 <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Federal calendar, 2030. The “Virtual Reality” technology, which had always been the focus of attention, had achieved an unprecedented breakthrough three years ago. The World Alliance used this as a foundation and gathered the wisdom of the world to develop an epochal virtual online game—”Divine Realm”! According to the World Alliance, the purpose of creating this game was to perfect the artificial intelligence’s lack of ’emotion’. So, any citizen who entered the game was contributing to human technology. On the other hand, to promote the game, the World Alliance had made a special announcement. The contents of “Divine Realm” were all operated by the “smart-brain”. No one could interfere. Furthermore, the gold coins in the game were linked to real money. Any gold coin could be exchanged for 1,000 dollars of real money. There were even online rumors that if the ‘Virtual Reality’ technology improved, it would reach the level of ‘Virtual Realism’ and bring everything in the game to the real world. The authenticity of the latter part could not be verified for the time being, but 100% simulated virtual games were still epochal products. Whether it was farming gold coins to earn money, enjoying the thrill of fighting in the game, or resting in the other world, they could attract countless players. Therefore, once this game was released, it attracted the attention of the entire world. The sales of the game equipment also exceeded 4 billion in a month! That made up half of the world’s population. As for the remaining half, it was not that they did not want to play the game, but the equipment was too expensive. The game equipment for “Divine Realm” was very expensive. Even the cheapest cost 100,000 alliance dollars. It was not something an ordinary family could accept. Lorne could not afford it. Three years ago, his sister, Roanna, suffered from a disease that was beyond medical understanding and was permanently unconscious. This was also the main reason for Lorne’s financial breakdown. All of his efforts over the years had been to make money to pay for her medical expenses, but unfortunately, that effort had not been enough. As of today, not only did Lorne not have any savings, but he even owed a huge sum of medical fees to the hospital, for a total of a million alliance dollars. According to the Federal Rights Law, if he could not pay 30% of the amount he owed by the end of the month, the hospital had the right to stop providing Roanna’s medical treatment immediately. ...; “Now…” “You are my last hope…” In the shabby and cheap rental room, the penniless Lorne was hugging a metal helmet with messy circuits. His eyes were filled with anticipation. This strange thing was the login helmet of “Divine Realm.” Although it had been badly damaged a month ago, the core was thankfully intact. So Lorne brought it home and tried to repair the damaged circuit so that it could be activated again. Of course, Lorne was still very nervous. Because he had no idea if he could log into the game with the ‘restored’ equipment. If this failed, then it was all over. “It’s impossible to earn 300,000 alliance dollars in half a month.” “Only the game ‘Divine Realm’ can save us now. According to the exchange rate, 300,000 alliance dollars is only 300 gold coins.” “If I can master the game well in the early stages, 300 gold coins shouldn’t be too difficult. If I’m lucky, I might be able to obtain high-level equipment and solve all the problems I face now.” Looking up at the yellow ceiling, Lorne’s eyes were filled with hope. The result of failure was something he dared not imagine. To him, this matter could only succeed, but it had to succeed! ...; After a while, it was 11: 59. There was less than a minute before the opening of “Divine Realm”. Lorne lay down on the bed and put on the crude iron helmet. He took a deep breath. Then, he turned on the power. The next second, an electronic voice sounded. “Ding! The game ‘Divine Realm’ begins now.” “Loading…” “Game loading complete.” “Identification complete. Logging in now…” The voice at the beginning were smooth, but when he was waiting to log in… Suddenly! An alarm sounded. “Beep! Beep! Beep! Beep!” “Anomaly detected, trying to analyze it….” Lorne’s heart sank. Unusual login? <i>‘Did they detect me?’</i>  Damn it! He had to succeed! Lorne gritted his teeth. He was extremely nervous. However, the alarm did not stop. It still sounded harsh. “Analysis failed, Analysis renewed…” “Analysis failed, Analysis renewed…” “Analysis failed, Analysis renewed…” “Beep—” “Analysis complete, abnormality denied. Determined to be a special login player.” “Detected that the player is a special login player. You will obtain an exclusive talent awakening opportunity.” Success! Lorne’s eyes narrowed. He could not hide his excitement. Although he did not know the meaning of ‘special login player’, being able to enter the game normally was already the greatest blessing of the Goddess of Luck. Taking two deep breaths, Lorne calmed down. Then, he looked at the light blue system panel. The next moment, a golden-red light burst forth. The brilliant light made it difficult to see. Lorne could only see through the gaps in his fingers to see what was in the light. ‘Is that… a wheel?’ Indeed! It was a golden-red wheel spinner! But before Lorne could read it, the golden-red wheel began to spin. Ten seconds later, the wheel stopped spinning. “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining a talent of unknown grade—[Monster Merging Simulator] (Unique).” Unknown grade? Unique? Anyone who played online games knew that “unknown” represented endless possibilities, and “unique” represented the only one in the world! Just from these two pieces of information, one could tell that he had obtained an incredible gift! Thinking of this, Lorne quickly opened the Talent Menu. The next moment. He gaped in astonishment. ———— Talent: [Monster Merging Simulator] Quality: ??? Effect: Capture or kill monsters to obtain various materials and use the simulator to synthesize and create a new, powerful monster. Synthesis Formula: [Prototype Monster] + [Body Part Material] = [New Monster]. (Note: Multiple materials can be added at once. The number of times the same material can be used is limited.) Rule 1: Synthesized monsters are considered summoning units. Their numbers are affected by the number of pet spaces available to the player. Rule 2: Synthesized monsters will obey their master’s commands. Rule 3: The prototype of a synthesized monster will largely determine the form of the new monster. Rule 4: The higher the compatibility level between the ‘prototype monster’ and ‘material’, the more superiority the final product would have, and the higher the attributes of the same type of monster. (1% Superiority = 1% Additional Attributes.) Rule 5: The synthesized monster cannot be given to others. It can only be released into the wild. ———— <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios He could actually merge and create monsters! It was too amazing. When he saw the effects of the planet, Lorne was shocked. As a player who had much experience in online games, he knew the value of this talent. To be able to merge monsters as he pleased, it was as if he had control over the game’s source code. It was a complete bug! While Lorne was still amazed at his gift, suddenly, he blacked out. When he regained his vision, Lorne found himself in an ancient temple. “Welcome, lucky one. You are about to enter the vast world of Divine Realm. Before that, please prepare yourself.” An old voice echoed in the temple. Lorne stood in the temple, looking around with a complicated expression. Honestly, he suspected that he was still on Earth. Otherwise, how could everything around him be so real? Lorne was confused, but could not find an answer. At this moment, a new system notification sounded. “Please choose your initial class.” At the sound, Lorne looked up at the six giant statues. They represented the six initial classes of the “Divine Realm”: Warrior, Mage, Archer, Priest, Assassin, and Summoner. The six classes each had their own characteristics. For example, the Warrior could tank and fight, the Mage had high DPS, the Archer could fight at long range, and others… If he had not awakened his talent, Lorne would have chosen to be a Warrior. This was because Warriors had high resistance and high damage output, they were the best choice for the solo players. Of course, the fact that Mages were efficient in killing monsters was also something that Lorne was very concerned about. However, this class was very costly in the early stages. Without enough money, it was impossible for him to catch up to other players in level. Initially, between these two classes, Lorne was still conflicted. But now that he had awakened his talent, all such thoughts were forgotten. Since the number of monsters merged had something to do with the Player’s pet space, there was only one choice for Lorne. That was to be a Summoner! Unlike other classes, Summoners had three pet spaces. As his level increased, the pet spaces of this profession would also gradually increase. If he wanted to be more powerful, he had to choose this class. “I choose to be a Summoner.” Lorne said firmly. “Ding!” “Congratulations on becoming an Apprentice Summoner!” “Please enter your name!” Two system prompts sounded. Thinking about it, Lorne said: “Tyrant!” With this talent, Lorne’s future strength would be brutal, and the name Tyrant was fitting. After naming, Lorne began adjusting his five senses. Because of this 100% realistic virtual reality game, there was no difference between what you felt in reality and what you felt in reality. If he started playing like that, he would be in so much pain when his skin and flesh were torn apart. He adjusted the five senses appropriately, especially the sense of pain and smell, to 10% and 50% respectively. 10% pain guaranteed a good combat experience, and 50% sense of smell was designed to reduce the impact of undead maps on the nose. As for the other senses, there was no need to adjust too much. “Enter the game!” After adjusting everything, Lorne eagerly entered the game. Now that the game had just started, countless players were fighting for time and trying to gain the upper hand. Lorne was no exception. Although he had the monster merging talent, he still did not have the confidence to make money. With that, a light poured down, and Lorne immediately vanished. ...; “Ding!” “Welcome to Beginner Village No. 2451.” “Congratulations on obtaining a Beginner’s Gift Bag (Summoner).” Once again, Lorne found himself in a small village surrounded by mountains and rivers. A cool breeze caressed his face. The refreshing feeling was even more comfortable than in reality. But now was not the time to enjoy it. Lorne quickly opened the gift bag. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining beginner’s supplies: Beginner’s Staff x1, Beginner’s Robe x1, Beginner’s Grass Shoes x1, Silver Coin x1.” All the new players only had three pieces of equipment. The last silver coin was the player’s initial funds. It was used to purchase potions. He put on his equipment and opened his attributes panel. ———— ID: [Tyrant] Class: Apprentice Summoner Level: 1 Talent: [Monster Merging Simulator (???)] HP: 100 / 100 MP: 100 / 100 Magic Attack: 20-40 Physical Attack: 10-20 Magic Resistance: 5 Physical Resistance: 5 Speed: 23 Attributes: Constitution 5, Strength 5, Spirit 5, Intelligence 5, Agility 5 Free Attributes: 5 EXP: 0 Possession: 0 Gold Coin, 1 Silver Coin, 0 Bronze Coin. ———— Pet Space: (Space 1) (Space 2) (Space 3) ———— These were Lorne’s attributes. The attributes of a Summoner were not very high, especially their resistance growth. They were the lowest among all classes. Fortunately, the Summoner did not have to fight by himself or pursue stats. As for the remaining five free attribute points? Lorne pondered. Most Summoners added points with the ratio: 3 Intelligence, 1 Constitution, 1 Spirit. 3 Intelligence was to increase their combat ability in the early stages. 1 Constitution was to protect them, and 1 Spirit was to endure so they could fight for long periods of time. However, he was different from ordinary people. He had a Monster Merging Simulator, so he did not need to raise his own combat strength. Therefore, he could add attributes to raise his health and resistances. After all, he was a Summoner. His life was the key. After some thought, Lorne decided: “3 Constitution, 2 Agility.” Not only would he have a decent amount of health, but his dodging abilities would also be pretty good. After dealing with the attributes, Lorne went straight to the square to find the village head. “The farmlands in the village are being harassed by a pack of demonized pheasants. If we do not stop them, the crops in the village will be wiped out. Young adventurer, are you willing to help the village?” The village head looked at Lorne pitifully. “Ding!” “Would you like to accept the beginner mission: [Kill the Demonized Pheasants]?” “Mission Description: Help the village head kill the demonized pheasants (0/30). Bring their beaks to the village head and you will be rewarded handsomely!” “Accept.” Lorne accepted the mission. However, as a Summoner with a merging simulator, his top priority was not to go out and farm monsters, but to create his own special pet. With that in mind, Lorne came to a less populated area. Then, he began to chant. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios In the game ‘Divine Realm’, there were rules for summoning pets. If one used ‘Instant Summoning’, the summoned pet would definitely have below normal attributes. If one summoned through incantations, the summoned pet would have better quality. The only drawback of the latter was that it would take some time. Fortunately, Lorne was not in a hurry. Compared to other players, he had the [Monster Merging Simulator]. As long as he spent more time on his pet, he would be able to make up for the difference in levels. With his eyes closed, he recited the complete spell and began to draw the summoning magic circle. Time slowly passed. Five minutes later. The summoning magic circle was completed. A brilliant light arose, enveloping the entire magic circle. At the same time, a ball of light appeared in the center of the magic circle. It was a summoned pet! “Ding!” “Congratulations on summoning a Slime (Normal)!” The system notification sounded. It seemed that Lorne was not so lucky. This time, he only summoned an ordinary slime, no different from other players. However, he did not mind the blob of sticky liquid. He believed that as long as it was synthesized, the little guy would be useful. Thinking, Lorne opened the pet panel. ———— [Slime] (Unnamed) Quality: Normal Level: 1 HP: 70 / 70 Physical Attack: 10-15 Defense: 5 Owner: Tyrant Skill: [Healing]: Absorbs 3% of the damage taken and turns it into HP. ———— It was as humble as the rumors said. As the most common low-level monster in the early stages of the game, the Slimes’ combat ability was really too low. Especially when it was only level 1. If not for the fact that the Summoner could summon three pets, he would not have been able to leave the village, much less kill monsters to level up. Lorne bent down and touched the bouncing blue creature. It was soft, like a water ball. What could he create by using such a weak little thing? If he used poison, it should be quite effective, right? There was a plan forming in Lorne’s mind. He was not in a hurry to leave, for there were still two slimes to be summoned. Twenty minutes later. Lorne left the area with the three soft blue creatures. ...; After crossing the street, Lorne arrived in front of the potion merchant. He opened the trading panel. There were only three types of potions in the beginner village: red, blue, and poison. Needless to say, the first two were common potions in every game. The final poison potion was prepared for the Assassin class players and to target Boss monsters. It had the effect of preventing monsters from healing. [Red Potion] (Price: 5 bronze coins): Regenerates 60 HP immediately and 2 HP per second for 30 seconds. [Blue Potion] (Price: 5 bronze coins): Regenerates 60 MP immediately and 2 MP per second for 30 seconds. [Poison Potion] (Price: 10 bronze coins): Deals 2 points of damage per second to the target for 30 seconds and reduces their healing by 20%. The poison potion was a little expensive. But the potion was what Lorne had been looking forward to. He quickly bought each of the three potions. Then, he quickly entered the alley. ...; “The monster synthesis formula is a basic monster prototype with appropriate materials.” “In that case, the monster prototype is the slime, and the material is this bottle of poison potion.” Leaning against the thick wall, Lorne muttered, then activated his talent. The next second, a special panel appeared in front of him with a system notification. “A monster prototype and a material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Slime) + (Poison Potion) = (???)” “The cost is 20 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” The upper half of the panel was the synthesis formula, and the lower half was the cost of the attempt. 20 bronze coins was completely acceptable. “Merge.” Without hesitation, Lorne said with certainty. In the next second, a complicated magic circle appeared under the slime’s feet. A pale blue light rose like a natural water screen. The poison potion turned into a purple light and entered the slime’s body. In the brilliant light, the slime’s appearance began to change. Other than its slightly larger body, the most obvious part was its appearance. The slime’s entire body had turned purple-black. There were even purple-black flames surrounding its body. Looking at it this way, one would think that it was a moving ball of poison, and that was true. “Ding! Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining an Elite Monster—Poisonous Slime.” ———— [Poisonous Slime] (Unnamed) Quality: Elite Level: 1 HP: 210 / 210 (140↑) Magic Attack: 30-60 (20-45↑) Defense: 15 (10↑) Superiority: 100% Owner: Tyrant Skill: [Healing]: Absorbs 3% of the damage taken and turns it into HP. Skill: [Poison Spray]: Spits out a ball of poison that deals 140% magic damage to the target and reduces the target’s health by 2 points per second for 30 seconds. (Poison effect does not stack.) ———— “Superiority of 100%!” Upon seeing the attributes, Lorne was pleasantly surprised. Just as he had expected, the slime and the liquid did not reject each other. They merged perfectly. 100% superiority meant that the pet gained an additional 100% stats. That was why the Poisonous Slime’s attributes were so terrifying. It had 210 HP and 30 basic magic attack. Even a normal level 3 monster would not be able to defeat this little fellow. “If it fuses with the poison potion, it will have the poisonous attribute.” “So if I use a red potion, will it become a mobile medical kit?” Lorne rubbed his chin thoughtfully. Thinking about it, he was a genius. Even a low-level monster like slime could become a necessity in battle. Unfortunately, pets that were synthesized could not be sold. Otherwise, the slime alone could make him a billionaire. Shaking his head and smiling, Lorne began the process again. “Ding!” “A monster prototype and a material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Slime) + (Red Potion) = (???)” “The cost is 10 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” 10 bronze coins? It seemed that the higher the quality of the materials, the more expensive the cost of synthesis. Lorne pondered and decided. Then, the same scene appeared. A complicated magic circle enveloped the slime, and the red potion turned into light and poured into it. This time, the slime turned completely fiery red. It looked like a beautiful and moving red gem. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Ding! Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining an Elite Monster—Vitality Slime.” “Congratulations on obtaining an Elite Monster—Magic Slime.” ———— [Vitality Slime] (Unnamed) Quality: Elite Level: 1 HP: 300 / 300 (230↑) Magic Attack: 10-20 (0-5↑) Defense: 5 (0↑) Superiority: 100% Owner: Tyrant Skill: [Healing]: Absorbs 5% of the damage taken and turns it into HP. Skill: [Healing Liquid]: Spits out a ball of healing liquid, healing the target by 100 HP immediately and 2 HP per second for 30 seconds. (Healing effects do not stack.) ———— [Magic Slime] (Unnamed) Quality: Elite Level: 1 HP: 170 / 170 (100↑) Magic Attack: 10-20 (0-5↑) Defense: 5 (0↑) Superiority: 100% Owner: Tyrant Skill: [Healing]: Absorbs 3% of the damage taken and turns it into HP. Skill: [Magic Liquid]: Spits out a ball of magic liquid, restores 100 MP immediately and 2 MP every second for 30 seconds. (Healing effects do not stack.) ———— Combined with the red potion, the slime’s HP was greatly increased. However, after using the blue potion, the slime’s attributes increased very little. The overall attributes were much worse than the other two. From the attributes of these panels, it could be seen that different materials had different effects on monsters. Therefore, in the future, he had to choose by considering the compatibility of the two. On the other hand, the combat strength of these slimes had increased. It was especially so for the Poisonous Slime. It was now the main combat member of the team. The other two pets were mainly providing it with support. “With these three slimes, there’s no need to buy supplies.” “Very good. Next, I can test the power of the Poisonous Slime. I can level up by killing monsters and walk towards glory!” Grasping a short wooden staff, Lorne headed out of the village. But at that moment, an armored female player passed by. Her gaze was inadvertently attracted by a very bright color. When she turned around, she immediately noticed Lorne leaving the alley. Then, the female player’s beautiful eyes quivered as she stared at the little group bouncing on the ground. Instantly, her mouth opened slightly and she gasped. Purple? Red? Deep blue? Heavens! Why were his slimes of various colors? As the leader of a large guild, she knew very well that the current Summoner players could only summon pets like the slime. Even if he was lucky enough to summon a mutated pet, it was impossible for all three to mutate. This was ridiculous. “No, I must make him join my guild!” The armored female player quickly rushed into the alley. She wanted to befriend the Summoner with the mutated pets. Unfortunately, by the time she caught up, the other party had already left the alley and blended into the crowd. ...; On the other side. With the short staff in hand, Lorne walked out of the village. The wheat field was in front of the village. There were many players and everyone was fighting over the limited number of Demonized Pheasants. Lorne also had the beginner mission that required him to kill 30 Demonized Pheasants. However, this place was obviously not suitable for farming monsters. He had to stay away from the other players so that he could encounter some chicks that were not being hunted. Lorne made his way to the edge of the forest. Soon, he arrived at the edge of the wheat field. If he continued forward, he would reach the terrifying forest region. There were many Level 3 monsters in the forest. The new players did not dare to approach. That was Lorne’s chance. ———— [Demonized Pheasant] Quality: Normal Level: 1 HP: 150 / 150 Physical Attack: 5-10 Skill: [Peck] ———— From the attributes panel, it could be seen that this was really a monster for the players to train. Other than having decent HP, the other attributes were nothing. There was no surprise about the outcome of battling an Elite-level Poisonous Slime. “I’ll use you to practice first.” “Fake Healer, take good care of it. Poison Spray!” As a Summoner, it was naturally impossible for him to get close to his opponent. He would leave these rough matters to the young ones who would do whatever he wanted. Upon hearing its master’s command, the Poisonous Slime immediately spat out a ball of purple poison. Splat! The poison spread over the demonized pheasant. -37 -2 Two damage numbers appeared one after another. The monsters in the Beginner Village did not have much magic resistance, so the magic output was impressive. “Caw! Caw!” Enraged, the demonized pheasant quickly charged at the Poisonous Slime. The greatest advantage in long-range combat was the range of the attack. How could it be so easily approached? The moment the attack was launched, Lorne had already commanded the Poisonous Slime to pull back. At the same time, the short staff was waved, and a blue magic bullet struck the monster. -15 -7 -5 The other two slimes were also contributing. Although their single damage was not high, together with Lorne’s basic attack, they still dealt 27 damage. The demonized pheasant had lost half its health by now. As for the Poisonous Slime, it bounced and moved with the monster. Once the skill had cooled, it immediately turned around and attacked. The pulpy poison clung to the demonized pheasant, damaging it. -37 -2 (Poison) -25 -7 -5 The skill cooldown of the Poisonous Slime was 5 seconds. In addition to the damage caused by the poison, the damage was more than 80. With the demonized pheasant’s health, there was no way it could withstand such an attack. So, not long after a series of attacks, the creature’s HP was completely drained by the poison. With a cry, it fell to the ground. “Ding!” “Congratulations to your pet [Poisonous Slime (Fake Healer)] for successfully killing a demonized pheasant. You have received 2 (+4) experience points.” Killing the monster gave Lorne 6 EXP, three times that of other classes. All of this came from the characteristics of the Summoner class. In “Divine Realm”, the Summoner’s EXP gain was different from other classes. Because he needed to level up his pet, every time the Summoner killed a monster, he would receive additional EXP. The specific rules were: [Summoner sends the first pet to battle. EXP+100%.] [Summoner sends the second pet to battle. EXP+50%.] [Summoner sends the third pet to battle. EXP+25%.] (Additional pets fixed at 25%) In other words, Lorne now had an additional 175% EXP gain! It was really awesome. Of course, it was not too early to rejoice. Because the Summoner’s level is tied to the pet’s level, when the Summoner reaches Level 10, all pets must also reach Level 10, or he would not be able to change class. Therefore, he still had a long way to go. With that in mind, Lorne squatted down and began to clean up the battlefield. At that moment, a special system notification sounded. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: [Demonized Pheasant’s Wings].” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios The wings of a demonized pheasant? Lorne, crouched near the corpse, paused. What he had just obtained was not a high-grade material, but this body part was very special. Wings! It corresponded to flying! Could it be that by using it, the monster could fly? Like… the slime? Eh? It was too beautiful to imagine. As a blob of liquid, the slime could not merge with the wings. The two were too different. Even if they were combined, the compatibility would be very low. Shaking his head, Lorne reconsidered. Finally, he looked at the other demonized pheasants. “If another demonized pheasant also gives me its wings, I will have four!” “Four wings…” “It sounds powerful!” Lorne nodded in agreement. In other books, there were always Four-Winged Angels, so when he thought of Four-Winged, he subconsciously felt that they were very powerful. It was not an expensive material anyway. He would just treat it as an experiment. With that in mind, Lorne attacked another demonized pheasant. In order to turn monsters into materials that could be synthesized, one had to reduce their HP to 5%, so that the simulator would determine that they were in a state of near death and were suitable for synthesis. Slam! Slam! Slam! The three slimes surrounded the demonized pheasant and quickly subdued it. At that moment, Lorne walked up. He decisively activated the merging skill. “Ding!” “Monster [Demonized Pheasant] has been confirmed as the prototype material. Please confirm other materials.” “Demonized Pheasant’s Wing.” There was only one part in Lorne’s bag. “Ding!” “A monster prototype and material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Demonized Pheasant) + (Demonized Pheasant’s Wings) = (???)” “The cost is 40 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” 40 bronze coins? It was not cheap. Lorne was a new player. After some expenditure, he only had 42 bronze coins left from his original 1 silver coin. Two bronze coins had been obtained after killing the pheasant. After some consideration, he used them. It would be easy to earn bronze coins in the future. After all, he could create powerful pets, so he did not have to worry about farming monsters. “Merge!” Lorne ordered. Then, a familiar light appeared. This time, the magic circle was more complicated. Perhaps due to the difference in the monsters, the difficulty of the fusion was also different. In the brilliant light, the pair of wings turned into light and poured into the demonized pheasant. Then, they gradually fused together. Soon, there were sounds of completion. “Ding!” “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining an Ordinary Monster—Four-Winged Demon Chicken!” Four-Winged Demon Chicken? It seemed to be something extraordinary. Lorne’s eyes lit up as he felt he got lucky. After all, the name ‘Four-Winged Demon Chicken’ gave off a very powerful feeling. Feeling a little excited, Lorne quickly opened the monster’s attributes panel. The next second, he froze on the spot. ———— [Four-Winged Demon Chicken] (Contract Possible) Quality: Normal Level: 1 HP: 160 / 160 (10↑) Physical Attack: 3-6 (2-4↓) Defense: 5 (0↑) Superiority: 5% Skill: [Peck]: Deals 120% damage to the target. Skill: [Four-Winged]: Due to the heavy weight of the wings, it is impossible to fly. Movement is severely affected. Movement speed -50%. Introduction: This is a Four-Winged Demon Chicken that evolved from a demonized pheasant. Due to the interference of the four wings, the beast is extremely weak. ———— Pfft— Lorne almost spat out a mouthful of blood. What was this? Where was the powerful creature? How did it become a deformed little chick? In the past, the monsters had improved. However, this time, not only did the attributes not increase, but they also decreased by quite a bit. The most severe decrease was the movement speed, which was reduced by half. It was as if it had broken a leg. “I was too naive.” Lorne shook his head and smiled bitterly. The loss of 40 bronze coins was heartbreaking. “I’ll kill this damned fellow!” Upon receiving the order, the slimes charged forward and attacked the Four-Winged Demon Chicken. The four-winged chick merely stood there and let out an innocent cry, as if it had done nothing but suffer a baseless torture. Gratefully, Lorne picked up the three bronze coins and the quest item, [Chicken Beak]. After cleaning up, he hurried forward. This time, he had to farm monsters and earn back the 40 bronze coins he had lost. Otherwise, it would be too uncomfortable. Lorne set his sights on the next demonized pheasant. Before the other players invaded this area, it was best for him to quickly obtain the 30 [Chicken Beaks] that he needed for the mission. Otherwise, fighting with others for the monsters would definitely cause a conflict and waste his time leveling up. ...; Slam! Slam! Slam! The Poisonous Slime worked tirelessly to attack one monster after another. The poison had given it a great boost, so it was no problem for it to fight alone. -37 -2 (Poison) -15 -7 -5 As damage was dealt, the demonized pheasant fell to the ground, giving him 6 EXP and 2 bronze coins. Equipment and skill books were the most valuable, but they did not drop. It was as if such items had a very low drop rate in “Divine Realm”. But that could not be helped. Lorne did not expect this to happen. With the help of the Monster Merging Simulator, he was confident that he could earn 300 gold coins in half a month with just his pets. Grateful to be behind his pets, he cleaned up the battlefield. Lorne picked up the coins from the wheat field. But at that moment, suddenly! A low growl came from the side. Lorne quickly looked up, his pupils immediately reflecting a hideous monster. It was a demonized hound. There was saliva on its white teeth and black patterns all over its body. Two blood-red eyes stared at him greedily, as if wanting to tear him into pieces. However, Lorne smiled upon seeing this. “Interesting, my new material is here!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Because of its proximity to the forest area, the Level 3 demonized wild dog managed to enter the wheat field known as the ‘safe zone’. Interesting. It just so happened that Lorne had completed his beginner mission. Now, before he returned to the village, he could have a good fight with the savage monster. ———— [Demonized Wild Dog] Quality: Normal Level: 3 HP: 400 / 400 Physical Attack: 25-37 Defense: 11 Skill: [Bite] Introduction: The demonized wild dogs wandering in the forest are very fierce. Their fangs are as sharp as blades. Be careful when you encounter them. ———— The attributes of a level 3 monster were really terrifying. 400 HP was higher than any of the pets under Lorne. Moreover, the upper limit of its physical attack was 37 points. Coupled with the increase in damage from the skill, it was normal for one hit to deal 50+ damage. To the current players, such monsters were nightmares. Even Lorne had to deal with this cautiously. Otherwise, if the other party seized the opportunity, he might very well die from the sharp teeth. “Fake Healer, use Poison Spray!” With the mentality of striking before the enemy, Lorne commmanded. With that, he quickly moved his legs and coordinated with his pets to surround the wild dog. Unlike facing the demonized pheasant, the opponent this time was even stronger. If they still used their previous attitude to deal with the battle, it was very likely that they would all die. Thus, it could be seen that Lorne grew very serious. Pfft— -31 -2 The Poison Sprayed as two numbers appeared. The Poisonous Slime was indeed the main force. Even against a level 3 monster, it could put up a fight. At the same time, Lorne’s staff also fired magic bullets. Boom! It was an accurate hit. Unfortunately, the damage was not high, only dealing 9 damage. The other two slimes were similar. Their damage output was in the single digits. But to his advantage, there were four of them attacking this time. Everyone could make a contribution. This was especially true for the Vitality Slime. It had a health bar as high as 300 points. Coupled with its healing effect, it could take a lot of damage. It was the best choice to tank in the front line now. “Howl!” The demonized dog let out a furious roar and quickly rushed towards the Poisonous Slime. It was the current DPS dealer, so all aggro was on it. But Lorne would not let that happen. “Little Doctor, obstruct it!” This was the name that Lorne had given the Vitality Slime. It was the opposite of the Poisonous Slime’s Fake Healer. Upon hearing the command, the little figure blocked the monster. Brutal fangs tore into its body, as pieces of red liquid splashed around. The Vitality Slime lost 32 HP and even its body shrank a little. This demonized wild dog’s damage was indeed very high. Fortunately, the little guy’s health was quite high, so there would not be any problems for a short period of time. At this moment, the poisonous slime that was protected at the back also attacked. All the poison struck the foe. -31 -2 -31 -2 -31 Every five seconds, the poisonous slime would attack. Although the frequency of its attacks was lower than that of the demonized wild dog, it was a long-range attacker. With the advantage of distance, it could reduce the number of times the opponent hit it. This was a test for Lorne as well. His commands were essential in this battle. With a good battle tempo, it could allow the strength of ‘1’ to unleash the combat strength of ’10’. Lorne had indeed succeeded in doing this. His accurate judgment made the attacks of the demonized wild dog repeatedly fall through. The entire battle seemed to be controlled firmly by the slimes and no effective attacks could land on them. About a minute later, as they fought back and forth, the demonized wild dog’s health rapidly decreased. Its health was as high as 400, but it could not even last for a minute before dying from the poison. “Ding!” “Congratulations to your pet [Poisonous Slime (Fake Healer)] for successfully killing a demonized wild dog. You have received 6 (+11) experience points.” A total of 17 experience points. In total, it was equivalent to three demonized pheasants. It seemed that forcefully killing high-level monsters was not a good thing. Although the experience gained from killing the demonized pheasant was low, it took much less than a minute. Additionally, it was easier to kill the demonized pheasant, there was no need to be so nervous. Lorne stretched his limbs, then began to clean up. To be honest, he was looking forward to the materials he obtained this time. He wondered what it would be. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: [Head of the Demonized Wild Dog].” The head of a demonized wild dog? Great! He wanted this material, for in his mind, there was a very bold idea that required this head. “There’s no rush to return to the village.” “Combining new pets is more important.” Lorne quickly gathered up the seven coins and rushed into the forest. Now he had to find another demonized wild dog. He would use it as a prototype. Together with the head in the bag as material, the final product might be the legendary Twin-Headed Hellhound! ...; “Found you, my little doggy!” Not long after entering the forest, Lorne found his target. Like the previous monster, this was a demonized wild dog. Although a level 3 monster was powerful, it could not escape from Lorne. “Fake Healer, treat your guest well!” Upon hearing the command, the poisonous slime directly shot out a ball of thick poison. Just like the previous battle, this time, it was mainly kiting the enemy. The demonized dog was unable to kill any of the enemies as the pets attacked in turns. A minute passed, it only had a little health left. At that moment, Lorne neared the beast. He directly activated the talent skill. “Ding!” “Monster [Demonized Wild Dog] has been confirmed as the prototype material. Please confirm other materials.” “Head of the Demonized Wild Dog.” Lorne took out the material from his bag. Then, the system interface popped up. “Ding!” “A monster prototype and a material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Demonized Wild Dog) + (Head of the Demonized Wild Dog) = (???)” “The cost is 120 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” Taking a deep breath, Lorne shouted, “Come out, Demon Hound from Hell!” However… The next second was very uncomfortable and awkward. “Ding!” “Insufficient bronze coins. Synthesis failed.” Lorne forgot that he had less than 70 bronze coins left. Damn it! He was clearly looking forward to it. What a waste of effort. With a disappointed sigh, Lorne had the poisonous slime use a mouthful of poison to kill the demonized wild dog. The level 3 creature brought him 7 bronze coins, a piece of fur skin, and a head of the demonized wild dog. After cleaning up the battlefield, Lorne quickly packed his things and ran in the direction of the village. With his savings and the reward for completing the mission, he should have 120 bronze coins. This meant that he could merge a new monster soon. Awesome! <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Young adventurer, thank you for your contribution to the village. This is your reward. Please accept it.” In the village, the old village head wiped the tears from the corners of his eyes. “Ding!” “Congratulations on completing the beginner mission: Kill the demonized chicken (30 / 30). Reward: +200 (+350) experience points, +100 reputation points, +200 bronze coins!” A beginner mission actually had so many rewards. It was a good harvest. Lorne continued asking: “Village head, is there anything else?” “No.” The headman shook his head, then thought of something. “It seems that the missionary of the temple has encountered something. Perhaps you can go and ask him.” The NPCs in virtual online games were not rigid. Many things could only be obtained by actively asking. This was a hidden rule that every gamer had to know. Receiving the hint, Lorne left the square. Across the noisy streets, he reached a sanctified sanctum and found the missionary within. “Young adventurer, thank you for your enthusiasm, but your current strength is not enough to accept this mission.” The missionary looked at Lorne solemnly, then took out another mission slip, “If you insist on accepting this mission, please come to me with the materials required.” “Ding!” “Congratulations on accepting the mission: Missionary’s Assessment.” “Mission Description: Kill 100 Stone Beetles alone within 48 hours. After completing the mission, you will receive the recognition of the missionary and a generous mission reward.” It was actually a time-restricted mission. Moreover, there should be an even bigger mission later on. Lorne took note of the location of the mission on the map. It seemed that the stone beetles were high-level monsters, and their activity area was in the deepest part of the forest. This could not be dealt with for the time being. Now, it was more important to create a pet. With that in mind, Lorne did not linger. He hefted his staff and went toward the forest. While on the way, he began to distribute the experience points on him. Because the frequency of changing pets in the early stages was very high, using EXP to raise pets would cause a huge waste, so he still raised his own level. “Ding!” “Congratulations on reaching Level 2.” “Congratulations on reaching Level 3.” Two consecutive golden lights poured down. Lorne had reached Level 3. To be able to achieve such results in an hour, he was already considered a high-level player. As for the attribute points he obtained… Lorne allocated them with the ratio of 3 Constitution, 2 Agility. [HP: 250 / 250 (100↑)] [Speed: 25 (2↑)] Then, he opened the skill tree. He had just leveled up twice and gained two Skill Points. In the first ten levels of “Divine Realm”, there were a total of three active skill columns. Apart from the initial “Magic Summoning”, he could also learn two other skills. However, the Summoner did not have many choices in the early stages. There was no need to spend points learning ordinary skills. After some thought, he chose [Agile Movement]. ———— [Agile Movement] Effect: Permanently increases movement speed by 10%. ———— This was a skill that could not be leveled up. It required 2 Skill Points to learn. Lorne felt it was cost-effective. For a skill like this that permanently increased attributes, even if he needed more Skill Points, he had to learn it. Because it would add to his strength, even after he got to a higher level. After doing this, he glanced at his attributes again, but did not feel that his strength had increased. It might be because of the Summoner class. A class that relied on pets to fight definitely had ordinary attributes. Fortunately, that was not what he relied on. Right now, he only cared about the result of the pet synthesis. With the existence of ‘Superiority’, every time he created a monster, there were infinite possibilities. Perhaps one day, a wonderful idea would really grant him a very powerful legendary monster. At that time, he would no longer have to worry about medical fees. ...; With that in mind, Lorne plunged back into the forest. In a pile of bushes, he found a cute demonized wild dog. He ordered the Poisonous Slime to fight. Soon, the battle ended. With a trace of health left, the demonized dog warily watched the approaching Lorne. Before it could strike, it was enveloped by the magic circle. Then, Lorne pulled out another head of the demonized wild dog. He placed it into the synthesis template. “Ding!” “A monster prototype and a material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Demonized Wild Dog) + (Head of the Demonized Wild Dog) = (???)” “The cost is 120 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” Looking at the notification, Lorne took another deep breath. This time, he had to succeed! “Come out, Demon Hound from Hell!” The atmosphere of the summoning ritual was perfect. With a loud cry, the head of the demonized wild dog transformed into light and fused with the original monster. In the light, its size increased. The height, which was originally only half a meter tall, had now increased to one meter! And it had two heads! “Ding!” “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Elite Monster—Two-Headed Demon Hound!” With that, a huge two-headed dog appeared in front of Lorne. Its entire body was covered in black patterns. Its limbs were strong, and it had two terrifying beast heads on its head. Both of them looked in one direction with arrogant gazes, and they emitted the dignity of kings. “Looks like it succeeded!” “What are its attributes?” Lorne was pleased with its appearance, but he looked forward to its attributes more. He opened the information panel. ———— [Two-Headed Demon Hound] (Contract Possible) Quality: Elite Level: 1 HP: 600 / 600 Physical Attack: 38-56 Defense: 17 Superiority: 75% Skill: [Double Bite]: Each head can deal 140% damage to the target. Introduction: This is a Two-Headed Demon Hound mutated from a demonized wild dog. Its two heads do not affect its movements at all, while making it even stronger. ———— So powerful! The attributes on the interface were beyond his expectations. This was only a Level 1 monster, but its basic attributes were much stronger than a Level 3 demonized wild dog! Health, attack, and defense had a huge lead in all aspects. Moreover, this monster had the [Double Bite] skill. It could deal 280% damage per use. It was unbelievable. With its damage output, basically no monster of the same level was its match. Coupled with the assistance of the Vitality Slime, even if it challenged monsters above level 5, it had a high chance of winning. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios He intended to make a pact with the powerful Two-Headed Demon Hound. But as pet space was limited, he had to give up one current pet. He thought about it. In the end, Lorne broke his pact with the Magic Slime. Then, he quietly watched the dark blue figure leave. He did not kill it. In any case, it had fought for Lorne before. Would it not be too inhumane to kill it with his own hands? “Work hard to survive. This world is very interesting.” Lorne murmured. Then, he led the Two-Headed Demon Hound into the forest. He had to find a few more demonized wild dogs and replace the slimes around him. Although these slimes had their own uses, their aptitudes were limited, so they could not keep up with Lorne’s growth. The appearance of the Two-Headed Demon Hound was the signal to replace them. Pushing aside the shrubbery ahead, he quickly located his target, a new demonized wild dog. This was a good opportunity for the Two-Headed Demon Hound to display its strength. <i>Go! Tear it apart!</i>  Having received the command, the Two-Headed Demon Hound charged forward. Even if it was facing a monster stronger than itself, it was fearless. Aggro was received when both sides were 10 yards away from each other. The demonized wild dog let out a roar and charged at the Two-Headed Demon Hound. The fur on its body stood on end as it opened its mouth and bit down! Pfft— Blood splattered. In just the first round, the demonized dog was injured. The Two-Headed Demon Hound’s had the Double Bite skill. It could deal 280% damage. Coupled with the upper limit of 56 points of attack, the final damage was very terrifying. -55 -59 The total damage was 114 points. With the 400 health points of the demonized dog, there was no way to resist it. Under the tearing and bleeding scene, the demonized wild dog fell to the ground in pain, no longer as ferocious as before. “Time taken: 15 seconds!” “The efficiency of killing is four times faster than that of a poisonous slime!” From this result, it was obvious that Lorne was not heartless in abandoning his pets. It was simply due to the great difference in attributes between pets. Lorne touched the head of the Two-Headed Demon Hound, then crouched down and picked up the bronze coins. Finally, he placed his hand on the monster’s corpse and prepared to collect the materials. Unfortunately, he obtained the [Demonized Wild Dog’s Tail] this time. It was of little use and was directly abandoned. But just as he was about to leave… It was as if Lorne had touched something hard again. He took it and saw that it was actually an equipment. ———— [Wild Beast Bracer] Grade: White Iron Type: Armor Defense: +5 Level Requirement: 3 ———— This was an armor equipment, but the Summoner was a cloth-armored job. He could not enjoy the attributes brought by the equipment. He should keep it for selling. Taking all the loot, Lorne moved on. His target was still the demonized wild dog. It would be too easy for the Two-Headed Demon Hound to kill the other party. But Lorne also noticed a problem. It was the health of the Two-Headed Demon Hound. After a few battles, its health points had already been depleted by half. If it wanted to recover all its health points by itself, it would need at least ten minutes. Fortunately, there was the Vitality Slime beside it. This little creature spat out the red mucus on the Two-Headed Demon Hound. In the next second, its entire body glowed green, and its health points rapidly recovered. “Looks like I need to keep this mobile medical kit.” “A combat team without logistics can’t persist on the battlefield forever.” With that in mind, he commanded his pets to fight. Ten minutes later. Lorne activated his skill again, he wanted to create a second Two-Headed Demon Hound. But just as he was about to merge them… He suddenly stopped. “It seems that a synthesized monster can add more than one material.” “In that case, can I add in another head?” Another bold thought occurred to Lorne. It seemed that in other books, there were many descriptions of the Three-Headed Hellhound. It seemed to be a legendary creature. It seemed that he could really give it a try. If it had the [Triple Bite] skill, the monster’s damage output would definitely be greatly increased. With that in mind, Lorne paused the process. He commanded his pets to continue the slaughter of the demonized dogs, then quickly located the third head. Then, he used the skill. “Ding!” “One monster prototype and two materials have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Demonized Wild Dog) + (Head of the Demonized Wild Dog) + (Head of the Demonized Wild Dog) = (???)” When the merging panel appeared, a red warning panel also appeared. “Ding!” “Warning! Multiple same materials have been added. The amplification effect of the merging will decrease, while the resistance of the merging will increase. This will affect the degree of compatibility between the materials. Please choose carefully.” The system’s notification came very suddenly. From the warning above, there was a lot of information. First of all, adding more body parts would not necessarily make the product stronger! In addition, fusing the same material together would increase the resistance when merging, thus increasing the probability of failure. The result was obvious. Lorne’s plan to infinitely add more parts to the monster was ruined. However, after some consideration, he decided to give it a try. Even if he failed, he would only lose some bronze coins. If he did not test it out, he would be conflicted. “I’m sure.” Lorne said firmly. The next second, another notification popped up. “The cost is 240 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” It could be seen that the cost of this synthesis had doubled again. This was not good news. Initially, the cost of creating the Two-Headed Demon Hound was only 120 bronze coins, but now, it was 240. It was extremely expensive. Lorne looked at his savings helplessly. Including the loot from killing the monsters, he only had 251 bronze coins now. “I wonder what kind of combat ability it would have after using 240 bronze coins.” Lorne grinned. He had already made up his mind. He took a deep breath and shouted, “Come out, my Three-Headed Hound from Hell!!!” As soon as he finished speaking, a grand magic circle appeared under the feet of the demonized wild dog, and the other two heads turned into light, beginning to change the entire form of the demonized wild dog. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios In the forest, since the light disappeared three minutes ago, there was no movement here. Lorne said nothing. He stood there for several minutes. If one followed his gaze, they would see a monstrous creature. It had three monstrous heads and was as large as a bull. Overall, it looked imposing. However! As the cause of all this, Lorne could not be happy. “Can I get 240 bronze coins by killing it?” That was what he had in mind. If not for the lesson from the Four-Winged Demon Chicken last time, the three-headed monster would have already suffered inhuman treatment and died on the ground. According to his previous calculations, the amount of bronze coins dropped after killing this monster should not exceed 20. In this case, he had already lost a total of 220 bronze coins. He had to kill 30 demonized wild dogs to make up for the loss. “Forget it, I’ll keep it for now, it’ll work to repay the debt.” He shook his head. The fusion did not go as smoothly as he imagined. Other than having three heads, the three-headed demon hound’s attributes were not up to expectations. Especially the agility attribute, the difference between the two was huge. ———— [Three-headed Demon Hound] (Elite) HP: 450 / 450 Physical Attack: 40-50 Defense: 20 Superiority: 55% Skill: [Chaos]: Unable to control the senses of the three heads at the same time. Unable to use skills properly. ———— After fusing three heads, not only did he not obtain the [Triple Bite] skill, but he even confused the monster’s brain. Therefore, the final result was… The beast had no skills! Fortunately, this guy’s other attributes were not bad. Although it was worse than the Two-Headed Demon Hound, it was much stronger than ordinary demonized dogs. He could only let it work to redeem itself. As long as it earned 240 bronze coins, he would consider sparing its life. “Get to work, you owe me a huge sum.” With a wave of his hand, the useless three-headed hound coordinated with the Two-Headed Demon Hound to slay monsters. No matter what, it was much stronger than the poisonous slime. However, as he watched the creature’s directionally erratic steps, it was clear to him that he would no longer try to create such a creature in the future. ...; -55 -57 -29 -33 -35 Damage numbers popped up on the demonized wild dog’s head. It could be seen that the two demon dog pets commanded by Lorne were very fierce. Their bloody mouths tore at the flesh of their enemies. The scene was very bloody. If other players saw how he killed the monster, their eyeballs would probably roll on the ground. This efficiency was unimaginable to other players, especially for the solo players. With their current combat strength, they could only try to fight the demonized wild dog by forming a team. Even so, their efficiency was extremely low. They were not on the same level as Lorne. However… Lorne did not feel anything. He was immersed in the joy of cleaning up the battlefield. Bronze coins, fur, and equipment were all exciting loot. During this period of time, there were countless spoils of war in Lorne’s bag. There was even quite a lot of equipment. The system interface was also filled with combat information. Soon, two golden lights poured down. After reaching Level 5, his attributes had increased significantly. The higher the attributes of a Summoner, the better their adaptability in special situations. Especially when killing monsters in this forest, the pets did not have to worry too much about their master’s safety. They could do whatever they wanted. While distributing attributes, the two pets continued to kill the monsters. “Ding! You have killed a demonized wild dog…” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” The small army of pets swept through the forest, killing countless monsters. Then, Lorne would remove part of their bodies. Therefore, there were all kinds of hideous corpses left at the scene. Almost none of the corpses of the demonized dogs were intact. ...; At the same time, a group of excited figures appeared at the edge of the forest. “Demonized wild dogs, we’re here!” “Prepare to die, you ugly monsters!” “I’ve completed the [Kill the Demonized Pheasant ]mission and gained 200 bronze coins. That’s awesome!” “On the black market, the price of one gold coin is 5,000 dollars. We must seize this opportunity to earn more money!” “That’s right! Everyone, do your best!!!” The new players had completed their beginner mission from the village head and received 200 bronze coins. They were all very excited. Someone had sold these bronze coins for 100 alliance dollars! To most people, earning 100 alliance dollars in an hour was simply a dream. Furthermore, it was income from playing games. As a result, countless players poured into the Divine Realm now, instantly creating an extremely huge market. Those large corporations valued this huge cake. They organized countless employees to enter the game to build a virtual business empire in the game. However, when this group of players entered the forest, they were all stunned. There should have been countless demonized dogs wandering in the forest, but now, there were corpses everywhere! Not a single one was complete! “What the f*ck!” “This is too sick!” “Who exactly dug out the hearts and heads of these monsters?” “This is completely inhumane.” “What the heck? What happened here?” “I don’t know. It’s impossible for a player to do that.” “Everyone, run! This place is too terrifying. There might be terrifying monsters wandering here. We can’t be their match!” The players trembled in fear as they looked at the corpses. No one dared to enter the strange forest. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Ding!” “Congratulations on reaching Level 6.” After staying in the forest for a period of time, Lorne’s level had reached Level 6. In ‘Divine Realm’, the higher the level of the player, the more experience points would be required. For players like Lorne, they needed 900 experience points to level up. At least 52 demonized wild dogs needed to be killed in order to level up. Calculating based on the continuous grinding speed, it would take half an hour. To other players, gaining one level in half an hour was very efficient. But to Lorne, it was too slow. After all, he needed to earn 300 gold coins in half a month. If he relied on his current efficiency, he would never be able to complete his goal. He knew very well that he had to raise his level as soon as possible and use that advantage to earn benefits from other players. Otherwise, to him, such days of owing money were too torturous. With that in mind, he left the forest. He planned to go to a higher-level location. Currently, most of the players were entering this region. Even if he stayed here to kill monsters, he would not be able to snatch many of them. It was better to leave early and go deep into the resource-rich forest alone. “Rock Valley?” Opening the map, he focused on a dark area. Because of the Missionary’s Assessment, Lorne had to kill a hundred Stone Beetles, which were gathered in the Rock Valley to the northwest. ...; Half an hour later, Lorne emerged from the thick foliage. Standing at the edge of the forest, what appeared before him was a canyon covered in rocks. Looking up at the towering mountains on both sides, Lorne was certain that this had once been a bottomless river. But now the river was dry, revealing a rocky riverbed. The stone beetles listed in the mission were in this huge valley. Crack! As he pondered… A rock nearby suddenly made a sound. Lorne quickly looked over and saw that the rock was cracking. From the crack, limbs stuck out. ———— [Stone Beetle] Quality: Normal Level: 5 HP: 800 / 800 Physical Attack: 25-35 Defense: 50 Skill: [Rock Body]: Resists 50% of physical damage. Introduction: A rock-type lifeform. Because its entire body is made of rocks, it has a powerful defense. Ordinary swords are unable to harm it. ———— “This is troublesome.” The sight of the creature gave him a headache. Although the opponent was only a Level 5 monster, what was shocking was that its health points were as high as 800 points! What was even more terrifying was that its [Rock Body] skill also made it immune to 50% physical damage. Coupled with 50 defense points, which player could kill such a monster alone? Even the Two-Headed Demon Hound behind Lorne could not break through such a terrifying defense. Therefore, there were only two choices before him. <i>1: Leave now and increase the pets’ level before coming back.</i>  <i>2: Create a monster that deals magic damage.</i>  Both options were feasible enough. But there was not much time for Lorne to solve the problem. Therefore, he decisively chose the second option. “The most powerful defense of the Stone Beetles is physical defense, but in the face of magical damage, physical defense will immediately be useless.” “But the only question is, what kind of monster do I make?” Lorne considered. When he came to this region, he encountered many types of monsters. Many of them were magic-type creatures. However… Lorne had to find the right choice. The health points of the Stone Beetles were too high. If he used magic attacks to kill them one by one, it would consume a lot of time. He had to find a monster that dealt AOE damage. However! In the early stages of the game, monsters with AOE moves were rare. He had to carefully choose among the monsters he had only seen once. Suddenly! His eyes lit up. “Found it!” Lorne looked pleased as he murmured. He remembered that he had encountered an ugly but suitable monster on the way to the Rock Valley. With this in mind, he immediately left the valley and rushed into the forest. Then, he began a carpet search for a land of depression. According to his memory, the monster should be nearby. But it was good at disguising itself. If one did not look closely, one would easily miss it. After searching for ten minutes, Lorne finally saw something. “There it is!” Not far away, there was a dark green toad. Because its body color was the same as the forest, it took Lorne two attempts to find its trail. [Poisonous Toad] This was a monster that did not actively attack. But if it was harmed, the poison sacs on its back would spray poison that would harm the target. Thus, even though this monster was extremely ugly, as long as it was used properly, it would definitely be of great use. While he was thinking, the Two-Headed Demon Hound had already subdued the monster with its companions. Now it was Lorne’s turn. He had to think of a way to let this monster gain high defense. Otherwise, it would not be able to withstand the attacks of so many stone beetles. As for how to create it? He already had a plan. He picked up a few ores from the ground and opened the synthesis template. “Ding!” “A monster prototype and material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Poisonous Toad) + (Ordinary Rock x5) = (???)” “The cost is 120 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” Although it was only an ordinary rock picked up from the ground, it should be able to give the monster enough defense. Lorne was confident. He immediately chose to confirm it. A familiar magic circle appeared, enveloping the poisonous toad. Then, the rocks turned into yellow light that entered his body. Unlike before, this fusion seemed to be even more thorough. The yellow light completely enveloped the poisonous toad, as if it wanted to transform its entire body. Soon, the light dissipated. The ugly poisonous toad had also transformed. The poison sacs on its back had turned to stone, as if a stone statue had cracked. This was not what he had planned. Fortunately, there was still poison spurting out from the cracks between the rocks. The poisonous toad’s greatest weapon was still usable. At the same time, he heard a pleasant reminder. “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining an Elite Monster—Stone Skin Poison Toad!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios ———— [Stone Skin Poison Toad] Quality: Elite Level: 1 HP: 500 / 500 Magic Attack: 30-50 Physical Attack: 25-37 Defense: 28 Superiority: 83% Skill: [Stone Skin]: Resists 10% of physical damage. Skill: [Spew Poison]: After receiving an attack, the Stone Skin Poison Toad will spew poison on the surrounding targets, causing 40% magic damage and additional poisoning effect. Reduces the target’s health by 3 points per second. Duration: 10 seconds. ———— Seeing the attributes, Lorne was pleasantly surprised. He did not expect that the monster he created this time would have 83% superiority! Among the possibilities, this was likely a lucky attempt. Of course, from the interface data, this monster’s attack attributes were even lower than the Two-Headed Demon Hound. But that was not the point. Most importantly, the Stone Skin Poison Toad had 28 points of defense. With such a high defense, it could survive the attacks of the stone beetles with the treatment of the Vitality Slime. In addition, the [Spew Poison] skill was also very important. An AOE skill was a powerful weapon that could effectively kill stone beetles. But then again… The Stone Skin Poison Toad was too ugly. Moreover, its combat ability was limited. Other than being able to effectively restrain the stone beetles, it had no advantage against other opponents. Therefore, Lorne only treated it as a temporary helper. After completing this mission, he would still choose to give up on this ugly guy. “Let’s go, Poison Toad. Let’s go compete with those strange rocks!” Lorne said as he led his new pet away from the forest. In order to contract this pet, he had removed the contract with the ‘Three-headed Demon Hound’. The dog that made him waste 240 bronze coins had finally used labor to redeem its damned life. ...; Soon, Lorne returned to the Rock Valley. This time, he came with absolute confidence. “Gather the Stone Beetles.” Lorne commanded the Two-Headed Demon Hound to draw the surrounding stone beetles together. As an agility-type monster, the Two-Headed Demon Hound had high movement speed and could easily dodge the attacks of the stone beetles. “Go on, you ugly little guy. It’s time for your performance.” Seeing that the Stone Beetles had gathered, Lorne immediately retreated with the Two-Headed Demon Hound, leaving the main battlefield to the Stone Skin Poison Toad. However, the Stone Skin Toad could not win against five Stone Beetles alone. It needed the Two-Headed Demon Hound to take a share of the attacks at the critical moment and the Vitality Slime to recover its health. As for Lorne, he was a magic damage dealer and could help out a little. On the battlefield, the Stone Skin Poison Toad lay there without any movement, but one could see that the rocks were all pressed together on its body, making it look like a carved stone. Its strategy was very clear, it would defend on the spot. Creak! Creak! Provoked, the Stone Beetles moved their limbs, emitting the sound of rocks colliding. Finally, they reached the Stone Skin Poison Toad and surrounded it, their entire body shrinking back before suddenly pushing forward. [Collision], the Stone Beetle’s attacking method. This scene looked clumsy, but the attacks were unbearable for most players. -3 -5 -5 -3 -1 The five monsters only dealt 17 damage to the Stone Skin Poison Toad. This was because the Stone Skin Poison Toad had the [Stone Skin] skill, and it could resist 10% physical damage. Coupled with its 28 points of defense, all the attacks of the stone beetles could not break through its defense. Moreover… Due to the attack, the Stone Skin Poison Toad used [Spew Poison]. The fragment behind it cracked open, and dark green poison splattered on the surrounding stone beetles. -15 -15 -15 -3 (Poison) ...; A series of damage numbers appeared. As a monster with high physical defense, the magic resistance of the Stone Beetles was almost zero. Facing the non-lethal poison, they lost a lot of health points. Especially the subsequent “Poisoning” effect, it would take away 3 health points from the Stone Beetles every second. The poisoned Stone Beetles immediately went crazy, attacking the Stone Skin Poison Toad fiercely. The damage they dealt per round of attack was 17 points. Within 30 rounds, the toad would be killed. However, they had no hope of doing this. This was because when the Stone Skin Poison Toad’s health decreased by 100 points, the Vitality Slime next to it would immediately spit out a pool of mucus and heal 60 health points directly, while also adding a continuous recovery effect. In this way, the Stone Skin Poison Toad could always maintain a safe amount of health. Of course, the health of the Stone Beetles decreased very slowly. After a minute, they only lost a quarter of their health points. Fortunately, this was group damage. With five Stone Beetles injured at the same time, the overall efficiency of killing monsters was quite good. About four minutes later, the health points of the Stone Beetles was finally emptied. Under the power of the poison, the Stone Beetles crumbled, becoming a few huge rocks and completely losing their lives. “Ding!” “Congratulations to your pet [Stone Skin Poison Toad (Unnamed)] for successfully killing a Stone Beetle. You have received 10 (+18) experience points.” “Ding!” “Ding!” After killing the monster, he gained 28 experience points. After killing five, he gained 140 experience points. According to his current efficiency, he only needed ten minutes to raise his level to Level 7. But strangely… He had just killed five monsters, but none of them dropped any “body parts”. “Are there no materials in them?” Lorne could not help but think of this. For him, who had the Monster Merging Simulator, the “body part material” that the monster dropped was completely different from the ordinary rocks on the ground. If he wanted to create a powerful monster, he had to use the ‘body parts’ he obtained from other monsters. Otherwise, the improvement would be limited. For example, the Stone Skin Toad that had fused with ordinary rocks only received 10% physical damage immunity. While the Stone Beetle’s [Rock Body] had 50% physical damage immunity. The difference between the two was obvious. Lorne also valued this super defensive trait. Unfortunately, no matter how hard he searched, he could not find what he wanted. Even if he smashed the rock, he could not find anything. As he thought, a new battle began. In less than five minutes, five more stone beetles shattered. As he went to clean up the loot, suddenly, the system notification sounded! “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the material: Rock Fragment.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Lorne took out a rock fragment that glowed dull yellow from his pouch. This was a ‘body part material’, very different from ordinary rocks. The Stone Skin Poison Toad beside him jumped in front of Lorne. Its dark green eyes landed on the rock fragment, as if it knew that it was a good thing. Lorne shook his head and smiled. Don’t look at how naive this fellow was. At this moment, it was really smart. It actually took the initiative to run up and ask for a reward. But Lorne did not agree, for the fragment was too rare. When he created the Stone Skin Poison Toad, he had used five rocks to give it the [Stone Skin] skill. If he wanted to increase its defense again, he had to accumulate at least five ‘rock fragments’. Otherwise, there was not much meaning in fusing them. There was also the fear that the merging would cause its [Spew Poison] to be replaced. Without it, the toad would lose its value. Therefore, he did not want to test such a pointless attempt. “Let’s get to work first.” “After completing the mission, I will reward you.” With a wave of his hand, he led the group deeper into the valley. ...; In the following period of time, with his pets, Lorne repeated his strategy. The Two-Headed Demon Hound was responsible for attracting the monsters to gather, the Stone Skin Poison Toad was responsible for the main battle, and the Vitality Slime was responsible for providing continuous healing. As for himself, because he was a Summoner and did not have any [Intelligence], his damage output was too low. Therefore, he became a useless onlooker in the entire battle. Fortunately, the Stone Skin Poison Toad’s farming efficiency was quite good. It could kill five Stone Beetles in about five minutes, gaining 140 EXP. The other gains were also very generous. Despite a lack of materials, a Stone Beetle would drop 12 bronze coins, which was a considerable amount. In addition… Stone Beetles had a higher equipment drop rate than other pets. This might be because the stone beetles were too hard to kill. When ordinary teams encountered such monsters, they would basically avoid them. After all, the magic damage dealt by players was low and the cooldown was long. It would take too long to kill a Stone Beetle. ...; “Ding!” “Congratulations on reaching Level 8.” “Congratulations on reaching Level 9.” “Congratulations on reaching Level 10.” “Warning! As you are a Summoner, your level has been locked. Please raise your pets to Level 10 and enter the main city to complete your Class Advancement.” In the three hours of fighting, three golden lights fell on Lorne. His level had reached 10. This was the highest level that one could achieve in the beginner village. If he wanted to continue leveling up, he had to go to the main city of the game and find a professional mentor to change his class. After changing his class, he could obtain experience points again. There was still a gap between the Summoner class and other classes. After the Summoner reached Level 10, they had to increase their pets’ levels. Otherwise, the player’s level could not be unlocked. He knew that rule. However, the demand for pets to level up was too high, making him feel a little depressed. In the “Divine Realm”, pets also needed experience points to level up, and the requirement for level-up was higher than players. This was especially so for high-quality pets. Take the three pets of Lorne as an example. [Vitality Slime] (Elite), [Two-Headed Demon Hound] (Elite), [Stone Skin Poison Toad] (Elite) All three pets were of Elite quality. However, due to their different strengths, the EXP requirement was also different. Among them: [Vitality Slime] required twice the experience of Lorne. [Two-Headed Demon Hound] required four times the experience of Lorne. [Stone Skin Poison Toad] required thrice the experience of Lorne. For a player, Level 1 → Level 2 required 100 experience points. Then, in their case, it was: 200, 400, and 300 experience points respectively. It was a huge problem that could not be solved easily. Just looking at the experience data in front of him made him feel despair. However, many people still chose the Summoner, simply because the future belonged to them. After all, the attributes of pets were higher than players. Moreover, they had more skills and a larger attack range. Although they needed to level up several times more than the players, based on their combat strength, one would realize that their strength would also be several times that of the players! Most importantly, a Summoner could also carry many pets! Once in the later stages of the game, the quality of the Summoner’s pet would increase, and the ability of the Summoner players to suppress other professions would increase significantly. “Then, which pet should I raise first?” Looking at the three pets fighting, Lorne fell into deep thought. Firstly, the Stone Skin Poison Toad was not suitable for leveling up. It was designed to target the Stone Beetles. In the Rock Valley, it was more useful than any pet. However, against other monsters, the Two-Headed Demon Hound’s farming efficiency was clearly much higher than it. Secondly, the Vitality Slime was not very suitable too. Its quality was too low. Even if he raised its level, the attribute growth would not be very high. Of course, low quality meant that the need to level up was small and could quickly increase its level. Unfortunately, that was not what he sought. What he wanted was enough combat strength. Neither the Stone Skin Poison Toad nor the Vitality Slime could achieve this. Even the Two-Headed Demon Hound was barely passable. After all, it was a monster formed from a level 3 demonized wild dog. Its attributes were limited. There was no way for it to deal with battles involving Level 10 and higher. “It looks like I need to change a batch of pets as soon as possible. It’d be best if it’s a Level 10 high-quality monster.” Lorne had already figured out the rules of the ‘Monster Merging Simulator’. Under normal circumstances, the higher the level of the prototype monster and the ‘body part material’, the stronger the monster would be. This was an iron rule. However, he did not have a good direction now. In order to choose which monster to merge, he had to explore a higher-level map and obtain the final conclusion after encountering the monster. But now, he had to return to the village first and take what the missionary had called a difficult task. But as he prepared to leave… Suddenly, a grand system notification sounded in the sky. “Ding!” “Beginner Village Notification: Due to the appearance of the first Level 10 player in Beginner Village No.2451, the Boss [Slime King] has arrived. All players from Beginner Village No. 2451, please head to the entrance of the village to assist in guarding against it.” “Beginner Village Notification: All players from Beginner Village No. 2451 will automatically receive the limited-time mission [Protecting the Village]!” “Mission Success: All players in this Beginner Village will receive a large amount of rewards.” “Mission Failure: All players in the Beginner Village will lose one level of experience and receive a debuff of -50% EXP gain. Duration: 6 hours.” “...;” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Boss fight?” When Lorne—who was preparing to leave—saw the banner in the sky, he was also shocked. He did not expect that such a huge thing would happen after he reached level 10. The announcement disrupted his plan. He could not return to the village to submit his mission now. That was because he would have to face a Boss-level monster when he returned. But the pets behind him were not strong enough to stand against it. Furthermore, that was the first boss in the entire Beginner Village. The other large guilds would definitely be watching. Under such circumstances, it was too difficult to obtain the first kill. “I have to create a batch of stronger pets!” Lorne rushed into the depths of the forest. There was a higher-level map in that direction. As for the mission failure against the boss, he did not need to worry too much. After all, it was an event boss in the Beginner Village. It was extremely rare and every Beginner Village only had one. If players wanted to kill it, they would probably need hundreds or thousands of people working together. It was not too late to snatch the kill at the last moment. During this period of time, Lorne had to find pets he was satisfied with. If the conditions allowed, it was best to raise the pet’s level as well. With that in mind, Lorne did not pause. He led his pet deeper into the forest. In the process of moving forward, Lorne opened the internal browser of the “Divine Realm”. There was a dedicated live-stream room inside that could check on the actual situation at the village entrance. [No. 2451 Beginner Village, Silver Snow Guild challenges the Slime King!] He found the relevant live stream and clicked on it. ...; “That can’t be. There is already a Level 10 player in Beginner Village No. 2451?” “How is that possible!” “The strongest player in our village is only Level 6!” “How lucky. Beginner Village No. 2451 is the first to fight this boss. This is the chance to become famous!” “If we get the first kill of the boss, we’ll be rich!” “Don’t think too much. This kind of boss is the target of large guilds. Unaffiliated players can’t even touch it.” The live stream was very lively. Countless players in the Beginner Village were watching this battle. Looking at the live stream, the first thing that caught his eye was a gargantuan slime. It glowed a deep blue and had a strange crown on its head, as if an enraged king sought to conquer the backward village. The Slime King looked very weak, but its performance in battle shocked everyone present. It only used three attacks to kill the strongest guard in the village. Then, it began to slaughter the villagers. The players who cooperated with the NPCs did not dare to get close, because this Boss only needed one skill to kill a large number of players. The one who provided this vision was a member of the Silver Snow Guild. It was a special guild composed entirely of female players. In front of this camp, Lorne saw a slim figure. She wore white armor and held a silver sword in her hand. She weaved through the monsters’ attacks and counterattacked at the right time. He did not expect a female player to be so powerful. Lorne’s eyes brightened, but that was all. He would not give up his goal just because his opponent was beautiful. On the contrary, if her beauty hindered him, he would destroy the beauty mercilessly. “I hope that doesn’t happen. After all, I want to be kind-hearted too…” ...; Looking at the live stream, Lorne walked deeper into the forest. The simple straw sandals stepped on the moist ground. A cold feeling passed through the sole of his feet, causing him to shiver. In this moist region, there were many high-level creatures. Lorne did not let any of them go. He sent his pets after the creatures, then took some of their body parts. Ten minutes later. Twenty minutes later. Thirty minutes later. Time passed very quickly. As he hunted in the forest, the number of monsters he killed was already uncountable. Unfortunately, he still did not find a suitable pet. Fortunately, he obtained a huge amount of experience points. This trip was not in vain. However, he did not recklessly use the experience points. He wanted to save them for the next pet. Only by letting this powerful pet reach a sufficiently high level would it have a chance to help Lorne snatch the boss from the hands of countless players. Just as he was about to cross the hill, he suddenly stopped. There seemed to be something in the forest ahead. That was a… Bull? Lorne did not see the figure clearly. In the dark forest, he only saw a huge bull’s horn. However, with its size and aura, it was obvious that it was not a low-level monster. Lorne raced after it, pausing just long enough to survey the monstrous form. It was indeed a bull! At this moment, it was wandering in the forest. However, it was obvious that it was not an ordinary bull, but a minotaur! After being infected by a special power, its entire body was greatly enhanced. The demonized ox-headed figure gained an even more magnificent body. On its arms, extremely strong muscles could be seen. Thick beast fur covered its entire body. There were also sinister fangs and scarlet eyes. No matter how one looked at it, they would feel the savage power of the demonized figure attacking them. This monster was simply too powerful. It caught Lorne’s eye immediately. “Little fellows, let’s get to work!” Lorne commanded as he chose to attack. The pets quickly surrounded the enemy. After leaving [Rock Valley], the Two-Headed Demon Hound became the main attacker again. Its [Double Bite] could cause huge damage to the target. Bite! Bite! The Two-Headed Demon Hound’s teeth sank into its target. -33 -35 Two numbers showing successful hits flew out. However, such an attack did not hurt the minotaur at all. Instead, it seemed to be provoked and became even more violent. The minotaur let out a roar as its huge bone club struck the Two-Headed Demon Hound with extremely violent force. Crack! The sound of bones cracking could be heard. The Two-Headed Demon Hound was also sent flying more than ten meters away. -95! The terrifying damage floating in the sky nearly reached three digits. This was terrifying. But it was normal. After all, it was a high-level monster and looked so special. It was obvious that it was not easy to deal with. Looking at everything, the corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up, and he casually opened the monster’s attributes panel. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios ———— [Minotaur] Quality: Normal Level: 10 HP: 1300 / 1300 Physical Attack: 80-100 Defense: 31 Skill: [Power]: Increases attack by 25 points. Skill: [Charge]: Charge in one direction. After hitting the first target, stop moving. Causes 1 second stun and deals 140% damage to the target. Introduction: The bull-headed figures wandering in the forest have become stronger and more violent after being corroded by the demonic energy. ———— What powerful attributes! No wonder it could deal such high damage to the Two-Headed Demon Hound. Its health had already reached 1,300 points, and its attack power was even more terrifying. With the upper limit of 100 Attack Points and the additional 25 Attack Points from the skill, one club could directly deal more than 100 points of damage. It was very terrifying. “If I had such a pet by my side, no one in the Beginner Village would be able to stop me.” “Very good. Little fellows, attack in turns!” This time, Lorne joined the fray. His magic attacks would have some effect on the minotaur, but more importantly, he had to constantly give commands to his pets, otherwise he would lose this fight. The best solution now was to encircle it! Using the Two-Headed Demon Hound’s agility and speed to slow the enemy’s movements, the Stone Skin Poison Toad was responsible for dealing damage and interfering with the minotaur’s movements. As long as they cooperated well enough, he believed that they could easily win the battle. [Double Bite]! [Spew Poison]! [Magic Bullet]! A few skills hit the minotaur, but the damage was less than 70. To kill this minotaur with 1,300 HP, he had to fight extremely carefully for several minutes. Fortunately, the health points of the pets were quite good. Two-Headed Demon Hound had 600, Stone Skin Poison Toad had 500, Lorne had 550, and the Vitality Slime had 300. The total health of the team had already surpassed that of their opponents. Moreover, the Vitality Slime could still heal them, so there was no need to worry. “Roar!” A huge bone club swung back and forth, but it could not deal fatal damage to Lorne and his pets. Under the healing of the Vitality Slime, it could basically maintain its health above 70%. Instead, under Lorne’s command, the minotaur’s health plummeted. In less than two minutes, the minotaur’s health bar had fallen to 10%. At this moment, Lorne began to control the rhythm of his attacks, preventing the monster from accidentally dying. Soon, the minotaur’s health dropped below 5%. Lorne immediately used the system. “Ding!” “Monster [Minotaur] has been confirmed as the prototype material. Please confirm other materials.” Synthesize with what? He had prepared for that already. He took out a battle axe from his bag. He threw it into the template. “Ding!” “A monster prototype and material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Minotaur) + (Crude Battle Axe) = (???)” “The cost is 500 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” The fees increased again! 500 bronze coins was definitely not a small amount. But Lorne was glad to see the figure, for the higher the cost, the better the result. Therefore, without any hesitation! “Merge!” As soon as he finished speaking, 500 bronze coins disappeared from his bag. But at the same time, an even more intricate magic circle appeared. The crude axe did not fly directly into the minotaur’s hand, but instead turned into a familiar light that infused into its body. The minotaur’s appearance changed slightly in the light, and the bone club in its hand gradually transformed into a battle axe. “Ding!” “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Elite Monster—Giant Axe Minotaur.” ———— [Giant Axe Minotaur] (Contract Possible) Quality: Elite Level: 1 (0/500) HP: 800 / 800 Physical Attack: 50-70 Defense: 20 Superiority: 80% Skill: [Powerful Battle Axe]: Increases attack power by 40 points and unleashes a heavy slash on the target with 150% damage. Skill: [Charge]: Charge in one direction. After hitting the first target, stop moving. Causes 1 second stun and deals 150% damage to the target. Introduction: A Giant Axe Minotaur that has mutated from a minotaur. The sharp battle axe has given it even more terrifying power. Do not provoke it, or you will be chopped into mincemeat. ———— These attributes were too powerful! It had 70 Physical Attack at Level 1. What would happen if it was raised to Level 10? Looking at the panel in front of him, even Lorne was shocked speechless. He could not imagine that a Level 1 Elite Monster could actually have such an incredible interface data! Health Points: 800, Attack Limit: 70, and even Defense: 20! But that was not all. The most terrifying thing was the Giant Axe Minotaur’s [Powerful Battle Axe] skill. It increased attack by 40 points and dealt 150% damage! Which monster of the same level could withstand such a terrifying outburst? “Let’s first sign a contract.” All the creatures that he had created could be directly contracted. However, he only had three slots. He had to give up one pet and assign the spot to the Giant Axe Minotaur. There was nothing to think about. The Stone Skin Poison Toad could be sent back to nature in advance. It was not that it was useless, but it was too ugly. Shaking his head, Lorne let it go. At the same time, he fulfilled his previous promise and used the ‘rock fragments’ to evolve the Stone Skin Poison Toad. In the end, its attributes improved slightly, but no new skill appeared. ...; After sending the toad away, Lorne looked at his new pet. The Level 1 Giant Axe Minotaur was not very big. It was only 1.5 meters in height, and looked very short. Moreover, it seemed to be a little slow-witted. At this moment, it was looking at Lorne with its large eyes, and the ferocity from before was nowhere to be seen. Looking at the beast skin armor on its body, although the thick and long beast fur was retracted, the savage aura was still revealed from the two-meter-long battle axe and the majestic muscles. “Let me see how much you’ll change after you level up.” Lorne nodded, then began distributing the experience points. The experience needed to level up an elite monster was very high, especially the Giant Axe Minotaur. It was five times more than that of himself! Just advancing from Level 1 to Level 2 required 500 experience points. It was simply a bottomless abyss. However, when the golden light landed on it and he saw the change in its attributes, Lorne immediately felt that the 500 experience points spent was worth it! <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Ding!” “You used 500 experience points to raise your pet [Giant Axe Minotaur] to Level 2.” [Health: 1000 / 1000 (200↑)] [Attack: 62-88 (12-18↑)] [Defense: 25 (5↑)] [...;] After leveling up, the statistics of the increase appeared on his interface. Seeing this scene, Lorne froze on the spot. He even suspected that he had seen wrongly. It was only a level increase, but its attributes had increased so much. Just its health points had increased by 200 points! How was this possible! To be honest, as the master, Lorne was jealous. In comparison, every time he leveled up, he would only have 20 Health Points, 5 Attack Points, and 3 Magic Attack Points. It was too sad in comparison. However… There was one thing to note. The level up experience value went from 500 to 1500! Rising to Level 3 actually required so much experience. Lorne could not help but wipe away his cold sweat. The experience points he had accumulated previously was 1715 points, but it could only raise the Giant Axe Minotaur to Level 2. It was only then that Lorne truly felt the pressure brought about by the level requirements of a high-level pet. This was only an elite pet, but it already needed so much experience. What would happen if it was a Bronze or even higher Boss? Lorne could not imagine. Fortunately, after seeing the powerful attributes of the pet again, the grudges in his heart disappeared. “What should I name you?” Lorne wanted to give it a domineering name, but he was bad at naming. He gave up after only three seconds. “Your name is Minotaur One!” “Go! Use your skill, Powerful Battle Axe!” With a wave of his arm, Lorne gave the order. Although the Giant Axe Minotaur’s body was very small, its attributes were not inferior to a Level 10 minotaur. Moreover, it had an extremely powerful offensive skill. It was not a problem to fight alone. Slash! The huge axe slashed down! The sharp edge of the axe tore through the enemy minotaur’s tough hide, slicing through its flesh and spilling hot blood. -143 A monstrous damage number appeared. It was only a Level 2 pet, but the axe in its hand dealt 143 damage to a Level 10 monster. It was a startling sight. If other players saw this scene, their jaws would probably drop to the ground. “Roar!” Not to be outdone, the minotaur retaliated with its skill. However, its damage was much worse than that of the Giant Axe Minotaur. It only dealt 71 damage. Lorne did not watch them fight. Now that there was an event going on, he had to hurry. It would be best if he could raise the pets by a few levels before returning to the village. As for more merging? He could not. This was because fusing such a pet required 500 bronze coins. He could not earn so much money in a short time. ...; As time passed… Powerful Level 10 monsters died under the siege of the other two pets. The attacks of the Giant Axe Minotaur were too powerful. With the help of the Two-Headed Demon Hound, the efficiency of killing was very high, and the EXP value was rising crazily. Half an hour later. An hour later. After farming for more than an hour, he looked at his bag. He had already collected 63 [Bull Horns], which meant that he had killed 63 [Minotaurs] and earned 3,300 experience points. In the meantime, Lorne used 3,600 experience points to level up the Giant Axe Minotaur. The current Minotaur One had already reached Level 4. The upper limit of its attack was also 103 points. It was very domineering. As for the loot, Lorne obtained seven pieces of White Iron and one Bronze equipment. ———— [Wild Shoulder Guard] Grade: Bronze Defense: +7 Constitution: +2 Introduction: A wild hunter’s armor that is stained with the blood of wild animals. ———— The attributes of the equipment were not bad, and it could give Lorne some defense. There were also two White Iron items that could be used. Lorne had already equipped them. Although the attributes did not increase much, to new players, no matter how little the attributes were, it was still better than nothing. After arranging his equipment, he opened the character interface. It seemed that he had not taken a close look at his attributes since leaving the village. ———— ID: [Tyrant] Class: Apprentice Summoner Level: 10 Talent: [Monster Merging Simulator (???)] HP: 560 / 560 MP: 300 / 300 Magic Attack: 48-96 Physical Attack: 23-46 Magic Resistance: 14 Physical Resistance: 55 Speed: 27.2 Attributes: Constitution 55, Strength 5, Spirit 5, Intelligence 5, Agility 26 Free Attributes: 0 EXP: 915 Possession: 0 Gold Coin, 1 Silver Coin, 23 Bronze Coins. ———— Pet Space: [Vitality Slime] Level 1 (0 / 200) [Two-Headed Demon Hound] Level 1 (0 / 300) [Giant Axe Minotaur] Level 4 (0 / 2400) ———— These were Lorne’s attributes. It could not be said to be very outstanding, it could only be considered mediocre. After all, his attribute points were: 3 Constitution, 2 Agility. On the other hand, the Summoner’s resistance and speed growth were not high, so his attributes seemed a little too ordinary. Fortunately, Lorne’s pets were invincible. They were enough. After dealing with these things, Lorne looked at the live-stream again and realized that the Slime King was killing crazily in the village. In order to seize the kill, the new players were using suicidal attacks to resist it. Under the crazy barrage, the Slime King’s health had already decreased to about 10%. The gamers should have given up after more than an hour. After all, if they died like this, they would lose too many levels. But the problem was… None of them dared to give up. After failing the mission, everyone would receive a debuff. In the next six hours, their experience and income would decrease by half! Once this happened, everyone in Beginner Village No. 2451 would advance slower than other villages. At that time, they would have even less hope in competing after reaching the main city. Therefore, those large guilds had no way out. They could only use the players’ level to forcefully exchange for the Slime King’s health and obtain victory regardless of the consequences. With that, Lorne hurried back to the village. In ‘Divine Realm’, the killing of the Boss did not depend on the output, but on who could deal the final blow. Therefore, Lorne was determined to take down this boss. If someone fought over it, then, sorry, Lorne would not hesitate to slay him! <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios By the time Lorne returned to the village, it was already in ruins. Dust billowed everywhere. The guards of the village took part in the battle. In the end, the corpses of the NPCs filled the entire village alley. One by one, Lorne looked over and finally saw the corpse of the missionary in the corner of the wall. The NPC who issued the mission was dead! Tsk! The death of an NPC meant that the mission could not be submitted. Naturally, he could not obtain the mission reward. Lorne could barely contain his emotions after seeing this. Fortunately, missionaries were ‘functional NPCs’ of the village. Even if they died, they would be revived in the temple after 12 hours. In other words, he still had hope of obtaining the mission reward. However, he had to wait for 12 hours. With a heavy sigh, he headed toward the village square, where he saw the culprit of the missionary’s death. It was a huge Slime King. Its entire height was more than two meters. When it bounced on the ground, it covered a range of at least ten meters. Many players could not dodge in time and were eventually wrapped in liquid and suffocated to death. Instead of pushing his way through the hundreds of people, Lorne opened the forum and found a picture of the boss that someone had posted. ———— [Slime King] Grade: Special Boss Level: 10 HP: 9,551 / 100,000 Magic Attack: 240-320 Physical Defense: 130 Magic Defense: 100 Skills: [Sticky Spray], [Powered Jump]. Skill: [Healing]: Absorb 25% of the damage and turn it into health points. Skill: [Summoning of the King]: Summons 50 small slimes. Consuming one will recover 200 health points. If killed, the small slimes will explode and cause 100% magic damage to the target. Introduction: When it senses the appearance of powerful adventurers in the nearby villages, the Slime King will take the initiative to attack this village and kill all those who endanger its rule. ———— It was no wonder they had to fight it for so long. When he saw the Slime King’s skills, he knew why. First of all, [Healing] was a skill that any Slime would have. However, ordinary Slimes would not absorb more than 5% of the damage. However, this powerful Boss-level Slime could absorb 25% of the damage and turn it into health! Coupled with the ability to summon monsters to recover, it was harder to kill it. At this moment, hundreds of players were surrounding the Boss and attacking it. -53 +38 -33 +37 -200 (Critical) +75 ...;. Every time it was attacked, a green healing number would appear on the Slime King’s body. Coupled with its high defense ability, its health points did not decrease much at all. There were even players with lower strength who attacked, causing it to recover its health points instead. This was because the current players were only Level 6. The highest attack among them was only at 110 points. Moreover, in the high-intensity battle, many top players lost their levels, causing their attack power to decrease further. In this case, there was not much effective combat strength. Fortunately, there were NPCs around to help them. Those high-level players did not need to face the Boss head-on, so the situation could be stabilized. Right now, the Boss still had more than 9,000 health points, so Lorne was not in a hurry to act. Instead, he found a more suitable space to set up a stall to sell his equipment. After farming in the forest for so long, there were indeed a lot of equipment that needed to be dealt with. It just so happened that all the players were in the square now, so he even saved the money to advertise in the chat channel. ...; “What’s going on? What’s that guy thinking? Everyone’s attacking the boss, but he’s actually setting up a stall?” “Selling things in a place with such a large flow of people, he really has a talent for business.” “He knows he has no hope of killing the boss, so he does this instead.” “What a joke. What can a new player sell?” “He should be a rookie!” In such a chaotic battlefield, everyone was abnormally nervous. However, at this moment, they discovered a player setting up a stall. This immediately caused the surrounding people to laugh. They did not think that a new player would have good items. ...; Not far away, as the main combat force against the Boss, the Guild Leader of [Silver Snow Guild] “Twinkle Rose” was commanding the guild’s high-level players to attack the Boss. However, at this moment, she saw a strange player in the corner of the city wall selling equipment. Was it him? Twinkle Rose’s beautiful eyes quivered. That guy seemed to be the one she had seen in the alley. A special player with three mutated pets! With that in mind, Twinkle Rose could no longer remain calm, for she had sent people to search for the other party for a long time, but to no avail. Now that she had finally encountered a ‘suspicious figure’, she naturally had to go up and investigate. Twinkle Rose put away her thin sword and retreated from the center of the battlefield, walking towards the corner of the city wall. As she neared, she saw the equipment shimmering on the ground. Her beautiful pupils dilated as she opened her mouth. Even her breathing quickened. A glowing piece of equipment! It was Bronze grade! Twinkle Rose looked at the various equipment on the ground and was even more shocked. [Rock Armor] (Bronze) [Wave Sword] (Bronze) [Forest Robe] (White Iron) [Exquisite Bracer] (White Iron) [Crude Warrior Leg Guard] (White Iron) ...; The drop rate of equipment in “Divine Realm” was very low. This was a rule that every player knew. Not to mention Bronze weapons, even White Iron weapons were treasures that players needed to fight for. And in this stall, there were actually two Bronze items and 17 White Iron items! There was also a Bronze-grade longsword among them. This was the equipment that made the Twinkle Rose’s heart beat faster. For a swordsman, a high-grade battle sword was a treasure that could not be missed. Furthermore, they were currently attacking the boss. If she could equip this longsword with excellent attributes, the chances of snatching the boss’s first kill would be higher. Twinkle Rose’s chest pounded. She felt as if she was about to see her name appear on the system announcement. Taking a deep breath, Twinkle Rose calmed herself down. But at that moment, her gaze swept across the equipment level, and in the next second, she could not help but gasp. “This is a Level 10 equipment!!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Looking at the level of the equipment in front of her, Twinkle Rose’s eyes widened. She could not imagine how a new player could obtain such high-level equipment. The level of the equipment dropped would never surpass that of the monster. For example, a level 5 demonized wild boar would only drop equipment at or below level 5 after killing it. There would definitely not be any Level 6 or higher equipment. Which meant… This player had once killed a Level 10 monster before obtaining these items! But how could that be? “I want all these equipment. How much?” Twinkle Rose was filled with curiosity, but she was very rational. She did not ask recklessly, because everyone had their own secrets. If she asked rashly, it would only cause the other party to be disgusted. “White Iron equipment, 20 silver coins.” “Bronze equipment, 2 gold coins.” Lorne stated his price, his eyes studying the other. She was indeed a perfect beauty. Her long red hair was tied up, and on her exquisite face, there was a pair of beautiful fiery red eyes. Her arrogant gaze was filled with admiration and surprise when she looked at Lorne. Under that rough light armor, there was a fiery figure. On her slim waist, there was a simple female-style sword and a slightly exquisite body shape. With such an attitude, she would not be inferior even to the most beautiful celebrity in reality. “I want them all. It’s a total of 7.4 gold coins. But I don’t have that many game coins now, so I can only give you real money. But don’t worry, the price I quote is the highest on the black market. 5,000 alliance dollars for 1 gold coin.” Despite being stared at like this by Lorne, Twinkle Rose did not dodge at all. She spoke extremely confidently. As for the price, 37,000 Alliance Coins to purchase two bronze items and some white iron items was actually quite expensive. However, it could not be helped. If a guild wanted to gain an advantage in the early stages, they had to buy their equipment at a high price to compete for the game’s dominance. However… At this moment, Lorne shook his head surprisingly, “I’m sorry, but I only want in-game coins. Or, you can trade health potions for them.” Only in-game coins? Twinkle Rose paused. She could not imagine why the other party wanted so many in-game coins. Did he have his own guild? Other than forces who needed to develop, other players would not give up the real life currency that was five times as valuable and convert them into in-game coins… “Alright, I’ll give you the game currency, but you have to wait for me. 7.4 gold coins is not a small amount.” Twinkle Rose said. At this moment, an inappropriate voice sounded. “Brother, sell me these equipment. I’ll pay 10 gold coins!” The person who spoke was a warrior player in armor. There was an ID floating above his head, [Unparalleled Domination]. He was extremely arrogant and looked like an insolent rich second-generation heir. Seeing the other party approach, Twinkle Rose clearly turned cold. Unparalleled Domination did not care at all. At this moment, he cared more about the equipment on the ground. Every piece of Bronze equipment was a strategic resource. He could not let them fall into the hands of the enemy guilds. “10?” Lorne was pleasantly surprised. The two guild leaders had taken a liking to these items at the same time. Now, it was a good opportunity for him to start a bidding war for them. With that in mind, Lorne put on a troubled expression, “Since you both want it, why don’t we do it this way? The equipment will be given to the highest bidder. What do you say?” “You—” Twinkle Rose gritted her teeth. They had just agreed on the price, but this guy suddenly changed his mind. How detestable. The beautiful guild leader was very angry, but she quickly sighed to herself. She could not blame Lorne. After all, he had not agreed to sell it to her just now. If she really wanted to blame someone, she could only blame herself for not bringing enough gold coins. Otherwise, there would not have been so many troublesome matters. “I offer 11!” Twinkle Rose bit her red lips. “My Domination Guild offers 12!” “13!” “14!” “15!” The two guild leaders opposed each other, neither willing to give up. In other games, the Domination Guild had a deep-rooted foundation. When faced with a new faction, they displayed their might very well. However, Twinkle Rose was not to be outdone. She did not have any fear of the guild and even pushed the price to 15 gold coins! When the price reached this level, Unparalleled Domination did not continue bidding. It was only tens of thousands of alliance dollars, this was nothing to a large guild. However, they were still in the Beginner Village now. Gold coins were an extremely important resource. If they spent too much, it would severely affect the efficiency of the guild players’ leveling up. Thinking of this, Unparalleled Domination walked up. “Brother, sell me your equipment. In the future, you will be a friend of the Domination Guild. In this game, no matter who you provoke, my guild will help you deal with them.” “But if you sell it to the Silver Snow Guild, you’ll be our enemy. At that time, a million people will be your enemies. This game will probably not be playable for you.” He stared at Lorne with a hint of threat in his tone. “Don’t be afraid of him. The ladies of the Silver Snow Guild can protect you in the future.” Twinkle Rose immediately stood up. The two guild leaders were at odds with each other, as if they were about to fight at any moment. The onlookers sympathized with Lorne upon seeing this. Because no matter who he chose, he would offend another force. According to the style of large guilds, they might take revenge soon. At that time, he might not even have the chance to leave the Beginner Village. If he had to choose, that Domination Guild should be the best choice. Simply because the Silver Snow Guild was not so violent, they might not secretly take revenge on him. But the result was unexpected. Without hesitation, he said to Twinkle Rose, “10 gold coins and it’ll be yours.” Hearing this, Twinkle Rose raised her exquisite chin and revealed a victorious smile, “Tyrant, it seems that you have good taste. Our Silver Snow Guild does have more potential than the Domination Guild. Choosing us to be partners is the best decision.” “You’re overthinking it,” Lorne cut off the oddly confident female guild leader. He had no idea why she was so confident but he answered: “I sold it to you because you are bigger, but that doesn’t mean we’ll be partners. Don’t think about it. Let’s hurry up with the deal.” At first, Twinkle Rose did not understand, but when she realized that he was referring to her huge breasts, her delicate face turned red. She gritted her teeth and cursed in her heart. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios He had said those words because he had no choice. Lorne did not want to ally with anyone, and he did not want to cause trouble for the other party because of him, so he tried to pull their relationship further apart. However, he did not expect the beautiful guild leader to hate him now. “Damn you, if not for the fact that you sold your equipment to me, I will definitely let you have a taste of being chopped into pieces!” Twinkle Rose bit her lip and glared at him. However, despite being stared at, he did not feel any sense of danger. Instead, his eyes lit up as he studied her with interest. She was actually quite beautiful after all. At the same time, Unparalleled Domination stood at the side and looked at the two of them flirting, he was in an awkward situation. He had clearly said some harsh words earlier, but in the end, these two only knew how to exchange glances with each other and simply did not take him seriously. Unparalleled Domination roared angrily, “Very good! Tyrant! The Silver Snow Guild as well! Be careful, I’ll remember you. You’d better not be caught by me, or else I’ll make sure you regret ever offending me!” “Have you watched too many anime shows?” Lorne ignored him. He just did not think that anyone would say such an awkward thing in this day and age. What an incredible sight it was. Unparalleled Domination, who was about to leave, heard this and was so angry that his entire body trembled. He gnashed his teeth so hard that they almost shattered. If not for the fact that there was the Twinkle Rose beside him, he would have immediately turned around and torn that evil brat into pieces! On the other side, after receiving the gold coins, Twinkle Rose walked over and completed the transaction. “Don’t worry, Tyrant. Although you’re not a decent guy, this is a conflict caused by the Silver Snow Guild. The sisters in the guild and I will protect you from bullying. Or if you want, you can level up with us. How about it?” Twinkle Rose looked confidently at Lorne, awaiting his answer. In her opinion, no one could reject this invitation, especially men. As she said this, Lorne was being watched enviously by everyone. Everyone present knew that the Silver Snow Guild was like heaven. Every member of it was a top-notch beauty. If they could fight monsters together, it would be the dreamiest thing in the world. However… Lorne looked exasperated. What did she mean by not a decent guy? <i>I used to be a young master too!</i>  “I don’t need women’s protection.” “Also, we only made a deal. Please don’t have too many concerns, and don’t covet my handsome looks.” Lorne rejected the beautiful guild leader’s invitation. He knew very well what this woman was thinking. Firstly, she stepped out of the battlefield and walked directly toward him, proving that she had already noticed him. Secondly, she definitely had a reason for inviting him to form a team with her. Most likely, she wanted to figure out his background through forming a team, and a small probability was to rope him in through forming a team. But whatever the reason, Lorne did not want to fall for her tricks. In short, having no contact and acting alone was the best way to do things. “Tsk! Who is coveting your looks? How shameless, how narcissistic!” Twinkle Rose bit her lip and looked angry. However, before she left, she still threw something at Lorne. “If you have equipment for sale in the future, just let me know.” With that, the beautiful guild leader entered the battlefield again. Lorne looked at the potion in his hand and discovered that it was a high-quality tool. Before the deal, he had mentioned that she could use Recovery Potions to exchange. However, he did not expect this beautiful guild leader to really have one. Furthermore, she gave it to him for free. ———— [Alchemy Potion] Quality: High Effect 1: After using it, the target will recover 500 HP and 500 MP. Effect 2: Damage reduction of 10%. Duration: 5 seconds. ———— Seeing the effect, Lorne was pleasantly surprised, this was the potion he was thinking of. It provided health and mana. If he used this potion to fuse with the slime, he would be able to obtain a moving supply station. His ability to do prolonged battles in the wilderness would be greatly improved, and he could even be said to have unlimited resources! Just thinking about it made him excited. “Very good. I have gold coins and the potion with me now. I’m just short of a good slime.” Lorne looked at the center of the battle, at the Slime King, who was slaughtering. Indeed! That was his goal. As a Boss-level monster, the merging definitely required a large amount of gold coins. It was also because of this that Lorne did not want real currency earlier. Closing his stall, Lorne squeezed into the crowd. After an intense battle, the Slime King’s health had fallen to less than 6,000 points under the frenzied attacks of the players. It was almost below 5%. Seeing this health bar, all the players went crazy. The Boss was already at the final juncture. As long as they could snatch the final blow, they would obtain a huge amount of experience points and rewards. Moreover, this was the first Event Boss in the entire server. The rewards would definitely be extremely high. Countless players who were watching joined the battle and attacked the Boss crazily. But at that moment, the players of large guilds who were originally at the center of the battlefield tacitly stopped attacking the boss and started to turn their blades towards the rogue players. Instantly, countless screams sounded. Starting from the areas occupied by several large guilds, all the rogue and small guild members suffered a terrible blow. Although there were more rogue players, they only wanted to protect themselves. They did not want to organize a resistance. In the end, the battlefield was completely occupied by large guilds. About seven or eight forces surrounded the boss, among them were the Silver Snow Guild and the Domination Guild that Lorne had just met. Although there were many Beginner Villages in the game “Divine Realm”, in this Beginner Village, a few famous guilds still gathered in groups of 200 to 300 people. There were more than a thousand people in these guilds in total. But they fought no more. It was as if all of them had agreed to it. At this moment, they were all targeting the Boss, but they did not use their full strength. Although the Boss’ health was less than 6,000, it would take them at least ten minutes to deplete it. Therefore, the guild players were still calm and attacking rhythmically. The Slime King’s health also slowly decreased. 5,400! 5,300! 5,200! 5,100! The Slime King’s health decreased gradually and was about to reach 5% of its health. At this moment, in a corner that no one was paying attention to, Lorne held his short staff and activated the Pet Summoning skill. After the magic circle flashed, a wild-looking creature appeared in the square. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “What’s that?” When the magic circle appeared, the surrounding players noticed it. They had seen magic circles before. However, the strange thing was that the summoning formation was so huge that even the runes on it were abnormally complicated. It was obvious that this was a powerful magic circle. “Look! There’s something inside!” “Is this summoning magic?” “That’s not right. How can there be such a summoning formation?” “But it is summoning a monster, look.” “Is that a bull head?” More and more players looked over. Under the brilliant light of the magic circle, a huge ball of light appeared. It gradually formed the shape of a monster, especially the bull horns on its head, they were very conspicuous. Under the watchful eyes of the crowd, the light of the magic circle dissipated, and a huge bull-headed monster appeared. In its hand was a huge battle axe. It was two meters tall and its entire body was filled with strong muscles. The savage aura attacked the senses of the surrounding players. At this moment, everyone’s attention was attracted by the Giant Axe Minotaur. However, no one noticed that a player with a short staff had already crossed the defense circle and walked towards the center of the battlefield. ...; “That guy over there, get lost!” In the core battleground, a player discovered Lorne and shouted at him while waving his sword. But before he could say more, a savage figure rushed to him. Then, the huge axe chopped down. Slash! -163 -219 As soon as the player shouted, two damage values popped up above his head. He turned into white light and flew back to the resurrection point. “Damn you! How dare you kill my brother!” “You’re courting death!” Another warrior player from the same guild let out a roar when he saw his teammate being killed. He raised his sword and charged at Lorne. But before he could run, a huge axe fell. The mission that Lorne gave the Giant Axe Minotaur was to attract the attention of other players. It was allowed to cause a scene. Therefore, Minotaur One went all out. After killing the first player, it rushed into the enemy’s camp and began a mad slaughter. Upon seeing this, the surrounding players widened their eyes. No one could have imagined that this minotaur was not a new Boss that appeared! It was the pet of a player! Moreover, the damage of the attack was extremely terrifying. With one swing of the axe, it actually dealt 219 points of damage, killing a Level 6 high-level player with one strike. ...; At this moment, several guilds in the battle circle also noticed this. Unparalleled Domination’s eyelids twitched. It had only been ten hours since the game started. How did that player summon such a terrifying pet and deal 219 points of damage? Was he using a cheat?! He could not accept this result. After all, the pets summoned by the current Summoners were all slimes. No one had summoned other pets, let alone such a terrifying minotaur. “Go take a look. Which guild is the Summoner from?” Unparalleled Domination wanted to rope him in to join the guild and provide them with greater battle strength. But a lackey soon recognized him, “Boss, that looks like the kid who sold the equipment.” Hearing this, Unparalleled Domination was furious. “So it’s that little scoundrel!” “Boss, I’ll bring people to kill him now!” “No, let him pass.” Seeing that his subordinate was murderous, the corners of his mouth curled up into a smile. He looked confident and did not have any intention of killing Lorne. Now was not the time. Since that kid wanted to kill the Boss, he would let him go. First, he would deplete the Boss’s health points. At the last critical moment, he would let the guild members kill him and rob him of everything! This way, he could reduce the losses of the guild and also peer into his strength. It was killing two birds with one stone. Why not? The higher-ups of the other guilds thought the same. This was just a Summoner. No matter how powerful he was, there was still a limit. Furthermore, in the Beginner Village, all the players were only level 10 at max. How could a Level 10 Summoner kill a recovery-type boss with 5,000 health points? ...; In the guild camp, Twinkle Rose bit her red lips and started to persuade Lorne, “Tyrant, don’t go over. Although you have some strength, this Boss’s recovery ability is too strong. Even we need ten minutes to lower its health.” It had to be said that the beautiful guild leader’s character was really good. Unfortunately, she was still too naive. It would take ten minutes for the thousand of you to end the battle, but it did not mean that it would take ten minutes for him alone, right? Ignoring Twinkle Rose’s advice, Lorne entered the most dangerous area of the battle. When he was close enough to the Boss, he activated the skill. “Ding!” “Monster [Slime King] has been confirmed as the prototype material. Please identify the other materials.” Hearing the notification, Lorne took out the Alchemy Potion in his bag. Although this high quality tool was not good enough for a Boss-level monster, it was still better than the red potions. After all, this was a Beginner Village. It was really too difficult to obtain even better potions. “Ding!” “A prototype monster and a ‘body part material’ have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Slime King) + (Alchemy Potion) = (???)” “The cost is 5 gold coins. Would you like to merge?” As expected of a Boss-level monster, just the cost of fusing was so high. As usual, the higher the cost, the greater the strength! Now was not the time to be concerned about the gold coins. Without any hesitation, Lorne chose to merge them. Perhaps because the Slime King was a powerful Boss-level monster, when Lorne chose to fuse it, an incomparably huge magic formation immediately appeared, covering an area of more than a hundred yards. The Slime King’s entire body turned into light, intertwining with the light formed by the alchemy potion. But this time, something was different. This time, the slime’s size actually shrank! In the end, it was condensed to a size smaller than an ordinary slime. At this moment, a pleasant reminder sounded. “Ding!” “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Bronze Boss-level Monster—Slime King, Alchemy.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios At this moment, in the square of the Beginner Village, all the players were watching the situation in the center of the battlefield. They were all curious about how powerful the special Summoner who could summon the bull-headed monster was. Of course, they did not think that he could slay the boss. After all, it had 5,000 health points. Even if a thousand players surrounded it, they would need to attack for ten minutes to kill it. And just when no one thought highly of Lorne… A huge magic circle suddenly appeared! A huge array with complicated runes and an incomparably grand light completely enveloped the Summoner and the Slime King. “What happened?” “Heavens!!!” “Why is there such a huge magic circle?” “What did that Summoner do?” No one could see what was happening inside, they were all speculating. But at that moment, a scarlet banner suddenly appeared above everyone’s view. “Ding!” “Congratulations player [Tyrant], you have successfully killed the Event Boss, the Slime King, in Beginner Village No. 2451. You have done a great deed and are now in the annals of history!” “Congratulations player [Tyrant], you have received the first kill achievement reward: +10,000 EXP, +2000 Reputation Points, +10 Gold Coins, Silver Treasure Chest x1, Bronze Treasure Chest x5, Attribute Points x20, +2 Luck.” “Ding!” “Ding!” The announcement was repeated two more times! And then… All the players in Beginner Village No. 2451 received a new announcement. “Ding!” “Congratulations to all players of Beginner Village No. 2451. You have successfully completed the event mission—[Protecting the Village]. Score: A!” “Congratulations to all players who belong to Beginner Village No. 2451. Reward :+500 EXP, +50 Reputation Points, +1 silver coin, White Iron Treasure Chest x1, Attribute Points x1.” “Ding!” “Ding!” The Beginner Village announcement was played three times as well. ...; At the same time, all the Beginner Villages in the world were in an uproar. “Who is Tyrant?” “Is he a top player from some guild?” “My goodness! This reward is so tempting.” “I envy the players in Beginner Village No. 2451. They got a White Iron treasure chest and one attribute point for nothing!” “Gosh! This event needs to be triggered by a level 10 player. The highest level player here is only Level 7!” “The players of Beginner Village No. 2451 are going to grow rapidly now.” ...; Beginner Village No. 2451. In the square, due to the death of the boss, everyone received the system reward. The rogue players in the outer circle were very happy, because this reward was basically given to them for nothing. However, the higher-ups of the large guilds were all stunned on the spot. A few seconds ago, the lively Boss with 5,000 health points was in front of everyone. However, a few seconds later, the Boss suddenly died. They did not even see how the Boss died. “Boss! We’ve struck it rich! Everyone in the guild has obtained a White Iron treasure chest, and there’s also one attribute point, some EXP, and reputation points. Now, our Domination Guild is going to rise up!” A lackey received the reward and excitedly reported to Unparalleled Domination. “Rise in your dreams!!!” Unparalleled Domination was furious. He directly pulled out the longsword at his waist and slashed at the head of this underling. Rise up? Rise up his ass! The members of the Domination Guild only received a small reward. The real reward was taken away by that accursed Summoner. Whether it was the reward for the first clear or the equipment dropped by the Boss, they were the most, most, most precious treasures. Any single one of the rewards could cause a commotion in the Beginner Village. Furthermore… That guy was with Twinkle Rose. If he sold the equipment to the Silver Snowflake Guild, then the life of the Domination Guild would be very tough, and they might even be suppressed. Not to mention other things, just the resource-rich training grounds around the main city were not something their Domination Guild could fight for. ...; The scene focused on the center of the square. The light had not dissipated yet. Lorne stood in the center, listening to system notifications one after another. He did not expect to receive the system reward after he synthesized the Boss. Not only that, but the reward this time was extremely astonishing. After calculating all the rewards, just the experience points alone reached 28,000. With so much experience, it could directly allow a Level 1 player to raise their level to Level 10. Furthermore, they would still have more than 10,000 experience points left. However, he was already Level 10 and could not level up again. Therefore, these experience points were all left for the pets. Then, there were reputation points. This was a setting in the later stages of the game. There was no use for it now, but when the time comes, high reputation points would lead to a surprise. Gold coins were next. 10 gold coins was equivalent to 50,000 alliance dollars in reality. To someone in debt, it was a generous amount. Then, there were the treasure chests. There was nothing to say about the Bronze Chests. The Silver Treasure Chest was what Lorne was most looking forward to. He opened it directly. “Ding!” “Unlocking the Silver Treasure Chest. Obtained: Sage’s Short Staff (Silver)” ———— [Sage’s Short Staff] (Sage Set: 1 / 7) Quality: Silver Magic Attack: +110 Intelligence: +20 Spirit: +15 Type: Weapon Level Requirement: 10 Additional effect: Cast Range +20%. Additional effect: Increases magic resistance by 10%. Introduction: A short staff enhanced by a Sage. It can be of great help to the user. ———— Seeing the effects of this equipment, Lorne was shocked. An overall increase of 170 magic attack. This attribute was very violent. In addition, there was still the 20% increase in casting distance. It could allow him to attack at a longer range. In the future, when he fought, he could stay further away from the enemy. But that was not the most important part. To his surprise, it was a set item! Seven pieces of equipment as a set was the rarest and most precious among the types of sets. However, the effect of the set was hidden. It would only be activated after a second piece of equipment dropped. Lorne did not hesitate as he first replaced the staff. With one of the set items equipped, he could naturally drop other parts when killing monsters in the future. After dealing with the treasure chest, only the point of ‘luck’ was worth mentioning. However, before he could check the effect, a ball of red mucus on the ground jumped onto his shoulder. Looking at the protesting little guy, Lorne did not know whether to laugh or cry. His greatest gain was this pet, how could he have forgotten about it? Was he suffering from dementia at such a young age? He touched the slime and opened its attributes panel. The next second, Lorne was stunned. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios ———— [Slime King, Alchemy] (Contract Possible) Quality: Bronze-Grade Boss Level: 1 (0/2,500) HP: 50,000 / 50,000 Magic Attack: 120-160 Physical Defense: 65 Magic Defense: 50 Superiority: 100% Skill: [Sticky Spray]: Grants (100% + 500) HP/MP Recovery to a friendly target. Deals 100% fixed magic damage to enemy targets. Skill: [Powered Jump]: The Slime King will bounce with all its might. When it lands, it will deal 100% magic damage to targets within a range of (2×2). Skill: [Healing]: Absorb 10% of the damage and turn it into health points. Skill: [Summoning of the King]: Summons 20 small slimes. Consuming one will recover 100 health points. If killed, the small slimes will explode and cause 100% magic damage to the target. Introduction: Originally, it was a ferocious Slime King, but it accidentally fused with a special potion and was enlightened. In the end, it evolved into a Bronze-Grade Boss proficient in healing. ———— Gasp!!! Lorne gasped when he saw the attributes. A Boss-level pet could actually have 50,000 health points at Level 1. This was an unimaginable number for players. As an elite monster, Minotaur One only had 800 health points at Level 1. The difference between the two was too great. However, Lorne also noticed a problem. That was— When the Boss became a pet, its attributes were weakened! Although the attributes of the panel in front of him were powerful, if he did not include the additional bonus and raised the Slime King’s level to 10, the final attributes should not be as high as the Event Boss earlier. Lorne understood this point well. After all, in reality, pets reared were no match for wild beasts. Therefore, he did not think too much about it. Rather than that, the current Lorne felt that he should cheer, for he now had a mobile medical base that was practically ‘infinite healing’. [Sticky Spray] was originally an AOE damage skill, but now it was more focused on healing and recovery. The pitiful 100% fixed damage was too mediocre compared to the healing aspect. Perhaps this was the drawback of synthesizing with the ‘Alchemy Potion’. The damage output was reduced but the recovery effect was amplified. In regards to this, Lorne had been mentally prepared the moment he had combined it, so he was not disappointed. However, [Powered Jump], [Healing], and [Summoning of the King] were all weakened to a certain extent, which was out of his expectations. He felt that perhaps because of the ‘Event’, the system had added additional attributes to the Boss. Otherwise, an ordinary Level 10 Boss would definitely not have 100,000 health points. This was hard to verify. But neither did Lorne fixate on this issue. In any case, he had obtained a Boss-level pet. This was a good outcome! ...; “Now, it’s time to give you a name.” Lorne rubbed his chin in thought. Naming was a tough job. However, he had contracted a Boss-level pet this time. He could not be too casual. After all, it would follow him for a long time in the future. Hmm… Got it! His eyes snapped open. “From now on, you shall be called Rimuru.” Rimuru was an ideal name for a slime. Hearing this name, the little guy excitedly stuck to the side of his face, making the most intimate contact with him. Lorne laughed. He liked this “sticky” little guy. It was soft, cool, and, most important, it kept all the members of the party safe. After giving it a name, he directly used the EXP to level it up. As soon as the light shone down, he was stunned. “Ding!” “You used 2,500 experience points to raise your pet [Slime King, Alchemy (Rimuru)] to Level 2.” [Health: 62,500 (12,500↑)] [Attack: 150-200 (30-40↑)] [Physical Resistance: 81 (16↑)] [Magic Resistance: 62 (12↑)] [...;] Just the level up alone increased Rimuru’s health by more than 10,000! This meant that the increase was 62.5 times that of Minotaur One! If he told this news to other players now, no one would believe him, because this number was too shocking. Of course, with a huge increase in attributes, the requirement to level up was naturally huge. From Level 2 to Level 3, Rimuru required 7,500 experience points, which was equivalent to a player going from Level 1 to Level 10. The 28,000 experience points that Lorne had could only allow it to level up a few times. “Ding!” “You used 7,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 3.” “You used 12,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 4.” “You used 17,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 5.” After reaching Level 5, he used up all his experience. At this time, Rimuru also had extremely powerful attributes. Its health points alone were 100,000 points, and its Attack was 240-360. Its attributes were almost exactly the same as when it was in the event. After dealing with this matter, Lorne quickly sent a message to his only friend before the light completely dissipated. “Big-busted Sister, do you want to do another shady deal?” As soon as he sent the message, not far away, Twinkle Rose, who was about to send a message to remind him to leave, trembled and nearly spat out a mouthful of blood. “Who wants to make a shady deal with you! Hmph! You’re such a pervert!” Twinkle Rose answered angrily. “Alright, since you don’t want it, then forget it. In any case, it’s just a few Bronze Treasure Chests. It’s really hard to sell these worthless things. I’m so annoyed.” <i>What?</i>  <i>Bronze Treasure Chests?</i>  Twinkle Rose’s eyes lit up, and she replied pitifully, “Waah, Little Brother Tyrant, our Silver Snow Guild’s sisters are still very weak. We need high-grade equipment. If you have any that you can’t use, please sell them to us, please!” “Of course, that’s not an issue. Now, let’s carefully complete this shady deal.” Seeing this reply, Twinkle Rose clenched her fists. That guy was too evil. Although it was true that this deal could not be seen by the other guild leaders, it was too strange to describe it as a ‘shady deal’. At that moment, Twinkle Rose wanted to grab him and use her rapier to seal his mouth. On the other side, Lorne opened his bag and placed the unopened treasure chests on the online trading platform. Right now, there were players from large guilds everywhere. He could not trade with them in person. He could only let the system earn some “fees” to complete the transaction. “A total of 50,000 alliance dollars.” This time, Lorne did not ask for the in-game currency to be used. The synthesis of the Slime King had ended, and now he wanted to earn real alliance dollars. Twinkle Rose also gave a rather generous price. Each Bronze Treasure Chest was given a high price of 10,000. Originally, the price of an equipment treasure chest was much more mediocre because one did not know what equipment would drop from it. It could be that the attributes were good or that the attributes were bad. Such items with more uncertainty should be priced at the middle-upper levels. But Twinkle Rose still gave the highest price on the market. And as soon as he was certain of the deal, 45,000 Alliance dollars went into his virtual account. At that moment, the surrounding atmosphere became restless. Now that the light was about to fade, the players from the large guilds also realized that they did not want to let go of Lorne, because the reward for the first kill was too great, and the equipment dropped by the first boss was too tempting. However… When all of them surrounded him, Lorne’s body began to fade away as he simply vanished on the spot. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Lorne had chosen to go offline not because he was afraid of the guilds. Firstly, it was because of the high-intensity gaming process that his brain was a little tired. Now, he needed to rest appropriately. Otherwise, if he tired himself out, the consequences would be extremely troublesome. Secondly, he thought the battle was meaningless. In fact, with Rimuru’s strength, he could completely turn their camp upside down, but there was no need. So what if he killed the other party? He would just gain lots of sin points. After all, if one had many sin points, their name would be red. At that time, they would not be able to enter the village or the main city. In short, doing so would only affect his efficiency in leveling up and waste his time. Lorne was not such a fool. Not to mention that he had a debt to pay. For the past two weeks, he had been trying to earn money. First, he had to pay off his debts. Then, he would earn more money and find the best doctor in the world to treat Roanna. As for other matters, he would avoid them if possible. He would not waste his time. ...; “Ding!” “Message reminder: Your account ending with digits 1244 has been transferred 45,000 alliance dollars today. (Virtual Bank of the Divine Realm)” The moment he went offline, a panel popped up on the watch in his hand, showing today’s income information. The original transaction amount was 50,000, but in the end, he only got 45,000. This was because using the online trading of “Divine Realm” required paying 10% tax, so 5,000 dollars was deducted. Fortunately, there was no need to pay any fees to withdraw funds from the Divine Realm Virtual Bank. Otherwise, he would have lost another portion of his money. In addition… When Lorne went offline, he did not convert the gold coins on him. This was because one gold coin from the Exchange System of the Divine Realm was only worth 1,000 alliance dollars, which was five times lower than the price on the black market. Of course, he would not want to suffer such a loss. “It’s already 10 pm?” Only then did Lorne realize that he had made 45,000 in less than ten hours! This income was higher than most people living in the Energy Zone. Not to mention the equipment and pets he had. If he counted all of them, his income today would probably exceed ten million. After all, Rimuru was a Bronze-Grade Boss. Just its value alone should be worth a million, or even ten million. At the thought of this, Lorne finally relaxed. He took a shower and changed into a comfortable new set of clothes before heading out to finish his dinner. ...; He had made a lot of money today, so he wanted to reward himself a little. Lorne found a restaurant with a good environment and sat alone in the corner. He ordered a recommended set meal. There was no need for red wine; he was not that extravagant. Seated on the soft couch, it had been a long time since he had enjoyed such a sensation. Under the warm light, he missed the time when he would have dinner with Roanna. With a sigh, Lorne opened the official site of “Divine Realm.” Today was the opening day of the launch of “Divine Realm”. This was the first time that humans had come into contact with a virtual online game that was 100% realistic. There should be hundreds of millions of players who entered on time. Perhaps there were also people who had obtained powerful innate skills and had done something amazing. Ding! Ding! Ding! As soon as he opened the official forum, news articles popped up. “Player ‘Tyrant’ has successfully killed the Boss. Mission completed in Beginner Village No. 2451!” “What method did Tyrant use to instantly kill the boss within ten seconds?” “Did Tyrant cheat?” “Deep Analysis, Boss Battle in Beginner Village No. 2451!” “Tyrant’s first pet turns out to be a minotaur!” “Shocking news! The true identity of Tyrant is likely to be…” “Video of the scene in Beginner Village No. 2451 uploaded. Netizens, let’s view it together and find out how Tyrant killed the boss!” Looking at the news on the webpage, Lorne was stunned. Why was the news today all about him? There was no news about the other Beginner Villages? Moreover, there were people who suspected that he had cheated. There were even people who analyzed his true identity and thought that he was some gaming master. Eh, the news seemed even more boring than he had imagined. Lorne shook his head, then opened the last trending post. What did this live video capture? He looked at the post and opened the video. At the beginning of the video, a few large guilds were chasing away the rogue players. Their axes and swords slashed at the other players. At that moment, a player with a short staff walked out from the corner. When someone reprimanded him, a strong bull-headed monster chopped the player’s face with the ax. Instant kill! After that, the minotaur started a massacre in the players’ camp, and the Summoner walked to the center of the battlefield. Then, an incomparably grand light shone out. Under the dazzling light, everyone’s vision was obstructed. While everyone was curious, a worldwide announcement appeared. The boss was killed! Slayer: Tyrant! From the moment he walked to the side of the Slime King, the blinding light blossomed. In less than three seconds, the even more magnificent light covered the entire battlefield. The entire process was too quick, and no one could see what was happening inside. After watching this video, the netizens were no longer calm. Countless comments appeared below. “Damn! What happened?” “This magic circle looks very profound.” “As expected of a man called Tyrant. His methods are really brutal!” “Daddy Tyrant, please enlighten me on how to kill the boss in three seconds. I’ll kneel down before you.” “Brother Tyrant, do you have a girlfriend? I can do anything.” “Brother Tyrant, I can swallow 20 centimeters. Please consider me. For the next week, I only need one Bronze equipment.” ...; Countless people were curious about what happened in the light. After all, killing the Boss within ten seconds was simply a myth to the players. They did not dare to imagine it. But there were also those who thought that Lorne had used some special method. Congratulations to them, for their guesses were very close to the answer. These were all relatively normal comments. But then, everything changed as he continued scrolling. Countless people saw his potential. Some people wanted to recruit him with money, while others wanted to use their beauty and body to exchange for his attention. It made Lorne uncomfortable. He never denied that he liked beautiful women, but this kind of woman who could sell her body for a week to get a Bronze equipment really made him feel a little disgusted. He quickly closed the post and looked at other information. Just as he was about to flip through the posts… Suddenly! A pop-up window appeared! Glancing at it, Lorne’s eyes widened. He quickly clicked on it. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios [First Instance Dungeon: [Valley of the Dead]!] The top post on the forum was particularly eye-catching. Lorne was also shocked by the information on it. He had thought that after the mission ended, the game would be quiet for a period of time. However, he did not expect that not long after he had logged off, the game had actually issued a notice for the first dungeon in the entire server! He quickly opened it. ———— [Valley of the Dead] Type: Special Instance Dungeon Difficulty: ??? Level: 10 Entry Requirement: Limited to players in the Beginner Village. Clear reward: Attribute points, Reputation points, Experience points, Gold Coins, Luck, and Bronze Chests. First Clear reward: Global Announcement, Silver Treasure Chest, Unknown Item reward. Rule: All monsters in the dungeon will not drop experience points, but equipment and other loot will be dropped. Moreover, the more monsters you kill, the higher the exploration completion percentage will be. The reward after the dungeon clear will also be increased accordingly. Introduction: Due to the fact that Beginner Village No. 2451 blocked the Slime King’s attack, the empire believes that the adventurers are powerful enough. Therefore, they have announced the Valley of the Dead hidden in the space near the Beginner Village, hoping that powerful adventurers can complete the exploration of the valley and clean up the minions of the dark forces. ———— This was a level 10 dungeon. The difficulty was unknown, but from the amount of rewards, it could be seen that this dungeon was not simple. Just the rewards for clearing the dungeon included ‘attribute points’ and ‘luck’. These were rewards that players had to fight for. The reward for the first clear was even more insane. There was a ‘global announcement’ on it that would be seen by all the players in the world. It was equivalent to a global advertisement, and it would be forcefully issued to everyone. To those financial groups that wanted to create a business empire in the virtual world, this was definitely an opportunity that they had to seize. It could be seen from the fact that the guilds had already announced that they were determined to obtain the first clear of the dungeon and become the world’s number one! To them, winning this battle was equivalent to telling the world that their guild had the ability to become the number one guild in the world. This would attract countless players to join, and the guild’s strength would madly rise, thereby quickly pulling away from other large guilds. In contrast, it put a lot of pressure on Lorne. The top players of large guilds had their gaming mechanics and awareness at the limit. In addition, they could team up to enter the dungeon, which gave them a greater advantage. But that did not concern him. With Rimuru and the minotaur with him, he only needed to go online and create a new combat-type pet to make up for the lack of damage. At that time, with Rimuru’s high health and the damage output of the other two pets, forcefully clearing the dungeon would not be a problem. ...; The next day, Lorne woke up very early. He took a cab to the People’s Hospital in District 3006 of the Energy Zone. The poor people had to notify the authorities in advance when they entered the Energy Zone. After that, they would go through the approval of many departments. Only after they passed all of them would they be allowed to go through. Lorne had been familiar with the process since two years ago. Every Monday and Friday, he came to see her. When he arrived at the special ward, he looked in through the small glass window and saw a young girl lying quietly on the bed. Her body was connected to medical equipment everywhere. For the past three years, he had watched his sister through the small window. He could not even approach her to say a few words, because the environment inside had to be kept clean. Every time he entered, he had to go through a very complicated inspection and disinfection process. At the same time, he had to pay additional fees. “Don’t worry, Roanna. I will heal you.” Lorne clenched his hands. Unlike his previous helplessness, he was filled with hope this time, because he had found the path to the greatest wealth and had obtained some achievements on this path. Then he came to an office. The woman in front of him was none other than Roanna’s doctor-in-charge. It was also because of her that they had not been forced out of the medical room despite the debt of one million dollars. Lorne only had 50,000 in savings and could not pay the minimum amount, but he still came because he wanted to ask Director Sally to help him buy time until the end of the month. The hospital was heartless. Without instructions, no one knew when they would act recklessly. If they forced the equipment to stop, it was possible that Roanna would really lose her life. Director Sally agreed to Lorne’s request, but she said that the deadline was at the beginning of next month. If Lorne could not repay the loan on time, she would not be able to stop the hospital’s decision. Lorne thanked her and left the hospital. He was not worried about money. To the current him, 1 million was not a difficult figure to earn. Lorne was very confident that in just one or two days, after completing the dungeon and the special mission of the missionary, he would definitely earn a million, or even more. At that time, he would get Director Sally to help him find the most famous experts in the world and let them treat Roanna effectively. ...; At home, he put on his simple gaming helmet and logged into the game, Divine Realm. With a flash of light, he returned to the familiar Beginner Village. At this moment, the Beginner Village had returned to normal. The buildings that had been destroyed by the Slime King had been refreshed. Even the NPCs had been revived. The players were all accepting missions. After 12 hours, most of them had reached Level 10, but they still could not leave this place. As the dungeon had not been cleared yet, the way to the main city was temporarily sealed. Now, all the players in the world had to wait until the Hell-difficulty dungeon was cleared before they could go to the main city. The appearance of Lorne immediately stirred up the Beginner Village. “Look! It’s Tyrant!” “He still dares to show his face in the Beginner Village. Isn’t he afraid that the guilds will find trouble with him?” “Tyrant snatched the guilds’ Boss and has so many high-level equipment on him. The grudge has already been formed. He can’t hide.” “Looks like the Beginner Village is going to be lively again.” The surrounding players discussed. It seemed that yesterday’s incident had dealt a huge blow to the higher-ups of the large guilds. They had actually been staring the moment he appeared. But Lorne did not care. He pushed through the crowd to the temple, where he found the missionary that he had been waiting for. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “The village just suffered a great calamity. Young adventurer, quickly help repair the village.” The missionary said earnestly. Hearing this, Lorne was speechless. As a powerful adventurer, how could he do such a small thing like building a village? He was wasting his talents. “I’m here to turn in the mission,” said Lorne. “Mission?” The missionary thought for a moment, “Young man, I don’t think I’ve given you any mission?” Lorne swore internally upon hearing this. This missionary was young, how could his memory be blurry? Could it be that yesterday’s battle had damaged his brain? Lorne was speechless. He did not want to say anything else, so he took out the mission slip he had obtained at the time and threw it to the missionary. The other party glanced at it. His eyes instantly widened, and he acted as if he had seen a ghost. “You did this, adventurer?” “How is this possible! You are only a weak Summoner. How can you complete such a difficult mission?!” Although he sensed that Lorne was Level 10, the Summoner did not have any combat ability. Even if he could summon pets, it was impossible for him to kill so many stone beetles in such a short time! The missionary froze. It took him a moment to recover. He could not believe that someone could complete this mission in such a short time and that such a huge thing had happened to the village yesterday. However! The number recorded on this mission list with magic power could not be faked. This young adventurer had indeed done what others could not. There was no doubt about it. “You surprised me, young adventurer.” “Although I cannot believe it, you have indeed completed this difficult task in an impossible period of time.” “This is your reward. The glory of the Empire and the Deities will forever shine upon you.” Calming himself, the missionary prayed sincerely. At the same time, a light poured over Lorne. “Ding!” “Congratulations on completing the mission ‘Missionary Assessment’!” “Favorability received from the missionary: +50. Current Attitude: Friendly.” “Reward: Experience Points +2,000 (+3500), Reputation Points +300, and Gold Coin +1.” “Due to completing the mission ahead of time, additional equipment is obtained: [Exquisite War Boots] (Bronze).” ———— [Exquisite War Boots] Grade: Bronze Speed: +6 Agility: +3 Level Requirement: 10 Introduction: …. ———— It was a good piece of equipment that Lorne could use. He directly changed out of his Beginner’s Grass Shoes. His speed also increased from 28.8 to 33.4. In addition, he received other rewards, including 5,500 experience points, which were used to increase the level of Minotaur One. Rimuru needed too many experience points. If he forcefully increased its level now, it would severely reduce the efficiency of Lorne’s farming. After dealing with that, Lorne looked at the missionary again and asked, “Didn’t you say there was another mission?” He did not forget the true purpose of this test. The missionary made an inviting gesture, “Come with me, adventurer. The priestess will give you that more important task.” Priestess? Lorne was surprised. No wonder the test just now was a time-limit mission. It turned out that there was a ‘big shot’ behind it. ...; Following the missionary into the interior of the temple, there was a barrier at the entrance that prevented the other players from seeing. At that moment, Lorne found himself in an even more glorious temple. A white-robed woman sat in the middle of the temple. Her eyes were closed, as if she was meditating. As he neared, a name could be seen above her. [Light Priestess Leisha] (???) “Greetings, Priestess.” Lorne bowed respectfully. Virtual games were different from other types of games. In the virtual world, NPCs also had their own thinking ability. If you offended them, they would hate you, and showing proper etiquette could increase their affinity. At the greeting, the eyes of Priestess Leisha opened. They were golden. “Young adventurer,” Priestess Leisha spoke, her holy voice echoing through the temple, “the power of the abyss has corroded this peaceful land. The power of darkness lurks near this village. Under the guidance of the Dragon Deity, I came here to disperse the darkness and investigate the source.” “After many days of exploration, I obtained some information, but now I’m in some trouble.” “Will you help a noble Light Priestess, young adventurer?” “I will.” Lorne nodded. It was obvious that the Church of Light wanted to entrust the hidden mission to him. Only a fool would not be willing to do so. The Church of Light was one of the most powerful forces in the Empire, and behind it stood the Dragon of Light, Hamut. Because they were opposing the dark forces, the Church of Light was also the faction with the most missions. There was no reason for the players not to get close to such a force. “Thank you for your help. May the glory of the Empire and the Church forever shine on you.” Priestess Leisha gave him a soft smile, “Perhaps you already know of the Valley of the Dead, and the minions of the Dark Abyss who have infiltrated the Empire. They lurk in the cracks of darkness, awaiting the moment to swarm out.” “What these dark creatures do not know is that the empire has long discovered their location and has not eliminated them. They only want to give the adventurers a test. When you are powerful enough, the empire will announce their location.” “However, I did not come here because of this. My original mission was to inquire about a secret matter. Now, the key to that information is likely to be in the deepest part of the Valley of the Dead.” “However, as a Light Priestess, I cannot enter, because the space opened by the dark minions is very likely to connect to the abyss. If they sense my power, that might attract extremely terrifying existences.” “Therefore, I need a powerful adventurer to help me enter the deepest part of the Valley of the Dead and uncover its secrets.” A look of concern crossed the noble white-clad Priestess Leisha’s face. At the same time, a mission notification appeared. “Ding!” “You have triggered a unique hidden mission in the world: [Explore the Valley of the Dead]. Do you accept it?” “Accept.” Lorne nodded excitedly. This was a unique mission in the world, and the rewards for completing it would be immense. However, when he opened the mission details and checked the mission requirements, he immediately felt a sense of pressure. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios ———— Mission: [Explore the Valley of the Dead] Requirements: Clear the ‘Nightmare-difficulty’ Instance Dungeon of the Valley of the Dead. Reward: Unknown. Description: Priestess of Light, Leisha, has commissioned you to explore the deepest part of the Valley of the Dead. After completing the mission, you will receive a generous reward. ———— Yes, that was right. The mission requirement was to clear a Nightmare Dungeon! That was the most difficult dungeon! There was another bad news too. When he was checking the information of the dungeon earlier, Lorne realized that every player only had one chance in a nightmare-difficulty dungeon. In other words, he could not fail, or else he would lose the unique hidden mission. He was not worried about that. Ever since he had the Monster Merging Simulator, Lorne had felt that there was no mission in this world that he could not complete. If there was, then no other player would be able to complete it! This was his confidence. However… Now that he had accepted the mission, it did not seem right to leave just like that. It was an opportunity for Lorne. After some thought, he looked up and said, “As a brave adventurer, it is my duty to fight the darkness, but I am too weak to do so. I seek the help of the priestess.” <i>Huh?</i>  <i>He wanted a reward before completing the mission?</i>  <i>Was it appropriate?</i>  The priestess looked at him oddly, but Lorne did not seem to notice. “With my current strength, I can explore the Valley of the Dead and am confident enough, but your request is to explore the deepest part of the valley. I’m afraid that my strength is not enough to do that.” With a disconsolate expression, Lorne voiced his concerns. Priestess Leisha thought about it. Considering that the Valley of the Dead was indeed too dangerous for the current adventurers, it was best to provide help so that he could investigate the situation in the valley as soon as possible. “What do you want?” Priestess Leisha decided to help him. After hearing this, Lorne was overjoyed: “As a Summoner, I want to have more pet spaces.” “The tool to open up the pet space is very precious. I don’t have it on me for the time being, but your level has already reached Level 10. I can help you activate the pet space you can obtain after changing your class in advance. Is this okay?” Priestess Leisha gently asked. However, there was nothing Lorne could do about it. He had originally thought that he would be able to obtain an additional pet space, but who would have thought that she would only help him activate the original pet space in advance? How was that any different from no reward? “Forget it.” Lorne shook his head, “Priestess, do you have any useful tools you don’t need, such as the limbs of monsters or their sabers, swords, or wands?” Monster limbs? Upon hearing this, Priestess Leisha frowned slightly. In the end, she nodded and said, “Originally, these things were planned to be brought back to the main city to be handed over as materials for the Blacksmith Guild to do research. Since you like them, I’ll give you some.” With a wave of her hand, a golden light fell upon Lorne. The system’s notification sounded immediately. “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Unknown Light Bone]!” “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Dried Undead Heart]! “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Continuous Burning Flame]! “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Blood-soaked Rusted Iron Sword]! “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Cracked Death Scythe]!” Perhaps feeling that the items were not worth much, Priestess Leisha directly offered five strange items. But Lorne’s eyes glowed. After hearing the names of these materials, he knew that they were very useful. If he used them to synthesize, he would definitely be able to obtain excellent monsters. For example, ‘Continuous Burning Flame’ could add fire elements to monsters; the ‘Sword’ and ‘Scythe’ were weapons, and there were too many merging options to choose from. The rest were also quite good. He believed that they would be useful in the future. Satisfied, he left. Now, he could level up properly and find a suitable monster. When Minotaur One and another pet reached Level 10, he could attempt to challenge the dungeon. With that in mind, Lorne headed out of the village, humming. ...; At the entrance of the village, right after Lorne had barely left… Suddenly! From the wheat field and the village, a large group of players quickly gathered. They all glared at him fiercely, clearly not here to treat him to a meal. The players quickly surrounded him, ready to attack. To a Summoner player, this was the most fatal blow. Even if the Summoner’s pets were invincible, they could not avoid such an encirclement because the enemies could attack the Summoner. As long as they killed the Summoner, the pets would naturally disappear. At this moment, a familiar figure walked out of the crowd. Unparalleled Domination was the one who led the members of the Domination Guild to encircle and suppress them. “Tyrant, are you going to hand over your equipment yourself, or do you want me to kill you and take them forcefully?” He looked at Lorne arrogantly, his eyes greedily staring at the Sage Staff in his hand. This exquisite Silver-grade equipment was like a dazzling gem that attracted the attention of many. That was not all. Look at the shining shoulder guards, exquisite war boots, and wrist guards. They were all bronze items! It should be known that most of the current players were only wearing White Iron equipment. Some were still wearing beginner equipment. At such a time, the Tyrant was dressed in bronze and even silver. It was too luxurious. “If we can get a Bronze-grade weapon, it can feed us for a few months.” “We will also get 500 dollars each time we kill him!” “You guys really don’t have any goals. I’m aiming for the Silver-grade equipment.” “The Silver-grade equipment reward is 100,000 dollars!” “All of you, move aside. Don’t fight with me!” The battle had not begun, but these people had already thought of how to take his equipment. But Lorne was calm. As a Summoner, death would not affect his combat ability at all. After all, pets were his true strength. Furthermore, under the circumstances that he was not a Red Named player, death would not cause too many equipment to drop. If these people wanted to strip him naked, they were thinking too much. In addition, there was Rimuru and Minotaur One beside him. If they really fought, it was hard to say who would kill who! The corners of Lorne’s mouth turned up. He was going to have a good fight with them, or even kill them all! Just as the battle was about to begin… Suddenly! Lightning exploded in the crowd, killing more than ten players from the Domination Guild on the spot. Everyone looked over and were stunned immediately. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios A large number of NPCs appeared at the entrance of the village and rushed over. The leader was a missionary from the church. He held a short staff that was flickering with lightning. The lightning skill was clearly released by him. Next to him were the white-haired village head, the half-naked blacksmith, the leather-clad hunter, the spear-wielding NPC, and nearly all the other guards. “Damn! What’s going on?” Seeing this scene, the surrounding players were all stunned and could not believe their eyes. Was another Boss going to attack the village? Other than that, there should not be any situation that would cause such a commotion, right? No one knew what was happening. At the side, the players from the Domination Guild were even more confused. They could not understand why these NPCs came here. The players did not provoke them after all. Furthermore, they had specially chosen to surround the village this time. They had not violated the village’s laws. Why? Why were the villagers attacking them? They were clearly good children who obeyed the law and contributed to the village! However, the NPCs did not explain anything. When they arrived near the battlefield and saw that Lorne was surrounded by a group of people, they flew into a rage. The village head waved his crutch. In the next second, an immense fire spell covered the entire area. At the same time, the savage blacksmith rushed into the crowd and threw the terrifying strength he used to forge at the surrounding Domination Guild players. “Little brats, have a taste of my hammer!” “Experience the hunter’s bow and arrow!” “Watch my sweep!” “Spear Thrust!” “...;” The NPCs attacked the players of the Domination Guild crazily. They used all their strength as if they wanted to send this group of adventurers to hell. On the other hand, the players from Domination Guild did not dare to retaliate. When players attacked NPCs, their affinity with them would decrease. At that time, they would not be able to accept any missions from these NPCs. They would not even be able to use the teleportation array controlled by the village head. Thus, there was no suspense in the entire battle. Under the various attacks of the NPCs, dozens of corpses instantly fell on the ground. The players who were standing far away hurriedly retreated into the crowd, afraid that the NPCs would discover their identity. ...; The battle quickly ended. The village head stopped using his spell. He used the wand as a crutch and approached Lorne, asking respectfully, “Master Adventurer, are you all right?” “I’m fine. Thank you for your help.” Lorne thanked him from the bottom of his heart. It was heartwarming to see the NPCs protecting him. Of course, he did not understand why they would help a player like this. The missionary came up to him and explained, “Master Adventurer, when you first stepped out of the temple, I noticed their furtive movements. To keep them from disturbing you, I informed the village head.” “Indeed!” The old village head nodded earnestly, “I heard you have a mission to do, and because you saved the village yesterday, you are our benefactor. We will not allow you to be harmed near the village.” At this point, the old village head gestured to the NPC team behind him. Everyone smiled back. The nearest uncle blacksmith carried a hammer and scratched his head. “Oh, I see.” Lorne replied. The surrounding players finally understood everything. However, Unparalleled Domination hiding in the crowd was so angry that his entire body was trembling. With these NPCs around, he could not teach Tyrant a lesson near the Beginner Village, so he did not plan to waste any more time here. But before he left, he had to make sure Tyrant was fearful. “Brat, consider yourself lucky today. However, wait and see. Unless you don’t leave the Beginner Village for the rest of your life, I will make the players of the Domination Guild keep an eye on you!” Unparalleled Domination said as he gritted his teeth. With that, he turned to leave. But before he could go any farther, he heard voices behind him. “Village head, it seems that it was that guy who led the adventurers to kill our Master Adventurer.” “I see. This kid doesn’t look like a good person. I also heard that recently, the dark forces have been secretly recruiting a group of adventurers. I suspect that it’s them. Although there’s no direct evidence now, we have to be wary.” The missionary and the old village head discussed among themselves. Hearing this, Unparalleled Domination staggered and almost fell to the ground. In the next second, a grand voice sounded. “Beginner Village Announcement (Village Head): Due to the destruction caused by the Slime King yesterday, the village has suffered a huge blow. A large amount of rocks are needed to repair the house. I have decided to ask all adventurers with the word ‘Domination’ in their names to go to the ‘Rock Valley’ to mine the materials.” With the authority of the village head, the old man issued a forced special mission. At the same time, all the players with the word “Domination” in their IDs received a notification. “Mission Information: You have triggered a special mission. Please hurry to the ‘Rock Valley’ to mine the rocks. If you do not reach the target area after 30 minutes, you will lose one level of experience. At the same time, if you do not fulfill the mission conditions, you are forbidden to leave the map area. Otherwise, you will be severely punished.” “During the mission, you will receive a buff reward: -50% EXP.” “After completing the mission, you will receive a reward: +10 experience points, +1 bronze coin.” Pfft— When they saw the details of the mission, all the players who had the word “Domination” on them spat out blood. This was a mission? A buff of -50% experience gain? Who would do such a mission?! Furthermore, completing the entire mission would only give them 10 experience points and 1 bronze coin as reward. Was he treating them like beggars? “F*ck you!” “Tyrant! You’re a f*cking despicable scoundrel!” “If you’re a man, use your fists to solve problems. Don’t use such dirty methods!” Unparalleled Domination was extremely furious as he cursed endlessly. Under such dirty arrangements, all the Domination Guild players in this Beginner Village were unable to level up. To the ambitious him, this was the greatest blow. But before he could curse more, one of the guards forced him away. “He offended the noble adventurer. Lock him up for one more day.” In the Beginner Village, the old village head had a lot of authority. As for Lorne, he silently picked up all the equipment that had fallen from the ground and packed them up to sell to the uncle from the smithy. Then, he took the one gold coin he had obtained from selling them and walked into the forest happily. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios After passing through the low-level region, he directly entered the deepest part of the forest. “Rimuru.” When he had summoned it, this little fellow became very intimate, touching him with its cold body. After being apart for more than ten hours, it was missing its master. From the looks of it, a Boss-level pet had very high cognitive abilities. This was unlike the Two-Headed Demon Hound. As a pet created from a Level 3 prototype, it showed no emotion at all. As for the Giant Axe Minotaur, it was just dull by nature. Its eyes were firmly fixed ahead as it held the battle axe in its hand tightly. Clearly, it wanted to fight. After getting the reward, all the experience had been given to the minotaur to increase its level. It had already reached Level 5, and its attributes could already suppress normal Level 10 monsters. No wonder this guy could not hold back. “Let’s go. We’ll set off now!” Lorne patted Rimuru on the head and led his pets through the forest. After a night of exploring, all the map resources around the Beginner Village had been explored. Now, they were all occupied by the guilds. Lorne did not want to compete with the other players for resources. Therefore, this time, his goal was the forest beyond. In the outer layer of all the known maps, there was also an area covered in black fog. The name could not be seen on the map, giving people a sense of danger. But Lorne did not care. He led the party directly into this dark region. Since Rimuru’s attack was long-range, Lorne let it stay on his body as a fixed cannon. While protecting its master, it also dealt long-range damage. The Giant Axe Minotaur was responsible for slashing, and the Two-Headed Demon Hound was responsible for assisting. However, so far, Lorne had not found a monster that interested him, so he had not been able to create anything. ...; As he was farming, his friend list suddenly lit up. It was a message from Twinkle Rose. “Tyrant, where are you? I brought someone to save you.” While Lorne was surrounded, Twinkle Rose and the others were trying to clear the dungeon. When she revived in the village, she heard news about Lorne and rushed to the village entrance, but she did not see anything. Seeing this news, Lorne did not know whether to laugh or cry. This beautiful guild leader’s information was too slow. By the time she came to rescue them, everyone would probably have left already. Of course, he was very touched by the fact that the Twinkle Rose had brought people to save him. After all, fighting a guild like Domination would result in heavy losses. “There’s no need. The matter has been resolved. Unfortunately, you came too late and missed a transaction.” Lorne appeared relaxed, but such an attitude made Twinkle Rose very shocked. At this moment, a player happened to pass by. She hurriedly asked about what had happened at the entrance of the village. When she heard that all the NPCs in the village had come to support Lorne, her beautiful eyes widened several times! After a long pause, she replied, “What are you doing now? Do you want to explore the dungeon with us?” Exploring the dungeon? No, now was not the time. Lorne rejected her invitation. His mission was to clear the Nightmare difficulty dungeon. With his current strength, he was not too confident. “Alright, Little Brother, take care of yourself. Big Sister is going to bring people to tackle the dungeon.” Twinkle Rose had specifically used the phrase “little brother”. The last time this guy had called her “big-busted sister”, she had been trying to find a way to get back at him. The phrase “little brother” was simply too appropriate. “Please don’t use the word ‘little brother’ without knowledge of what it means. It really doesn’t suit me.” Lorne said with a meaningful smile. “Little kid, you sure like to brag.” At the entrance of the village, Twinkle Rose looked at the message in the chat and could not help but laugh merrily. Even the frustration of her failure to clear the dungeon vanished. Then, she closed the chat, drew her sword, and led her team to the forest. She wanted to recover her lost level and then reattempt the dungeon. ...; In the forest, Lorne grinned. It seemed that the beautiful guild leader had an interesting personality. She was not as serious as she looked. This was even better. At the very least, when they were chatting, it was not too lifeless. After chatting for a while, his mood improved a lot. Very good! Young people should work harder! Taking out his short staff, Lorne increased the pace of their trek through the forest. “Ding! You have killed a Jungle Bull. EXP +20 (+35).” “Ding! You have killed a Forest Lizard. EXP +18 (+32).” “Ding! You have killed a Poison Marsh Frog. EXP +20 (+35).” “Ding! You have killed a demonized wild boar. EXP +16 (+28).” “...;” The monsters in the Beginner Village posed no threat to Lorne. He quickly arrived at the target area. After entering, the types of monsters that appeared became more and more disorganized. There were almost all kinds of monsters, and they were all Level 8-10. This was Lorne’s ideal farming area. As for the third pet, he still had not created it. There was no need to worry about that. Without inspiration, he did not want to replace the Two-Headed Demon Hound just like that. After all, with Minotaur One and Rimuru around, the efficiency of farming monsters was not slow. “Ding!” “You used 4500 experience points to raise your pet [Giant Axe Minotaur] to Level 6.” Ten minutes later, the minotaur’s level increased again, and its attributes increased significantly. Health: 1,800, Attack: 112-157, Defense: 45 With such attributes and a powerful skill effect, it was not a problem to crush level 10 monsters. At this moment, Lorne heard something unusual. He moved toward it. When he came out of the forest, he saw a strange creature eating the corpse of a demon wolf not far away. What was that? A mantis? Lorne’s eyes widened. The creature before him was a mantis, a giant mantis over a metre long! Its two arms were like sickles, easily slicing through the demon wolf’s corpse. Lorne’s eyes lit up at this sight. He had a bold idea. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios The mantis’s arms were powerful weapons. What if it combined with the scythe? It seemed possible. However, attack-type pets had to be equipped with high movement speed. Therefore, he had to give it a body part that could increase its speed. Eh? What part should he use? Lorne checked his bag. There were a lot of materials inside, all of them from when he had killed the monsters in the forest. “If it’s speed, this seems pretty good.” There was something about the creature that made a deep impression on Lorne. It was not particularly powerful, but it moved with incredible speed. If he used it to synthesize with the mantis monster, the result would be very good. With a confident nod, Lorne removed the odd half of the corpse from his pouch. It had long, slim legs and a long, narrow tail. This was the back half of a lizard. Perhaps because its talent was concentrated there, so when the material dropped, half of its body dropped. “The mantis plus the lizard, this is a completely different species. Will it succeed?” Lorne frowned. This time, his idea was more bold. Not only did he use different monster body parts, but he also used many materials. In the past, the synthesis only used a single body part material, and the result was basically satisfactory. This time, though, Lorne wanted to combine two parts. He was not confident. “It doesn’t matter. We still have to try. It’s just a waste of materials and gold coins at worst.” He comforted himself, then turned to his pets. “Little ones, get to work.” The pets that received the order immediately rushed up. The monsters in the Beginner Village could not affect them at all, not to mention that there was Rimuru behind them. It was a Bronze Boss-level pet. The Two-Headed Demon Hound moved the fastest. It was the first to close in on the enemy. The two beast heads bit down at the same time. -9 -11 Two damage numbers popped up, dealing exactly 20 damage. This was because the Two-Headed Demon Hound was only level 1. It was almost impossible to deal effective damage to a level 10 monster. The mantis monster, who had been attacked, was completely enraged. It let out a strange cry as its sickle arms quickly slashed across the Two-Headed Demon Hound’s body. Slash! The sharp blades broke through the fur of the Two-Headed Demon Hound, and its crimson muscles were immediately exposed, blood dripping onto the ground. The Two-Headed Demon Hound let out a howl and quickly retreated from the battlefield. However, the HP above its head decreased by a large amount. -103! A triple-digit amount of damage floated in the air. This was normal. After all, it was a high-level attack type monster. It would be strange if the damage was not high. The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up after seeing this. To him, the stronger the monster, the more powerful the pet would be. Moreover, he would be using the scythe that Priestess Leisha gave him for this synthesis… “Before I merge it, I should do a little test first, right?” First, he would let the mantis monster and the lizard’s tail combine to see what the final effect was. If it really inherited the high movement speed, then the success rate would be higher when he combined it with the scythe. While thinking, Lorne walked up and opened the mantis monster’s attributes panel. ———— [Giant Mantis] Quality: Normal Level: 10 HP: 1100 / 1100 Physical Attack: 115-140 Defense: 30 Skill: [Sharp Blade]: Increases the effect of armor-piercing by 50 points. Skill: [Continuous Slash]: Deals 1-3 continuous slashes on a target. Damage is 80% each. Introduction: A giant mantis that lives in the forest. It has powerful attacks. Be careful. Don’t go near it or you will be cut into pieces by sharp blades! ———— No wonder it could deal such terrifying damage to the Two-Headed Demon Hound, its attributes were really impressive. The attack limit was actually 140 points, and it had 50 points of armor-piercing. It was simply a natural born assassin. Of course, that was not the most terrifying thing. What was truly powerful about the giant mantis was its combo attack. Once it launched three consecutive attacks, it could deal 330+ damage in one go. It was very terrifying. “Two-Headed Demon Hound, step back.” Lorne said. The Two-Headed Demon Hound only had 600 health points. Facing the giant mantis’s attack, its life was in danger. This little guy was about to retire, so he did not need its help in such a dangerous battle. The Giant Axe Minotaur stepped forward and faced the mantis. When it was close enough, it slashed down with the axe in its hand. The mantis was unable to dodge the swift and accurate strike. The sharp edge of the axe tore through the hard shell, revealing blue flesh. -227! The minotaur’s axe was still very powerful. 150% damage, plus the increase of 40 points of attack, finally dealt 227 total damage. It was quite terrifying. Ignoring the pain, the giant mantis quickly counterattacked. It struck the minotaur three times in a row, dealing more than 200 damage. [Armor-Piercing+Consecutive Strike], this combination could bring about the greatest explosive force. Unfortunately, its attributes were limited. Although its attack damage was on par with the Minotaur, its health was lower by 700 points. Furthermore, without Rimuru’s healing, it was no match for the minotaur in such a battle. In just half a minute, its health points were depleted. At about 5%, Lorne stepped forward and activated the Monster Merging Simulator. “Ding!” “Monster [Giant Mantis] has been identified as the prototype. Please identify the other body parts.” “The tail of a Basilisk Lizard.” Lorne dropped the entire tail in, but the Cracked Death Scythe was not used yet. He had to test this type of cross-species fusion first. He did not want to waste such a good material. “Ding!” “A monster prototype and a material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Giant Mantis) + (Basilisk Lizard) = (???)” “The cost is 150 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” “Merge!” Lorne confirmed. As soon as he finished speaking, a familiar magic circle appeared. The giant mantis and the tail of the basilisk lizard turned into light and mixed together. In the light, an upright creature appeared. Its tail was very short, but its arms were very long, like two thin sickles. Soon, the system notification sounded. “Ding! Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Elite Monster—Basilisk Mantis!” With that, the light dissipated, and a very strange creature appeared before Lorne. Its body was completely green in color. It had a triangular head with vertical eyes that could turn. The neck resembled that of a snake. It was very long and very agile. The two mighty arms were no different from before. However! The strange thing was… It was standing on two legs! The legs were very long. They had the shape of a lizard’s leg and the exoskeleton of a mantis’s limb. The tail behind was short and fat like the abdomen of a mantis. However, there was a benefit to it. It did not stop one from standing, completely freeing the sickle-like arms. Lorne rubbed his hands together, then opened the pet’s attributes. Immediately, he frowned. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios ———— [Basilisk Mantis] (Contract Possible) Quality: Elite Level: 1 HP: 540 / 540 Physical Attack: 49-68 Defense: 15 Superiority: 45% Skills: [Sharp Blade], [Continuous Slash] Introduction: …. ———— “Only 45%?” Lorne frowned. His luck today was not very good. It was usually above 60, but this time, it was only 45. That was too low. However, although its superiority was not high, the attributes of this monster were not low. The upper limit of 68 points was higher than when the minotaur was created. If it could achieve 80% superiority, the monster’s attributes would definitely be very impressive. Most importantly, this mantis had inherited the high movement speed of the “basilisk lizard”. Its attributes in terms of agility had increased by 0.5 times. When its level increased, its combat ability would also increase greatly. “Little one, time to retire.” Lorne did not slay the mantis, for it was much more capable than the Two-Headed Demon Hound. Since he had already created it, he would replace the demon hound and let the creature retire earlier. With his new pet, Lorne set off. His next target was still the giant mantis. What the team lacked the most was a damage dealer. The basilisk mantis could very well supplement this disadvantage. Moving along the valley, Lorne’s party encountered countless monsters, but he did not deliberately choose them. All that he encountered were slain by the minotaurs. These were all experience points, one of the targets of this operation. But somehow, it seemed that he was unlucky today. After farming for more than an hour, they killed countless monsters and encountered many giant mantises. However! He had not created a satisfactory pet yet. The one beside him was the most outstanding one he had created recently. But its superiority was only 61%. Seeing this, Lorne could not help but wonder if the two species’ fusion compatibility was very low. Otherwise, how could the highest superiority only be 61% after more than ten combinations? “Let’s try a little longer.” Lorne did not want to give up like this. He liked the basilisk mantis very much. Its combat ability was excellent, its speed was fast, and its attack power was high. It could perfectly serve as the DPS in the team. If he gave up just like that, he would feel a little pity. Rimuru bounced on his shoulder, as if to lessen his impatience with the cheerful rhythm and cool touch. “Don’t worry, your master has a good temperament.” Lorne tapped Rimuru with his finger as he gradually calmed down. Then, he led his pets forward and began farming monsters along the way. Time slowly passed. When another hour passed, Lorne was still not satisfied. He had not succeeded in two hours, which meant that this plan had failed. Lorne intended to abandon such creatures and seek out a new combat species to create. But at that moment, out of the corner of his eye, he saw a huge green mantis quietly hanging from a tree ahead. Its hard carapace, which was shimmering with a faint metallic luster, seemed to be harder than steel. Even its abdomen was covered in a thin carapace that protected all parts of its body. And what made people most fearful was its serrated arms. Every serrated edge on them was like a sharp blade. It was terrifying to look at! This was no ordinary monster! He opened his attributes panel excitedly and was pleasantly surprised. ———— [Giant Mantis] Quality: Elite Level: 10 HP: 1650 / 1650 Physical Attack: 150-182 Defense: 60 Skill: [Sharp Blade]: Increases the effect of armor-piercing by 75 points. Skill: [Continuous Slash]: Deals 2-4 continuous slashes on a target. Damage is 80% each. Introduction: …. ———— This was an elite monster! His eyes widened in delight. After checking its attributes, he finally confirmed that he had really encountered an elite-level giant mantis! Although its quality had only increased by one rank, its attributes were much stronger than ordinary monsters. Such an intrinsic, powerful monster would evolve even more in the hands of Lorne. For example, Rimuru. Every time it leveled up, its health points would increase by 12,500. It was several times stronger than its original aptitude. It was the same for the giant mantis. Its attributes would be greatly enhanced! The more he looked, the more he liked it. The upper limit of 182 Attack Points combined with a skill that could have 2-4 consecutive strikes. Once four consecutive strikes were triggered, it would deal 320% damage. Such an explosive damage output was definitely stronger than ordinary Bosses. “Rimuru, you keep it busy this time.” “The minotaur and the mantis will assist in the attack!” This time, Lorne gave orders to Rimuru. Otherwise, it would take too much time for the minotaur to win. Rimuru was also very happy about this opportunity to fight. It quickly enlarged its body a little. Although it was not as tall as two meters, its aura still firmly suppressed the entire scene. “Sticky Spray!” The moment Rimuru entered the attack range, it immediately used his skill. A ball of light red liquid spread out on the giant mantis. -299! A Level 5 Bronze-grade Boss had terrifying damage output. Enraged by such an attack, the giant mantis closed in on Rimuru, unleashing a series of slashes, instantly striking out three times. -75 -77 -73 Three consecutive hits dealt 210+ damage to Rimuru. Originally, the giant mantis’s attack should not have broken through its defense, because Rimuru was now Level 5 and had 146 Defense. The combo damage was 80% each, so it could not break through its defense. However, the giant mantis had a very powerful skill, which had an armor-piercing effect. Physical defense would be greatly reduced against it. It created the scene before him. Unfortunately… The difference in health between the two sides was too great. Rimuru’s health was now 112,500. With just attacks dealing 210+ damage, it might not be able to kill Rimuru for the rest of its life. After all, it also had recovery-type abilities. On the other hand, the giant mantis only had 1650 health points. Under the attacks of the pets, it could not last long. Within seconds, the giant mantis was already dying. Lorne let Rimuru cease its attack, fearing that the mantis would be slain with a single strike. He stepped forward and used his merging skill. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Ding!” “Monster [Giant Mantis] has been identified as the prototype. Please identify the other body parts.” “The tail of a Basilisk Lizard, the Cracked Death Scythe.” Lorne put the scythe into it, ready to risk everything. If he failed, then he would not waste any more time on the mantis. He only hoped that there would be a good outcome and not waste this material. “Ding!” “A monster prototype and two materials have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Giant Mantis) + (Basilisk Lizard’s tail) + (Cracked Death Scythe) = (???)” “The cost is 50 silver coins. Would you like to merge?” <i>’50 silver coins?’</i>?Lorne was surprised. One gold coin was equivalent to 100 silver coins which was equivalent to 10,000 bronze coins. Last time, he had spent 5 gold coins to create a Boss-level Slime King. This time, it cost 50 silver coins. This also proved that the monster to be created this time had very strong potential. “Merge.” Taking a deep breath, Lorne made his decision. In the next second, a familiar light appeared. The three materials in the formula turned into light and began to fuse together. At last, like a ball of rubber, it gradually transformed into a very agile figure. “Ding! Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Elite Monster—Death Scythe Mantis!” ———— [Death Scythe Mantis] (Contract Possible) Grade: Bronze Level: 1 (0/1000) HP: 1200 / 1200 Physical Attack: 110-140 Defense: 50 Superiority: 80% Skill: [Sharp Blade]: Increases the effect of armor-piercing by 100 points. Skill: [Continuous Slash]: Deals 2-5 continuous slashes on a target. Damage is 80% each. Skill: [Scythe of Death]: Increases Attack Power by 5%. Introduction: …. ———— It was a Bronze-level monster! Seeing the monster’s attributes, Lorne was so surprised that he could not speak. He no longer knew how to describe his emotions. After two hours of trying, he was about to give up, but at the last moment, he encountered an elite monster and underwent the final attempt. Who would have thought that not only would the synthesis succeed this time, but he would even obtain a Bronze monster of 80% superiority! It could be seen that this monster’s attributes were very powerful. It was not inferior to an ordinary Boss, especially its damage output. It was at least several times stronger than the minotaur. “If I raise it to Level 10, its Attack should be close to 500 points. Then, with the skill [Continuous Slash], the highest possible damage should be 2,000 points!” That made him look forward to it even more. He even wanted to create another such monster to replace the minotaur. Unfortunately, there was only one “Cracked Death Scythe”, and such an elite-level giant mantis was hard to find in this region. Thus, this dream could not be fulfilled. “Sign the contract.” Lorne contracted the Bronze monster and named it “Little Mantis.” Although it was not a unique name, it was easy to remember and easy to pronounce. Yes, Lorne was definitely a genius at naming. “Let’s go and level up.” Lorne led the way. Now that the Giant Axe Minotaur had reached Level 7, he could postpone its level increase. His top priority was to level up Little Mantis. However, because it was a Bronze monster, the EXP needed to level up was ten times that of Lorne. To raise it from Level 1 to Level 2, it required 1,000 EXP. This EXP requirement was very large, but he still felt that it was natural. After all, it was very powerful, and its speed of killing monsters was fast, so its EXP gain was naturally fast as well. Compared to other players, its leveling speed was definitely not slow. ...; After entering the valley, the air here was more moist, and the jungle was filled with dew. He continued forward and soon arrived near a pool. Waves of wolf howls sounded, causing one’s hair to stand on end. “Roar!” There was a low growl, and the underbrush ahead suddenly shook. A group of strange lizards rushed out. Several pairs of baleful eyes focused on Lorne, seeking to make him into a meal. Unperturbed, Lorne glanced at the creatures’ attributes. ———— [Armored Lizard] Quality: Normal Level: 10 ...; ———— It was an ordinary level-10 monster with astonishing defense because of the thick armor on its back. However, against the mantis’s armor-piercing effect, defense was useless. “Go, little ones.” The mantis and the minotaur rushed forward at the command. These were just ordinary monsters with low attributes. They were not a threat at all. In fact, there were many monsters around. They were in groups of five to ten, and such small groups were very suitable for farming experience. Little Mantis was very fast. It attacked first, using its forearms that were sharper than blades to quickly unleash a combo attack on the monster. Slash! Slash! Slash! Slash! Slash! Very luckily, Little Mantis managed to hit five consecutive times in less than a second. -115 -115 -115 -115 -115 Five damage numbers floated in the air. Although the single damage of the combo was only 80%, Little Mantis had a 100 points of armor-piercing effect, almost shattering all of the opponent’s defense. Therefore, the damage dealt in the end was very impressive. One skill dealt a total of 575 points of damage. After all, it was still a Level 1 monster! At the side, the Giant Axe Minotaur also stepped forward to participate in the battle. The savage Giant Axe was slashed ruthlessly, dealing 483 damage in one strike. Of course, it was Level 7 and its attributes were much stronger than Little Mantis. It was normal for it to be able to deal such damage. On the other hand, the lizard monsters only dealt 30+ damage. They could not threaten the lives of the two pets. Under the cooperation of the mantis and the minotaur, this group of Armored Lizards was quickly wiped out, and the loot dropped on the ground. “Ding! Congratulations on killing an Armored Lizard, EXP +20 (35).” “Ding!” “Ding!” A level 10 monster could provide 55 experience points. The wave of seven Armored Lizards had directly given him 385 experience points. At this rate, he only needed three waves of monsters to raise Little Mantis to Level 2. With that in mind, Lorne quickly commanded his pets to continue their assault on the other groups of enemies. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Next, in order to farm more monsters more effectively, Lorne decided to split into two groups to search separately, reducing the time wasted. The first pair were Lorne and Rimuru. Although his attributes were very ordinary, with Limu around, it was very easy to deal with a group of Armored Lizards. The second group consisted of the mantis and the minotaur. Both of them had excellent combat strength. It was too easy to fight these Armored Lizards. Just like that, the two teams began to madly sweep through the area. Under the terrifying output, the Armored Lizards could not resist at all. One by one, the monsters fell to the ground, giving Lorne rich experience points. ...; “White Iron? No need.” “This is a Bronze equipment. I’ll take it away.” “Bronze coins, my favorite!” With Rimuru by his side, Lorne was like a machine cleaning up the battlefield. He only needed to pick up equipment along the way, so the experience points and items in his bag piled up gradually. However, because he had killed too many monsters, his bag was full. Low-grade White Iron items were basically abandoned in the forest. As for the worthless Bronze coins, due to the lack of picking restrictions, they became Lorne’s favorite loot in this battle. As he picked up the loot, he calculated his efficiency in killing the monsters. He discovered that ever since Little Mantis’ level increased, his efficiency in farming monsters had grown tremendously. In the beginning, including the time wasted in finding monsters, he could kill three Armored Lizards per minute. However, after Little Mantis reached Level 3, he could harvest four Armored Lizards per minute. With such efficiency, he could quickly raise the levels of the pets around him to Level 10. It was a happy thought. However… A battle where he did not have to deal damage was not challenging at all. After a while, Lorne felt bored. In order to get accustomed to such a lifestyle, he opened the game’s internal forum and checked the latest news while cleaning up the battlefield. On the main page of the discussion forum, there was information regarding the latest dungeon [Valley of the Dead]. “Blazing Flame Guild failed to clear the Hard-difficulty dungeon. Everyone has died!” “The experienced guild, Guild of Creation, failed to clear the Hard-difficulty dungeon. Exploration: 55%.” “Five top experts of the Dynasty Guild joined forces to explore the [Valley of the Dead] and died at the 50% mark.” “Thunder God Guild was wiped out in the Hard-difficulty dungeon.” “...;” Today’s posts were basically all related to the dungeon. Almost all of the guilds attempted to challenge the dungeon, but in the end, they all failed. What was even more shocking was that they had all fallen by the 50% progress of the dungeon. It could be imagined how difficult the hell and nightmare-difficulty dungeons would be in the future. But that was to be expected. After all, the current players had just reached Level 10 and had yet to improve their equipment. Their strength was very limited. Moreover, this was the first dungeon in the entire server. The rewards inside were so rich. If the players could clear it easily, it would be too boring. Lorne continued to look for posts concerning the situation within the dungeon, but did not find the information he needed. In the dungeon, ordinary players would not be able to come into contact with the core part and would be killed by the monsters. To large guilds, the information of the dungeon was very important. Before this dungeon was cleared, they would not reveal the information. At this moment, his friend list lit up again. Needless to say, he only had one good friend now, and that was Twinkle Rose. “Tyrant, do you have a moment?” “What is it?” Lorne replied. “Oh, it’s like this. During this period of time, my guild has been challenging the Hard-difficulty dungeons but kept failing.” At this point, Twinkle Rose paused. Clearly, she could not bring herself to say such a thing. They had been challenging the dungeon since a few hours ago, but they had still gained nothing. To her, the confident beautiful guild leader, this result was too shameful. Lorne took the initiative to ask: “And?” “I want to hire you to challenge an instance dungeon with me. If you really can’t do it, then we can only give up temporarily and try it after changing to higher-grade equipment.” Twinkle Rose suggested. She felt that the Tyrant was the person who could help her the most. After all, he had killed the first Boss in the entire server and had three mutated pets. If even he could not pass, then no one could obtain the first clear of the dungeon in a short time. Hearing this, Lorne was attracted to the word “hire”. “How much will you pay?” “If we only enter the Hard-difficulty dungeon, if we don’t clear it, I will give you 20,000 as employment fees. However, if we clear the dungeon, I will give you 200,000 dollars. How about it?” The price that Twinkle Rose offered was very generous. This was the amount that top experts in the Hall of Fame would receive. It could be considered a high acknowledgment of Lorne. However, in the next second, her eyes widened. This was because of the reply she received, “What if it’s hell or nightmare?” Twinkle Rose rubbed her eyes. She even suspected that she was seeing things. That evil guy not only wanted to clear the dungeon, but he also wanted to clear the Hell or even the Nightmare-difficulty dungeon! Was he mad? Twinkle Rose had two hours of experience in the dungeon and knew the situation inside. The top players of the guild only lasted for four waves of monsters before they were wiped out. To be honest, according to her thoughts, even if she roped in Tyrant, the probability of clearing the dungeon was very low. Her initial goal was to see the difficulty of the later levels in advance and prepare for the next official raid. But now, she heard that someone wanted to clear the Hell dungeon or even the Nightmare dungeon. It completely subverted her world view. “Big-busted Sister, are you there?” Big… big-busted… Seeing this title, Twinkle Rose gritted her teeth. This Tyrant was really detestable. <i>‘Good!’</i>  <i>‘Since you like to brag so much, this lady will play with you. Let’s see what else you can brag about!’</i>  Thinking of this, the corners of Twinkle Rose’s mouth curled up, “Can you really clear a Hell-difficulty dungeon?” “No, Nightmare is my goal.” “You sure talk big. If you can help me clear the Hell Dungeon, I’ll give you 500,000. For a Nightmare clear, one million. I’ll keep my word!” 500,000 dollars was enough to buy a top-grade branded bag. Twinkle Rose felt that she was really foolish at this moment. It was not because she had spent 500,000 dollars to hire someone to lead the team, but because she actually believed that the other party had hope of clearing the Hell Dungeon. <i>Oh, lovely fairy, you must be blinded by anger.</i> <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Hell-level for 500,000? Nightmare-level for 1 million? Lorne was shocked by the amount. Perhaps it was because he had been living at the bottom all these years, but the figure of a million dollars was hard to imagine. Of course, in the game, spending 1 million to find someone to help one clear the dungeon was also an incredible thing. This was definitely a shocking scene in other games. Thus, Lorne was undoubtedly stunned. He looked at the message and thought for a long time. Only ten minutes later did he reply to the message. “In three hours, I will challenge the dungeon. Be prepared.” Lorne stated his plan. On the other side, Twinkle Rose paused, then quickly replied, “No problem. Our Silver Snow Guild’s sisters are all ready.” “You may be mistaken. There are some things that I must clarify in advance.” “First of all, the price of clearing Nightmare-level is one million per person!” “Secondly, it’s not you who hired me this time. It’s you who bought the right to join the team. After entering the dungeon, I’ll be in full command!” “All the equipment, skill books, and items dropped in the dungeon will be mine!” Lorne stated his rules. This was the first dungeon in the entire game. If one obtained the first clear of this dungeon and went on the system announcement, it would be an advertisement for players all over the world. The mere price of a million or even four million was not a problem. But at this point, Twinkle Rose could not help but spit out a mouthful of blood. Not only was Tyrant abominable, he was also very greedy! How worthless did he think money was to quote a million for a position? “You’d better make a decision quickly. I’m about to issue an announcement to start advertising. Don’t blame me for not reminding you if you don’t get a spot later.” “No spots? Are you sure? Right now, all the top guilds in the world can’t even clear the Hard Dungeon. Do you think someone will believe that you can clear the Nightmare Dungeon and use a million to buy a spot in the dungeon?” Twinkle Rose felt that this guy was crazy. “Of course. Anyway, I’ve already explained the situation. Think about it yourself. Bye-bye, big-busted sister.” “...;” Glitter Rose gritted her teeth as she read the final reply. She did not know what was wrong with her. She actually felt like believing him. Although Tyrant was a scoundrel, his strength was very real. After all, he had once killed a Boss with 5,000 health in just a few seconds! Thinking of this, Twinkle Rose felt even more conflicted. However, she did not contact Tyrant immediately, because she felt that no one would believe that guy, much less spend a million to buy a spot. When they were about to enter the dungeon, that guy’s price would definitely decrease. At that time, she could save some money. ...; On the other side, after talking to Twinkle Rose, Lorne opened the chat channel of the Beginner Village. Chatting here required 1 silver coin each time. To issue a notice here, one gold coin was needed every time. This time, Lorne did not save. In his eyes, what he was about to do was worth a few million. It was only right for him to spend a few gold coins to advertise. Soon, a long announcement was made. “Beginner Village Announcement (From Player ‘Tyrant’): Please note that this god-tier player is about to take the first clear of the Nightmare Dungeon in three hours. If anyone wants to join the team, you can chat with me privately about the rules.” “Beginner Village Announcement (From Player ‘Tyrant’)…” “Beginner Village Announcement…” “...;” Right now, the highest price on the black market for a gold coin was 5,000 alliance dollars. Lorne had swiped it ten times in a row, and the total cost added up to 50,000 dollars. When the players in the Beginner Village saw this information, the entire chat channel was in an uproar. “Did I see wrongly? Did he say Nightmare Dungeon?” “That’s right, it’s the Nightmare Dungeon!” “Gosh, is Tyrant crazy? Even the top guilds in the world haven’t passed the Hard-level yet. Does he think he can clear a Nightmare Dungeon alone? Is this a joke?” “I think this is a scam!” “That’s the truth!” “I’m dying of laughter. What kind of stupid child would believe such nonsense?” “A lot of the rich second-generation heirs of large corporations are brainless. He might really be able to fool a few.” “Hahahaha, you’re right!” ...; In the depths of the valley, after sending the announcement, Lorne continued killing monsters. A million dollars per position was not a small number. No one would choose to do this in the short term. Lorne did not mind. Even if there was no one, he could still contact the Twinkle Rose and give it to her for a million dollars. No matter what, he would not lose anything. As for why he had to set the time limit to three hours later? There was a reason, of course. He wanted to raise his pets’ levels. Even if he could not level up Rimuru, the other two pets had to reach Level 10. Otherwise, the damage output of the team would not be enough. And so, with his pets, Lorne continued his trek through the forest. During this period, countless people wanted to add him as a friend. But most of them were not his target. As he checked his friend requests, Lorne cleaned up the battlefield where Rimuru passed. After more than two hours, there was still no sign of any rich person who wanted to collaborate. Instead, Little Mantis’s level kept rising during this period of time. Under a few golden lights, it directly reached Level 10. “Ding!” “You used 13,000 experience points to raise your pet [Death Scythe Mantis, Little Mantis] to Level 8.” “You used 15,000 experience points to raise your pet to Level 9.” “You used 17,000 experience points to raise your pet to Level 10.” “Due to the pet being unable to surpass the level of the Summoner, your pet [Death Scythe Mantis, Little Mantis] cannot continue to level up. Please try to level up.” The pet’s level could not surpass that of the Summoner, so Level 10 was the limit. As a Bronze-Grade monster with an additional bonus from its superiority, Little Mantis definitely had an astonishing growth. Coupled with the fact that Little Mantis was one of the main damage dealers in the dungeon, it was much more important than the minotaur. Its strength would also greatly affect the success rate of clearing the dungeon. Therefore, Lorne was also looking forward to it. He took a deep breath and opened its attributes panel. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios ———— [Death Scythe Mantis] (Little Mantis) Grade: Bronze Level: 10 (0/38,000) HP: 4200 / 4200 Physical Attack: 385-490 Defense: 175 Superiority: 80% Owner: Tyrant Skills: [Sharp Blade], [Continuous Slash], [Scythe of Death], [High Speed Movement]. ———— It could be seen that after Little Mantis reached Level 10, its attributes had been greatly improved. With its current attack limit of 490 points, combined with the damage of its skills, it was definitely superior to Rimuru in terms of DPS. It was indeed worthy of being the main damage dealer of the team. Moreover, it gained another skill at Level 10. ———— Skill: [High Speed Movement] Effect: Increases movement speed by 100%. Duration: 3 seconds. ———— It was a very practical skill. Although it was not teleportation, acceleration could still increase the upper limit of mobility in battle, especially when fighting against ranged bosses. High speed movement could effectively avoid damage. However, after Level 10, the EXP requirement for pets became abnormally high. Little Mantis needed 38,000 to level up to 11. According to this number, for Rimuru, the EXP needed to reach that level should be 95,000 points. Just thinking about it was terrifying. After seeing Little Mantis’s attributes, Lorne opened his pet space. ———— [Slime King, Alchemy] (Rimuru): Level 5 (0 / 22,500) [Death Scythe Mantis] (Little Mantis): Level 10 (0 / 38,000) [Giant Axe Minotaur] (Minotaur One): Level 7 (0 / 6,500) ———— The EXP that his pets needed was astonishingly high, but fortunately, they were all mature pets and had learned to kill monsters themselves. This was commendable. “After I raise the minotaur’s level to 10, I can return to the village.” The combat power of Summoners depended on their pets. In order to clear the Nightmare Dungeon, Lorne needed them to be powerful enough. Therefore, he still needed to stay here for a period of time. At that moment, Lorne, who was checking the friend request list, suddenly saw something that made his eyes light up. “Player [Super Rich] requests to add you as a friend!” “(Additional information: I have a Pet Space Expansion Gem. God-tier player, please add me as a friend.)” Pet Space Expansion Gem? The name of this tool was too tempting for a Summoner. He eagerly accepted the request.  The next moment, this player called [Super Rich] sent over the information of the ‘Pet Space Expansion Gem’. ———— Item: [Pet Space Expansion Gem] Quality: Epic Effect: After using it, player’s pet space+1. ———— It was really a tool that could increase the pet space! Lorne had not expected to see such a precious item. One had to know that this thing did not even exist in the hands of Priestess Leisha. It was incredible that a Beginner Village player like him had one. “Friend, how much are you selling this gem for?” Lorne asked nervously. This kind of special treasure was definitely not cheap. Furthermore, the other party took the initiative to look for him, clearly knowing that he needed this item. Under such circumstances, even if this fellow asked for 1,000 gold coins, it was completely normal. However, such a high price would give him a headache. He did not have that much money now. “This isn’t for sale.” Not for sale? He showed the item but did not want to sell it? Was it to show off? Or was that guy purely trying to disgust him? Thinking of this, Lorne was a little unhappy. He had the urge to capture that guy and beat him up. But at that moment, the player called [Super Rich] replied. “God-tier player, don’t misunderstand. I bought this gem specially for you.” “For me?” What kind of trick was this? At this, Lorne grew wary. The man had to be up to something to give the gem away for free. “Yes, for you.” “There’s no need to doubt it. The reason is very simple. I’ve been rich for too long, so I don’t feel anything in reality. This time, when I entered the virtual game, I felt that the world was very wonderful, so I wanted to explore this world.” “But you know that as I get older, my hand-eye coordination is incomparable to that of young people. It’s very difficult to have fun in this world, so I wanted to find someone to bring me along to play. However, this is our first time meeting, so I had to prepare something. I bought this gemstone as a greeting gift. I hope that you won’t mind it.” Super Rich explained. Lorne understood his intention now. To super-rich merchants, as long as something could be bought in reality, they would possess it. They no longer had any interest in a normal life. However, “Divine Realm” was a 100% virtual reality game that was full of the otherworldly style. To humans, it was an exciting spiritual world. Especially to wealthy people like [Super Rich] who were sick of living in reality, it had an irresistible temptation. “Everything can be discussed.” Lorne answered happily. Originally, he would definitely not have agreed to such a request, but he had to admit that this greeting gift did make him have a better impression of [Super Rich]. It also gave him a new idea regarding the fees he wanted to collect for bringing people to clear the dungeon. The value of the gemstone far exceeded that of a dungeon slot. After all, money could be earned at any time, but such an epic quality gemstone could only be found by chance. As he thought this, Super Rich said, “God-tier player, I heard you’re going to challenge the Nightmare Dungeon recently. Can you bring me along? Although I’m not very good at playing, don’t worry. I can pay an extra 100,000 alliance dollars on top of your listed price. I don’t want anything, I just want to be on the system announcement.” Lorne thought he had misheard. An epic quality Pet space Expansion Gem plus 1.1 million dollars! How could he refuse? How could he find a reason to reject him? “No problem. Wait in the village. I’ll be right back.” Lorne added the other party as a friend, who sent 1.1 million alliance dollars into his virtual bank immediately, and at this moment, he also increased the speed at which he killed monsters in the valley. Now, he had a million dollars and was about to obtain a Pet Space Expansion Gem, this was definitely a pleasant surprise. To Lorne, the overall value was much higher than the ‘dungeon slot price’ of four million. ...; Half an hour later, after obtaining enough EXP in the valley, he returned to the Beginner Village. On the way, he raised the minotaur’s level to 10. ———— [Giant Axe Minotaur] (Minotaur One) Quality: Elite Level: 10 (0 / 19,000) HP: 2800 / 2800 Physical Attack: 175-245 Defense: 70 Superiority: 80% Skills: [Powerful Battle Axe], [Charge], [Battle Axe Sweep]. Introduction: …. ———— Its attributes were not bad, and it also gained the skill [Battle Axe Sweep]. The effect was to deal 100% damage to all targets within 2 yards. It was a skill with good AOE damage. However, that was not Lorne’s focus now. All he wanted to do now was return to the village and get the gemstone from Super Rich. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Soon, Lorne returned to the village. At this moment, the Beginner Village was very lively. People appeared on the resurrection array one after another. They were all players who had failed the dungeon and revived in the village. However, failure did not affect their fighting spirit. This group of players still rushed towards the wilderness excitedly. They went to level up. After they finished leveling up, they would still enter the dungeon. This was all because in the dungeon, the drop-rate of monsters had increased. Although the value of the White Iron equipment had decreased, to ordinary players, the income from being able to drop a piece of equipment had reached the expected amount. Passing through the streets, Lorne arrived at his destination. In the corner of the village square, he found Super Rich. “Greetings, God-tier player. This is my greeting gift.” An ordinary-looking middle-aged man smiled as he walked over with a gem. This treasure that was worth at least a few hundred thousand was like a useless rock in his hands. He handed it to Lorne without hesitation. Moreover, this middle-aged tycoon did not have the arrogance of a ‘big shot’. At this moment, he was more like an admirer of Lorne. If one only looked at him this way, it was hard to imagine that this ordinary-looking middle-aged man could casually toss out a million dollars. “You’re too polite.” Grinning, Lorne accepted the gem. He used it directly. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining Pet Space+1.” After a pleasant reminder, Lorne gained a new pet space. This way, he could contract another pet. But now was not the time. He had to create a team first. Then, he gathered the remaining few people. Although he did not need the help of his teammates, he needed money. In order to give his sister the best treatment, he needed a lot, a lot of money. “Ding!” “Player [Super Rich-Level 1] has joined the team.” Only Level 1? Lorne was surprised to see the notification. This rich player was too weak. The game had been on for more than 24 hours and he was only Level 1. Had he been traveling the entire day? Super Rich smiled awkwardly, “I’m old and don’t know how to play. I originally killed pheasants and reached Level 2, but after I walked out of the wheat field, I was quickly bitten to death by the demonized wild dogs.” “Don’t worry. Just follow behind the team and don’t wander around.” Lorne casually replied. In any case, he did not want to rely on the teammates he recruited. After all, they could not even clear Hard Dungeons. They were too weak. “Alright, leader. I won’t wander around.” Super Rich smiled and nodded. He then asked, “Should we challenge the dungeon now?” “Wait a while longer. There are still a few people left.” There was still half an hour to go before the appointed time. As for the Twinkle Rose, Lorne did not ask. Since he had already sold a ticket, her choice was not important anymore. Besides, he had already discussed this with her. If she did not plan to join in, there was no way that he would force her. But at that moment, Super Rich said something astonishing. “Leader, why don’t we stop waiting? I’ll buy the remaining spots. The two of us will go clear the dungeon now. When the full-server announcement appears, it will be even more shocking to see only two names on it.” When he thought of the scene of the two of them clearing the dungeon on their own, Super Rich felt inexplicably excited, as if the cost was nothing to him. Lorne’s expression grew odd. In order to save time, this man was planning to use three million alliance dollars to buy the other spots. It had to be said that the mind of the richest man was very different from that of a normal person. But that seemed a little immoral. While it was exciting to fleece a rich man, it was not in his nature to fleece one person over and over. It would be best to wait until the outcome was decided, then reluctantly accept his offer. “Don’t worry. It’ll be another half an hour before my promise expires.” “Alright then, I’ll try to recruit some people. If we can’t recruit anyone in this half an hour, then the two of us will enter the dungeon.” “No problem.” Lorne nodded. He could understand the thought of Super Rich. After all, he never lacked money. What he lacked was time. If he had half an hour extra in reality, the money he earned would be ten times of 4 million, or even more. Just as Lorne was feeling rueful, a series of announcements suddenly appeared in the Beginner Village’s chat channel. “Brothers, our Leader Tyrant is preparing to take the first clear of [Valley of the Dead]. There are still three spots left, going at one million alliance dollars each. Friends who are interested, don’t hesitate and quickly join the team. Here, I ‘Super Rich’ solemnly promise that if we fail to clear it, I will refund all of you.” +1 “Brothers…” +2 “Brothers…” +3 “Brothers…” +4 “...;” “Brothers…” +100 Starting from the first announcement, the chat of the Beginner Village had been refreshing non-stop. Half an hour later, there were a hundred new announcements. The players were dumbfounded. One had to know that every chat notification in the Beginner Village cost 1 gold coin! 100 announcements cost 100 gold coins! According to the highest price of the black market, this was 500,000 alliance dollars! In an instant, the name “Super Rich” became popular in the game. Everyone knew of this person. Furthermore, no one would doubt his words. Although three million was a large sum of money to ordinary people, it was nothing compared to a tycoon’s wealth. Seeing this situation, the players who were still wavering began to be tempted. Ten minutes after the announcement, someone contacted Lorne and took the initiative to pay him 1 million alliance dollars as the ‘ticket’ cost. At that moment, a message came from Twinkle Rose. “I want the remaining three spots. I’ll transfer you the money now.” “I’m sorry, big-busted sister. I received two invoices a second before you sent the message. There’s only one slot left.” Lorne sent her three cigar emojis, as if mocking her. Damn little brother! Twinkle Rose gritted her teeth, resisting the urge to curse as she requested, “I want the last spot.” Soon, Lorne received the last transfer, and the five-person team was officially completed. The group met in the Beginner Village and headed to the dungeon entrance of [Valley of the Dead]. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Inviting skilled players with more than 200 attack to join us.” “We need a high-level Priest who can heal over 150.” “We’re short of one. You need to have long-range DPS, priority given to those with 50 Agility points.” “Beauty, is your team lacking a tank? My defense is 80+.” At the dungeon entrance, there were shouts of players forming teams everywhere. Currently, all the players treated this place as a holy ground for dropping equipment. In order to reach farther, it was necessary to organize a powerful team. At this moment, the appearance of the team led by Lorne immediately caused the surrounding players to gasp. Everyone looked over. “Tyrant is going to challenge the dungeon!” “Is he really going to challenge the Nightmare Dungeon?” “Take a guess. How many minutes until they’re wiped out?” “They’ll probably be killed once they enter. Right now, all the top players in the world are unable to get through the Hard Dungeon. They are simply courting death by going to the Nightmare Dungeon.” “I don’t think so. Tyrant is no ordinary player. He’s the man who killed the boss in five seconds. He should be able to make it past 20% of the dungeon.” “Do you think Tyrant is joking when he said he’ll pass it? 20%? What a joke!” “That’s right. I think he should have enough confidence. Even if he can’t clear it, he must have at least 80% progress!” “Pfft… 80%? Look at that warrior in their team. He’s the ‘Super Rich’ who made the 100 announcements. He’s only Level 1, I can’t help but laugh.” “Hey! That’s not right. The requirement to enter the dungeon seems to be Level 10, right? How can he enter the dungeon at Level 1?” At this moment, everyone’s eyes were on Super Rich. In the team, Twinkle Rose and the other two members also realized that the super tycoon beside them was only Level 1! Sensing that everyone was looking at him, Super Rich hurriedly smiled and said, “I was too excited to team up with the God-tier player and forgot to do something.” With that said, he took out a medicinal herb from his bag. Everyone who had completed a mission in the village knew about this tool. This was the experience medicinal herb obtained by the medicinal shop’s merchant after completing a mission. Consuming one would give 100 experience points. Because everyone could only complete this mission once, the appearance of the experience medicinal herb did not cause much of a commotion. But it had a different significance to Super Rich. He took out one herb after another from his bag and chewed them. This was very funny, like seeing a wild ox eating grass. However, what made people speechless was that while chewing the herbs, the words “Experience points+100” kept flashing above his head. Then, ten rays of light shone on Super Rich. In less than ten seconds, his level increased from Level 1 to Level 10. Seeing this scene, there was silence. The onlookers were dumbfounded. This was the first time they had seen someone level up like this. <i>Was this how rich people played games?</i>  “How much did you pay for this herb?” Beside him, Lorne asked. Right now, Rimuru was only Level 5. If possible, Lorne wanted to raise it to Level 10. If he could do this, then he would have even more confidence in challenging the dungeon. “It’s very cheap, only 500 dollars per herb. Leader, do you want some? I still have over a hundred herbs here.” “Forget it.” Lorne shook his head, speechless. This was not a game he could afford to play. The experience value of a single medicinal herb was 100 points. If he wanted to raise the value of Rimuru to Level 6, he would need 112,500 alliance dollars. Just thinking about this number gave him a headache. He did not want Super Rich’s herbs, even if they were given for free, as it was not natural for him to take benefits from others for no reason. Moreover, a hundred herbs did not mean much to Rimuru, so there was no need to take them. ...; “I want to enter the dungeon.” Soon, Lorne stood before the dungeon manager and stated his intentions. “Young adventurer, please choose the difficulty of the dungeon.” After saying that, a selection panel appeared in front of Lorne. Difficulties were divided into: Easy, Hard, Hell, and Nightmare. Easy Mode and Hard Mode, all Level 10 players could try them countless times. However, players could only enter the Hell or Nightmare once. After completing either difficulty, they could not attempt to clear the other difficulty. Without hesitation, Lorne said, “I choose nightmare.” Hearing this choice, the manager could not help but be shocked. He immediately advised, “The Valley of the Dead is filled with dangers. Young adventurer, I advise you to wait until you are strong enough before exploring.” “No need. I have enough confidence in my strength. Please send me into the dungeon.” “Alright…” Seeing that Lorne was so adamant, the manager no longer advised him. He entered the IDs of Lorne and the others and activated the teleportation circle. In the next moment, with everyone watching, an indigo light rose up, and Lorne and the others disappeared. ...; The history of the “Divine Realm” mainly revolved around the war between the Dark Abyss and the Empire Alliance. They represented the two most powerful forces in the world. As for other races, such as elves, titans, orcs, they were attached to the two major forces. For their own purposes, they made a choice between light and darkness. The [Valley of the Dead] contained the scouts of the Dark Abyss that infiltrated the Empire. They lurked in special spatial cracks. Apart from hiding, they would also bewitch the surrounding neutral races and destroy the peace and stability of the Empire from within. After they entered the dungeon, they immediately entered story mode that explained the information about the dungeon and the reason for the anomaly. At this moment, the scene began to transform. An ancient war scene appeared before everyone’s eyes. This was a battlefield after a great battle. The surroundings were deathly silent, and the ruins covered countless corpses. The rotting war chariots were in ruins, and the rotting skeletons still wore mottled armor. The war banner that originally represented glory could no longer wave in the air. After an unknown period of time, a group of creatures from the Dark Abyss appeared on this sealed battlefield. They invaded this exiled battlefield and used their terrifying undead power to resurrect the dead soldiers and turn them into terrifying undead creatures. Seeing this, the scene changed again. By the time Lorne and the others could see again, they had officially entered the dungeon. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Ding! You have entered the Nightmare Dungeon [Valley of the Dead]!” The notification sound pulled back their thoughts. Lorne looked over and saw the scene resembling the Dark Abyss. All traces of the battle had disappeared, and everything had changed. The sky and ground were pitch-black. The white trees were like weathered bones. The poisonous pool on the ground was bubbling, and rotting corpses floated above. Seeing this, Twinkle Rose and the others silently reduced their sense of smell and followed behind Lorne. On a hill not far ahead, a large number of monsters appeared. They were undead that had been awakened and were currently wandering aimlessly with heavy swords in their hands. “It’s different from the Hard Dungeon.” At the side, Twinkle Rose explained, “The Hard Dungeon requires us to stay in one area and resist the attacks of the monsters. There are a total of ten waves. After killing one wave of monsters, you can obtain 10% of the dungeon’s progress.” What appeared in front of them was the dark creatures’ base. The way to explore the dungeon was to destroy all the monster camps. It was different from guarding the base. However, Twinkle Rose knew the characteristics of the monsters ahead. She cautiously unsheathed her sword and said, “Those monsters are Undead Swordsmen. They have high attack power and can use [Sword Charge]. Everyone should pay attention to where they stand, especially you.” At the end, Twinkle Rose glanced at Super Rich. Super Rich felt deep malice, but he could not refute it, because his strength was indeed very poor. He might really be killed by an unknown attack in the chaotic battle. As the beautiful guild leader spoke, Lorne also looked at the attributes of the monsters. ———— [Undead Swordsman] Quality: Elite Level: 10 HP: 1600 / 1600 Physical Attack: 120-150 Defense: 50 Skills: [Heavy Sword Slash], [Sword Charge], [Undead Body], [Berserk Blood] Introduction: The soldiers who died during the war were reawakened by the evil forces and became terrifying undead. They wandered aimlessly in the valley, resisting all intruders. ———— Even the guards were elite monsters. The Nightmare Dungeon was indeed special. Moreover, a level 10 elite monster actually had four skills. It was really shocking. Especially the last two skills, they made the teammates behind Lorne feel fear. [Undead Body] made it immune to 10% of damage. [Berserk Blood] increased attack speed by 10-25% and also gave the life leech effect. The lower the health, the higher the buff of this skill. This kind of monster got stronger and stronger as they fought. It required a lot of skill for the players. If they were not careful, they might be wiped out. The members could not help but look at Lorne. They all wanted to know what his pets were like. But at that moment, Twinkle Rose and the others rubbed their eyes in shock. After Lorne waved his staff, a huge summoning array appeared. In the light, there was a huge bull-headed monster with an axe in its hand and a humanoid monster that looked like a mech. It had two extremely long sickle arms and looked very technological. “Could that really be a robot?” Although they were mentally prepared, what Twinkle Rose saw still exceeded her expectations. One of the knight players in the team almost had his eyes pop out. He was clearly shocked by this scene. At this moment, the light dissipated, and a powerful minotaur monster appeared before everyone’s eyes. Last night, the Giant Axe Minotaur had appeared before everyone, so everyone could understand. However, the other Death Scythe Mantis had refreshed everyone’s world view. Its metal shell and sickle-like arms were already astonishing enough, but the most strange thing was its way of moving. It could stand on two legs. It was unbelievable! “Is this pet something a player can summon?” Several players had such questions. At that moment, Lorne gave the order to attack. The Death Scythe Mantis collided with a monster. The undead swordsman also roared. The animosity between a monster and a pet was triggered even from a distance. It charged forward angrily, the heavy sword in its hand raised high. However, before it could attack, the Death Scythe Mantis attacked first. Its two sharp blades waved quickly, and several reflected lights instantly blossomed in the air. [Continuous Slash]! -281 -281 -281 -281 -281 A series of damage values appeared, dealing 1405 points of damage. With one more attack, he could directly kill this elite monster in front of him. Clang! The undead swordsman’s greatsword also struck the body of the Death Scythe Mantis, but the blade only dealt 9 points of damage, as if striking metal. Clearly, the monster’s damage did not break through its defense. The Dead Scythe Mantis’s defense was as high as 175 points. It was impossible to break such a defense with just the attack of the undead swordsman. When the axe of the Giant Axe Minotaur fell, the entire skeleton of the undead swordsman was torn apart, turning into a pile of powder that was blown by the wind. The entire battle took less than two seconds. From behind, Twinkle Rose stared in shock at the battle. The undead swordsman, who she had thought to be so powerful, had been slain in a single breath? How was this possible! The teammates behind her also looked ahead in shock. Only ‘Super Rich’ glanced at everyone mockingly, as if saying, ‘See? If you don’t believe in our leader, it’s because you’re shortsighted.’ While everyone was stunned, Lorne was lost in thought. He wondered if he should create another pet. The Undead Swordsman was an elite monster with excellent attributes. If he were to use the ‘Blood-soaked Rusted Iron Sword’ in his bag to fuse it, he believed that the final monster would be extremely powerful. There were also the Undead Heart and the Unknown Light Bone. They seemed to be suitable for the undead creatures. However, there was only one set of these materials! If he used it too early, there would be no suitable materials when he encountered rare undead creatures. With that in mind, he put aside his thoughts and followed his pets deeper into the valley. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “It’s only the second day of the server launch, how is he so strong already?” “Didn’t they say that Summoners are the weakest class? That’s not right.” “Did we enter the wrong game?” “What a terrifying pet. Its single attack output is as high as 400+!” Seeing the undead monster before them killed, several of their teammates began to doubt their eyes. They did not expect this. They were all Level 10 players, why was he so different from them? Did he have the aura of a protagonist? Impossible. This was not some random web novel. The few of them were speechless. However, in the next second, something that made them even more speechless happened. Under the command of Tyrant, the mantis pet no longer attacked the monsters. Instead, it began running through the entire valley. Along the way, it made a loud sound, attracting all the monsters nearby. “My god, is he mad?!” Twinkle Rose stood rooted to the ground, her beautiful eyes staring at the hundred or so monsters in front of her in shock. That was a group of elite monsters! In there, every undead swordsman was an elite monster with powerful attributes and all of them had their own life leech abilities. He had gathered more than a hundred such monsters. Was he seeking his own death? “Watch carefully. My leader’s methods are not something you can imagine.” Super Rich stood proudly at the side, not hiding his admiration for Tyrant. “Your leader?” Twinkle Rose gave him a disdainful smile, “Don’t worry, your leader will be cut down by the monsters soon enough. Remember to compensate me.” Although she also admitted that Tyrant was powerful, the monsters in front of her were not simple. There were more than a hundred elite monsters. Not to mention a player, even a Boss might not be able to block more than a hundred slashes at once. ...; Roar! Roar! Roar! In the valley, the undead swordsmen who had discovered the intruder let out hoarse roars. They held their swords and began chasing after the Death Scythe Mantis, threatening to mince the bold intruder to pieces. Unfortunately, the slow-witted undead could only follow behind Little Mantis who was traveling at a high speed. They could not get close no matter what. “Don’t come close. I’ll be right back.” With that said, he led Rimuru into the fray. Behind them, Twinkle Rose and the others did not move. Even without Lorne’s reminder, they would not have come close to such a terrifying battlefield. There were more than a hundred monsters, and if the aggro was drawn to them, all of them would suffer. They would definitely be slashed to death. By this time, Lorne had entered the core battle. “Rimuru, it’s your turn to perform.” Lorne touched the Slime King on his shoulder. He had not sent it out just now mainly to protect everyone. But as he slew the undead creatures, Lorne suddenly noticed that there were some undead archers hiding in the nearby woods. Archers were long-range attackers, and in Lorne’s team, they just happened to lack long-range attackers. Therefore, he changed his strategy and began to draw all the monsters together, in order to prevent the other four teammates from approaching. Although there would be a day when people would discover that he had the Monster Merging Simulator, he still wanted to hide this ability as much as possible. At the very least, he could not reveal his ability to others in less than two days. Slash! Slash! Slash! Because of Rimuru drawing the aggro, the undead swordsmen used their swords to hack at it. The sharp edge easily cut through Rimuru’s viscous body, and because there were so many monsters, more than a dozen swords slashed at it. But, interestingly, Rimuru’s body was untouched. It had lost almost no health. -49 +20 (Healing) -47 +19 (Healing) -49 +20 A series of numbers appeared above Rimuru’s head, but each time it was attacked, it regenerated some of its health, each dealing less than 30 points of damage. The range of the melee monsters was limited. There were no more than ten that could hit Rimuru at one time. Of course, in order to attract the aggro of the monsters behind, Rimuru would take the initiative to rush into the center of the monsters and use its jumping skill to move back and forth among them. But even then, it did not take much damage. Each wave of attack might have only dealt 300 points, but that was all that mattered to Rimuru, who had 112,500 HP. At the very least, for a short period of time, Rimuru would be able to hold back the hundred or so monsters. Seizing the moment, Lorne led the mantis and the minotaur into the forest behind them. He quickly found an undead archer. This was also a group of soldiers who had died in the Empire. After being affected by the power of the undead, they stood up again. They were wearing rotting light armor and tattered hempen cloaks. There were two scarlet eyes on their indistinct faces. At this moment, they were holding a large bow and looked extremely hideous. ———— [Undead Archer] Grade: Bronze Level: 10 HP: 1950 / 1950 Physical Attack: 170-240 Defense: 60 Skills: [Rapid Fire], [Rain of Arrows], [Power of the Undead], [Frenzied Shooting] Introduction: The soldiers who died during the war were reawakened by the evil forces and became terrifying undead. They wandered aimlessly in the valley, resisting all intruders. ———— Bronze-grade monster? That surprised him. At first, he thought that merging them would waste the materials in his bag. But not if it was a bronze monster. Although it was only an increase in quality, its attributes were much stronger than that of an Elite. Without synthesis, it already had a limit of 240 Attack points. If it was combined, how much would its strength increase? Perhaps more than 600 points. After all, even the mantis had 490 Attack points after reaching Level 10. After merging the undead archer, its quality would definitely increase by another level. At that time, it might become a Silver monster or even a Boss. Thinking of this, Lorne was excited. He took a deep breath and commanded the mantis to attack. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios [Continuous Slash]! Little Mantis quickly stepped forward and activated its skill. Immediately, an overwhelming sword light enveloped the monster. -275 -275 -275 -275 With a series of damage, the undead archer’s health decreased by half. This was normal. Although the two were both Bronze-grade monsters, Little Mantis had been enhanced by the synthesis. Both its health and attack power completely crushed the undead archer. Moreover, the mantis moved much faster than the undead archer. In a situation where it could not quickly pull away, the assassin was far stronger than the archer. Thus, it could be seen that the entire battle was practically one-sided. Within a few rounds, the small mantis reduced its health to less than 5%. Lorne stepped forward and activated the merging simulator. “Ding!” “Are you sure you want to use the monster [Undead Archer] as the prototype material? Please confirm other materials.” Unwrapping the sack, Lorne fell silent. There were now four available materials in its bag. The “Blood-soaked Rusted Iron Sword” was a material that could not be used here. The “Dried Undead Heart” was a special material that Lorne planned to keep for the final boss of the dungeon. Therefore, he only had two choices now. Unknown Light Bone or Continuous Burning Flame. Due to the fact that it was not easy to obtain the materials, Lorne believed that using only one material to transmute them was the safest solution. After all, the speed at which pets were replaced was very fast, and using too many materials would be a waste. As for which one to use? There was already an answer in Lorne’s mind. [Unknown Light Bone] could be used at the same time as the other two materials. However, [Continuous Burning Flame] was different from other materials. So the answer was obvious. “Continuous Burning Flame.” Lorne made his choice. “Ding!” “A prototype material and a body part material have been confirmed. The synthesis formula is: (Undead Archer) + (Continuous Burning Flame) = (???)” “The cost is 1 gold coin. Would you like to merge?” The formula appeared and there was a hint of joy on Lorne’s face. The cost of synthesis was 1 gold coin, which meant that the final product would possess a higher quality. The greatest possibility was Silver-grade. At this moment, Lorne wished for a miracle to happen. After all, when Rimuru was first created, it only cost five gold coins. The final product was a Bronze-rank Boss. If he were to weigh it using the price, Lorne had some hope of obtaining a Boss pet now. Thinking of this, Lorne became even more excited. As he chose to confirm, a familiar light enveloped the two materials. In the complicated magic circle, the prototype material and body part were magically fused. When the light vanished, what appeared before him was an undead in a black cloak. Black flames burned on its body, making it impossible to see its true appearance. But overall, one could still clearly see the changes in its body. For example, the mottled and rotting armor started to glow with brilliance following the enhancement of the monster’s quality. Fire patterns were engraved on the armor and longbow, and they were glowing faintly. The overall appearance was very different from ordinary undead archers. At the same time, a pleasant reminder sounded in his ear. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Silver Monster: Fire of Death!” ———— [Fire of Death] (Contract Possible) Grade: Silver Level: 1 (0/1500) HP: 2100 / 2100 Physical Attack: 180-260 Defense: 70 Superiority: 90% Skill: [Rapid Fire]: Attacks a single target with 2-6 arrows fired at an extremely fast speed. Each arrow will deal 90% damage. Skill: [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows]: Fire countless arrows at the target location (10 × 10) yards, forming a rain of arrows to cover the area. It will cause 100% magic damage to all targets in the area and inflict a “burning” effect (all healing effects reduced by half). Skill: [Fire of Death]: All attacks deal an additional 20% magic damage to the target. Skill: [Frenzied Shooting]: After killing the target, it will receive 1% Critical Strike chance, 3% Attack Speed, and 5% Critical Strike effect. (Maximum: 10 stacks. Duration: 20 seconds) Introduction: The undead awakened by the evil power, under special circumstances, has been greatly enhanced, becoming an even more terrifying undead flame. ———— After combining with the flames, the undead archer had indeed evolved into a Silver monster. Although it was not a Boss, Lorne was not disappointed. Instead, he was pleasantly surprised. It was because he did not expect the Silver monster that had been created to be so powerful. Although Fire of Death was only Level 1, its attributes were already much higher than a Level 10 undead archer. Not only that, but its skills had also undergone tremendous changes. Among them, [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows] changed from the original ‘80% physical damage’ to ‘100% magic damage’. The range changed from the original (8×8) to (10×10) yards. The area of effect was greatly enhanced. Secondly! [Power of the Undead] had become [Fire of Death]! The effect went from “increasing 50 Attack Power” to “dealing an additional 20% magic damage per attack.” Without a doubt, the latter was more effective than the former. In addition, it was magic damage! When a physical archer received magical damage, it would deal greater overall damage. No matter how thick the armor, it would still deal considerable damage. Of course, in Lorne’s opinion, this was not the strongest skill of the Fire of Death. It was only truly powerful after killing ten targets. At that time, it would obtain 10% critical strike chance, 30% attack speed, and 50% critical strike effect! Under such ferocious buffs, could any monster of the same level defeat it? “The monsters produced by dungeons are indeed different.” “I suppose I should replace the minotaur too.” Lorne glanced at the nearby undead swordsmen. These powerful life leech monsters were not so easily found outside the dungeon. However, the undead swordsmen here were still too ordinary. Elite monsters were not bad, but Lorne had a higher goal. He wanted a Bronze-grade Undead Swordsman and used it to create a powerful Silver-grade pet. “There’s no hurry. I’ve just started tackling the dungeon.” Lorne felt that there had to be a stronger undead swordsman deeper in the valley. When the time came, he would not waste the iron sword material in his bag. With that in mind, Lorne did not hesitate anymore and returned to the battlefield with his pets. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios At this moment, Rimuru continued to use its powerful vitality to fight the hundreds of creatures. However, it had suffered too many attacks and had lost 50% of its health. Seeing this, Lorne immediately controlled the Fire of Death to join the battle. Summoners could control their pets from afar, but because masters could not be too far away from their pets, they had to pay attention to their own safety when controlling their pets. This was a very challenging operation for a player. Lorne was very talented at multitasking, so he did not find it difficult to do it. On the contrary, this humanoid monster made him feel very comfortable, and the effect of controlling it in combat was also much better. Lorne controlled the Fire of Death to draw the bow in its hand. At this moment, a ball of black flames suddenly shot up, making the entire arrow look like a fire snake. This was the effect of the [Fire of Death] skill. Accompanied by this, it would cause an additional 20% magic damage with this attack. Swish! The arrow left its hand and struck the undead swordsman’s joint. -780! Gasp!!! Lorne gasped at the high damage. This arrow dealt 780 points of damage! This amount of damage made Lorne quickly check the combat panel. Only then did he understand everything. It turned out that the arrow had hit the monster’s weak spot and had fortunately produced a critical hit effect. In the “Divine Realm”, the damage amplification of “Weakness” was random between 150 %-200% damage, while the normal critical damage was 200%. These two effects could be triggered at the same time, so it created the scene just now. Unfortunately, they were too far away. Twinkle Rose and the others stood on the other side of the swarm and did not see this astounding scene. “Roar!” With one arrow, the undead swordsman’s health dropped by half. The monstrous creature immediately turned and roared, its gaze fixed on the one attacking it. However, before it could counterattack, Lorne had already unleashed his skill. Bolts of black fire shot forth from the bow. This was the [Rapid Fire] skill. It could randomly fire 2-6 arrows at once. That one strike by Lorne had directly triggered the maximum number of arrows. The six arrows formed a straight line and hit the undead swordsman consecutively. Instant kill! [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows] After slaying one of the creatures, Lorne fired into the sky. In the next moment, countless burning arrows descended from the sky and bombarded the ground like cannon fire. All the monsters within 10×10 yards were hit, and the scene became a sea of flames. -191 -47 (Magic Damage) -189 -45 (Magic Damage) -187 Hundreds of damage numbers floated in the air. It was a spectacular sight. Unfortunately, “Fire of Death” was only level 1. Its attributes had not grown, so the final damage was not very high. But to Lorne’s surprise, the undead creatures had no magic resistance! The effect of the skill [Fire of Death] was especially outstanding here. Coupled with the huge range of skills, a rain of arrows directly hit dozens of monsters. The total damage was more than 10,000 points. ...; “F*ck, our leader has made a big move!” Not far away, Super Rich let out a cry. The fiery rain of arrows was like a cannonball, giving people a huge visual impact. He could not even believe that it was a player’s skill. “Oh my god!” Twinkle Rose’s eyes widened. As the guild leader, she had seen many hidden occupations, but she had never seen such a powerful skill. Moreover, there was no archer among Tyrant’s pets, right? Could it be… He had even more pets?! ...; Swish! Swish! Swish! While the others were still in shock, Lorne began leading the horde of monsters through the valley. He controlled his pets to attack while ensuring his own safety. Because it was a Silver monster, it had high agility and movement speed, so the pulling of monsters was relatively simple. If not for the undead swordsman’s Charge skill, Lorne would have been able to fight much easier. “Ding!” “Battle notification: Congratulations on killing a target. You have received a layer of ‘Frenzied Shooting’ effect.” After killing ten targets, Lorne’s “Frenzied Shooting” successfully stacked to the tenth layer. The final increase was: Critical Strike chance+10%, Attack Speed+30%, Critical Strike effect+50%. He could clearly sense that after reaching ten stacks, his attack speed was much faster and the probability of him triggering a critical hit was also higher. The most terrifying thing was the damage after the critical hit. The Critical Hit effect+50% meant that the damage after the Critical Hit was increased to 250%. If he hit the monster’s weak spot at this time, the final damage would exceed 1,000 points! Against such damage, the undead swordsmen could do nothing. And so, as he pulled, Lorne fired, keeping the distance between himself and the creature about twenty yards, ensuring his absolute safety. At the same time, arrows burst from his hands. Under the high output, the hundreds of undead swordsmen were wiped out in less than ten minutes of battle. The drop rate of monsters in the dungeon was very high, and at this moment, the ground was filled with glowing spoils of war. Lorne did not clear these things, but carried the longbow and left the area. Before leaving, he left a few words for his teammates not far away. “Pick up the loot. After clearing everything, quickly catch up to me.” With that, he walked towards Super Rich and took the rest of the EXP herbs he had. Then, he held the bow and walked deeper into the valley. Hearing that, Twinkle Rose and the others became excited. To a player, picking up equipment was definitely the most, most interesting thing in the entire game, especially when they could see high-grade equipment. However… Just as Twinkle Rose was about to pick up a Bronze equipment from the ground before the others… She was stunned. After the equipment was picked up, it disappeared. At the same time, she heard an unfriendly reminder. Ding! You have picked up the equipment [Skull Armor] (Bronze). According to the distribution rules of the team, the loot will belong to Leader ‘Tyrant’. ” Pfft— The beautiful guild leader spat out blood from anger. She stood on the spot and gritted her teeth, cursing: “Tyrant! You scoundrel!!!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining: Bone Armor (Bronze).” “Congratulations on obtaining: Bronze Coin x50.” “Congratulations on obtaining: Bone Wrist Guard (White Iron).” “Congratulations on obtaining: Skill Book – Morale (Grade E).” “...;” At this moment, countless information appeared on Lorne’s interface. Most of them were bronze coins, something that the monster would definitely drop. In this dungeon, an undead swordsman would drop 80-100 bronze coins. According to the rough estimation, this wave of monsters would bring him 80 silver coins, equivalent to 4,000 alliance dollars. In addition to the Bronze equipment and skill books, the total income earned by Lorne would be more than 50,000. However, it should be known that Lorne had only been in the dungeon for less than twenty minutes! Earning 50,000 alliance dollars in 20 minutes should be enough to surpass the income of 99.99% of people in the world. Indeed, the game dungeon was the best place to make a fortune. Unfortunately, such a good place could only be cleared once. Smiling, Lorne shook his head and took out the EXP herbs he had just obtained. Originally, he did not need these herbs, but now that he had “Fire of Death”, he had to first raise the level of this pet. Otherwise, it would be rather difficult for a Level 1 pet to quickly clear the Nightmare Dungeon. After eating all the herbs, he gained a total of 15,700 experience points. He directly leveled up his pet. “Ding!” “You used 1,500 experience points to raise your pet [Fire of Death (Small Artillery)] to Level 2.” “You used 4,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 3.” “You used 7,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 4.” Three consecutive rays of light landed and its level increased by three. Although its level was still not high, the improvement it received was not small. ———— [Fire of Death] (Small Artillery) Grade: Silver Level: 4 (0 / 10,500) HP: 3675 / 3675 (1575↑) Physical Attack: 315-455 (135-195↑) Defense: 122 (52↑) Superiority: 90% Owner: Tyrant Skills: [Rapid Fire], [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows], [Fire of Death], [Frenzied Shooting]. Introduction: …. ———— “Small Artillery” was the name that Lorne had given it, a glorious title for the new guy. As for its attributes, it had indeed improved significantly. At this moment, the upper limit of its attack had reached 455 points, which was even higher than what he had expected. If “Small Artillery” was raised to Level 10, its attack limit would be very close to 1,000 points. Just the thought of it was thrilling. After checking the level of Small Artillery, Lorne was in a good mood. At the same time, he stepped into a basin. This place was very similar to a Colosseum. It was surrounded by mountain peaks, and in the center stood hundreds of monsters. The types were mainly undead swordsmen, and there were a few undead archers with long bows mixed in. As usual, Lorne simply checked the monster’s attributes and found that although the monsters’ attributes had increased a little, their level was still at 10. This should be the restriction of the Beginner Village. The players could not go above Level 10 in the Beginner Village, so the monsters were naturally restricted in the same way. Ignoring the creatures, he quickly surveyed his surroundings. Finally, his gaze focused on a rock gap. As a map with such a high concentration of monsters, there must be a way for the players to win. Most maps that possessed a challenge would provide some subtle help with the terrain. If one was strong enough, one could rely on it to complete the impossible. That gap seemed to be the key location in the entire map. “Little Mantis, go attract the monsters.” Lorne ordered. After the monster made way, he led the others through carefully and quickly arrived at the gap between the rocks. It was a pocket-like space that could be guarded as long as the entrance was blocked. But it was not easy to block the entrance. To make use of the terrain, one had to satisfy certain special conditions. First, one needed a powerful tank capable of withstanding a dozen monster attacks. Otherwise, once the entrance was taken, the DPS hiding in the back would immediately be revealed. Second, one need a strong source of DPS. It would be best if they could quickly clear out all the monsters in front. Otherwise, if the pressure on the tank was too great, it could easily collapse. This was a huge challenge for any other team. But to Lorne, it was simple. With Rimuru around, the tank’s mission could be completely handed over to it, and the position of the DPS could be handed over to the Level 4 “Small Artillery”. It had 455 attack power and could deal tons of damage to monsters. “Rimuru, become larger and block the entrance.” Lorne ordered. As a Bronze-Grade Boss, Rimuru could change its size to a maximum of more than one meter wide. This size could block most of the entrance. As for the gap beside it, Little Mantis directly blocked the hole. It had a high defense of 175 points and could easily complete this mission. “Roar!” At this moment, hundreds of undead swordsmen surrounded him, completely sealing off his retreat. What he had to do now was clear out all the monsters before Rimuru was killed. This was not difficult at all. [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows] Arrows were tossed into the air. When they landed, they turned into burning ‘meteors’ that dealt a powerful blow to all the monsters in the vicinity. Before leveling up, the damage of the rain of arrows was at 180+ each. Now that it was Level 4, the damage of the rain of arrows was directly increased to 390+. The total output had more than doubled. Then, under the continuous bombardment of “Small Artillery”, the undead swordsmen fell one after another, dropping a lot of loot. With a roar of fury, the creatures slashed at Rimuru. The result was obvious. They could not deal any effective forms of damage to it. Even if Little Mantis next to it did not have much health, Rimuru could heal it. Furthermore, there was also the minotaur beside them who could temporarily take over the task. This way, the entire situation was completely under control. In less than ten minutes, more than 200 undead swordsmen fell to the ground. Most of the damage came from the rain of arrows from Small Artillery. Each wave could cover 60 to 70 monsters. Four waves could directly shoot down a large number of them. If other players saw him killing monsters like this, they would probably quit the game. This was simply too absurd… However, Lorne was very calm. He did not even pay attention to the equipment on the ground. His gaze shifted to the path ahead. At the end of the path, there seemed to be a huge poisonous pool. It was green in color and was currently bubbling with poison. The center of the poisonous pool was also churning non-stop, like lava spewing out from the ground. As he wondered, suddenly, a huge tail flung out from the poisonous pool! <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Lorne quickly moved forward and quickly entered the target area. In front of him was a huge poisonous pool. The dark green poison covered the entire area. There were the skeletons of unknown monsters and rotting corpses floating inside. Before he could investigate the surrounding terrain, countless huge bubbles bubbled out of the poisonous pool. The air was filled with a disgusting stench. Lorne stepped back, his eyes on the turbulent lake. The bubbles became more and more concentrated, and the commotion became greater and greater. At this moment, the poisonous pool was suddenly stirred. A hideous bone claw reached out and touched the pitch-black ground. Splash! The poisonous pool churned as a huge head that looked like a catfish popped out. This huge head was already mostly rotting. There were three holes in the rotting white bones, and scarlet soul flames were flickering inside. The other half of the head was filled with poisonous lumps and rotting flesh, and there were three blood-red eyes embedded on it. It was then that Lorne saw the creature’s overall appearance. It was a huge Salamander monster. Because it had died for many years, its entire body was rotting. It had four white bone arms that were on its left and right. The sharp spiky bones on the back of its head reached all the way to the end of its tail. Other than the stench, there was also the yellow-white fangs in its mouth. ———— [Poisonous Salamander King] Grade: Boss Level: 10 HP: 45,000 / 45,000 Magic Attack: 280-370 Physical Defense: 150 Magic Defense: 115 Skills: [Poisonous Fang], [Bite], [Blood Claw Combo], [Poisonous Explosion] Introduction: A salamander born from the corpse has been corroded by the power of darkness and has become the minion of the Dark Abyss. Any stranger who enters this area will be treated cruelly by it. ———— From the attributes on the interface, it could be seen that the health of this Boss was much lower than that of the Slime King who attacked the village. However, 45,000 health points was still the players’ nightmare. Last time, it was the thousands of players in the Beginner Village who attacked the Boss together. This time, it was only a five-person team. Comparatively, it was harder this time. Moreover, this Boss’ attack power was higher than the Slime King. Its attack limit was 370 points. As long as it used its skill, it could kill any non-tank professional player. Unfortunately… The boss encountered Lorne. “Rimuru!” Without hesitation, Lorne commanded his pets to attack. Although Rimuru was only Level 5, it was a Bronze-Grade Boss that had been created through merging. It now had 112,500 health points. It was not something an ordinary Boss could compare to. Pfft— Rimuru spat out a ball of mucus and hit the boss’s head. -205! Rimuru was created by merging with a potion. Its combat strength was very limited, so the single damage was not high. But at that moment, fiery flames flew behind it. It was a combo attack from the Fire of Death—Rapid Fire. Very luckily, it dealt the highest possible six hits. -295! -81 (Magic Damage) -293! -79 (Magic Damage) ...; The defense of the Salamander Boss was 150 points, but against Small Artillery who had 455 attack points, these defense points were useless. A series of numbers appeared, instantly dealing a terrifying damage of 1880 points. If his other teammates saw this scene, they would probably be stunned on the spot. Such damage was too terrifying. “Roar!” The Salamander King roared. After the high defense was broken, the grudge between the two sides was completely drawn. It charged forward angrily, its huge claws striking Rimuru’s body, tearing half of it apart. -335 +55 (Absorb) The damage of a high-level Boss was terrifying, but Rimuru did not feel anything. With 112,500 HP, such damage was nothing more than a tickle. On the other hand, the ferocious attacks of Little Mantis and Small Artillery made the Salamander King unable to hold on. Although Little Mantis’s quality was slightly low, its attack power was almost the same as Small Artillery because it was Level 10. Moreover, it had a high armor-piercing effect. The total damage output was the highest in the entire team. The Level 4 Small Artillery could not outdo it for the time being. As for the minotaur, it was in an awkward spot. Its attributes were useless on this battlefield. After all, they were facing a powerful Boss. It was normal that it could not deal direct damage. Pew! Pew! Pew! The arrow struck the Boss crazily. At the same time, the sickle-like forearm was waved by the mantis, creating countless illusions that slashed at the rotting flesh of the Salamander King. Its health decreased very quickly. In less than ten seconds, its health had already decreased by 10,000 points. Under Rimuru’s interference, the Salamander King could barely counterattack. It could only roar angrily and vent its anger. At this moment, as the leader, Lorne stood around and calmly looked at the pleasing scene. This was the correct way to fight as a Summoner. There was no need for the master to take action. The pets could do it in minutes. However… He had to think about something else now. That was the problem of synthesis. The monster in front of him was a powerful Boss. If he took it as a pet, it would definitely allow his strength to increase greatly. But Lorne thought it was too ugly. Take the undead archer, for example. Although it was rotting, it was still a humanoid monster, Lorne quite liked the undead style it had. However, the Salamander King was different. It was covered in poisonous lumps and pustules, looking very disgusting. The stench coming from its body made people feel despair as well. To be honest, Lorne rejected it from the bottom of his heart. What made him hesitate was the attributes of the Boss-level monster. If he merged such a powerful material, it would definitely be even stronger. Should he do it or not? This was a conflicted choice. “Small Artillery, kill it!” In the end, Lorne chose to kill it. Other than the fact that the boss was too ugly, there were several other reasons for Lorne to give up. The first was the synthesis material. Right now, Lorne did not have any materials that were suitable for fusing with this Boss. Even if he tried, it would be very difficult to obtain a stronger creature. Next was the progress of clearing the dungeon. Lorne did not know if accepting the other party as a pet meant that he had passed the dungeon requirement. Although there was a high chance that he would pass, Lorne did not feel the need to take the risk. Instead of thinking about this, it was better to kill this Boss and obtain the materials dropped by it to prepare for the synthesis later. After all, this was only the first Boss in the dungeon. He had to look further ahead. With that in mind, Lorne gave the order to kill. The pets no longer held back. They all unleashed their greatest strength. Several combo skills were used at the same time, instantly dealing more than 6,000 damage. The Salamander King could not stop them. Under the barrage of this storm, the first Boss guarding the valley quickly fell to the ground unwillingly, turning into a pile of rotting bones. “Ding!” “Congratulations on killing the boss—Poisonous Salamander King!” “Current dungeon completion level: 50%!” A pleasant system notification sounded. The ground was also filled with loot. There were five items, four of which were bronze in color, and the last was silver in color. ———— [Poisonous Armor] Quality: Silver Health: +400 Defense: +30 Constitution: +15 Type: Armor Level Requirement: 10 Additional effect: Physical Damage Reduction+3%. Additional effect: After receiving an attack, it will automatically counterattack with poison. It will cause 5 points of true damage to the target every second. Duration: 20 seconds. It can cause poison to a maximum of 10 targets at the same time. Introduction: A poisonous armor that can automatically counterattack the enemy. ———— This was a Silver-grade equipment. Although its attributes were worse than Lorne’s Sage Set, it was still great. Especially with the additional special effect, this poison counterattack could give the main defensive tank an excellent clearing ability. … At the same time. On the other side. Twinkle Rose and the others finally picked up the bronze coins that were scattered on the ground. They made preparations and tried to to catch up to Lorne. But at that moment, A system notification sounded in everyone’s ears. “Ding!” “Congratulations, your team member [Tyrant] has successfully killed the boss—Poisonous Salamander King!” “Current dungeon completion level: 50%!” Hearing this notification, the useless members of the team could not remain calm. They had only cleaned up the battlefield for a few minutes, but Tyrant had already killed the next Boss? How was this possible! “Is he really cheating?” Twinkle Rose bit her lip in disbelief. It should be known that their Silver Snow Guild, and even the top guilds in the world, could not even defeat the Hard-difficulty monsters. However, Tyrant killed the Boss in just a few minutes? “How can such an important virtual game allow cheating to happen? Little girl, you have to believe in our leader’s strength.” ‘Super Rich’, who had climbed up from the bottom until he became a tycoon, had never believed in those illusory things. In his eyes, any success had a reason and was closely related to other people’s efforts. But his words elicited scorn from Twinkle Rose. He was so rich, but he had to be a bootlicker. He was hopeless. At this moment, there was a message from Lorne on the team channel. “The boss dropped a mediocre equipment. Does anyone want it?” With that, he hung up a picture of the equipment. When Twinkle Rose saw it, her mouth widened. This was actually a Silver-grade equipment! Furthermore, its attributes were so powerful! If the tank wore this equipment to farm monsters, the efficiency of leveling up would increase by at least 20%! It was such a top-grade Silver-grade equipment. In the mouth of that guy, it was actually a ‘very mediocre equipment’? Did he know how to play games?! “I want it!” Twinkle Rose was the first to speak, “The Silver Snow Guild offers 60,000 alliance dollars.” At this stage, the highest price for Bronze equipment was 10,000 alliance dollars. Because only Bosses would drop Silver-grade equipment, the price was extremely expensive. The lowest price was about 50,000. Twinkle Rose offered 60,000 alliance dollars, which was already far beyond the market price. But how could others not try to buy the equipment? A knight in the team directly said, “65,000.” “I’ll pay 70,000.” Another person also spoke. The price of the equipment immediately increased to 70,000. However, none of them wanted to give up. Twinkle Rose gritted her teeth and continued bidding, reaching 90,000 in one go! Increasing the price bit by bit would only make the price higher and higher. It was better to directly increase the price by tens of thousands and display her determination and desire. This way, the group of buyers who did not have much money would immediately choose to give up. Twinkle Rose’s thoughts were clear. This move was indeed hard for the other two to withstand. After all, the normal price of a Silver-grade equipment was only about 50,000. If they increased the price, it would be twice the price of equipment. They were not extravagant to this extent. Seeing that the two of them were speechless, the beautiful guild leader was overjoyed. She even thought of the scene of wearing this equipment and farming monsters crazily in the future. At this moment, Super Rich, who had been silent, asked weakly. “Is this equipment very powerful?” Super Rich was a newbie in the game. He did not understand the value of this equipment, so he asked. Twinkle Rose looked around as if she did not hear him. No matter what, she would not explain. After all, this guy had spent 500,000 dollars on the global chat. If he was interested, it would be hard to obtain the equipment. The other two did not dare to offend the Silver Snow Guild because of this, so they did not speak. Seeing that no one spoke, Twinkle Rose felt that victory was in her grasp. But at this critical moment. Lorne, the auctioneer, appeared at an inappropriate moment. “Very impressive.” Lorne explained, “The top equipment at this stage in the game are Bronze-grade. Silver equipment is the peak at this time period. Moreover, this equipment has high defense and automatic poison damage functions. It can make up for the lack of skill and maintain a high farming efficiency.” “I see.” Super Rich suddenly realized something, “I want this equipment. I’ll pay 100,000 alliance dollars.” 100,000? Hearing this price, the other two looked at each other. This was the difference between them and a super tycoon. Looking at him, bidding 100,000 was as simple as drinking water. There was no need to think. At the side, Twinkle Rose also bit her red lips. She wished she could kill that scoundrel Tyrant. It was already a huge loss for her to buy an equipment for 90,000, but this scoundrel actually wanted to earn more. He did not even care about a girl’s wallet. He was simply too evil. How horrible! She was supposed to spend the money on some cosmetics… “I’ll pay 110,000.” Twinkle Rose bit her lips and said angrily. ‘I’m a natural beauty. I don’t need much cosmetics…’ But then… Super Rich added plainly, “Then I’ll round it up to 200,000.” Pfft— The three allies beside him suffered heavy internal injuries. At this moment, they finally understood what it meant to be extravagantly inhumane. The commotion of snatching equipment quickly stopped, and Twinkle Rose was also stopped by the price of 200,000 alliance dollars. A level 10 Silver-grade equipment could shock people even if it was sold for 100,000 dollars. If it was 200,000 dollars, everyone who heard the news would probably feel their scalps tingle. As everyone gradually entered the next segment, an even more astonishing sight greeted him. The area in front that looked like a Battle Arena was actually filled with spoils of war and piled up together, like a small glowing mountain. “No way, he also killed hundreds of elite monsters too?” Twinkle Rose felt her mouth go dry. She had always thought that Tyrant had killed a Boss alone in these ten minutes. But who knew that the result would be so terrifying? Not only had Tyrant killed a single Boss, but he had also killed hundreds of elite monsters! At this moment, everyone was confused. They could not believe what they were seeing. Only Super Rich stood at the side and said with a rueful expression, “Leader is indeed the leader. His strength far exceeds everyone’s imagination.” “Tsk, you damned bootlicker!” Twinkle Rose glared at him. She really could not understand. He was clearly a super tycoon in reality. How could he be willing to be a simp in the game? In fact, he was simping a man. … A few minutes later, the few of them cleaned up the battlefield. Because the loot here was relatively concentrated, it was picked up relatively quickly. They continued forward. After passing through the poisonous pool, they saw another speechless scene. There were hundreds of corpses in front of them. At least a third of them were Bronze monsters. “How absurd…” Twinkle Rose was speechless. If they were facing this monster, they might need to fight one for a long time. She really did not know what Tyrant had done to be able to farm so quickly. There were four of them cleaning up the battlefield, but they could not beat Tyrant’s clear speed alone. It was too uncomfortable. … At the same time, deep in the valley. Lorne gathered the materials that had dropped from the ground and stepped on the corpses of the monsters into a very special area. This was a circular cave with eight caves around it. Every once in a while, a random cave would produce a large number of monsters. He had to get rid of these monsters as soon as possible, or else the monsters in the field would increase and soon drown him. “Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows!” Currently, only “Small Artillery” had a AOE skill, so it was the main attacker here. With its high attack power, the first five waves of monsters were cleared very easily. However, as the monsters’ attributes increased and their numbers grew, the damage dealt by Small Artillery was already somewhat insufficient. With his current pets, there was no way for Lorne to clear out the monsters before the next wave arrived. “No, I have to replace the minotaur.” Lorne frowned. Now that the team was short of damage, they needed another DPS to quickly clear the monsters. With that in mind, Lorne looked at one of the undead archers. Although he did not have the ‘fire’ material on him now, he had obtained some poison after killing the Poisonous Salamander King. He could use it to create a poison archer to make up for the team’s lack of damage. “It should be effective.” Without hesitation, Lorne activated his talent and placed a dying undead archer into the formula. Then, he took out the Poison Sac of the Poisonous Salamander King from his bag and put it into the formula. Soon, the synthesis formula was created. “Ding!” “A prototype material and a body part material have been confirmed. The synthesis formula is: (Undead Archer) + (Poison Sac of the Poisonous Salamander King) = (???)” “The cost is 1 gold coin. Would you like to merge?” The formula appeared and Lorne was pleasantly surprised. The cost of this synthesis was also 1 gold coin, which meant that the quality of the final product was no different from the Fire of Death. There was a high chance that it would be a Silver monster. Now, it was up to the final compatibility level. If the superiority was high, then passing this trial would be very easy. With that in mind, Lorne made up his mind. The next moment. A familiar light enveloped the undead archer. Soon, a pleasant reminder sounded in Lorne’s ear. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Silver Monster: Source of Poison!” With that, what appeared before Lorne was an undead in tattered clothes. Dark green poison fog rose from its body, making it look very unique. ———— [Source of Poison] (Contract Possible) Grade: Silver Level: 1 (0/1500) HP: 2100 / 2100 Physical Attack: 180-260 Defense: 70 Superiority: 90% Skills: [Rapid Fire], [Frenzied Shooting] Skill: [Poisonous Rain of Arrows]: Fire countless arrows at the target location (10 × 10) yards. The arrows will continuously release poison. Each second, there will be an additional stack, up to five stacks. Each layer of poison will deal 5 points of true damage. Duration: 10 seconds. Skill: [Poisonous Arrow]: All arrows will release poison for 5 seconds. Range (2 x 2), up to 5 stacks. (Poison effect is the same as above, but attack speed -50% after activation of the skill.) Introduction: …. ———— Indeed, this monster’s attributes were identical to the Fire of Death. The only difference were the skill effects. The Fire of Death dealt damage instantly. As for the ‘poison’ attribute, it provided sustained damage over time. What Lorne cared about now was the true damage of Source of Poison. Although its level was low, the additional poison effect was very powerful. Even in its Level 1 state, it could deal excellent damage against the monster in front of it. “Poisonous Rain of Arrows!” At Lorne’s command, Source of Poison drew its dark green bow. In the next second, countless poisonous arrows descended from the sky, enveloping the monsters in front. The damage from the arrow hitting the monsters was not high. But most important, the arrows were all emitting green poison, which affected all the monsters that passed. Under five stacks of poison, it could cause 25 points of damage per second. After 10 seconds, it would deal a total of 250 points of damage. In terms of output, it was definitely not inferior to the Fire of Death. With it, Lorne’s team had twice the combat strength. With such damage output, it was easy to pass the round. Swish! Swish! Swish! Lorne stood in the center, commanding his pets to take advantage of the situation. The savage Bronze monsters could do nothing to him. A few minutes later, Lorne stepped on a pile of bones and followed the dungeon’s instructions into a dark cave. He followed the dark stairs and finally arrived at a huge and strange dark hall. Slam! Slam! Slam! The moment he stepped in, countless voices sounded. Five meters above, dozens of torches burned fiercely. With the help of the dark green light, Lorne saw the true appearance of the fire sources. They were the heads of ferocious beasts. At the same time, the flames lit up the entire hall. There were no other monsters here, only a coffin in the center of the hall. It was suspended in midair by four thick chains. There was a scarlet magic circle under it, and the patterns on it were like blood. At this moment, they were emitting red blood energy that gathered towards the coffin above. Such a strange scene was obviously not normal. Lorne moved a little closer, Rimuru beside him, ready to defend him against any potential danger. Two archers stood on each side, their bows in their hands as they guarded the surroundings. When everyone was close enough, suddenly! “Phew—” A strange wind swept through the entire hall. Then, they gathered at the bottom of the coffin, forming a strange tornado. It gathered the scarlet blood energy and even the red runes on the ground, finally infusing them into the coffin in midair. Then… Everything went calm. It was as if nothing had happened. Thinking that he had to get close enough to trigger the subsequent scene, Lorne walked over. But at that moment, A scythe made entirely of white bones descended from the sky. Clang! The bone scythe landed on the path Lorne took, the blade stabbing into the hard ground. Then, black fog enveloped the surroundings, and a pair of scarlet eyes floated in midair. The white bone scythe on the ground trembled and flew into the sky. A dark, withered hand seized the scythe. Lorne could not help but take a few steps back. Following his pupils, he could see a huge figure. It was a black-robed undead mage. ———— [Undead Mage – Soul] Grade: Boss Level: 10 HP: 67,500 / 67,500 Magic Attack: 320-450 Physical Defense: 120 Magic Defense: 120 Skills: [Death Confinement], [Undead Summoning], [Undead Blessing], [Undead Absorption], [Death Scythe] Introduction: Once a powerful Mage of the Empire, he died unfortunately in the war. Later, his soul was awakened by the power of darkness and became a puppet that only knew how to kill. Anyone who came close to its territory would be torn to pieces. ———— From the interface, although this was also an ordinary Level 10 Boss, its attributes were anything but normal. An attack limit of 450 points was stronger than any enemy that Lorne had encountered so far. However, it could not escape the fate of being killed. Lorne was not about to let it go. “Rimuru, draw the aggro of the Boss!” “Small Artillery, Rapid Fire!” Lorne quickly gave the order, then hid far away, using his authority to control the Fire of Death to activate the skill. The bow was drawn like a full moon. In an instant, five flaming arrows burst from its hands. -319 -315 -297 -301 -299 The undead mage’s defense was not high, so Lorne dealt a considerable amount of damage with one skill. At this moment, Source of Poison also drew its bow and fired countless arrows. However, it was only Level 1 and could only deal about a third of the damage of Small Artillery. On the other hand, Little Mantis’s damage output was on par with Little Artillery in close combat. However, unfortunately, it needed to dodge the Boss’ counterattack, so it could not deal as much damage. As for Rimuru, who was responsible for absorbing damage, damage output was not its strength. The 200-300 damage output could basically be ignored. Even so, in just a few seconds, the four pets dealt nearly 4,000 damage. To the current players, this was simply unimaginable damage. “Come out, undead wandering in the world!” Seeing that its health had decreased by a large amount, the Boss Undead Mage clenched its dry fingers. The next moment, countless mounds appeared. Then, undead creatures broke out of the ground. It was a group of Skeletal Warriors. Their entire bodies were rotting. With their blades and shields in hand, they charged at Lorne. “Rain of Arrows!” Lorne did not dare to be careless. He quickly commanded the two undead archers to use their AOE skills, and countless arrows covered the ground. In an instant, red skill damage, purple magic damage, and white true damage floated in the air. There were more than a hundred of them. Those skeleton monsters were only creatures that had been summoned. Their health points were not high. After taking two waves of rain of arrows, their health points had already decreased by half. “Little Mantis, clean up the remaining monsters!” Lorne did not let the monsters affect his damage output. He commanded the mantis to clear the monsters. Then, he moved quickly and controlled Small Artillery to focus on dealing damage. Arrows burning with flames bombarded the undead mage non-stop. The upper limit of 455 Attack Points was vividly displayed at this moment, and a magnificent damage output feast was played under Lorne’s command. Facing such constant attacks, the Boss’ figure trembled repeatedly. Its health decreased by 10,000 points in the blink of an eye. But at that moment, The undead mage waved its hand and roared, “Lowly undead, offer up your souls!” As soon as it finished speaking, balls of light emerged from the summoned monsters and poured into the undead mage. Almost in the next second, its health points returned to full. This effect came from one of his skills. ———— [Undead Absorption]: The undead mage will recall the souls summoned to heal itself. Each undead can heal 200 HP. ———— This self-healing boss was the most troublesome opponent. Fortunately, Lorne’s pets had enough damage output to deal with the current situation. As for earlier? It was only because Lorne wanted to farm the monsters later that the Boss had the opportunity. However, as long as he arranged for them to clear the monsters, the situation would be much simpler. With a plan in mind, Lorne was more confident. When the undead mage’s health decreased by about 5,000 points again, it began another round of summoning. “Come out, undead wandering in the world!” Another dozens of mounds appeared, and dozens of monsters walked out. This time, Lorne did not let them wander. Instead, he turned the arrow and quickly cleaned up the monsters that wandered on the ground. -437 -433 -441 -425 -870! (Critical) … Under the high attack speed and AOE skills, the monsters were quickly wiped out. Without the small monsters to heal it, this Boss was basically helpless. Because of the “Summoning” skill, it had very few active offensive skills. It was impossible to turn the situation around with just Undead Confinement. Instead, Lorne’s damage output was very obvious. In the midst of the extremely fast shooting, the flaming arrows were like cannonballs that bombarded the Boss crazily, quickly reducing its health. -427 -421 -413 -405 -425 A series of high damage numbers floated in the air. Against Lorne’s attack, the undead mage could not fight back. Its health points decreased rapidly like running water. But Lorne’s attacks did not stop. Arrows shot out constantly, making him look like a emotionless shooting machine. In this case, after a series of wild shots, the undead mage’s health had fallen to less than 10,000 points. However, at this moment, the Boss, who felt that its life was in danger, finally changed its attack style. “Foolish human brat, see how powerful the Death Scythe is!” The Boss let out an angry roar. With that, it walked out of the black fog. The huge bone scythe in its hand was also wrapped in a layer of black light. ———— [Death Scythe]: The Undead Mage swings the scythe and turns into a close combat fighter. Attack range increases by 100%, attack speed increases by 100%, attack damage increases by 100%, and is immune to 30% of damage. ———— This was clearly the Boss’ ultimate move! Lorne could feel the powerful pressure of the bone scythe. With double the damage, only one slash was needed to take his life. Especially with the terrifying double attack range. This effect was very fatal to players, because it was very difficult to determine their safe location. If they were not careful, they might die by the hands of the other party. “Rimuru, block it!” Lorne did not continue controlling Small Artillery, but instead focused on dodging. This Boss had already placed all its attention on him, so he had to dodge seriously. Fortunately, when he added points, he treated “Agility” as his main attribute. Coupled with the stats from equipment, Lorne’s current speed was not slower than the Boss. As long as he controlled the rhythm, he could easily kite the boss. With unusual calm, Lorne began leading the undead mage around the room, perfectly keeping the distance between them at about 30 yards. This was a relatively safe distance. Other than archers, it was difficult for other classes to hit such a long-range target. Furthermore, this was a melee-type undead mage. With a roar, it held the scythe and charged at Lorne, bent on slicing him in half. Unfortunately, that plan did not succeed. With Rimuru blocking it, it could not get within ten yards of Lorne. Instead, during this period of chasing, it had suffered too many attacks. Its health decreased rapidly. In the blink of an eye, it was below 5%. It could be merged now! Lorne made everyone stop, then activated his talent skill at the Boss. However… This time, something unexpected happened. “Ding!” “This monster is in a special state. It cannot be synthesized as a prototype!” An indecipherable notification popped up. This was the first time that Lorne had encountered such a situation. “Special state?” Seeing this, Lorne finally noticed the name of the boss. It said, “Undead Mage – Soul”, as if it was only a controlled soul and not a complete monster. Lorne did not know if that was the reason. But he did not think too much about it. Since he could not treat this Boss as a prototype, he would kill it and get the body part material. After all, it was a Bronze-Grade Boss. The materials dropped would definitely not be ordinary. Without thinking, Lorne ordered his pets to kill it. After a series of shots from Small Artillery, Little Mantis, who was wandering near the undead mage, quickly stepped forward. Its sickle-like arms slashed out countless sword lights that covered the Boss. The final scythe tore through its throat, ending the brutal battle. -860! (Critical) A scarlet-colored critical damage floated out, and the undead mage’s health was completely emptied. It lost its vitality and became a pile of rotting bones. At this moment, a ball of white and a ball of black energy spread out from the skeleton. The white energy only quietly emitted light, calm and peaceful. However, the ball of black light transformed into the shape of a demon’s head. It struggled in the air, as if it were on the verge of collapse. It let out a hysterical roar at Lorne, “Damn you, human brat! How dare you offend the Great Necromancer, Hall! Just you wait, one day, I’ll tear you into pieces!” “How noisy.” Before it could finish, Lorne waved his short staff and shattered the evil soul. It was already dead, why did it have to say so much nonsense? With that in mind, he grabbed the ball of white light. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: A cleansed pure soul.” This was a body part material? Lorne was surprised at his harvest. This was because the materials he had obtained previously were mostly parts of the monster’s body. But now, he had obtained a soul. It seemed that there were many forms of synthesis materials, and there were countless possibilities for the synthesis of monsters. Everything had just begun. “There are no other loot?” Lorne looked at the skeleton of the undead mage, but there was not a single bronze coin around. Moreover, the dungeon notification did not appear. Was there a special situation? Lorne recalled what the Light Priestess Leisha had said. It seemed that there was something special hidden in this dungeon. But this seemed to be the end. Apart from the coffin, there was nothing to note. With that in mind, Lorne carefully walked in its direction. Only this coffin was suspicious. However! When he was close enough, something like an air wall blocked his path. At the same time, a notification appeared in front of him. “Ding!” “Warning! Unable to approach. The spatial node has not been completely opened.” Spatial node? Lorne saw another strange phrase. If he was not mistaken, this was the information that Priestess Leisha wanted. “Should I destroy it?” Lorne thought that might be his mission. Since it was an arrangement by the Dark Abyss Faction, it must be disadvantageous to the Human Empire. If he could destroy it, it should be a meritorious deed. Moreover, this dungeon could only be entered once. If he ignored this magic circle, it might really bring disaster to the surrounding forces. With that in mind, Lorne ordered his pets to destroy the array under the coffin. Small Artillery’s black bow was drawn directly, and an arrow burning with undead flames instantly shot at the center of the magic circle, destroying the runes in the magic circle. But at that moment, suddenly! A powerful and strange force descended. All the flames in the hall were instantly extinguished, and the entire hall fell into deathly silence. In the Valley of the Dead. Twinkle Rose and the others, who were still cleaning up the loot in the valley, were entering the region with eight caves. They were used to the pile of glowing equipment. No one was as excited as before. After all, these loot were not theirs. Twinkle Rose sighed and prepared to pick up a Bronze equipment from the ground. At that moment, she suddenly blacked out. An ear-piercing reminder sounded. “Ding!” “An unknown powerful existence has descended nearby. You are suppressed by its aura and thus received the following debuff: -90% HP, -90% Attack, -90% Defense, -100% Movement Speed…” As the voice sounded, their bodies froze. They realized that they could not move at all. Moreover, even their attributes had fallen to the limit at this moment. “What happened?” “What happened?” Twinkle Rose used her lively eyes to survey her surroundings. However, her vision was blocked, making it impossible to see her surroundings. “Could something have happened in the valley?” The Knight player in the team wondered. Another person answered, “It must be!” “This isn’t good. The leader is still farming monsters. He must have encountered something.” Super Rich quickly opened the team channel and said, “Leader, we can’t move. Is everything okay over there? We’re all worried about you.” “Who’s worried about him? Don’t talk nonsense, you bootlicker.” Twinkle Rose grumbled, but she was also thinking about what had happened. She also wanted to know what had happened to Lorne. … In the deepest part of the valley. The same notification sounded in the hall. Feeling his own condition, Lorne was stunned. He could not understand what was happening. An existence that could instantly make him lose all attributes with just its aura. Could it be that a god had descended? Or rather, the guy hiding in the spatial node? That was possible. To be summoned so secretly, he was definitely not an ordinary existence. Just as he was thinking this, suddenly! Flames burst forth. Five meters up, the flames that had already been extinguished suddenly ignited again. But this time, it was not dark green flames. It was the even more peculiar black! The light emitted by these black flames was very faint, but at the same time, it made one feel an intense chill. Almost the moment it appeared, the entire hall’s temperature fell to a freezing point. “Puny human…” An icy female voice sounded in the hall, bringing with it the pressure of a superior being, and an aura that made people not dare to look up. Lorne trembled slightly. It was not because he was afraid, but because he was not accustomed to the sudden drop in temperature. After all, he was a player, and death was not the most terrifying thing. The moment he heard the voice, Lorne looked up. In the next moment, his pupils dilated several times. He was shocked by the scene before him. It was because Lorne saw a hideous dragon head. The fangs in it were as thick as his entire body. Two scarlet eyes stared at him, as if they wanted to look at him from head to toe. Giant Dragon! A black Giant Dragon! It was a hundred meters long and covered the entire hall. In the dark shadows, huge dragon wings could be seen waving. “You’re strange…” “Despite such weak strength, you can actually summon so many strange creatures. Looks like you have a huge secret on you.” A hint of curiosity appeared in the black dragon’s eyes. It seemed to be very interested in Lorne’s ability to summon strange creatures. It said in a proud and cold female voice, “In that case, I, the Dragon of Darkness, Doris, will give you a chance to join the Dark Legion. I will promise to make you a powerful Dark Summoner!” “Ding!” “System Notification: Dragon of Darkness, Doris, invites you to defect to the Dark Faction and promises to grant you the hidden class [Dark Summoner]. Do you agree?” “System Notification: After agreeing, you will automatically join the Dark Faction and be despised and hunted by all the Light Faction!” “System Notification: The Dragon of Darkness, Doris, is extremely savage. If she hears any defiant answer, you will be brutally killed by her! Please make a decision carefully!” A series of notifications appeared. However, Lorne felt a headache. He had been doing well in the human faction. Not only did he have so many powerful pets, but he had also formed a relationship with the Light Priestess, Leisha. He was about to receive the reward when he suddenly got forced to defect and join the dark side? Wasn’t this too much? To be honest, Lorne did not like the style of the Dark Faction. Thinking about the scene he saw when he entered the Valley of the Dead, it was unbearable. If he joined the Dark Faction, wouldn’t he be surrounded by disgusting monsters all the time? No. Absolutely not! Lorne did not want to be alone in that situation. However! He did not dare to reject her directly. The system notification said very clearly that as long as he rejected her, he would definitely be harmed by Doris. If he was killed by the black dragon with a single slap, he might fail the dungeon mission and even fail the mission given to him by Leisha. This was too great a loss for him to bear. He could only stall for time. He only hoped that the leader of the Light Faction would discover the Dragon of Darkness who had intruded into the territory of the Empire and rush here to save him. “A rare hidden class?” In the meantime, Lorne checked the benefits. The result was indeed attractive. This was a rare hidden class in the Summoner series. The class effect was very powerful. The skills were also several times stronger than ordinary Summoners, or even ten times as much. If not for the Monster Merging Simulator in his hand, he might have really agreed to the other party’s request. It was just that the bonus of a hidden class was too tempting for a player. “Human, don’t challenge the dragon’s patience. Make your choice quickly!” The Dragon of Darkness, Doris, said impatiently. Its huge eyes emitted a cold killing intent, as if it would kill Lorne if he did not answer in the next second. Lorne frowned and smiled bitterly. It seemed that he was really going to die today. Forget it, so be it. It was impossible to join the dark side. After all, he was a young man filled with righteousness! Lorne made up his mind. He stared helplessly at Doris who was about to erupt and quietly waited for death to arrive. But at that moment… Buzz— An incomparably brilliant light descended into the hall, illuminating everything with a holy aura. “Ding!” “An unknown powerful existence has descended nearby. You are suppressed by its aura and thus received the following debuff: -90% HP, -90% Attack, -90% Defense, -100% Movement Speed…” The four teammates in the valley received another notification. Just like before, this time, they received the same negative effects. This made them even more confused. “Why is there another one?” “What happened inside?” “Leader is indeed the leader. He’s different from others even when farming dungeons.” “What is Tyrant doing?” Twinkle Rose frowned. She wished she could rush to the deepest part of the valley and see the scene clearly, but she could not do so now. She could not even raise a finger. … At this moment, a few teammates were asking about the situation in the team channel. But Lorne had no time to answer them. Because in this hall, another incomparably huge golden dragon appeared! On the body of this golden dragon, there was a holy and pure light. The huge golden dragon wings flapped, completely dispelling the cold in the hall. Its huge body occupied the other half of the hall. It was high up and extremely holy. Lorne looked over and saw a name above him. [Dragon of Light, Hamut] Dragon of Light? Was it the god of the Church of Light? Lorne had not expected to see the supreme Divine Dragon here. “Doris, why aren’t you staying in your Dark Dragon Abyss? Why have you come to the Human Empire?” The Dragon of Light spoke in an extremely calm voice, but it did not sound like it hated evil. The tone was more like meeting a good friend and giving the most basic greeting. “Do I need to report to you wherever I go?” There was no fear in her tone. But Lorne could see that her strength could not resist the Light Dragon’s suppression. The shadows around Doris were also corroded by the holy light power. No matter how hard she resisted, she could not grasp any more space. At this moment, the Light Dragon was still releasing its power, and the holy light was becoming more and more magnificent. Doris could not hold on anymore. “You’re just relying on the thousands of years of faith…” Doris snorted, then began to back away. In the domain of the Human Empire, she was no match for Hamut, not to mention that this was just an avatar of hers now. However, before leaving, she could not help but look at Lorne and say coldly, “Damn human brat, This King will remember you.” With that, Doris flapped her wings, opened a spatial door, and vanished from the sealed hall. At this moment. Lorne received a notification. “Ding!” “You have received the attention of the Dragon of Darkness, Doris. You have received a negative buff: Mark of Darkness.” Hearing this notification, Lorne felt a headache. It was fine if the Dragon of Darkness left, but why did she have to give himself a negative buff before she left? Was she a sore loser? ———— [Mark of Darkness] (Buff) Effect 1: All dark creatures deal+20% damage to you. Effect 2: You deal +20% damage to all dark creatures. Effect 3: Due to the fact that this mark is stained with the aura of the Dragon of Darkness, it has a suppressive effect on all low-level dragons. All attributes -10%. Description: The Dragon of Darkness, Doris, is staring at you. As long as she is within a certain range, she will be able to sense your location. ———— “Is this a negative buff?” Lorne thought he had seen wrong. Although the dark creatures could harm him more, he could do the same to them. If he compared it, it would not be considered a loss, right? Moreover, the effect of this buff was not only limited to that. Its third effect was most interesting. It could actually threaten the low-level dragons and even reduce their attributes by 10%. One had to know that these were dragons! Their attributes were all very powerful. Reducing the attributes of a dragon by 10% was a terrifying number. “Did she fall for me?” Lorne felt that she had a good impression of him, or else she would not have given him such a huge gift when she left. At this moment, the Dragon of Light, Hamut, said, “Young adventurer, you have been marked by the aura of the Dragon of Darkness. Let me help you cleanse it.” What? Cleanse it? No, no need for that. Lorne quickly shook his head and said respectfully, “Honorable Dragon God, thank you for your kindness, but I do not want to remove this mark like this. As a new adventurer, I want it to always be by my side, reminding me that there is still a powerful enemy targeting me from the outside world.” “I didn’t expect you to have such resolution.” The Dragon of Light’s majestic gaze became much gentler. It approved of the adventurer’s will, and said, “Young adventurer, your courage is commendable. It has been a long time since the Church of Light has had an adventurer join us. If you are willing to join the Church of Light, find it in the main city. I will give you a chance to approach the Divine Radiance.” With that, a mission panel appeared in front of Lorne with a pleasant reminder. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining the recognition of the Dragon of Light and obtaining an epic mission: [Divine Radiance – Prelude]. Do you accept it?” “Mission Hint: This mission is very difficult. Failure to complete the mission will affect the Dragon of Light’s opinion of you. Please make a careful decision.” “Prompt: The Church of Light is located in the main city of any human empire.” An epic mission? Lorne was stunned by the surprise. In “Divine Realm”, “epic” was a very high-level term. The rewards for an epic mission were extremely rich and could allow one to surpass all the players at this stage. Of course, the difficulty of an epic mission was beyond imagination. To complete the mission, one needed to have immense strength. Lorne had never doubted his strength. If this was a mission that even he could not complete, then no one in this world could complete it. Therefore, he did not hesitate. “I will definitely go.” Lorne answered firmly. This attitude made the Dragon of Light very pleased. It said, “You did not disappoint me.” “I will wait for you to come. In addition, before you leave, let me give you a greeting gift. Thank you for your contribution to the light.” With that, the Dragon of Light flapped its wings, and a holy light poured over Lorne as it left the hall. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining the divine power baptism of the Dragon of Light. All attributes+10.” “Congratulations on obtaining the Dragon of Light’s gift: Sage’s Magic Robe (Silver).” “Congratulations on obtaining the blessing of the Dragon of Light: Luck+2.” “Congratulations on obtaining the Dragon of Light’s gift: Dragon Race of Order, Reputation+100.” A series of notifications sounded. Looking at the dazzling rewards, Lorne was too touched. This Dragon of Light was too good to him. It wanted to help him clear the mark of darkness from the beginning. Then, it issued an epic mission. When it left in the end, it even gave him four rewards. Each of these four rewards was very extraordinary in value. Especially the final reputation points of the Dragon race, this was something that one could not obtain no matter how much money they spent. After giving the rewards, the Dragon of Light left. The floating coffin was illuminated by the holy light and completely lost its effect. At the same time, time began to flow again in the hall. The corpse of the dead undead mage dropped equipment all over the ground, spilling various loot. The dungeon clear notification that had not appeared all this time sounded at this moment. “Ding!” “Global Announcement: Congratulations [Tyrant’s Team] for successfully killing the Boss, the Undead Mage, and for completing the first clear of the Nightmare Dungeon. You have done a great deed and are now in the annals of history!” “Ding!” “Global Announcement: Congratulations to the five members of [Tyrant’s Team]: [Tyrant] (Leader), [Twinkle Rose] (Member), [Super Rich] (Member), and… They will receive: Free Attribute Points+10, Reputation+1,000, EXP+10,000, Gold Coins+10, Luck+1, and Bronze Treasure Chest x3.” “Ding!” “Global Announcement: Congratulations [Tyrant’s Team] for obtaining the first clear of the Nightmare Dungeon. Reward: Silver Treasure Chest x2, [Hellhound Summoning] (Orange Skill Book).” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” All the announcements sounded in the players’ ears three times. When they heard the contents of the announcement, all the players in the world were shocked. … In the Federation. In the eastern region. In a certain Grade 1 Energy Base City. At the headquarters of the Creation God Guild. As the most powerful guild in the eastern region, the “Creation God Guild” was jointly created by six large corporations. At the beginning of the establishment of this guild, the six large corporations had gathered 10 billion alliance dollars to use it to rope in all the online gaming experts in the world. Therefore, although it had just been created, it still had the strength to compete with the strongest guilds in the world. At this moment, In the core base of the Creation God Guild. The top ten players of the guild were all in the high-level game cabin. They controlled their characters and began the dungeon challenge mission. Their goal was to pass the Hard-difficulty dungeon and prove themselves to the world. Moreover, the six large corporations were considering whether to continue injecting funds. As for how much funds they would give, it would depend on the results of the competition between them and the other guilds in the world. Therefore, in today’s dungeon challenge, the higher-ups of the Creation God Guild all had great determination. In the conference room, the higher-ups of the guild were watching the progress of the game. When everyone saw that the five guilds had used all their strength to pass the seventh wave of monsters, the entire conference room was filled with cheers. “Yes!” “We succeeded!” “Long live the Creation God!” “Great, we’ve succeeded before the rest of the entire world!” Everyone was abnormally excited. This was because their information showed that the other guilds were still stuck at 50% progress. No one had reached 70% progress. This meant that they were infinitely close to obtaining the first clear of the Hard-difficulty dungeon before all the guilds succeeded! If they completed this goal, not only would the guild be able to prove their strength to the world, but they would also be able to obtain 60 billion dollars from the six major corporations. The Creation God Guild would then walk towards glory and become a legend in the “Divine Realm”! Thinking of this, all the higher-ups were abnormally excited. But at that moment, an announcement banner suddenly appeared on the projection screen of the meeting room. “Ding!” “Global Announcement: Congratulations [Tyrant’s Team] for successfully killing the Boss, the Undead Mage, and for completing the first clear of the Nightmare Dungeon. You have done a great deed and are now in the annals of history!” “Ding!” “Ding!” The huge announcement sounded three times. The smiles on the faces of all the higher-ups of the Creation God Guild and the visiting members of the six major corporations froze. They stared at the announcement in disbelief, as if they had seen a ghost. Nightmare-level! It said Nightmare! “How is this possible?!” The confident higher-ups of the guild scratched their heads in disbelief. The information was clearly stated that the other guilds barely made it past 50%. Why did someone suddenly complete the Nightmare Dungeon? “How can this be?” The president of the Creation God Guild did not believe everything that was happening. Even if he saw it with his own eyes, he could not accept such an outcome. 60 billion! A second ago, he still felt that he was about to succeed. In the next second, he was sent directly to hell, and the 60 billion dollars was gone. “Go and investigate! Find this Tyrant no matter where he is!!!” … In the western region of the Federation. In an underground base, there were tens of thousands of high-level game cabins. Countless selected soldiers lay inside and entered the game. This was a game base secretly built by the Western Region’s military. Because of some secret information from the Federation, they organized some troops to enter the game. The rumors about “virtual reality” on the Internet were not groundless. In a sense, this situation was likely to be realized. Therefore, they valued this game very much. However, because the World Federation did not advocate war now, any thoughts regarding fighting had to be carried out secretly. It was because of this that their base was set up so secretly, and even on the surface, it was hidden by the private enterprise groups. “The Creation God Guild in the eastern region still thinks that we’re stopped at 50% progress. What a joke. In fact, we’ve already reached 80% progress.” “With just one or two days, we can definitely obtain the first clear of the Hard-difficulty dungeon!” Colonel Mathegus, the head of the underground base, smiled. The combat skills of the special forces were not something ordinary people could compare to, especially in virtual games. Right now, he was confident that his army could definitely obtain the reward of the first clear before everyone else and quickly increase the strength of the guild. With that in mind, Colonel Mathegus laughed. He seemed to see the Goddess of Victory waving at him. At this moment. A series of grand system notifications suddenly sounded in the office. “Ding!” “Global Announcement: Congratulations [Tyrant’s Team] for successfully killing the Boss, the Undead Mage, and for completing the first clear of the Nightmare Dungeon. You have done a great deed and are now in the annals of history!” “Ding!” “Ding!” Upon seeing the word ‘Nightmare’, Colonel Mathegus was immediately dumbfounded. He sat down on the chair with a blank expression and could not recover from his shock. Because “Divine Realm” was released by the World Federation and was directly linked to real money, the virtual game received worldwide attention. Today, because of the sudden announcement, all the players in the world were riled up. Almost everyone was searching for information regarding [Tyrant]. On the various search platforms, the search numbers for terms like [Tyrant’s Team] and [Nightmare First Clear] suddenly increased by tens of thousands of times. On the forum, there were thousands of topics discussing Tyrant. Everyone wanted to know his true identity. But in the end, there was no result. No one knew who Tyrant was. They only knew that he had used more than half an hour to clear the most difficult Nightmare Mode Dungeon of “Divine Realm” and create an impossible legend. … “Ding!” “You used 10,500 experience points to raise your pet [Fire of Death (Small Artillery)] to Level 5.” “You used 13,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 6.” “You used 16,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 7.” “You used 19,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 8.” “You used 22,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 9.” “You used 25,500 experience points to raise your pet to Level 10.” “Prompt: The pet is unable to surpass the level of the Summoner. Please try to level up.” In the dungeon hall, Lorne obtained a large amount of experience, which he used to level up his pets. The level of “Small Artillery” directly reached 10, which cost a total of 108,000 experience points. However, to his surprise, Lorne still had more than 70,000 experience points left. This was because the first clear reward earlier gave him 50,000 experience points. Then, the clearing reward was 10,000 experience points, which added up to 60,000 points. The Summoner had a special EXP gain mechanism. With the experience buff of four pets, Lorne gained an additional 200% experience. Therefore, in the end, he obtained 180,000 experience points. After leveling the Fire of Death, Lorne gave the remaining 80,000 experience points to Source of Poison. The EXP needed to level up a Boss was too great, it was far inferior to the temporary benefits gained from leveling up other pets. Therefore, leaving Rimuru to level up in the end was the best choice. “Releasing pets is too costly.” “If only I had a tool that could extract experience points.” Looking at the new pet, Lorne thought of the Giant Axe Minotaur that had been released. Previously, the minotaur was Level 10, which also consumed a lot of experience. However, because it was released, the EXP on it could not be recovered, so all the EXP was wasted. From this, it could be seen that it was best not to change the pets of Summoners too frequently. Otherwise, just the cost of leveling up would make one spend several times more time than other players. “There should be information on the related items in the main city.” Lorne did not dwell on this issue. He looked at his harvest. Apart from the experience, he also obtained a large number of other rewards. First was the Silver Treasure Chest reward for the first kill. This was the team reward. However, before forming a team, there was a pact. All the rewards in the dungeon belonged to Lorne, so he could directly distribute them. He opened the treasure chest. Immediately, a brilliant silver light shone. The first was a gorgeous longbow that was glowing green. The second piece was a pair of wristguards. They were made of cloth and had golden patterns on them. They were very exquisite. As the equipment appeared, the system’s notification sounded. “Ding!” “Congratulations on obtaining the equipment: Forest Longbow (Silver-grade).” “Congratulations on obtaining the equipment: Sage’s Wisdom Bracer (Silver-grade).” An item part of the set?! Lorne’s eyes lit up. In the second treasure chest, one of the parts of the Sage Set appeared. He quickly picked up the equipment. ———— [Sage’s Wisdom Bracer] (Sage Set: 1 / 7) Quality: Silver Magic Attack: +50 Magic Resistance: +20 Spirit: +15 Type: Cloth Armor Level Requirement: 10 Additional effect: Increases MP recovery by 20%. Additional effect: Resists 5% of magic damage. Introduction: The Wisdom Bracer enhanced by a Sage can be of great help to the user. ———— The attributes were very outstanding. He directly equipped it. “Ding!” “The effect of [Sage Set] has been triggered. Set attributes received: Bypass 10 points of magic resistance of the target.” Clearly, this was a Mage equipment set. There were many magic attributes added, and the set effect reduced magic resistance. It was not so practical for Lorne. After all, as a Summoner with powerful pets, protecting his life was his only mission. However, no matter what, this was a Silver Set. The attributes it brought were superior to any equipment at this stage. In any case, before he obtained stronger equipment, Lorne would definitely not change out of this set. As for the set parts… Lorne took out the gift of the Dragon of Light. There was also a part of the Sage Set in there, and it was an even more important magic robe. ———— [Sage’s Magic Robe] (Sage Set: 1 / 7) Quality: Silver Health: +500 Magic: +400 Spirit: +20 Type: Cloth Armor Level Requirement: 10 Additional effect: Increases Constitution by 10 points. Additional effect: Resists 7% physical damage. Introduction: A magic robe enhanced by a Sage. It can be of great help to the user. ———— In ordinary equipment, the attributes of the robe and weapon were higher than other parts. This could be seen from the equipment in front of him. Moreover, the quality of this set equipment was very high. Although it was a cloth armor equipment, the health attribute increase was higher than the previous [Poisonous Armor]. Added to this, the three parts set effect was triggered: Bypass 20 points of magic resistance. According to this pattern, the seven sets should be able to bypass 280 magic resistance points. Most monsters would not have any defense against it and would just be running around naked. Other than that. There was also a precious reward after the first kill. It was an orange-level skill book: [Hellhound Summoning]! ———— Skill: [Hellhound Summoning] (Orange) Effect: Unlocks the Gate of Hell. Summon (Level x 5) Hellhound(s). Each Hellhound has 20% of the summoner’s attributes and will attack the target ahead crazily. Hellhound Duration: 30 seconds. Skill Cooldown: 300 seconds. Cost: (Number of Hellhounds x5) MP. Learning Requirement: Summoner, Level 40. ———— Gasp!!! Lorne gasped when he saw the effect. It was said that Summoners could win by numbers. However, such a scene of summoning dozens of monsters at once was unheard of. Although the attributes of the hellhounds were not high, their numbers were ‘Lorne’s Level x5’. If he was at Level 10, there would be 50 of them. This huge number was enough to surpass any quality differences. Especially when faced with a large number of enemies, this skill had the effect of changing the situation. However… This skill could only be learned after the Summoner reached Level 40. It was a terrible feeling. Because Lorne was only Level 10 now, he could not learn this skill. He had obtained a powerful skill but could not learn it immediately. To be honest, Lorne felt terrible. However, in the end, he could only sigh. This was the rule of the game. It could not be easily broken. Lorne could only focus on the other rewards. For example, the free attribute points. He was given 10 points as the clear reward. However, with all attributes+10 from the baptism of divine force bestowed by the Dragon of Light, he basically gained 50 points of stats. After adding the free attribute points in his own way, Lorne’s attributes increased significantly again. ———— ID: [Tyrant] Class: Apprentice Summoner Level: 10 Talent: [Monster Merging Simulator (???)] HP: 1440 / 1440 (760 ↑) MP: 1300 / 1300 (850 ↑) Magic Attack: 298-596 (80 ↑) Magic Resistance: 84 (55 ↑) Physical Resistance: 93 (26 ↑) Speed: 37.8 (4.4 ↑) Attributes: Constitution 93, Strength 15, Spirit 65, Intelligence 35, Agility 51 Free Attributes: 0 EXP: 9155 Reputation: 3,500 Dragon Race of Order Reputation: 100 Luck: 5 Possession: 20 Gold Coins, 45 Silver Coins, 11 Bronze Coins. ———— These were Lorne’s attributes. Compared to his own pet, such attributes were very ordinary. He was inferior to even the lowest quality creature, Little Mantis. However, to the players, such attributes were extremely powerful. Perhaps they wouldn’t even dare to imagine that they could have such magnificent attributes at Level 10.  While checking the attributes of the character, Lorne also glanced at the situation in the pet space. ———— Pet Space: [Slime King, Alchemy] (Rimuru): Level 5 (0 / 22,500) [Death Scythe Mantis] (Little Mantis): Level 10 (0 / 38,000) [Fire of Death] (Small Artillery): Level 10 (0 / 57,000) [Source of Poison] (Venom): Level 7 (0 / 19,800) ———— If the Summoner wanted to change his class successfully, he had to raise all his pets to Level 10. Lorne let it go for the moment. Because there were still some equipment left behind by the undead mage on the ground. As the final boss of the dungeon, the undead mage dropped a lot of equipment. There were five Bronze items and two Silver items. Unfortunately, there were no parts of the Sage Set among the Silver-grade equipment. The attributes were also very ordinary. Lorne did not like these things now, so he threw them into his bag. “The Enhancement Gems are not bad.” In addition to the equipment and gold coins, a few transparent gems dropped on the ground. This was a material used to enhance equipment. Unfortunately, they were all Bronze-grade gems and could only strengthen Bronze-grade items. Lorne was not very interested in them. After all, all his core equipment was Silver-grade, and there was no need to strengthen Bronze-grade equipment. He put away all the gems. But at that moment, Twinkle Rose and the others hurriedly rushed into the hall. “Tyrant, what have you done? You actually cleared the Nightmare Dungeon!” Twinkle Rose blushed as she looked at Lorne. She had not recovered from the surprise of appearing on a global announcement. “Eh…” Lorne did not know how to answer her, nor did he want to. This was because of the pets’ strength. On this issue, he did not want to reveal too much information to others. But Twinkle Rose did not dwell on this issue. Curious, she peeked at the hanging coffin behind Lorne and asked, “Where are the two powerful existences?” “They’ve already left.” Lorne casually explained, “That was just the ending story of the dungeon. There was no special situation.” Hearing this, Twinkle Rose, who had rich gaming experience, bit her lip and looked pensive. In the end, she left the team and ran near the coffin alone, wanting to find a clue. At this moment, Super Rich looked at Lorne seriously and said with deep meaning, “Leader, you’re really too awesome. The speed at which we looted the battlefield is actually slower than the speed at which you farm monsters.” “This is just basic stuff…” Lorne smiled and waved his hand, indicating that this was normal. The Knight player in the team poured out the loot that did not belong to him from his bag and suggested, “Tyrant, you can’t take all the equipment away from the dungeon. Why don’t you sell them to us now?” Hearing this, the eyes of Twinkle Rose, who was still studying the coffin, lit up. She hurried over. Lorne looked at his bag. It was full. This time, there were too many equipment. There were at least a hundred White Iron items and quite a number of Bronze items, at least twenty to thirty in number. However, the players only had 50 units of equipment space. Therefore, long ago, most of the equipment was kept in the bags of other teammates. Now that they had all taken out their equipment, it immediately piled up like a small mountain. Lorne did not care about the White Iron and Bronze equipment. He directly divided them into four portions and let the higher-ups of the guild distribute them. Super Rich bought a few Bronze items and did not want anything else. After all, he was a lone player and did not have a guild to support. The portion that he did not want was taken over by the Twinkle Rose. Finally, Lorne made a total of 355,000 dollars. This was all because they wanted to curry favor with Lorne, so they offered the highest price in the market. As for the Silver-grade equipment… Including the two items dropped by the undead mage and the one dropped from the treasure chest, there were a total of three Silver-grade items. Lorne did not want to keep them. Level 10 equipment would experience a very serious drop in price. The value would decrease by at least 20% every day. Therefore, it was best to make a move as soon as possible. Lorne directly launched an auction to let the rich bosses compete with each other. After several rounds of bidding, the auction finally ended. Forest Longbow, price: 90,000. Silver Light Sword, price: 130,000. Rock Wrist Guard, price: 70,000. The total auction sale reached 290,000. Coupled with the previous 355,000 and the 4 million entrance fee, Lorne had earned 4,645,000 alliance dollars today! The higher-ups of the three guilds each bought a Silver equipment and were very happy. Especially Twinkle Rose, she hugged the Silver Rapier and could not bear to let it go. However, she was quickly jolted awake by a notification. “Ding!” “You have been kicked out of the team by Leader [Tyrant]!” Pfft— The beautiful guild leader was so angry that she nearly spat out blood. The corners of her mouth twitched, “This heartless man, he kicked us the moment the dungeon was cleared.” Seeing that the others had left the dungeon, Twinkle Rose was still not resigned. She took advantage of the last minute to continue studying the coffin. However, she did not find anything in the end and could only leave the dungeon helplessly. “There must be a secret. That guy must be hiding something. Humph, do you think you can hide from me just because you don’t tell me? Stop dreaming. I’ll keep an eye on you! Damn little brother!” In the real world, in a top hotel in the Eastern Region. A high-level game cabin opened and a middle-aged man walked out. He was filled with the dignity of a superior. If there was anyone in the circle of super-rich people, they would definitely know his name. He was the richest man in the Eastern Region who had giant industries all over the world, Hoses. As an entrepreneur who had turned the Waltz Group into a top financial group in the world in a very short period of time, Hoses’ success was all due to his unique taste and tact personality. Twenty years ago, he had met an official who was inspecting a small construction site. Using him as a springboard, he had joined the upper society and lived there like a fish in water. In the end, he had started gathering influence in both legal and illegal businesses and gradually became the richest man in the Eastern Region. Today, he was tempted to try a new industry. That was the virtual game—”Divine Realm”. “It seems that the technology of the Federation is developing rapidly.” “This digital world should be as huge as the real world.” Thinking back to his experience in the game, he could not help but laugh. He had only wanted to change the tempo of his boring life, but he did not expect that this game would reignite the passion he had when he was a young boy. Unfortunately, he was a little old now and his skill was too poor. After playing for a few hours, he did not even leave the Beginner Village. Fortunately, just as he was thinking of a way to increase his strength, he met an absolute expert in the game. He was a player that all the players in the world could only look up to. At that moment, Hoses chose to be his companion. In the end, in a very short time, the other party brought him on a global announcement. In an instant, he became the envy of all the players in the world. In the period of time that he had been in contact with the other party, he had a very strong feeling that he had to maintain this relationship with the other party. This concerned his future. Although he did not know where this thought came from, it was all thanks to this premonition ability that he could succeed today. Otherwise, he would still be a small construction worker. “Master, the members of the Stern family are waiting for you in the dining room.” The old butler waited nearby and brought him a warm face towel. Hoses took the towel and said, “Okay. Go notify Hillier that I’ve approved her proposal. In addition, assign 30,000 workers to Hillier’s company from the surrounding factories. At the same time, appoint Tog as the vice-president and help Hillier manage the company.” “Oh… Understood, master.” The old butler stood rooted to the ground in shock. A few days ago, the Missy said that she wanted to open a virtual business. Master did not seem to have agreed all this time. Why did he suddenly agree today? Furthermore, 30,000 people were invested in one go. This was not a small number. … In the game world, after leaving the dungeon, Lorne appeared in the Beginner Village. Before entering the dungeon, he had spent a long time leveling up his pets, so it was already very late. After submitting the mission, he should go offline to rest. Virtual games put a lot of pressure on the mind. Being under such a tense situation for a long time, the body could not bear it. While he was thinking, Lorne arrived before the temple. As soon as he entered the temple, the missionary, who was praying for the other players, walked towards him with a smile. “Master Adventurer, I can’t believe you destroyed the minions of the Dark Abyss so quickly. You’re too powerful!” The missionary’s attitude had changed greatly compared to before. Lorne waved his hand, “It’s just a small matter. It’s not that great.” “No, no, no. You’re too humble, Master Adventurer.” “The minions of the Dark Abyss who have infiltrated the Empire are all very powerful, especially in this region. They are opponents that we cannot defeat.” “Even so, you have eliminated danger for the village. As the missionary of the village, I should give you the greatest admiration.” The missionary followed him with great respect, like a fanatic. Lorne was about to go find Lorne, but he paused after hearing the words. Then, he looked at the missionary and said earnestly, “Admiration is never as great as actual support. If you are willing to support me with dozens of gold coins, I think I will be more motivated.” “Eh…” The missionary was stunned. He had seen countless adventurers and dealt with countless situations. However, this was the first time he had encountered such an awkward and straightforward adventurer. What should he do? How should he answer? <i>‘I’m just being polite. I don’t really want to give you anything!’</i>  Although this was what he thought, the missionary could not say this against the adventurer before him, because he had completed the mission of the Light Priestess. He could not be offended. After a moment’s hesitation, the missionary took out his short staff and said, “I’m sorry, my lord warrior. As a missionary, I have no gold coins on me. The only valuable thing is the staff that I use to pray for the other adventurers in the village. It is very important and cannot be given to…” “It’s okay, I don’t mind that.” Before he could finish, Lorne took the equipment from him and walked into the inner hall of the temple. The missionary was stunned. He stood rooted to the ground, his head spinning intensely. Was there something wrong with his ears? <i>‘I had clearly said that the magic staff was very important and could not be handed to you. Why did you take it from me directly?’</i>  Without the Staff of Blessing, how could he bless the other adventurers? At this moment, a player stepped forward to request, “Missionary, I need your blessing.” However, the missionary could only return with the most depressed expression. From his resentful gaze, one could see that he said, “I’m sorry, friend. I’m an incomplete missionary without a staff.” … Inside the temple, Lorne glanced at the equipment in his bag. It was a Silver-grade equipment. Although the quality was relatively ordinary, the Silver-grade equipment at this time could be sold for tens of thousands of dollars as long as it was taken out. It was not inferior to dozens of gold coins. As for the missionary’s situation… As a player, was there a need to be polite to an NPC? If these NPCs wanted equipment, they could get it with just some data. How could players like them compare? Therefore, in the future, when encountering such NPCs, there was no need to be polite to them. If they wanted to help, he would not act stupid and reject their offer. Walking through the interior of the temple, Lorne thought of the strange things he had encountered in the dungeon. It was only a small dungeon, but it had attracted the Dragon of Darkness and even the Dragon of Light. This did not look normal at all. “I wonder if I can get some information from Leisha…” With that in mind, he walked into the inner hall. Here, he saw the Light Priestess Leisha in her holy robes again. Unlike the last time, Leisha had been waiting for this moment. Noticing his arrival, Leisha’s golden eyes snapped open, and she hurried down the platform to stand beside him. “I didn’t expect you to sweep through the Valley of the Dead so quickly. I can clearly sense that the dark aura in that area has weakened. They no longer pose a threat to the village.” Leisha looked at him, a holy smile on her face, “By the way, did you see anything special in the deepest part of the valley? Or was it something peculiar?” <i>Something peculiar?</i>  Without much thought, he told Leisha about the coffin he had seen in the dungeon hall and the information about the ‘spatial node’. Soon, Leisha gritted her teeth and said, “Those fellows from the Dark Abyss have indeed obtained information regarding the sealed node.” Sealed node? Lorne heard another strange phrase. “What’s a sealed node?” Lorne looked at her curiously. Hearing this, Leisha could not help but look deeply at Lorne, as if wondering if she should tell this news to the adventurer. After some thought, Leisha explained, “This matter needs to be explained from a long, long time ago.” “About a thousand years ago, in the abyss of this continent, there were a total of 27 incomparably powerful Abyss Kings. They fought with the gods of the Order faction for the right to rule the continent, starting the final battle.” “In the unprecedented war, 20 of the 27 Abyss Kings died, and the other seven were also severely injured by a god of the Dragon Race, but at this moment, all the other gods of the Order faction had died, and the god of the Dragon Race was at its limit. It could not wipe out the abyss completely.” “Helpless, that god could only use the last of its magic power to permanently exile these severely injured Abyss Kings in the spatial turbulence, and leave behind the rough coordinates of the spatial node. It hoped that the gods of the Order faction that appeared in the future could kill them as soon as possible to prevent future troubles.” “However, a hundred years ago, a traitor appeared in the Human Empire. He stole the scroll that recorded the coordinates of the seal and attempted to open these sealed nodes to release the terrifying Abyss Kings!” Leisha slowly walked towards the platform and continued, “The mission of the Light Priests and Priestesses is to find the whereabouts of the scroll and snatch it back before the sealed node is broken.” “A thousand years?” Lorne was curious as he asked, “Hasn’t a god appeared in the Order faction after so long?” The sealed node that the god of a thousand years ago had specially left behind was to let the future gods enter the spatial turbulence and kill the Abyss Kings. But strangely, after so long, this matter did not happen. Had no god been born in the Order faction for a thousand years? That was not right. If that was the case, then what was the Dragon of Light? It was the Dragon God! “Of course there were. But that was another matter 300 years ago.” Leisha sighed helplessly, “After seven hundred years of recuperation, those Abyss Kings have probably already recovered from their injuries. If we enter the spatial node now, they will only be given a chance to escape.” “For the safety of the continent, the plan to suppress them was repeatedly postponed until that heinous betrayal occurred.” Lorne nodded after he heard the explanation. However, he quickly asked, “But why hasn’t the sealed node been completely opened after a hundred years?” “It’s not that simple.” Leisha said, “There are more than ten thousand spots recorded on that scroll, and the spatial node keeps jumping, so every once in a while, the true sealed node will be rearranged. Coupled with the fact that most of the spots are within the range of the Empire Alliance, if the Dark Abyss wants to open the seal, they can only keep trying. It’s normal for them to not succeed for a hundred years.” Wow… After hearing all of this, Lorne was shocked. In the “Divine Realm”, the Abyss Kings were one of the most powerful beings. For example, the Dragon of Darkness that he had seen in the dungeon was one of the current Abyss Kings. The Dragon of Light and the King of the Abyss were on the same level. Lorne did not expect to see two existences at the top of the pyramid and obtain such important news not long after the server opened. If nothing unexpected happened, this information would probably cover the entire game’s storyline. After all, the greatest enemy of the Order faction was the Dark faction, and the greatest threat in the Dark faction were the incomparably powerful Abyss Kings. “Young adventurer, I’m telling you this information to motivate you. This continent is not as peaceful as you think.” “Behind this incomparably harmonious background is constant war. The demons of the Dark Abyss have never given up on invading this peaceful land.” “Therefore, as the best of the new generation of adventurers, I hope that you can increase your strength as soon as possible. The Human Empire needs new strength.” With that, Leisha waved her arm. The next second, a gorgeous light poured over Lorne. Ding! “Congratulations on completing the mission of Light Priestess Leisha: [Explore the Valley of the Dead]!” “Reward: Gold coins+5, EXP+5,000, Reputation+500, [Stone of Wisdom of the Ancient Gods] (Mythical).” The mission reward was finally given. The previous rewards were not worth mentioning. It was just that the rewards for clearing the dungeon were too many. But of the many rewards, Lorne heard a strange phrase. He quickly looked at the final reward. When he opened the attributes of the tool, he was dumbfounded. ———— [Stone of Wisdom of the Ancient Gods] Grade: Mythical Effect: A special gem that the ancient gods used their divine power to gather. It has unimaginable power. After using it, one can temporarily obtain extraordinary wisdom. You can ignore the level requirement up to 50 and learn any skill. ———— “Is this real?!” Lorne could not believe his eyes. This reward could actually allow players to ignore level requirements to learn skills! Didn’t that mean that he could use this tool to learn the skill [Hellhound Summoning]?! However, before Lorne could think further, Leisha continued, “Last time, you wanted other rewards, but instead obtained some monster parts that were useless. I believe you are like the smiths of the Blacksmith Guild who are studying their uses. In that case, I’ll give you some more materials.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Blood-soaked Cloak]! “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Rotten Death Crown]! “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Blade Scarred Hard Armor]! “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Rusted Steel War Boots]! “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining the Light Priestess’ gift: [Unknown Light Muscle]! “...;” A series of pleasant notifications appeared. Lorne was excited. These were all very high-grade materials, especially the equipment. They were the types he had the least stock of. With these materials, he could make some new attempts. However, he would not do so in the Beginner Village as the most powerful monster was in the [Valley of the Dead] dungeon. Now that he had even cleared the Nightmare Dungeon, there was no longer any prototype monster in the Beginner Village that Lorne wanted. ...; Then, Lorne left the temple and came to a less populated area. He took out the gemstone from his bag. He could not wait to see how powerful the orange skill book was. Ding! “You have used the [Stone of Wisdom of the Ancient Gods] to obtain an opportunity to learn beyond the limit!” When he chose to use it, the gem immediately turned into light and entered his body. There was a notification sound. Hearing this, Lorne took out the skill book from his bag. He used it immediately. The next second, a skill icon lit up in Lorne’s skill list. Ding! “Congratulations on learning the orange skill [Hellhound Summoning].” These two items were at least worth a million, or even ten million to others. With the current popularity of “Divine Realm”, it was not impossible for these two items to be sold at a high price of ten million. After all, [Hellhound Summoning] was an orange skill with extremely powerful effects, and the Stone of Wisdom could allow one to learn this skill at Level 10. A skill that could summon dozens or even hundreds of monsters could allow the player to level up several times faster than others. To the large guilds that were fighting for the game’s progress, this was what they wanted the most. But Lorne did not choose to sell it. He knew very well that as long as he could always be faster than other players, he could earn a lot of money by selling equipment and other methods. For example, during today’s dungeon trip, in less than a day, he had obtained nearly five million. All of this came from how powerful he was. Therefore, Lorne would not consider selling anything that could increase his strength, unless it was something that he could not use. “Let’s see how the skill effect is!” After learning the skill, Lorne activated it. He waved the short staff in his hand, and an extremely complicated magic circle gradually enlarged under his feet. 5 meters! 10 meters! 30 meters! 50 meters! When the magic circle was 50 meters wide, the surrounding players were stunned. Everyone looked at the change in the ground in shock, not understanding what was happening. In the next second, countless light clusters appeared in the magic circle. The players widened their eyes as they watched the light spheres gradually take shape, turning into hideous hellhounds! “Damn!!!” “How is this magic circle so big?” “My god, where did so many monsters come from?” “They look like summoned monsters.” “How is that possible? How can a Summoner summon dozens of monsters?” “That must be a powerful NPC nearby!” “Go and find it quickly. There might be a hidden mission that we can accept!” ...; ———— [Hellhound] HP: 288 / 288 MP: 260 / 260 Magic Attack: 60-120 Magic Resistance: 17 Physical Resistance: 19 Speed: 7.56 Description: The summoned hellhound will obey the Summoner’s command and bite any enemy. ———— Lorne leaned against the wall and looked at the attributes panel. It could be seen that the attributes of the Hellhound were not high, only 20% of Lorne’s. However, there were many of them. There were a total of 50 summoned creatures. Using the barrage of monsters, the hellhounds could buy Lorne enough time. “I’ll go offline first.” Lorne opened the settings page. Then, he went offline. It was already very late. If he wanted to level up, he had to rest his mind before continuing tomorrow. As for the class change achievement, he could not obtain it. As long as the dungeon was cleared, the players in the Beginner Village could go to the main city. But for Lorne, he needed to raise his pets to Level 10 before leaving. Therefore, he did not have any thoughts about this reward. ...; Ding! “Message reminder: Your account ending with number 1244 has been transferred 4,645,000 alliance dollars today. (Virtual Bank of the Divine Realm)” As soon as he went offline, he received a message from the bank. Carefully, Lorne removed the simple helmet filled with wires and opened his bank information panel. Looking at the remaining four million on the information panel, Lorne felt a little dazed. Three days ago, he was still a penniless pauper. But now, he had so much money. In just one day, he had gained nearly five million dollars in his account. Everything felt like a dream. It was unbelievable. “I have to settle my sister’s issue first.” Lorne quickly opened a special funds transfer page that involved his sister, Roanna. This was her medical card. But because it owed nearly a million dollars, there was a scarlet warning message. Every time he saw this notification, Lorne would feel immense pain. Because this information threatened Roanna’s life, as her brother, he could do nothing for a long time. Without hesitation, he transferred 1.5 million dollars to his sister’s payment. The next second, the scarlet warning disappeared. The blue panel looked so beautiful. With a heavy sigh of relief, Lorne lingered on his sister’s profile for a long time before reluctantly closing the panel. “That’s not enough. I want to earn more money!” Lorne clenched his fists. The money now could only sustain his sister’s life, but it could not wake her up. To do that, he clearly needed more funds. In fact, he even wanted to materialize the potions in the game! Although Lorne did not believe that anything in the game could be “conjured” in reality, he was willing to place hope in it. After all, this belief gave him the confidence to persevere. The next morning, Lorne adjusted his schedule. Only with a healthy body could he play the game in his best state and earn the most money. After breakfast, Lorne returned to his room and put on his simple helmet. Looking at the yellow ceiling, Lorne realized that he was still in the slums. He had to find time to register for the permit to stay in the Energy Zone. The quality of life in the slums was poor, and violent things happened from time to time. In order to have a more stable life, it was necessary to move to the Energy Zone. However, this matter would have to wait. After all, the game had just started. Time was precious. He could not let other players pull apart the difference in levels. Thinking that the others had already entered the main city for a period of time, Lorne did not stay any longer and quickly went online. “Enter the game!” … Swish! Lights flashed. Lorne returned to the familiar Beginner Village. It could be seen that because the dungeon had been cleared, the entrance to the main city had also been opened. Now, all the players who reached Level 10 had already left the Beginner Village. After all, this was only the start. There was no meaning in staying here. Moreover, level 10 players could change their class in the main city, which attracted the players even more. Unfortunately, Lorne could not leave yet. For Summoner players, they had to first raise their pets to Level 10 before leaving. Such a mechanism was also designed to limit the impact of the Summoner’s additional experience. Lorne looked at his pet space. There were still two pets that had not reached Level 10. They were Rimuru, Level 5, and Source of Poison, Level 7. Of the two, one was a Bronze-Grade Boss and the other was a Silver-Grade monster. To raise their levels, he needed a huge amount of experience. Lorne did not find it difficult. After all, they were all mature pets that could automatically kill monsters themselves to level up. They just needed Lorne nearby. “Let’s find a place with high level monsters to farm.” Lorne did not accept any missions. To be honest, the income from completing missions was definitely not as high as his efficiency in farming monsters. As he thought, he walked towards the village entrance. But before he could get far, Lorne suddenly stopped. In front of him was the Beginner Village’s chat channel. There was a series of comments on it. “Attention all solo players! The Lizard Forest in the north of the Beginner Village has been reserved by our [Fire God Guild]. Please do not approach it lest a conflict arises.” “Everyone, look carefully. The Full Moon Valley in the north has been reserved by my [Domination Guild]. Those who trespass will be killed without mercy!” “Everyone, please note that the abandoned camp in the north is the training ground of our [Sunset Guild]!” “Attention everyone! The Monster Lake in the South is reserved by my [Fantasy Guild]. Please go elsewhere to level up!” “Please note…” For some reason, all the messages in the chat channel were warnings like this. Because the first batch of elite players had left the Beginner Village, the other members of the guild became more and more fearless. They even used announcements to assign their guild’s training grounds. In this way, almost all the Level 10 areas were surrounded. Seeing this, Lorne’s expression turned ugly. These guys were clearly not letting him level up. “Good!” “Very good!” “You like to farm, right?” “Then let’s all occupy a farming ground and see who’s more awesome!” Lorne immediately bought three announcement tools and sent his message to everyone. “@Everyone, from now on, all the areas in the north of the Beginner Village, including the Lizard Forest, the Full Moon Valley, the abandoned camp, the Bear Beast Ridge, and other Level 10 areas, are mine. If you don’t agree, just stay where you are.” “@Everyone…” “@Everyone…” The announcement was repeated three times. When they saw the contents clearly, with a loud bang, all the players in the Beginner Village exploded. … “Gosh! Boss Tyrant is attacking the large guilds!” “We should deal with those bastards.” “That’s right, they’re too much.” “This is going to be interesting. I don’t think the large guilds will give him face.” The ordinary players discussed. The players from large guilds could not help but laugh. “Who do you think you are? Do you really think you’re something?” “Does this guy think that he can compete with us just because he cleared a dungeon?” “Hahaha…” “Which guild doesn’t have hundreds of people? Would we be afraid of a fool like you?” “Come if you dare. Let’s see if my machete is rusty!” “…” … In the eyes of the players of large guilds, numbers were the most important. In the early stages of the game, everyone’s skills were limited. Without AOE skills, no matter how powerful a person was, he could not be a match for hundreds of people. Therefore, when they saw the warning… None of them felt nervous. They even wanted to fight Lorne. As long as they killed him, they would be able to obtain his high-level equipment. One had to know that he had just cleared the Nightmare Dungeon and obtained two Silver Treasure Chests. Coupled with other equipment, they could easily snatch one or two items and obtain a year’s worth of earnings. It was also because of this that many of them even provoked Lorne in the chat. However… This provocation did not last long. About half an hour later, in the northern forest of the Beginner Village, a few terrifying monsters had already begun to kill the players crazily. Lorne stepped over the corpses and crossed the area. He did not stop here to farm because his target was not this region. What Lorne wanted was the entire north region. He passed through several key areas in the northern forest. During this period of time, countless guild players who targeted him in the region died under the arrows of ‘Small Artillery’. After reaching Level 10, the basic attack of Fire of Death had reached 910 points. Against it, these players dressed in White Iron equipment could not resist at all. They were basically killed with one arrow. Even if the tanks focused on raising their defense, they could not block the second arrow. Coupled with the other pets, the situation was even more tragic. Under normal circumstances, a team of more than a hundred people would not even be able to last three minutes under their attacks. Therefore… An interesting scene occurred in the chat. “[Fire God Guild] has announced its withdrawal from the Lizard Forest.” “[Domination Guild] has announced its withdrawal from the Full Moon Valley.” “[Sunset Guild] has announced its withdrawal from the abandoned camp.” “…” In the current Beginner Village, time was precious. Every time a person was killed, he would lose one level. To the players who worked in large guilds, this was a price that they could not afford to pay. If they did not leave the Beginner Village within the specified time, they might be expelled by the large guilds. So, when they saw how strong Lorne was, they all gave in. Almost all the guilds in the north of the Beginner Village had announced their withdrawal from the region. They no longer dared to covet it. As for the solo players, they trembled even more. The weaker ones did not dare to go to the Level 10 training area. The stronger ones hoped that they could leave the Beginner Village as soon as possible. Therefore, no one dared to provoke Lorne. At this moment, Lorne’s friend list suddenly lit up. It was a message from Twinkle Rose. “Little Brother Tyrant, I heard that you swept through seven barricades in a row in the Beginner Village and claimed the entire Northern Forest. How impressive~” Twinkle Rose had already left the Beginner Village, but she still sent a message immediately. Clearly, there were still members of her guild in the Beginner Village. “Big-busted Sister, please speak properly.” Lorne was speechless. This beautiful guild leader really did not care about her image at all. When she acted flirtatiously, it gave him goosebumps. “Tsk! Little brother, you don’t know how to appreciate it at all.” <i>‘Others can’t hear it even if they want to.’</i>?Twinkle Rose pouted and muttered to herself. But Lorne mercilessly exposed her thoughts, “Just say what you want. Don’t think you can take anything from me with just a few coy words.” Hearing this, Twinkle Rose immediately giggled. “It’s not a big deal. I just want to ask you to give up an area to the sisters of the Silver Snow Guild. You know that they are all weak little girls and can’t compete with those unreasonable savage men.” “I can give you an area, but you have to promise me one thing first.” “What is it?” “I haven’t thought of it yet. Promise me first. I’ll tell you when I think of it in the future.” “You want to trick me, no way!” In the main city, Twinkle Rose stood in the square, her face red. She said angrily and with a smile, “You definitely want me to agree to you and then make such an outrageous request. Tsk! Little Brother, you’re such a pervert. How dare you have such thoughts about me, your elder sister!” Pfft— Seeing this reply, Lorne burst out laughing. Although he sometimes felt that this beautiful guild leader was very interesting, he was not that dirty. Indeed, Lorne had not thought about what he wanted. If it was three days ago, he would have asked for money, but now, money was not an issue. “How about this? Just treat it as you owe me a favor. If I need anything in the future, you can choose to help based on the situation. Is that okay?” “That’s more like it. I agree.” The two completed a transaction. Then, Twinkle Rose gave Lorne a real-life number and said that he could contact her if there was an emergency. From this, it could be seen that this beautiful guild leader’s identity in reality was also extraordinary. Without thinking about it, Lorne led his pets through the forest. … “Let’s go, little ones.” There was no need for Lorne to do anything. The remaining battles would be left to the pets. The lizards wandering in the forest immediately discovered the intruders. They gathered like mad, opening their bloody mouths to tear the intruders into pieces. But before they could get close, countless arrows fell. An arrow with black flames enveloped the entire area ahead. Swish! Swish! Swish! -771 -765 -759 -777 -751 Under the rain of arrows, a large amount of damage numbers danced in the air. Although the single damage of the rain of arrows was not high, against the monster with 910 Attack, one arrow still emptied the monsters’ health to less than 10%. Before the lizards could react, a new rain of arrows descended. It was a rain of green arrows. When these arrows landed, all the monsters were penetrated with a bloody hole and died instantly. The current “Source of Poison” was also Level 7 and its attack had reached 715 points. Ordinary Level 10 monsters could not withstand it. “Ding! Congratulations on killing the Forest Lizard!” “Ding! Congratulations!” “Ding!” “Ding!” The combat panel kept flashing with new notifications. A level 10 monster could give Lorne about 54 experience points. Because he had four pets, it gave him an additional 200% experience gain. If he wanted to level up Source of Poison, he needed to kill about 360 monsters. This was only the requirement to level up. If he wanted to raise the levels of both pets, it would definitely be a huge task. Without much thought, Lorne went into his killing mode. He first divided the group. Little Mantis moved quickly, so it would focus on gathering the monsters. Then, Fire of Death (Small Artillery) would use a rain of arrows to quickly clear the monsters. The other group would be Rimuru, Source of Poison (Venom), and Lorne. Because it was a one-sided battle, the combat efficiency of the two teams was not too different. As for the equipment that had fallen, Lorne did not want to waste time. Low-grade White Iron equipment could only be sold for dozens of dollars at the current stage. Lorne did not want to waste his time on these trivial matters. … And so it went, that was how Lorne spent the next few days. This could not be helped. He could only blame the pets for needing too many experience points. To go from Level 5 to Level 10, Rimuru needed 162,500 experience points. It took 67,500 experience points to raise Venom from Level 7 to Level 10. It added up to a total of 230,000 experience points. According to the experience gained from killing Level 10 ordinary monsters, Lorne needed to kill 4259 monsters to achieve his goal. For an ordinary player, when facing monsters of the same level, they could only have a few dozen kills per day. If they were asked to do this mission, it might take a hundred days. Fortunately, Lorne was different. His combat strength far exceeded that of ordinary players, and his efficiency in killing monsters was also beyond that of other players. According to his rough calculations, Lorne could kill more than a hundred monsters per hour. This number was not very satisfactory to Lorne. After all, in the dungeon, he had killed more than 200 monsters in ten minutes. The reason for this situation was that the distribution of monsters in the wilderness was different from that in the dungeon. The monsters in the dungeon would not leave the designated area, but the monsters in the wilderness would wander anywhere in the map. Therefore, Lorne spent a great deal of time searching for the monster. But even so, he managed to level up within three days. When the last light shone on Rimuru, Lorne could not help but cheer. Ding! “Congratulations on spending 42,500 experience points to raise your pet [Slime King, Alchemy] (Rimuru) to Level 10!” Ding! “Your pet, Rimuru, has awakened its skill—Continuous Spray!” After reaching Level 10, Rimuru also obtained a new skill. ———— Skill: [Continuous Spray] Effect: The Slime King attacks the target repeatedly 3-8 times, each dealing 100% damage. (Has a healing effect when used on friendly targets.) ———— 8 consecutive attacks? Seeing the skill introduction, Lorne was pleasantly surprised. This skill was very violent and had a high single-target damage output. However, Lorne still preferred the aspect of healing. In the future, if there was an emergency, Rimuru could quickly use this skill on its teammates. With such powerful healing effects, it could definitely turn the tide. Then, Lorne opened its attributes panel. ———— Pet: [Slime King, Alchemy] (Rimuru) Quality: Bronze-Grade Boss Level: 10 (0 / 95,000) HP: 175,000 / 175,000 Magic Attack: 420-560 Physical Defense: 227 Magic Defense: 175 Superiority: 100% Owner: Tyrant Skills: [Sticky Spray], [Powered Jump], [Healing], [Summoning of the King], [Continuous Spray] Introduction: …. ———— Rimuru’s attack attributes were relatively ordinary, inferior to the Silver monster “Small Artillery”. However, its health was very high. At Level 10, it had already reached 175,000. Compared to the undead mage’s pitiful 60,000 health points, Rimuru was almost three times as tanky. Moreover, Rimuru had the ability to absorb damage and turn it into health. With it in the team, Lorne basically did not have to worry about anyone breaking through the team’s defense. However… There was also a huge problem. That was Rimuru’s level up requirement. To go from Level 10 to Level 11, the EXP needed was as high as 95,000! Even Lorne could not help but feel his scalp tingle when he saw such terrifying data. This was only the amount to level up one pet. Lorne now had four pet spaces. Although he only had one Boss-level pet, he would definitely replace them in the future. At that time, would the difficulty increase by three times, or even higher? The thought made Lorne’s head spin. No wonder Summoners had additional experience, but not many people chose this class. The pressure was too great. This was especially true for players with high quality pets. The pressure they faced was basically several times that of other players, and an existence like Lorne required dozens or even hundreds of times the experience of others. Of course, high investment represented high returns. After paying dozens of times the experience, the increase in strength was also dozens of times that of others. This could be seen from the battle against the large guilds. The current him already had the strength to fight hundreds of people alone. Therefore, Lorne did not have any complaints. He only sighed slightly and happily led his pet out of the training area. … He returned to the Beginner Village. Although the game had been on for several days, the liveliness of the Beginner Village did not decrease. Because of the importance that the large financial groups placed on the virtual world, they began to build slum factories and recruited cheap slum residents to play games, letting them kill monsters to earn gold coins and support the game elites of large guilds. Therefore, more and more poor people obtained the opportunity to enter the game. Although it was also considered a form of working in the game, at the very least, one could receive a salary. It was much better than staying in the slums of the old era. Lorne did not pause. He continued forward and finally arrived near the main city’s teleportation array. He could finally leave this place. Lorne was three days behind the first batch of players. However, he did not care much, because in terms of strength, he was definitely number one. Moreover, the level of the Summoner was too easy to raise. With the enhancement of three times the experience, he estimated that within an hour or two after entering the main city, he could directly reach Level 20 and catch up to the level difference that was behind. When they saw his figure, the surrounding players were shocked. “Brothers, look. Tyrant is going to the main city!” These words immediately attracted the attention of countless people. Many people wiped their eyes hard, unable to believe what they were seeing. After seeing it clearly, someone cried. He was finally leaving! The tyrant who occupied the most resource-rich area of the Beginner Village was finally leaving! They finally had a chance to farm monsters in the high-level areas! Boohoo… Some players cried in joy, leading the entire Beginner Village to celebrate. They were as happy as if it was Christmas. The players from the guilds were so excited that they were about to cry. “Congratulations to God Tyrant for leaving the Beginner Village. [Sunset Guild] sends its congratulations!” “Congratulations to Tyrant for taking another step forward and embarking on a new journey. The Fire God Guild sends their congratulations!” “Congratulations, Tyrant…” “Congratulations.” “Congratulations.” The guilds sent their messages, making even Lorne feel a little embarrassed. It seemed that they developed feelings after staying together for a long time. Looking at how grand their farewell ceremony was, it was heartbreaking. At that moment, the village head arrived in front of Lorne. “Master Adventurer, you already had the strength to leave the village, but you still chose to stay in the village and help the village clean up the surrounding monsters. There is nothing we can do to repay your contribution to the village. This is an emblem that I treasure. I hope you don’t mind it.” The old village head shed tears of excitement. Lorne did not expect to receive an NPC reward without accepting a mission. ———— Item: [Warrior’s Emblem] Grade: Rare Effect 1: Increases the wearer’s HP by 500 points. Effect 2: Increases the wearer’s MP by 500 points. Description: Only a warrior who is highly acknowledged by the village head will obtain this emblem. ———— “Rare equipment, good stuff.” In “Divine Realm”, conventional equipment was divided into weapons, helmets, armor, shoulder guards, bracer, leg guards, and shoes. Apart from normal equipment, there were also rare items. It was divided into rings, necklaces, shields, cloaks, emblems, titles, and so on. Among them, emblems and titles were the most difficult items to obtain. They usually required a hidden mission or system achievement. But Lorne did not expect the emblem to come to him without him doing anything. Needless to say, he had struck it rich this time. He directly put on the emblem, and his attributes increased by a large amount. HP: 1940 / 1940 (500 ↑) MP: 1800 / 1800 (500 ↑) Then, he waved at the enthusiastic players behind him and stepped into the teleportation circle leading to the main city. An indigo light rose, and he vanished on the spot. After Lorne entered the teleportation circle, he was not sent directly to the main city, but into a CG story cutscene. The ground before him was changing rapidly. It was as if time had accelerated by tens of thousands of times. At the same time, an ancient voice sounded in the sky. “A long, long time ago…” “There were two divine dragons ruling this land. One was the Divine Dragon of Order that represented light and harmony, while the other was the Divine Dragon of Disorder that represented chaos and darkness.” “They had their own believers, but because of the opposite ideology, the war between the believers continued. In the end, even the two divine dragons fell out.” “Just like that, because of the dispute between the two divine dragons, the world-destroying war erupted!” As soon as it finished speaking, a grand scene appeared. The entire scene instantly changed as the sky and ground darkened. In the next second, countless fireballs danced in the air, and glowing arrows covered heaven and earth. The warhorses neighed, and the beasts roared. A chaotic but grand battle scene entered his eyes. In the sky, an incomparably huge black figure appeared. It was an incomparably huge black dragon. Its wingspan exceeded 10,000 kilometers. Its armor was hideous and its aura was awe-inspiring. The arrogant dragon head raised as terrifying black flames spewed from its bloody mouth, destroying a huge area. In the face of this divine dragon, the entire world was extremely weak. The defense of those cities was also useless. With a wave of the dragon claw that was overflowing with black light, the entire city, and even the mountain range of tens of thousands of kilometers were destroyed. At this moment, another brilliant divine dragon appeared. It was the Divine Dragon of Order that carried endless holy light. It spread its wings and flew high into the sky, engaging in an intense battle with the Divine Dragon of Disorder. A terrifying light covered the entire sky, and no one could see what was happening inside. Like this, countless days and nights passed. By the third year, the outcome of the battle was finally decided. An incomparably huge figure fell from the sky to a huge and extremely long crack in the ground. At this moment, an ancient voice sounded again. “After the great war, the Divine Dragon of Disorder died, and its corpse fell into the endless abyss. In order to reconstruct the Divine Realm, the Divine Dragon of Order also sacrificed itself to restore the Divine Realm.” “Since then, the Divine Realm regained its vitality and countless races appeared.” “However, many years later, under the abyss, the corpse formed by the intertwining laws of chaos and darkness gradually demonized the creatures under the abyss, thereby creating the abyssal monsters!” “Their thoughts were distorted by the violent laws of darkness, and they began to develop negative emotions such as ‘Slaughter’, ‘Greed’, and ‘Chaos’.” “To the Abyss, the rules on the ground were hypocritical and useless. The so-called order is only a cover for greed and desire. Therefore, the Dark Abyss has begun to challenge the Human Empire to overthrow the orderly world.” At the end of the words, the CG scene completely froze. To the left of the scene was an extremely pitch-black abyss that spanned hundreds of millions of kilometers. The entire scene was pitch-black, as if it wanted to devour everything in the world. To the right of the scene was an incomparably huge city. Divine light illuminated the entire land. This was the mythical era hundreds of thousands of years ago, and it finally ended in destruction. The believers of [Order] and [Chaos] officially stepped onto the world stage many years later. … “Is that the power of the divine dragon?” Although the cutscene had ended, Lorne was still in shock and could not forget it for a long time. At this moment, a system notification appeared. Ding! “Please choose your destination for your following adventure.” With that, a huge map appeared in front of Lorne. This was not a complete world map, but a part of the Order faction. There was the Human Empire, as well as the kingdoms of the gnomes and elves. As an adventurer, Lorne could choose from the forces above. The human players could go to the Gnome Kingdom, but that was only a human city in the region they were in charge of. They could not directly join the Gnome Kingdom. Lorne looked at the Human Empire. The current Order faction was led by the Human Empire, so he had no intention of choosing other races. As for which city to go to? Lorne looked at a city called Iron Skull City. This city sat on the empire’s northern border, resisting the icy plain calamity at all times. From the perspective of a gamer, he had to go to a city with more wars, because more conflict meant more missions, and more missions meant faster leveling up. Therefore, without thinking much, Lorne chose the most dangerous Iron Skull City! Ding! “Warning: Iron Skull City is the main city on the border of the Empire. It is constantly faced with the invasion of the northern icy plain calamity. It is at war all year round, and the difficulty of this main city is extremely high. Adventurer, please make a careful decision if you really want to go there.” Lorne did not expect the system to give such a reminder. It seemed that this main city was not easy to survive in. However, Lorne was confident in his strength. He would not be intimidated by a warning. “I’m sure.” Lorne stuck to his decision. Ding! “Iron Skull City has been chosen as the target main city. We are about to teleport. Please prepare.” As soon as the system notification sounded, an indigo light rose from Lorne’s body. Then, the scene changed, and he finally appeared in a simple town that was filled with the aura of another world. This was a main city? Wasn’t it too simple? Lorne looked around and frowned. But at that moment, a panel popped up. Ding! “Due to the special influence of the teleportation circle, you were sent to the [Green Rock Town] near Iron Skull City.” It was indeed not Iron Skull City. This place was too simple and crude. It was only slightly better than the Beginner Village. Lorne was not surprised. Being transferred here should be a storyline of the game. He would probably have to complete some hurdle before he could officially reach the main city, or there might be a special tool here that could change his fate. In short, the game would not let the players suffer a loss. As he thought, Lorne suddenly received a special mission. Ding! “Congratulations on accepting the mission: [Proof of Courage].” “Mission Details: In order to test the strength of the adventurers, the commander of Iron Skull City, Klent, has specially set the teleportation location in Green Rock Town. If you can walk to the main city within five days, then every monster you kill on the way will bring you a special reward.” This was a mission that was automatically accepted. The players could choose to proceed or reject it. The players who rejected it could use the teleportation array in Green Rock Town to directly head to the main city. Lorne did not choose to do that. Since this was a mission, there was no reason to let it go. Moreover, this mission was a little special. It did not limit the number of monsters killed. To Lorne, this was the ideal type of mission. After all, his farming efficiency was more than a hundred times that of ordinary players! With that in mind, Lorne did not pause. He walked out of the town. From the map, he saw that there was a very long way to Iron Skull City. Moreover, this was already the territory of Iron Skull City, so the monsters around were not only Level 10. To ordinary players, stepping on this path was a very risky decision. After all, they had entered the main city in a hurry and did not seriously accumulate high-grade equipment. Most of them did not even obtain the reward for clearing a simple dungeon, causing their strength to be very mediocre. However, as players, they did not want to give up on this special challenge mission. Therefore, many professional guide groups were born in the end. “Professional gamers will lead the team. We’re short of two people, the cost is 30 silver coins each.” “The guild elites will lead the team. 50 silver coins per person. We will definitely complete the mission!” “We charge a lower price of 20 silver coins. Everyone, let’s go!” “High-level players with 250 Attack leading the team.” “Any warriors with 80 or more defense? We can form a team and go immediately, free of charge!” Many powerful players chose to pause here for a moment, their goal was to earn some silver coins. It could be seen that guiding players was very profitable, one could easily earn tens of silver coins. The current price of gold coins was still around 4,500. 50 silver coins was equivalent to more than 2000 dollars. Many players could not afford it. Therefore, a large number of people gradually began to line up, wanting to rely on their own strength to complete the mission. But reality was cruel. On the resurrection array in the small town, people revived one after another. There were powerful monsters above Level 10 everywhere in the wilderness. Most players could not deal with such opponents and could only give up in the end. Lorne looked at them and shook his head. Those ordinary players were too anxious. Some had farmed wild dogs for a few days and came here. How could they complete the mission with Level 3 equipment? He did not approach the team but left from the side. But at that moment, Lorne suddenly saw a large group of players surrounding the city wall, as if they were accepting a mission. He looked over. The next second, Lorne’s eyes widened. In the center of the player camp was a simple temporary camp. There was a group of young girls in gray hoods. What was shocking was that they had sharp ears, were tall, and had snow-white skin. They were like the most perfect works of art in the world. “Those… are elves?!” Lorne’s eyes widened in shock. In the “Divine Realm”, apart from humans, all races were considered neutral, especially the elves who yearned for peace. Unless necessary, they would never raise their bows and blades. “It seems that elves are high-level NPCs, right?” Lorne had seen some guides on the Internet that specifically introduced some insights regarding the Divine Realm, and among them were comments on the elves. Most players thought that the elves were high-level NPCs. The general traits of a high-level NPC were: It was very difficult to accumulate Reputation with them, they had very high-level missions, and very rich rewards… In short, when he encountered high-level NPCs, he had to build a good relationship with them so that he could receive better missions in the future. With that in mind, Lorne walked over. … At this moment, a large number of players had already gathered near the elves’ temporary camp. Like Lorne, they wanted to build a relationship with the elves and attempt to obtain the mission from the elven NPCs. A player asked in a friendly manner, “My dear elf friends, I’m a righteous adventurer. How can I help you?” However, the elven girl was unmoved. She did not even answer him. At this moment, a player from the Sunset Guild tried to bribe her. He took out a gold coin and said, “Elf beauty, here is a gold coin. I hope this is the start of our friendship.” The elven girl took the gold coin and glanced at him coldly, “We don’t trust you.” “Damn!!!” <i>‘If you don’t trust me, why did you accept my gold coin?!’</i>  The player from the Sunset Guild felt that he had been cheated by the NPC. However, in the next second, he felt that although one gold coin did not allow him to receive the mission, it made the elf speak. According to this trend, he should give her more gold coins, which would definitely increase the affinity between the two sides. Thinking of this, the small manager of the Sunset Guild took out a few gold coins and handed them to the elven girl one by one. He wanted to make a contribution and raise his position in the guild. But the result was upsetting. Even when he used up all 10 gold coins collected by the team, the elven girl did not change her attitude. She still did not trust him. Upon seeing this result, the Sunset Guild player jumped up. He roared crazily at the elves, wanting to take the gold coins back from them. After all, 10 gold coins was 50,000 alliance dollars! However, in the next second, he saw that all the elven girls in the camp had unfriendly looks in their eyes. At the same time, they were ready to fight. This player was so frightened that he quickly retreated into the crowd and did not dare to cause trouble again. After the incident, the other players went up to ask. But without exception, all of them failed. As a neutral faction, the elves would not recognize the reputation of the Human Empire. Therefore, these new players who did not have the reputation of the elves could not obtain their trust. But at that moment, Lorne neared the crowd. However, before he could squeeze into the crowd, the elven girl standing in front of the camp pushed the players aside and rushed to him, her beautiful eyes filled with anticipation. The elven girl asked excitedly. “My dear Mr. Tyrant, would you be willing to help us poor elves?” A free mission? Lorne paused, then quickly replied, “Yes, of course.” As soon as he finished speaking, the system notification sounded. Ding! “Due to the fact that you have 100 Reputation Points with the Dragon Race of Order, you have received the attention of the Night Elf Leader, Mayra, and have received a hidden mission: [Protecting the Elves].” “Mission details: An elven team encountered a battle on the way and could only stay in the Green Rock Town. Please send them to Iron Skull City safely. The elves will thank you for your help.” ‘I see.’ Only after seeing the notification did Lorne nod, understanding everything. No wonder the elf came up to communicate with him. It turned out that all of this was because of the reputation of the Dragon Race of Order. Because the Dragon Race of Order was the spokesmen of the Order faction, the elves who yearned for peace naturally had a good impression of them. As a human who could obtain the recognition of the Dragon Race of Order, the elves were naturally willing to trust him. At the very least, he would be much more reliable than these rude adventurers in front of them. Without hesitation, Lorne accepted the mission. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Damn! Why did the elf girl go to that guy?” “What’s going on?” “This is the first time that an elf girl is so proactive, right? Why? Just because he’s handsome?” “This guy is too lucky to have received a hidden mission from the elves!” Seeing this situation, the surrounding players discussed. They tried countless times, but to no avail. However, this guy actually made the elf beauty take the initiative to find him. It was simply enviable. “Stop! You’re not allowed to leave!” Suddenly, a team blocked his way. The leader was the Sunset Guild player who had given the elves 10 gold coins for nothing. He blocked in front of Lorne and said with an unfriendly expression, “Friend, how can you do this? This is our guild’s NPC.” Hearing this, the surrounding players called him shameless. Everyone had seen what had happened. It was the beautiful elf who approached the player, but now, he said that Lorne snatched the NPC. He was simply distorting the truth. However… Although they thought so, no one dared to stand up for justice. Most of them were solo players, so they did not dare to offend a huge guild like “Sunset”. ...; “This is troublesome. That player is being watched by the members of the Sunset Guild.” “Sunset Guild has 100,000 members. Who dares to provoke them?” “These guilds are really shameless!” “Get used to it.” “How unfortunate. He finally obtained a hidden mission but got targeted by a large guild. I don’t know if he’s lucky or unlucky.” “I reckon that the members of the Sunset Guild will let him share the mission and team up to complete it. After completing it, there’s a high chance that they will take all the rewards.” The players discussed softly, but no one dared to speak up. ...; “What do you want?” Lorne glanced at them calmly and asked. When he had left the Beginner Village previously, these guilds had sent congratulatory messages and even created a beautiful farewell party. Lorne had thought them friendly and good players. But now? It seemed that he was too idealistic. “What do I want? I should be the one asking you that.” “Everyone saw it just now. I used 10 gold coins and was about to take the mission. In the end, you stood up and snatched our NPC. Now, you’re asking us what we want?” The Sunset Guild player laughed fearlessly, then carried his saber and moved close to Lorne, whispering, “Brat, you’d better be sensible. Otherwise, if you offend our Sunset Guild, a mere Summoner like you can forget about playing this game!” To a large guild with 100,000 members, how could they fear a mere solo player? Furthermore, he was a Summoner. However… The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up, “Did your guild leader agree to this?” “Heh, interesting. You want to use our guild leader to scare me?” The team leader of the Sunset Guild was not afraid at all. He smiled and said, “Don’t try that. If you have the ability, show me your name. See if I can’t make you quit this game!” “Are you sure?” Lorne glanced at him, then displayed his ID. Under the watchful eyes of the crowd, a name suddenly floated above Lorne’s head. [Tyrant]! When they saw this ID, almost instantly, the entire scene fell silent. The team leader of the Sunset Guild took a step back. Tyrant? Wasn’t this the guy who had obtained the first clear of the Nightmare Dungeon? Why was he only Level 10? The team leader’s brain was buzzing. Then, his eyes lit up with the array of colors on Lorne’s equipment. The silver light that belonged to the Silver-grade equipment was extremely dazzling in this group of low-level players. Most of the players were still wearing the White Iron equipment. Occasionally, there would be one or two Bronze items, causing many people to look at them enviously. However, for [Tyrant], although he was still Level 10, he had three Silver-grade and four Bronze-grade items! This situation was definitely much more luxurious than any other player! Seeing this scene, the small team from the Sunset Guild retreated a few steps. Forget about that small team leader of the Sunset Guild, even the Sunset Guild’s leader would not dare to be so insolent when he saw that the other party was Tyrant. However, they were just the bottom-tier players of the guild. With such narrow vision, they naturally had nothing to fear. Therefore, when he saw that Lorne was about to leave, he shouted stubbornly, “Tyrant! Don’t think that this will pass. Wait and see. Wait until I report the news to the boss. At that time, I’ll teach you a lesson!” Lorne walked straight into the elves’ temporary camp, not bothering to look back. There was no need to take this to heart. So what if the entire guild came? He was not worried at all. With the Monster Merging Simulator in hand, no one could suppress his rise, much less threaten him. If they did, Lorne would destroy them! ...; In the camp, the elf girl introduced, “There are a total of 21 of us, but because we encountered the abyssal monsters lurking in the Empire, most of us were injured. The power of darkness is corroding our bodies, so we can’t continue fighting. Therefore, we need your help in the following battles.” “Don’t worry, leave it to me.” Lorne said confidently, “Be careful where you stand. Don’t split up too much.” “Yes, we will take note.” With an affirmative answer, the elves began to set off. Glancing at them, Lorne was surprised to see that everyone was injured. They staggered as they moved at a slow pace. In addition, because this was a hidden mission, the journey was different from other players. Lorne had to pass a dungeon, which was a unique path. After leaving the safety area of Green Rock Town and entering the dense forest, Lorne and the others passed through a light screen and entered the dungeon. This route had a benefit for Lorne, which was that there were no other players disturbing him. Otherwise, if a treacherous person attacked in the middle of the night, it might destroy the completion percentage of the mission. Of course, there was also a bad thing about it. The monsters in the dungeon were stronger than the monsters on the ordinary path, and this was not a small test for Lorne. He walked into the light screen. The scene before him was still the same. However, the entire map changed to dungeon mode. Ding! “You have entered a special dungeon—Dark Forest.” A notification sounded. Lorne immediately became wary, as if the forest before him was not the same as what he saw. Everything around him was covered in a very strange veil. The vision in the forest became dimmer and dimmer. The trees and flowers looked very strange. They seemed to have stopped moving. There was no life in them. “Come out, little ones.” With a wave of his short staff, Lorne summoned his four pets and placed them around the elves. “Be careful, adventurer.” Elf Leader Mayra walked up and explained, “In the land of the Empire, there are many minions that have infiltrated the Dark Abyss. Some abyssal creatures used to hide in this forest. Although they were wiped out many years ago, the abyssal aura on our wounds will still attract them to revive.” “They can last for so long? How are you going to cleanse the abyssal aura from your bodies?” Lorne could not help but ask. A good exchange could deepen the affinity between the two sides. Moreover, this Elf Leader Mayra seemed to be very strong. Most people are unable to move, but she still has some combat strength. If he can obtain more information from her, he might be able to obtain some hidden missions. “The power of elves is the stable power of natural elements. The abyssal aura will crazily corrode us, but similarly, as long as we can absorb enough natural elements, we can expel the abyssal aura from our bodies.” Natural elements? Lorne fell into deep thought. He felt that this thing could also be used as a synthesis material, and it was better than ordinary materials. For example, the “Continuous Burning Flame” that created the Fire of Death. If he replaced the flames with the fire elements, would the result be better? Or perhaps, if he directly used the power of the elves and the fire elements to merge, could he directly obtain a fire sprite?! Thinking of this, Lorne’s eyes lit up. He found this idea very interesting. Fire Sprites were very classic and powerful monsters in other games. If he could create such a pet, not only would it be pleasing to the eye, but his combat strength would definitely be greatly improved. However, it was still difficult to treat elves as prototype materials. In the racial background of “Divine Realm”, elves valued the bodies of their people more than dragons. They saw themselves as the purest species in the world, so they did not allow any elves to have a relationship with other races. The master-servant relationship was hated the most. Once they discovered this, the elves would kill that person at all costs. This point was very detailed in the race introduction of “Divine Realm”. For the moment, Lorne did not want to challenge its authenticity. Just as he was thinking this, Mayra suddenly clenched the blade in her hand and said nervously, “Adventurer, I feel a very ferocious aura approaching us!” Lorne came to his senses. He expanded the range of his pets again, so that he could know where the enemy was coming from. As he was spreading out his pets, Rimuru discovered the monster. It was a group of black wolves that had been demonized by the aura of the abyss. There were about 30 of them, and at this moment, they were all charging at the elves fiercely. ———— [Demonized Black Wolf] Quality: Elite Level: 13 HP: 1700 / 1700 Physical Attack: 105-130 Defense: 52 Skills: [Wolf Bite], [Rapid Pounce]. Introduction: The black wolves demonized by the power of the abyss are very powerful and they like to move in groups. Any enemy who encounters them will not even have a single bone left. ———— After quickly checking the attributes of the black wolf, Lorne was no longer worried. At this moment, a battle notification sounded. Ding! “Battle notification: A group of demonized black wolves is attacking. Please protect the elves. Every time an elf dies, your mission reward will be greatly reduced. You might even be viewed as an enemy by the elves!” The completion percentage of the mission depended on the number of elves left. Of course, Lorne would not let these beautiful Night Elves be harmed. He quickly gave the order to fight, and multitasking, he controlled Small Artillery to draw the bow in his hand. [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows] Countless arrows burning with black flames were shot into the sky, then they rained down like meteors. Pew— Pew— Pew— -771 -765 -759 -777 -751 The rain of arrows from Small Artillery could cover a range of ten yards. Thus, it could be seen that nearly all the black wolf monsters were covered by the rain of arrows. Coupled with its attacks, it deals 20% burning damage. Therefore, in the center of the battlefield, dozens of damage numbers floated up. Not only that, the next wave of poisonous arrows rained down. The Level 10 “Venom” had the same stats as Small Artillery. Although it did not deal any burning damage, the true damage brought about by the poison was also very outstanding. With these two waves of damage, the demonized black wolf’s health was less than 200 points. It only needed one arrow to kill it. “Ding! Congratulations on killing a demonized black wolf. Elf Race Reputation+10.” “Ding! Congratulations on killing…” “Ding! Congratulations…” “Ding!” When the group of demonized black wolves fell to the ground, Lorne suddenly realized that killing these monsters would give him 10 Elf Race Reputation points each! Reputation with the elves was very rare to obtain. Under normal circumstances, the early-stage players would basically not be able to come into contact with the other party, much less obtain a reputation with the other party’s race. Interestingly, the number of monsters killed would also stack on the other mission he received initially. In other words, as long as Lorne killed one monster, he would receive two rewards! A bold thought occurred to Lorne. He wanted to wipe out everything. It would be best if he could clear the entire dungeon and kill his way to the designated area five days later! Swish! Swish! Swish! Lorne commanded Small Artillery to control the entire battlefield. Arrows burning with the flames of death shot out from its hands, piercing the heads of the demonized black wolves. Soon, nearly 30 demonized black wolves fell to the ground. Lorne looked at his current elf reputation and found that he had 300 points. However, he also realized that the monsters here would not give him experience. This might have something to do with the challenge mission. It was also very likely that it was because Lorne had yet to change his class. But whatever the reason, he did not care, because to Lorne, the Elf Race Reputation was many times more valuable than some cheap experience points! But at that moment, the elf girl, Mayra, walked up and said, “Esteemed adventurer, the eyes of the dragon are indeed sharp. Your charm is truly astonishing. There is actually such a powerful monster who is willing to follow in your footsteps.” “Ding! Elf Leader Mayra’s affinity+1!” There was even an affinity bonus? Lorne could not help but glance at Mayra. This elf was not normal. In “Divine Realm”, only high-level NPCs or important NPCs would have an affinity system. Moreover, if this NPC’s quality was lower, it would be more generous when giving affinity points. For example, the missionary in the Beginner Village had his affinity increased by 50 points each time. However, the affinity that appeared this time was only 1 point. This forced Lorne to doubt her identity. After all, according to standard rules, the higher the level of an NPC, the harder it was to obtain a favorable impression. Furthermore, the affinity produced each time would be very low. If that was the case, then Mayra’s identity was not as simple as that of the Elf Leader. Of course, this might also be the unique affinity system of the elves. Everything still needed to be closely observed. “When you give up everything for freedom, you will naturally receive endless support.” Lorne appeared calm in the face of her praise as he answered. His words were highly approved by Mayra. “I will always remember this. At the same time, I thank you for protecting us injured elves.” The affinity between the two sides increased by 5 points. “Miss Mayra, it is my pleasure to serve the elves.” With a smile, Lorne said, “Now, please follow behind me. I will disperse all intruders for you!” “Yes, adventurer. We will keep close to the party, and we will reach Iron Skull City safely. I am confident in you.” “Ding! Elf Leader Mayra’s affinity+2!” Communicating properly with NPCs would give him unexpected benefits. The key points written in the game strategy were indeed good. Lorne realized that the affinity between the two sides had increased again. This was much faster than simply killing monsters. … Next, Lorne led the elves through the forest. In fact, there was a certain direction to go on the dungeon map, but Lorne deliberately avoided the right path and led the elves around the forest as best he could. In this dungeon, the monsters were like gold pieces scattered on the ground to Lorne. As long as he was willing to spend time, he could obtain countless rewards. Moreover, the number of monsters here was astonishing. The team had not gone far when they encountered a new monster. It was a group of demonized fanged boars! But before they could attack, Lorne had his pets attack. Swish! Swish! Swish! Countless arrows burning with black flames and huge green arrows descended from the sky, raining down on the monster’s camp. -73 -1550! (Critical) -761 -1550! (Critical) -767 In just one breath, several monsters were directly killed, and the remaining monsters only had a trace of health left. After the rapid rain of arrows, the entire battle quickly ended. Ding! “You have killed the demonized fanged boar x30. Elf Reputation+300.” “You protected the elves. Elf Leader Mayra’s affinity for you+1.” “Your noble quality has been approved by Elf Leader Mayra, affinity+1.” “…” As this wave of monsters fell, another series of notifications appeared. Lorne gained 300 Elf Race Reputation points and 4 affinity points from Mayra. At this point, Lorne was basically certain. As long as he was in this dungeon, he would be able to obtain a high amount of reputation points and income from the elves, and it would be easier for him to obtain Mayra’s good impression. Because of this, Lorne made up his mind. He had to clean up the entire Dark Forest, even if he had to miss the time limit of the mission from the Iron Skull City’s commander, Klent. After all, the number of hidden missions was even rarer. Furthermore, this was a hidden mission of the elves! The latter was several times more valuable than the former, perhaps even a hundred times more! Lorne could even believe that if the guild leader of the Sunset Guild had known that this mission could generate so much elf reputation, he would have probably spent a million to buy it. Even if Lorne could not be bribed, he would definitely gather the members of the Sunset Guild and fight a grand battle to the death with Lorne. “Perhaps this is luck.” Ever since entering this game, Lorne had finally felt the presence of the Goddess of Luck. Think about it, if he had not been lucky enough to obtain the Dragon Race Reputation given by the Dragon of Light, would he have been able to obtain this mission? The answer was no. Therefore, this was a very coincidental phenomenon. All the credit should belong to the Goddess of Luck. “Very good!” Continue moving! … “Dear Miss Mayra, please come this way. There are more monsters here… Oh, no, I mean, this is the safest route.” Lorne was already prepared to wander in this forest for a long time. As for the other players’ levels, he did not care anymore. Compared to the reputation of the elves, the mere difference in level was nothing. However, speaking of levels, it seemed that he could check the level ranking now? Lorne opened the system panel. Soon, he discovered a new unlocked page—[Iron Skull City Ranking]! ———— [Iron Skull City Ranking] First place: Fire Beacon, Level 17, 21%, Dragon Blood Warrior. Second place: Thor, Level 17, 15%, Lightning Mage. Third place: Soul Armor, Level 16, 79%, Holy Light Knight. Fourth place: Hundred Flowers Umbrella, Level 16, 68%, Forest Hunter. Fifth place: Proud War Soul, Level 16, 65%, Rock Warrior. Sixth place: Pot of Wine, Level 16, 59%, Warrior. Seventh place: Twinkle Rose, Level 16, 55%, Warrior. Eighth place: Hellfire, Level 16, 51%, Warrior. Ninth place: Bloody Mercenary, Level 16, 49%, Warrior. Tenth place: Starry Sky, Level 16, 47%, Mage. ———— Lorne did not feel anything after reading the list. However, it had to be said that the high-level players’ leveling speed was indeed much faster than he imagined. Especially the two people at the front of the rankings, they had already reached Level 17. Unfortunately, he did not know any of them. The only one he knew was the seventh-ranked Twinkle Rose. Although the big-busted sister did not have a hidden class, because she had bought a lot of high-level equipment from him, her level increased very quickly. “By the time I enter the main city, they will probably be Level 20 already, right?” Seeing that he was still Level 10, Lorne shook his head and smiled. This situation was completely within his expectations. After all, when he was in the Beginner Village, he had already left three days later than the other players. Now that he was doing a mission in the Dark Forest, it was normal for him to be behind in level. But that did not concern Lorne. In terms of strength, he was definitely first place. He was even several times stronger than second place. After all, the lowest level of his pets was Bronze-grade, and the highest was even a Bronze-grade Boss. It was not something ordinary players could compare to. “Why are there so many hidden classes?” Then, Lorne looked at everyone’s class. It could be seen that half of the players in the top ten were hidden classes. Was this a class change from a professional mentor? Or was it a reward for encountering a special mission in the wilderness? Lorne was interested. This was because he also wanted a Summoner’s hidden class. This way, he could obtain more pet spaces. With that in mind, he opened his friend list and contacted Twinkle Rose. “Big-busted Sister, let me ask you a question. Where did those hidden classes on the leaderboard come from?” The message was quickly sent. At this moment, Twinkle Rose, who was leveling up in the valley, looked at the chat and could not help but smile. Although she did not like the title “Big-busted Sister”, after thinking about it for the past few days, she realized that she was more willing to accept “Big-busted Sister” than being called “small” by others. Moreover, not everyone was worthy of the title, “Big-busted Sister”. She should be proud. However, she did not want to be taken advantage of by Tyrant. Therefore, in terms of words, she had to be more brazen than that guy! Let’s see who could take advantage of who! Thinking of this, she smiled evilly and replied with a message. “Little Brother, you don’t even know this? Why don’t you beg Big Sister to tell you? How about it?” Twinkle Rose wanted Lorne to bow before her. But Lorne did not fall for her tricks and counterattacked mercilessly. “Forget it. I can find out on the Internet.” Seeing this reply, Twinkle Rose stomped her feet angrily, but in the end, she still bit her red lips and explained, “Most of the hidden classes that appear now are obtained from professional mentors, but each class will only produce one hidden class. Therefore, only the first player who completes a Class Advancement mission can obtain it.” “The current fifth-ranked Proud War Soul, his hidden class was obtained from a Class Advancement mentor. The quality is Elite. As for the first-ranked Fire Beacon, his hidden class was obtained by completing a special hidden mission. The quality is Rare.” After explaining, Twinkle Rose asked, “By the way, Brother Tyrant, which main city have you gone to? Why do I keep seeing cross-server communication?” “Iron Skull City,” Lorne said. “Impossible. I’m in Iron Skull City.” “I haven’t entered the main city yet. I’m doing a mission in Green Rock Town.” “Huh?” The beautiful guild leader was stunned, then she immediately reminded him, “Don’t do that officer’s challenge mission. There’s no reward at all, it’ll be a waste of time. You’d better hurry over. I’ll bring you to attack the boss.” Twinkle Rose just happened to have the coordinates of the Boss. She had let Tyrant join because she wanted to solidify their friendly relationship. However, Lorne rejected her. “No, I need to spend a few days to complete this mission. I appreciate your kindness.” “Eh, you’re really ambitious. Forget it, Little Brother, do your best. Big Sister will take her leave now.” Twinkle Rose used a respectful tone, clearly thinking that Lorne was farming for the commander’s challenge, so she was speechless. Lorne did not explain further. At this moment, he just had to make a killing silently. … And so it went, the rest of the day passed in the Dark Forest. Other than some bodily needs, he had been in the game the entire time, leading the elves around the forest. With four powerful pets by his side, there was no need for Lorne to fight in the forest by himself. Moreover, Rimuru had a powerful healing effect, making the entire trip a breeze. However, the high-intensity battle that had been going on for more than ten hours still put a lot of pressure on his mind and body. Lorne did not force an all-nighter. He simply rested when he got tired. Around dawn, the last wave of monsters fell at Lorne’s feet. Ding! “Congratulations on killing the demonized black wolf. Elf Reputation+10.” Ding! “Due to your Elf Race Reputation reaching 10,000 points, the elves’ attitude towards you has changed!” … Ding! “You protected the elves. Elf Leader Mayra’s affinity for you+1.” Ding! “Congratulations! Elf Leader Mayra’s affinity for you has reached 100 points. Your current relationship is [Acquaintance].” … A series of notifications appeared, and the elves’ attitude toward Lorne changed greatly. First of all, his racial reputation exceeded 10,000 points, and the overall attitude of the elves toward him had been greatly improved. As for Elf Leader Mayra, under Lorne’s long guidance, her affinity finally reached 100 points, and her attitude also increased to [Acquaintance]! In “Divine Realm”, high-level NPCs had an affinity system with players. The rough classifications were: -200 (Hatred), -100 (Disgust, -50 (Dislike), -30 (Suspicious), 0 (Neutral), 50 (Foreign), 100 (Acquaintance), 1,000 (Friendly), 10,000 (Friend), 50,000 (Admiration), 100,000 (Idolization), 200,000 (Close Friend). It was definitely a good achievement to be able to reach the level of [Acquaintance] at this stage, especially when facing elves. This result also put an end to the day’s gaming session. It was already after midnight. After setting up a temporary camp for the elves, Lorne went offline to rest. As he went offline very late, he washed up and went to bed. After waking up the next day, he charged into the Dark Forest and began his journey to kill monsters. The monsters in the Dark Forest had basically not changed much. Most of them were level 13-15 elite monsters. To Lorne, there was no difference between them. Therefore, the following battles were very victorious. The next day. On the third day… On the fourth day… For four days, Lorne did not leave the forest. Every day, his mission was the same. Yet, it was not dull for Lorne. This was because his reputation as an elf was rising non-stop. It was too good to gain 10,000 points per day. During this period of time, something else also happened in the main city. Firstly, the first clear of the Bronze-Grade Boss was taken away. A large guild had organized a large team of more than 500 people. They spent more than two hours and finally obtained the first clear of a Bronze-Grade Boss. Other than that, the level of the main city players also reached a new stage yesterday. The first player on the leaderboard, [Fire Beacon], had reached Level 21. The other players on the leaderboard were also chasing closely. All of them had reached Level 20. However, after Level 20, the players’ leveling speed was much slower. Their levels increased too quickly, causing the quality of their equipment and skill levels to be unable to support their strength. Therefore, the speed of leveling up after Level 20 showed a trend of slowing down collectively. At this moment, many recruitment posts appeared on the game forum. Most of them were issued by large corporations. They treated the current Level 20 players as the dividing line of the top players. All the players who could raise their levels to Level 20 during this period of time were classified as top players. Their value had also greatly increased during this period of time. An annual income of five million was the most basic amount. Of course, there were also people who offered to recruit Lorne. As someone who had cleared the Nightmare Dungeon in a high-profile manner, his value had increased to a terrifying level. Most of the financial groups offered an annual salary of 50 million, and the highest offered an annual salary of 100 million, as well as an additional position of vice-chairman. This salary was dazzling. Unfortunately, Lorne did not care. With the experience of earning 4.6 million dollars one day, this life of being commanded by others could no longer attract him. … Ding! “Congratulations on killing the demonized bear, Elf Reputation+10.” Ding! “Due to your Elf Race Reputation reaching 40,000 points, the elves’ attitude towards you has changed!” When the fourth night arrived, Lorne received another system notification that his Elf Reputation had reached 40,000 points. If other players saw this scene, they would probably be stunned. 90% of them did not even have more than 400 reputation points in the Human Empire, but Lorne had raised his reputation with the elves to 40,000 at this moment. It was unbelievable. At the same time, after so many days and countless battles, the affinity between Lorne and Mayra also increased to 290. Unlike the previous two days, when the affinity level increased to 200 points, it became very difficult to obtain. So, by the fourth night, it did not exceed 300 points. As for the experience points, he did not obtain any for four days. Fortunately, there was another mission that recorded more than 4,000 kills. If he handed in the mission, he should be able to obtain a decent reward. “It seems that the dungeon is about to be cleared.” Lorne glanced at the map. According to the information on it, they were already in the final area. As long as they cleaned up the first part, they could reach the vicinity of Iron Skull City. Thinking of this, Lorne stretched. After exploring the forest for several days, he was more mentally exhausted than physically. Fortunately, with the company of the beautiful elven girls, and seeing the reputation points on his interface, Lorne felt that all this time had been worth it. Huff— With a sigh, Lorne moved on. This time, he let Little Mantis act as a scout alone to check the situation of the last part of the map. With the help of the shared view from his pets, Lorne did not see any monsters in the area. But soon, he realized that his eyes had deceived him. When the team entered this region, suddenly! The entire forest turned dark. Countless black fog began to gather in front of him and gradually circle. Seeing this scene, the elves all looked over, their eyes showing extreme panic. Ding! “Warning! Due to the large amount of abyssal aura on the elves, it attracted the souls of all the monsters wandering in the forest. They gathered together and became extremely terrifying monsters!” “Game Announcement: A Hidden Boss has been born near you. Kill it and you will receive a generous reward!” Hidden Boss? Lorne looked at the Boss in front of him. It floated in the air, its entire body formed from black fog. At first glance, it looked like an evil wizard in a cloak. On the head that could not be seen clearly, there was a pair of flickering scarlet soul flames. It looked very strange. ———— [Demon Soul King] Grade: Boss Level: 15 HP: 85,000 / 85,000 Magic Attack: 400-520 Physical Defense: 150 Magic Defense: 150 Skills: [Soul Shock], [Demon Soul Summoning], [Painful Howl], [Soul Body] Introduction: The souls of the dead who died in the dark forest in the past gradually swelled because they could not be freed. In the end, under the attraction of the dark power, all the souls merged together, becoming a demon soul king with countless negative emotions gathered. ———— For an ordinary Level 15 Boss, its attributes could only be considered ordinary. Although it was stronger than the undead mage in the dungeon in all aspects, Lorne’s pets were not all Level 10 at that time. Therefore, comparatively speaking, Lorne felt more relaxed against a Boss of this level. However, this Boss did not attack immediately. Instead, it looked at Lorne with doubt and fear in its eyes. “It’s Lady Doris’ aura!” The Demon Soul King looked at Lorne, the fear in its eyes turning to surprise, “So you are a human traitor who follows Lady Doris!” Human traitor?! Hearing this word, the elves stepped back. Due to the limitations on their power, they could not completely explore the situation on Lorne, so when they heard the Demon Soul King’s words, they were immediately terrified. The elves looked warily at Lorne, keeping their distance. “My goodness! It’s really the aura of the Dragon of Darkness!” Mayra stood nearby, staring in shock at the motionless Lorne ahead. She had not suspected him because she had sensed the reputation of the Dragon Race of Order on the adventurer. However, she did not expect that when she used the little strength left in her body to investigate the other party, she really sensed the aura of the Dragon of Darkness! Could it be that he was really a traitor for the Dark faction? Mayra froze on the spot, unable to believe what she was feeling. There was no response from Lorne. He was clearly being called a traitor, but he did not refute it! Didn’t this mean that he silently agreed to this identity? Thinking of this, all the elves felt despair and trembled. Although they knew what was happening, they could not stop it. … At the same time, Lorne frowned. He roughly understood why the other party had such a judgment. It was most likely because of the [Mark of Darkness]. This negative buff caused him to have a trace of Doris’s aura. That was why this Boss misjudged its enemy. This was interesting. He wondered if he could use this to gain some benefits from this guy. “Since you’re a follower of Lady Doris, human, go kill those elves who get in the way.” Seeing that Lorne was silent, the Demon Soul King spoke. “What’s the benefit of working for you?” Lorne grinned, “Let me remind you that if you don’t give me a reward enough, I will definitely tear you into pieces as the price for exposing my identity!” Hearing this, the elves became even more panicked. The Demon Soul King was also stunned, but quickly recovered. It said, “Of course there are benefits. As long as you can help me kill these elves, I will give you endless wealth.” Ding! “Do you accept the mission: Kill the Elves?” “Mission reward: ?” A dungeon boss could assign missions? Lorne found the game increasingly interesting. However, he did not accept it. After all, even an invitation from the Dragon of Darkness, Doris, had been rejected. How could he give in to such a useless boss? “I don’t care about your promise. I want a reward that I can see now!” Lorne said with a cold expression. The Demon Soul King could not help but be stunned. At that moment, he could clearly sense the killing intent from Lorne. However, he quickly recovered. After all, the guy in front of him was only a level 10 adventurer. If not for its fear of Lady Doris, it would have already killed this human brat at first sight. But then again, this human kid was really greedy. This was good news. There were also benefits to greed. At the very least, he could use enough money to control the other party. This was much easier to communicate with than those hypocritical Empire experts. “In that case, I’ll give you what you want.” With that, the Demon Soul King waved his hand. The next second, a ball of black energy flew towards Lorne. ———— [Dark Energy] Effect: Can increase the constitution of dark creatures. Undemonized creatures will be assimilated by the darkness. ———— That was it? Lorne stared in disgust. Dark energy was only effective on creatures of the Dark faction. If ordinary players used this energy, they would automatically defect from the Light faction to the Dark faction. However, despite his disdain, Lorne still put the ball of energy away. For him, who had a Monster Merging Simulator, any material was valuable. Especially for such an energy-type material, there were many chances to use it in the future. “Is that all?” Lorne put it away, but stared at it coldly. “Of course, that’s not all.” The Demon Soul King said rather proudly, “It has been more than a thousand years since I was born here. In these years, all the treasures that fell into this forest are in my hands. If you want them, do as I say. I, the Demon Soul King, will not treat you badly.” A thousand years? Lorne’s eyes lit up. A thousand years ago was the time period when humans fought the Dark Abyss. If that was true, then there should be many treasures hidden in this forest. Although he did not believe that everything was in the hands of this monster, looking at its treacherous appearance, it should indeed have a huge treasure trove. “Bring it here and take a look. I don’t believe in empty promises.” Lorne could not be bothered to waste his breath on it. “Alright, you haven’t been completely demonized yet, so you still don’t know the value of dark energy. In that case, I’ll give you this as a reward.” The Demon Soul King waved its hand again and handed a rock to Lorne. ———— [Space Gem] Grade: Rare Effect: Expansion of Bag Space by 50 units. ———— Good stuff! This time, Lorne’s eyes lit up. He did not expect the Boss to give him a space gem so quickly. As a tool that could permanently increase the size of his inventory, it should be very valuable. Lorne quickly used the gem to avoid any accidents. Ding! “Successful use. Bag space expanded to 100 units.” At this moment, Lorne’s bag space panel doubled in size, from 50 to 100 slots. Seeing that he was so happy, the Demon Soul King knew that he was very satisfied, so he said, “Quickly do it. I can’t wait to absorb the souls of these elves.” However, Lorne still shook his head, “I’m not strong enough, so I’m afraid I can’t fulfill your request. Why don’t you give me another tool that can increase my strength?” Lorne felt that this boss was too easy to fool and could not help but want to get more things from it. However, such actions completely enraged this Boss that was the fusion of thousands of negative souls. “Human brat, don’t go overboard!” The Demon Soul King glared at Lorne angrily and warned, “Even if you and Lady Doris have a plan, I will not be punished for killing you since you are the one bringing the elves into my territory!” Indeed, it had not attacked because it was afraid that there was a special plan between Lorne and the Dragon of Darkness, Doris. Killing Lorne might ruin everything. But it was now thoroughly enraged. If this human brat was still so disobedient, he did not mind sucking this brat’s soul out and then snatching his body to complete the following mission. “Is that so?” “It so happens that I want your small treasure trove.” With that, Lorne’s expression changed, and the coldness on his face became fervor, as if he were a robber who had suddenly seen someone come with a bag of money. Rimuru! [Powered Jump]! Lorne directly commanded Rimuru to activate its skill. With a bounce, it directly hit the boss’s head, drawing away the aggro. “Damn you, human! How dare you anger the great Demon Soul King!” The Boss was furious. The moment it was attacked, it immediately raised its hand and shouted, “Come out, souls who wander in the world!” As soon as it finished speaking, countless soul-type monsters formed from black smoke appeared in the air. They floated in the air and looked hideous, like evil spirits wandering in hell. The elves were all trembling in fear. With a sharp blade in hand, Mayra’s gem-like eyes stared strangely at Lorne’s back. She had no idea what this human adventurer wanted to do. They were clearly on the same side just now, but now, their swords were suddenly pointed at each other. It was too hard to understand. [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows] Lorne turned the battle to the other side, then commanded Small Artillery to fire at the evil spirits in the sky. With the experience of killing the undead mage last time, Lorne knew that he could not leave these monsters alone, or else the boss would heal endlessly. Swish! Swish! Swish! -775 -769 -763 -757 -1599 (Critical) … Countless damage numbers floated in the air. The ground was filled with arrows burning with black flames and arrows spewing green poisonous fog. The two colors dyed the area ahead into a living hell. Because they were summoned monsters, the health of the soul monsters was not high. After two waves of arrows, half of them died. The rest were quickly harvested. “Damn human, feel the vibration from your soul!” Seizing this opportunity, the Demon Soul King seized the opportunity. Its blood-red eyes suddenly widened, and a surge of soul power swept towards Lorne. This was an attack that could not be blocked. At the very least, the current Lorne could not do it. In the next second, Lorne’s entire body shook, and his health dropped by a quarter. -575! As he lost a large amount of health, Lorne was stunned. Two seconds of stun was very fatal against a powerful Boss. How could a Boss like the Demon Soul King, who was skilled in combat, miss such an opportunity? Almost in the next second, it began to let out a strange cry towards the sky. This was a soundwave-type AOE skill. The stunned Lorne could not dodge it. But strangely… Despite the continuous attacks, Lorne did not lose any health. Not only that. His health points even returned to full in an instant from the sound waves. +1060 (Healing) -300! +1060 (Healing) -300! +1060! Red and green values appeared at the same time, and Lorne did not lose any health. This was because when faced with an unavoidable attack, Lorne immediately had Rimuru heal him. Because the little guy’s level had reached 10, its magic attack had also increased to 560 points. Coupled with the fixed bonus of the health recovery skill, the single healing effect of Rimuru was 1060 points. Moreover, it had the [Continuous Spray] skill. It could trigger up to eight heals at once. This created the current scene. Under all the attacks of the Boss, Lorne did not lose any health points. Even after the Boss’ attacks stopped, three healing numbers still appeared above his head. “Use Rapid Fire!” The moment he was stunned, Lorne immediately retreated and commanded his pets to counterattack. The two bows were drawn at the same time. The flaming arrows and the green poisonous fog arrows shot out like lasers and hit the Boss accurately. -669 -675 -1500! (Critical) -1520 (Critical) -665 … The damage output was maxed out. The skills of the two Silver pets triggered the maximum of six attacks. Not only that, but because they killed the soul monsters earlier, the skill [Frenzied Shooting] of the two archer pets stacked. ———— Skill: [Frenzied Shooting]: After killing the target, it will receive 1% Critical Strike chance, 3% Attack Speed, and 5% Critical Strike effect. (Maximum: 10 stacks. Duration: 20 seconds) ———— 10 stacks could bring about 10% critical strike chance, 30% attack speed, and 50% critical strike effect. It was also because of this that a series of critical damage was inflicted on the skill just now. 12 terrifying damage numbers appeared on the Boss’s head, directly depleting nearly 12,000 health points. At this moment, the Demon Soul King opened its abyssal mouth, and the black fog immediately poured into it. Then, a series of green numbers appeared above the Boss. +500 +500 +500 +500 In a short while, the Boss had recovered 5,000 health points. This was all help from the dead souls in the forest. As the merging of tens of thousands of vengeful spirits, the Demon Soul King could absorb the surrounding soul power at any time to recover from its injuries. “This monster is really shameless!” Lorne could not help but curse. He felt that every time he fought, he encountered such a self-healing Boss. It was clearly the most difficult monster to deal with, but he kept encountering it. If it were any other team, they would probably be disgusted to death by this skill. However… Such healing could not save its life when fighting against Lorne. “Small Artillery, Venom, attack with all your might!” “Rimuru, block it!” Lorne moved away from the center of the battlefield and stood far away, watching the fiery battle ahead. In fact, the moment he used the skill to attack but had not dealt any damage to Lorne, the outcome of the entire battle had been decided. The Demon Soul King was forced back by the three pets. It could not last long against the 910 points of attack. Soon, its health was depleted. Lorne had no intention of using it as a merging target. The Demon Soul King’s attributes were very ordinary in all aspects. If not for the fact that it was in the Dark Forest, its life-recovery skill would have been useless, so it was just a monster with no outstanding qualities. What was the use of it? Without hesitation, Lorne commanded his pets to attack this ‘friend’ in the most brutal way possible. “Wait… Adventurer…” Sensing Lorne’s killing intent, the Demon Soul King fell from the sky and knelt on the ground without dignity. Then, it looked at Lorne with a pitiful expression and begged, “Master Adventurer, I’m just a lost soul, a pitiful person who died once. Please let me go. You will not gain anything by killing me. Why don’t you let me go and I’ll give you all my treasures?” “Then what are you waiting for?” Lorne glared at it while asking. “Yes, yes, yes. Please wait a moment, Master.” The Demon Soul King waved its hands. In the next moment, countless gold coins rose from the soil in the forest and gathered in front of Lorne, forming a small golden mountain. “These are the gold coins that I collected. It’s exactly 300 gold coins.” 300 gold coins meant 1.5 million alliance dollars. This harvest was much higher than killing a Boss. That was not all. In the next second, a few pieces of glowing equipment appeared in front of Lorne. The Demon Soul King said, “These are the equipment dropped by the adventurers who passed by the forest. There were originally more, but after too long, many of the equipment have become unusable.” <i>That was it?</i>  Lorne checked the details of the equipment and found that they were only ordinary Silver and Bronze items. Lorne’s expression remained cold, “You don’t think these things can get me to spare you, do you?” Although the items were not bad, it was not enough for an old monster who had lived for a thousand years. With that, Lorne had Small Artillery raise the bow in its hand. “Spare me, adventurer, spare me.” Feeling the threat of death, the Demon Soul King trembled and quickly took out its last treasure. “Adventurer, there’s another treasure here, it’s something that was left behind a thousand years ago.” It was a feather without any light. It was half a meter long and covered in black blood. Although there was no effect, any player could tell that it was a very rare material. Lorne held the feather in his hand and opened its information panel. ———— [Unknown Bloodstained Feather] Quality: ??? Effect: ??? Effect: A bloodstained feather that seems to contain a very faint power of light. If you hand it over to the Radiant Church, you might receive a reward. ———— The Radiant Church? Lorne just so happened to have a mission that required him to go to the Radiant Church. However, what made Lorne pay attention was that the quality of the feather was unknown! Any player would know that unknown quality represented infinite possibilities in the game. Perhaps it was just an ordinary ornament. However, it might also be an incredibly rare item. To know the answer to all of this, he had to hand it over to the Radiant Church. Lorne gathered his things. Then, he continued to squeeze out the last of the Demon Soul King’s assets. However, this cowardly Boss insisted that he no longer had any treasures. It was simply because too many ancient things had been completely buried in the annals of history. Just like how steel would rot, medicinal substances would spoil, plants would rot, and rocks would be eroded… In addition, the Demon Soul King would always forget some ancient memories. In the end, it only had this many treasures. Lorne could sense that the boss was not lying. Therefore, he did not waste any more time. Instead, he asked, “After staying here for so many years, have you not collected the corpses of some monsters or the remains?” In the battle a thousand years ago, too many great figures had died. There might be someone who would leave behind some bones or something. When the time came, he would definitely obtain a very good surprise by using them to synthesize. But at this moment, hearing this question, the Demon Soul King was stunned. Corpse? He wanted the remains of the dead! The information in its memory was right. The undead mages of the fallen race liked to study the bodies of the dead the most. This was a disgusting habit. Although it did not understand why this human wanted the corpses, it was related to its own safety, so the Demon Soul King was naturally very active. “Yes, of course. I’ll help you find them now.” The Demon Soul King quickly checked the memory fragments in its mind and checked them one by one. In the end, it found some relatively well-preserved corpses. One ball of light after another flew in front of Lorne. When the balls of light disappeared, he saw a pile of rotting corpses and various items on the ground. “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: [Abyssal Graveyard Ghostly Bone Claw]!” “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: [Rotten Demon Wolf Leg]!” “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: [Light Unknown Bone]!” “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: [Mummified War Banner Cloth]!” “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: [Cracked War Horn]!” “…” Lorne accepted most of the materials. Apart from some equipment on the battlefield, there were also the skeletons of monsters. Most of them were from recent decades. There were no materials from a thousand years ago. But at that moment… The Demon Soul King held a treasure chest and handed it over. It said respectfully, “Master Adventurer, this is what I found in the depths of my memory. Although I don’t know what’s inside, I feel that it’s very important. Now, I’ll give this treasure chest to you. I hope you can spare my life.” Treasure chest? Something that had been hiding in the depths of its memory? To be able to remember a treasure chest like this, it should be a very special tool, right? Lorne accepted the treasure chest, but was suddenly shocked because he seemed to sense something jumping in the treasure chest. Sensing something amiss, Lorne stared at the Demon Soul King. The Demon Soul King trembled in fear, but no matter what, it could not recall what was inside. Left with no choice, Lorne let it open the treasure chest and investigate the content. However, the moment it was opened, everyone’s eyes widened. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Crystal? Inside the box was a crystal that could breathe! ? Lorne was stunned. The crystal pumped slightly every few seconds and emitted a faint light. Such a strange scene made Lorne activate appraisal immediately. However, in the next second, he was even more shocked. ———— [Unknown Crystal Heart] Quality: ??? Effect: ??? Introduction: A very strange heart. Because of its powerful vitality, it has been beating for a thousand years. ———— Heart? This was a crystal heart! Despite having encountered countless strange creatures, the thing before him still shocked him. He could not imagine what kind of monster would have a crystal heart. Not only that, but this heart had actually left its owner and continued beating in this chest for a thousand years! “I’ve obtained the true treasure.” From the perspective of a player, Lorne knew that this was something extraordinary. Even to ordinary players, it was an extraordinary treasure. To Lorne, who had a Monster Merging Simulator, the heart was definitely the highest quality material. If he could synthesize the prototype with it, the final result would definitely shock the entire world. With that in mind, Lorne quickly put the crystal heart away in his bag. Then, he studied it. This crystal heart was very different from a human heart. Its entire structure was like a heart-shaped crystal block. It was crystal clear, and every time it beat, the center would emit a very subtle green light. “Master Adventurer, since you’ve obtained a satisfactory treasure, I won’t disturb you anymore. I’ll take my leave first.” The Demon Soul King said and bowed respectfully in a human manner. After this respectful and hypocritical behavior, there was an incomparably hideous expression on its face. The Demon Soul King, who had suffered such humiliation, swore that one day, it would capture this detestable human and imprison his soul, making him submit for all eternity! Just as the Demon Soul King was secretly cursing… Two arrows shot from the side. Pfft— Pfft— The flaming and poisonous arrows accurately struck the Boss’ head. The powerful force dealt high damage. The Boss, who did not have much health left, had its health points decreased even more. Now, it only had 2,000-3,000 health points left. “Human!” “You went back on your word!” The Demon Soul King let out an angry roar and used its fastest speed to flee. However, more than a dozen arrows instantly followed behind it and entered its body, wiping out its last health. “Do I need to keep my word against a demon like you?” Lorne had no intention of letting it go from the beginning. Only by killing this cunning demon would he be able to stop all threats. After killing the boss, Lorne went to clean up the final battlefield. At this moment, countless white souls flew out from the black fog, and countless voices echoed in the entire forest. “Thank you, brave adventurer. You are the one who ended my sins. My soul is finally free.” Countless souls were gathering around Lorne. Perhaps because of the wishes of these dead souls, this time, the boss dropped a lot of loot. In addition to the six Bronze items, there were two Silver items inside. One of them was a part of the Sage Set that Lorne needed. ———— [Sage’s Wisdom Shoulder Guard] (Sage Set: 1 / 7) Quality: Silver Defense: +50 Magic Resistance: +50 Constitution: +15 Type: Cloth Armor Level Requirement: 10 Additional effect: Resists 5% of physical damage. Additional effect: Resists 5% of magic damage. Introduction: The Wisdom Bracer enhanced by a Sage can be of great help to the user. ———— Lorne put it on and his resistance increased significantly. Ding! “The effect of [Sage Set] has been triggered. Set attributes received: Bypass 30 points of magic resistance of the target.” Four pieces of equipment gave Lorne 60 points of magic resistance penetration. Unfortunately, he was a Summoner who did not need to deal damage himself. He put away the loot. In the end, Lorne obtained an energy ball. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the material: [Purified Soul].” He obtained another soul material. It was the same as the material he had obtained in the last instance dungeon. However, the quality of the soul he obtained this time was slightly worse. “That doesn’t matter. It can be used as an experiment.” Feeling grateful, Lorne put everything away. After all, he had gained a lot from this dungeon exploration. Not only did he obtain a huge amount of elf reputation, but he also obtained a large amount of strange materials and items. It was simply awesome. Then… Lorne looked at the elves hiding in the distance, “Let’s go. We’ll reach Iron Skull City soon after leaving the forest.” In the end, Mayra looked at him warily, no longer as cooperative as before. Clearly, the scene just now made her very suspicious. Lorne had to explain himself. He showed the Mark of Darkness on his body to the other party, eliminating the other party’s suspicions and accidentally obtaining the admiration of all the elves. “Heavens, Master Adventurer rejected the Dragon of Darkness!” “This is unbelievable.” “So Master Adventurer has received the recognition of the Dragon of Light. No wonder he has a good reputation within the Dragon Race of Order.” “You are the best friend of the elves.” “Bless you.” The elves expressed their friendliest attitude. Mayra walked up and expressed her greatest gratitude to Lorne, “Best friend of the elves, thank you for saving our lives again.” Ding! “Elf Leader Mayra’s affinity with you+100!” “Elf Tracey highly approves of you, Elf Reputation+100.” “Elf Sloka highly approves of you. Elf Reputation+100.” “Elf Dolly highly approves of you. Elf Reputation+100…” “Congratulations on killing the Boss [Demon Soul King], Elf Reputation+3,000.” Ding! “Congratulations on reaching 50,000 points in total reputation among the elves. The elves’ impression of you has improved.” … A series of notifications appeared. But before Lorne could recover, an even grander voice sounded in the air. Ding! “Iron Skull City Announcement: Congratulations to Player [Tyrant] for successfully purifying the souls of the dead in the Dark Forest. Reward: None!” “Iron Skull City Announcement: Due to Player [Tyrant] purifying the Dark Forest, the mission [Proof of Courage] has officially ended. All players who have accepted and are undergoing the mission can go to the commander of Iron Skull City, Klent, to receive a ‘Brave Adventurer Reward’.” “Ding!” “Ding!” The two main city announcements sounded three times. All the players who entered Iron Skull City received the news at the same time. The moment they saw the announcement, they were all stunned. Then, they laughed crazily. “He purified the Dark Forest but ended up with no rewards. Hahaha, I’m dying of laughter.” “This person has been farming in the Dark Forest for four to five days just for the system announcement. He’s really amazing.” “No way, this person has not entered the main city?” “He’s a goner, everyone else is already Level 20, but this guy is still Level 10.” “Even with such an incredible start, he ended up in such a pathetic state.” “I’m smiling so widely my mouth is tearing apart.” The players of Iron Skull City were all dumbfounded. They had always thought that [Tyrant] might have entered the main city a few days later, which was why his level could not keep up with the first tier players. However, only at this moment did they understand that the player with huge potential in their eyes, [Tyrant], had not even entered the main city until today. In such a game, level represented the progress of the game. If one’s level was lower in the early stages, it was impossible to catch up to others in the later stages. Furthermore, in “Divine Realm”, the first player to change their class could obtain a hidden class. Their leveling speed was already very fast. Now, with the addition of the hidden class, ordinary players could not even dream of catching up to them in terms of level. For players like [Tyrant] who had a huge advantage in the early stages, they would also lose their advantage due to their level disadvantage. He would definitely end up as a normal player. … “No way, Little Brother Tyrant. How many days did you really spend on that mission?!” Twinkle Rose also sent a message. “Big-busted Sister, I told you about this a few days ago. You don’t have to be so surprised, do you?” “Pfft… I’m not surprised. I just think it’s funny. Hahahaha, I’m dying of laughter.” Twinkle Rose sent a smiling emoticon. Then, she sent another message. “Poor little brother, you’re only Level 10 now. Fortunately, I’ve been training crazily recently and am now a top player ranked sixth on the level board. Now, as long as you open your mouth and beg me, I’m still very willing to bring you along to level up. After all, our relationship as siblings is not bad.” Twinkle Rose did not change her attitude because of Lorne’s low level. She was even willing to lose her leveling speed and bring him along to kill monsters. “My mouth has always been very sweet. Want to have a taste?” Lorne replied meaningfully. “Tsk, tsk, tsk! All men stink. They don’t like to brush their teeth like the dead monsters in the cemetery.” In one of the ruins, Twinkle Rose giggled at Lorne’s words. Then, she asked about forming a team to kill monsters, but was naturally rejected by Lorne. Raising his level was not an issue for Lorne. Now that the mission in the Dark Forest had been completed, as long as he entered the main city and met the Dragon of Light, he believed that his level would quickly catch up. After ending the conversation with Twinkle Rose, Lorne received another call. It was from [Super Rich]. “Wow, leader, you’re on the announcement again. I’m so jealous.” This rich tycoon came over everyday to ask about his well-being. Lorne felt good about him. The only pity was that this guy was a greasy middle-aged man, not a young and cute girl. “This is just a normal thing, don’t be too surprised,” Lorne said. “Then, Leader, are you coming to the main city soon? I’ve been here for a few days already. I’ve always hired people to lead the way when leveling up. Yesterday, I finally reached Level 17, but just now, I accidentally got killed by a swarm of monsters in the forest.” Super Rich said ruefully. “Yes, I’ll probably reach the main city soon.” “That’s great, but Leader, you have to be careful. There are many guilds that have grudges from the Beginner Village who are waiting for you. They want to block you at the entrance when you are only Level 10.” “Ignore them. They’re just a bunch of clowns.” … Closing the chat panel, Lorne led the elves out of the forest. The moment they crossed the forest border, they officially walked out of the dungeon. At this moment, a towering city appeared before Lorne. It was Iron Skull City! It sat on the mountain range, extending all the way to the highest point. It looked like a giant dragon entrenched in the mountain range. Even from afar, one could clearly sense its majesty and magnificence. An extraordinary deterrence assaulted their faces. As he arrived at the edge of the city, he could see a huge wall that was as high as a mountain. It was hundreds of meters high and was made of hard mountains and rocks. As the empire’s northern stronghold, Iron Skull City faced the threat from the icy plains of calamity and maintained the peace and stability of the empire’s south. It was believed that anyone of any race would feel the most reverence when they came here. Ding! “You have entered the location—Iron Skull City!” The moment he entered the city, he heard the system notification. Then, Elf Mayra walked towards Lorne. “Friend of the elves, we have finally arrived at Iron Skull City. Thank you for your protection along the way. After we recover, we will definitely thank you for your help.” Mayra said respectfully. With that, she led the injured elves to a teleportation circle in Iron Skull City. The elves left. However, the strange thing was that there was no mission reward. Lorne opened the mission panel and saw that the mission had been completed. As for the reward, it might not be given until the elves had recovered completely. This was good for Lorne. After all, he had not changed his class yet. If the mission reward was given, he would not be able to obtain the experience reward. Therefore, this was the best situation. After bidding the elves farewell, Lorne headed for the center of Iron Skull City. Before heading to the Church of Light, he had to first change his class. Otherwise, if he kept waiting, he would lose a lot of experience. He walked towards the Summoner temple. Soon, Lorne arrived at his destination. Unlike other classes, due to the long growth period, the Summoner class was a relatively unpopular class. Therefore, even the Summoner temple was less popular than other professional temples. Lorne entered the temple and quickly saw the professional mentor at the front. It was a beautiful NPC with a well-proportioned body. She wore a light blue magic robe and looked very elegant. “Mentor, I need to change my class.” Lorne stepped forward and requested. “Young adventurer, I can clearly sense that you have the right to be an official Summoner. Welcome to the great Summoner faction. The empire will be proud of you!” The beautiful mentor said gently, allowing Lorne to see her name. [Summoner Class Mentor, Eloise] As soon as she finished speaking, the system notification sounded. Ding! “Summoner Class Mentor, Eloise, is about to change your class. Do you accept it?” “Accept.” Without any hesitation, Lorne made a decision. Then, a golden light suddenly descended from the sky and poured over his body. Ding! “Congratulations on reaching Class One. You have received +5 aptitude.” “Due to the increase in your aptitude, you have received the corresponding compensation. Free Attribute Points+50.” “Due to the increase in your aptitude, your attributes have increased to: (1 Constitution = 15 HP + 2 Defense), (1 Spirit = 15 MP + 2 Magic Resistance), (1 Intelligence = 4 Magic Attack), (1 Agility = 0.3 Movement Speed + Attack Speed).” “Due to the increase in your aptitude, the attributes of each level have increased to: HP +40, MP +40, Magic Attack +5, Defense / Magic Resistance +2, Movement Speed +0.4.” “Congratulations on reaching Class One. You have received +1 Pet Space.” “…” After a series of notifications, Lorne’s attributes increased tremendously. First, his aptitude increased to 10 stars, giving him an additional 50 Free Attribute Points. Then, his attributes doubled. In other words, the stats gained in the past from his point distribution would also double. Not only that, after changing his class, the attribute increase of each level doubled. This effect gave Lorne a few hundred attribute points. From this huge increase, one could clearly see the difference between a Class One Player and a non-class player. The two were on completely different levels. Lorne added 50 Free Attribute Points according to the initial 3 Constitution, 2 Agility ratio, and then opened his attributes panel. ———— ID: [Tyrant] Class: Official Summoner Level: 10 (0 / 3,800) Talent: [Monster Merging Simulator (???)] HP: 3,280 / 3,280 (890 ↑) MP: 2,325 / 2,325 (375 ↑) Magic Attack: 353-706 (55-110 ↑) Magic Resistance: 327 (148 ↑) Physical Resistance: 218 (75 ↑) Speed: 48.9 (7.1 ↑) Attributes: Constitution 138, Strength 15, Spirit 65, Intelligence 35, Agility 71 Free Attributes: 0 EXP: 9,155 Reputation: 3,500 Dragon Race of Order Reputation: 100 Night Elf Race Reputation: 50,520 Luck: 5 Possession: 45 Gold Coins, 17 Silver Coins, 79 Bronze Coins. ———— These were the stats that Lorne had obtained after reaching Class One. His overall strength had increased by about 50%. In addition, he obtained a pet space. In this case, Lorne could add another pet. “If only I could get myself an elf…” Looking at the additional pet space, Lorne could not help but think of the elves who had just separated. As the most beautiful species in the world, elves were loved by all races of the Order Faction. It was also because of this that a black market was created by the nobles. Greedy nobles would auction illegally captured elves there. Although the Human Empire had always valued their relationship with the elves, there were still some people who were willing to take risks in the face of their beauty. Such an action also caused the relationship between the Human Empire and the elves to be very rigid. When faced with elves, even NPCs could not control themselves. Could the players remain calm? Of course not. The players could do whatever they wanted in this world. Moreover, the players did not have to worry about being killed. Therefore, in the game world, players would indulge their desires even more. Lorne was no exception. Of course, he was different from those greedy and corrupt NPCs. What he wanted now was a companion, a friendly companion who could chat and fight hand in hand. After all, no one wanted to have strange undead creatures like Fire of Death around them all day long. “Unfortunately, I can’t make a move on the elves.” Lorne shook his head helplessly. Due to the fact that the elves and the Human Empire were in an alliance, the players could not attack the elves. Otherwise, once they were discovered, they would lose all the reputation points of the two races. Considering the use of reputation points, Lorne basically gave up on the idea of hunting elves. “Mentor, I want to learn Summoner skills.” Lorne looked at his mentor again. The beautiful NPC nodded. Then, a panel appeared in front of Lorne. In fact, every class could learn their own skills at level 1, but the Summoner was different. He would automatically learn Summoning, so there were no other skills for Lorne to use in the Beginner Village. ———— Skill: [Excitement] Effect: Used on pets, it will cause their spirit attribute to increase. Overall combat strength will be increased by 1%. Learning Requirement: Level 10 Summoner, 20 silver coins. ———— Skill: [Prayer] Effect: Used on pets, it will allow them to recover their bodies. Healing will be 100% of the player’s magic attack. Learning Requirement: Level 10 Summoner, 20 silver coins. ———— A Summoner could learn two skills at Level 10. The first [Excitement] skill was very useful in battle. After reaching Level 10, it could increase the combat strength of pets by 10%. It was very good. The second skill was relatively useless to Lorne. However, it was better than nothing. With the skill in hand, battles would be more interesting. Lorne spent 40 silver coins to learn the two skills. Then, he left the Summoner temple. As he walked out the door, his friend list suddenly lit up. It was a message from [Super Rich]. “Leader, you’re finally in the main city! Come to the Church of Light quickly. There’s a church mission here that can earn a lot of reputation. Many people are fighting over it, but I already know how to get past the line.” Super Rich said confidently. “Wait a moment. I’ll submit a mission first.” There happened to be a mission on Lorne that needed to go to the Church of Light. In any case, he had to go eventually. Since Super Rich was so concerned about a Level 10 Player like him, there was nothing wrong with giving him a hand. Lorne replied casually and walked in the other direction. Now that he had completed his Class Advancement, it was time to submit the mission he had received in Green Rock Town. He hoped to have a good reward. Soon, Lorne arrived at the city guard camp. Here, he saw the commander of Iron Skull City, Klent. It was an extremely tall and sturdy general in heavy knight armor. When he saw the mission list that Lorne handed in, his eyes immediately widened and he froze on the spot in shock. “Welcome, young adventurer.” Commander Klent patted Lorne on the shoulder with a heavy grip, “Come, young man. Let me see how much trouble you faced before coming to Iron Skull City!” As soon as he finished speaking, a mission notification panel appeared. Lorne chose to submit it. “Young man, your strength has exceeded my expectations. You’ve actually killed more than 400…” Klent glanced at the number and was about to praise the young adventurer. But in the next second, his words stopped. He suddenly looked as if he had seen a ghost. Then, he counted the numbers one by one. “Ten! Hundred! Thousand!” “Heavens! It’s over 4000!!” After seeing the number, Klent blinked in disbelief and looked at it several times. When he finally confirmed the number in front of him, he was wild with joy, “So you’re the adventurer who completely purified the Dark Forest. I didn’t expect you to be so young. Hahahaha!” Although the monsters wandering in the Dark Forest were not powerful, to level 10 adventurers who had not advanced their class, it required immense courage and strength to pass through this region. “Young adventurer, it seems that you are as powerful as you are courageous.” Klent looked at him very seriously, then said in a low voice, “Young man, you have not failed the Empire’s expectations. The holy light will shine even more because of you, and the branches of the World Tree will flourish even more. Thank you for your contribution to Iron Skull City. Come, this is your reward!” Ding! “Congratulations on completing the mission [Proof of Courage]!” “Since you have killed 4,520 monsters, you have received a reward: +226,000 (+452,000) experience points ,+9,040 reputation points.” “Since you have purified the entire Dark Forest, Commander Klent will give you an additional reward: [Sage’s Wisdom War Boots] (Silver).” Several system notifications sounded. Lorne was rewarded handsomely. Because Summoners had three times the experience, he gained 678,000 experience points alone! Without any hesitation, he used it to raise his level. Ding! “Congratulations on reaching Level 11. You have received 10 Free Attribute Points!” “Congratulations on reaching Level 12. You have received 10 Free Attribute Points!” “…” “Congratulations on reaching Level 20. You have received 10 Free Attribute Points!” “Warning! As you are a Summoner, your level has been locked. Please raise your pets to Level 20. The character’s level will be unlocked then.” A series of notifications appeared. Although he had leveled up, he only used 48,600 experience points. This was not even as high as the EXP requirement for his pets to level up once. “Let’s level up the Small Artillery first.” Lorne focused on his pets. As a Summoner, once the pet’s level increased, its combat strength would increase greatly. Among the pets, Small Artillery was the damage dealer. Only by increasing its level would the team’s farming efficiency be maximized. Moreover, it was a Silver monster, so the EXP requirement was not as terrifying as Rimuru. Ding! “Congratulations on using 57,000 experience points to raise your pet [Fire of Death (Small Artillery)] to Level 11.” “Congratulations on using 63,000 experience points to raise your pet to Level 12.” “Congratulations on using 69,000 experience points to raise your pet to Level 13.” “…” “Congratulations on using 94,000 experience points to raise your pet to Level 18.” Eight golden lights fell. Small Artillery’s level went from 10 to 18 in one go, and its attributes were greatly increased. [HP: 11,550 / 11,550 (4200 ↑)] [Attack: 990-1430 (360-520 ↑)] [Defense: 385 (140 ↑)] “Wow, the upper limit of its attack is as high as 1430 points!” Lorne could not help but be shocked by the interface data. As the master, he only had 756 points at Level 20. Although Lorne did not add any “Intelligence”, he had Silver-quality equipment. In comparison to the current players, his magic attacks were actually stronger than mainstream players. But even so, the upper limit of his attack was only half that of his pet! From this alone, it was obvious how terrifying the strength of Small Artillery was. This was only the beginning. In the future, the other pets’ levels would also increase. At that time, no one in this game would be able to stop him. Lorne fantasized. Then, he began to organize the other rewards. After the experience points, it was 9,040 reputation points. There was no need to elaborate. From their experience in Green Rock Town, everyone could tell that reputation points were the reason why players could communicate well with NPCs. It would determine the attitude of an NPC to a large extent. Therefore, by ensuring that one had high reputation points, in the future, when reaching a place where trust was needed, these points would prove to be useful. … Finally, there was a gift. This was one of the parts of the Sage Set, and it was the boots that Lorne needed the most. ———— [Sage’s Wisdom War Boots] (Sage Set: 1 / 7) Quality: Silver Speed: +15 Agility: +20 Type: Cloth Armor Level Requirement: 10 Additional effect: Increases endurance by 10%. Additional effect: Increases movement speed by 10%. Introduction: The Wisdom War Boots enhanced by a Sage can be of great help to the user. ———— This was a pair of great Silver-grade boots. The equipment increased Lorne’s speed significantly. In addition, it also increased endurance. It could greatly reduce the duration of an enemy’s control skill. It was a very special attribute. There was nothing to say, so he quickly changed into it. The speed immediately increased significantly. [Speed: 70.9 (18 ↑)] His speed had already exceeded 70+, about 2-3 times that of ordinary players. After obtaining this equipment, Lorne officially gathered five items of the Sage Set. He was still short of the leg guard and the helmet to complete the set. Although it was only a Level 10 set, its complete set effect was definitely not inferior to that of a normal Gold-grade equipment. Therefore, Lorne did not plan to replace them for the time being. After doing this, Lorne walked towards the Church of Light. Soon, he arrived before an extremely holy building. At the entrance of the holy building, countless players were gathered. The reputation of the Church of Light was very difficult to obtain, and he could only obtain it by completing church missions. In the current Church of Light, there were NPCs distributing harvesting missions. The materials that the players could collect could be exchanged for the reputation points of the Church of Light. To the top players of the guilds, this was the best opportunity. One had to know that the Church of Light had the most powerful hidden classes—Light Knight, and even Light Angel! Therefore, the current Church of Light was filled with players. Everyone wanted to accept this mission. “Leader, I finally see you.” Super Rich immediately rushed to Lorne’s side. When he saw the level displayed above his head, he was immediately shocked, “My goodness, Leader, your leveling speed is too fast. I saw on my friend list that you were still Level 10, but in just a few minutes, you directly reached Level 20. This leveling speed is too terrifying!” “I’m not even in the rankings, there’s nothing impressive about it.” Lorne shook his head and smiled, then looked at the packed square. He asked, “Are you going in to accept a mission?” “That’s right. Although there are many people here, I have a way to save time.” Super Rich walked towards the crowd confidently and said, “Leader, you can follow me later.” With that, Super Rich patted the players in front of him who were queuing up. “What’s the matter?” The player looked at him strangely. At this moment, Super Rich took out a money bag and said, “Brother, I want to buy your spot.” Hearing this, the player weighed the money bag and found that there were actually 10 silver coins inside. He immediately smiled and gave up his spot, walking behind Lorne. As a result, there was one less person in front of Lorne. “Leader, with this, we can go in to receive the mission in at most ten minutes.” Super Rich smiled happily at Lorne. Then, this super rich man took out dozens of small money bags from his bag and began doing the same thing. Although 10 silver coins was not much, to ordinary people, it was equivalent to 500 alliance dollars. The price of obtaining it was simply moving back by two spots. It was too easy of a choice. “Wait a minute, you’re wasting money.” Lorne pulled at Super Rich, who was about to give him the money bag. However, the latter looked at him uncomprehendingly and said, “No, there are only a few thousand people in front. It won’t cost much. It’s just that there aren’t enough gold coins. It’s too difficult to purchase gold coins on the market. Most of them have been taken away by the people from the large financial groups.” Lorne was speechless, “Put the money away. I’ll bring you in.” “No way, leader. How are you going to get in?” Super Rich looked at him questioningly, then whispered beside him, “Leader, if we cut in line here, we’ll be beaten up by the others. We might even be arrested by the city guards and sent to jail. Let’s spend money to go in.” “Is there a need to spend money with me around?” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up, “Don’t worry about anything else. I’ll bring you in. Just follow behind me.” “Oh… okay…” Super Rich frowned and followed behind Lorne. To be honest, he suspected that it would not be successful. After all, he had been watching others squeeze here for an entire day, and there was still no one who could cut the queue. Other than queuing and spending money to speed up the queue, there was basically no other way. As he thought this, after a short exchange with Lorne, a city guard maintaining the order quickly entered the church. Then… Not long after. The crowd in front suddenly became restless. A team of knights walked out of the church. Everyone was separated, making way for them. Then, a beautiful priestess in a holy robe walked out. Under the gaze of all the players, she walked straight up to Lorne and smiled, “Young adventurer, we meet again.” “Yeah, nice to see you again.” Lorne nodded. The high-level NPC in front of him was the Light Priestess Leisha who had interacted with him in the Beginner Village. He did not expect to see her here again after leaving the Beginner Village. “I have received a message from the Dragon God and have come to welcome you.” The adventurer who was invited by the Dragon God was already qualified to receive her respect. Then, she looked at Super Rich, who was beside Lorne, and asked, “Who is this?” “This is my friend. He also wants to contribute to the Church of Light.” “I see. Please follow me.” Priestess Leisha gracefully turned and led the two into the church. A few seconds after they disappeared from view, the entire frozen square suddenly erupted with a bang. Damn!!! The surrounding players were dumbfounded. After queuing for hours, they finally arrived at the church. However, look at this [Tyrant]. He had only just arrived at this place, but there was actually a super beautiful priestess welcoming him! They were both players, but the difference in treatment was too great! At the same time, looking at the extremely holy and beautiful NPC in front of him, even Super Rich was stunned. Oh heavens, the leader’s methods were truly unbelievable. He really brought them into the Church of Light. Not only that, but the leader even had such a noble Priestess NPC welcome him! Was this something a player could do? It was too amazing. <i>‘Fortunately, I chose to believe in the leader.’</i>?Super Rich nodded to himself and made up his mind. In the future, he had to follow this leader with all his heart. Not to mention what would happen in the future, just the scene in front of him and the scene of him going on a full-server announcement previously was very comfortable. … Soon, the few of them arrived inside the Church of Light. The Church of Light was different from other professional shrines. Ordinary players could not enter. Everyone only looked for NPCs to accept missions outside. Therefore, the Church of Light did not have any external noise, only incomparable holiness and peace. “Don’t wander around. In this hall, try to find as many NPCs as possible to converse. After organizing your words, it’s up to you how many missions you can trigger.” Lorne instructed Super Rich. Although this super tycoon was clumsy when playing games, how could someone with such a net worth in reality not have interpersonal skills? He believed that with his’ cunningness’, he would definitely be able to obtain a lot of benefits in this temple. As for Lorne himself, he was about to meet the Dragon of Light, hoping to obtain enough rewards from this generous dragon. When they neared the core region of the church, even Leisha could not set foot there. Lorne walked alone through the long corridor. In the end, he arrived in an extremely huge hall. What appeared before him was a huge hall with a radius of several hundred meters. It was like a square. There was nothing around them, only white stone pillars and pale golden flowers. As he surveyed his surroundings, the space in the hall suddenly distorted, and then a grand light shone. In the gentle light, countless holy light feathers fell. Then, huge holy dragon wings flapped, and an incomparably huge dragon descended in the hall. “Young adventurer, your growth is much faster than I imagined.” The Dragon of Light looked at Lorne with its golden eyes and said solemnly, “However, this is not enough to control the power of the Divine Radiance.” “Please enlighten me, Dragon God.” Lorne said respectfully. Although he was invincible among the players, in front of this Dragon of Light, such a level was nothing to be proud of. The Dragon of Light looked at him in satisfaction and asked, “Young man, do you know the true origin of the Divine Radiance?” Where did the Divine Radiance come from? Lorne was just a new player who had just entered the game. How could he know the origins of such a high-level power? As such, he shook his head. “The Divine Radiance is the origin power left behind by the Divine Dragon of Order before it sacrifices itself.” “If we can master all its energy, it will be equivalent to possessing the supreme power of the Divine Dragon of Order.” “However, after countless years, this power of origin gradually dissipated, and it was shattered one after another by huge battles, causing this power to gradually lose its original divine power.” “Fortunately, the first Dragon of Light figured out a way to preserve the Divine Radiance and gradually nourish it.” “That is to use faith!” “The power of faith produced by the billions of creatures of the Order faction is the best nourishment for the Divine Radiance. It can maintain the Divine Radiance for countless years and even make up for a portion of its deficiency.” “This is also the reason why the Church of Light was born.” “Today, the Divine Radiance has gradually grown stronger, but unfortunately, in this day and age, no one can control this power anymore.” “The Dragon of Light has always been the one with the greatest hope of controlling it, but over the years, no one has really done this.” “Therefore, I have to look for other users.” The Dragon of Light explained the situation. Finally, its gaze refocused on Lorne, and it asked him in an authoritative voice, “Young adventurer, are you willing to accept this challenge?” As soon as he finished speaking, at the same time, a warning system notification sounded. Ding! “Game Announcement: Your answer will affect the Dragon of Light’s opinion of you. Please answer cautiously.” This was a multiple choice question? That was not right. This should be a freebie question. Any normal gamer should know what to choose. From the Dragon of Light’s words, it was obvious that he wanted to pass on the most, most, most powerful strength in the world to him. How could he refuse such a good thing? Lorne answered decisively, “I will master the Divine Radiance and purify the entire Divine Realm!” Forget about the difficulty for now, he had to make his stand clear on such a matter. Only then could he obtain the most rewards. “Young man, you did not disappoint me. Although you are very weak now, you have a fearless heart. In that case, I will issue you the most difficult mission. I hope you can withstand my test.” The Dragon of Light looked at Lorne in relief. The next second, the system’s voice sounded again. Ding! “Congratulations! The Dragon of Light appreciates your attitude. You have received a gift from the Dragon of Light: Dragon of Light’s affinity+10, Dragon Race of Order Reputation+100.” “Congratulations! Your epic mission [Divine Radiance – Prelude] has been completed. Reward: Reputation+100,000, Dragon Race of Order Reputation+100.” “Congratulations! Your epic mission [Divine Radiance (1)] has begun!” A series of notifications appeared. The reward excited Lorne. In just a short while, his reputation with the Dragon Race of Order increased by 200 points! Not only that, but he also gained 100,000 reputation points. Of course, most importantly, it was the Dragon of Light’s affinity. It was one of the most powerful existences in the world. With its good impression, he would definitely have a chance to come into contact with more high-level missions in the future. Other than these rewards, the Divine Radiance mission that Lorne had also changed. [Divine Radiance (1)] Quality: Epic Content: The Dragon of Light, Hamut, believes that you have the potential to inherit the Divine Radiance, so he has decided to give you the most stringent test. You must go to the ruins of the war to search for the dragon souls and bring back five [Dragon Souls] to the Dragon of Light. The more dragon souls you bring back, the more generous the reward will be. War ruins? Dragon soul? This seemed to be another difficult task. Lorne had a very clear feeling. At this moment, the Dragon of Light also began to narrate. “It was a huge mountain range. It was originally the best place, but in the war a thousand years ago, it was covered by the flames of war between order and chaos and became a lifeless forest.” “Almost all races gathered together, including humans, elves, orcs, giants, dragons, abyssal demons, undead, and abyssal lords. They began an intense war that lasted for several years.” “The warriors of the Order faction used their lives to defend the peace of the Empire. Their blood has stained the entire mountain range, and their bones have propped up the towering mountains. They have brought peace and stability to us.” “But unfortunately, countless demons and undead from the abyss died there. Their bodies were the source of the chaos. Dark blood corroded the mountain range, and the aura of the undead covered the entire forest. The souls of the dead soldiers were also imprisoned in the ruins.” “They were once the most glorious warriors of the Empire. I hope that they can rest in peace in their homeland, so I hope that you can bring back the souls of some dragons and let them be free under the holy light to be reincarnated.” “Please leave the mission to me, Great Dragon God. I will definitely bring back enough dragon souls.” Lorne replied firmly. “Very good.” The Dragon of Light nodded and continued, “However, to find the dragon souls in the incomparably vast forest, you still need some help.” With that, two rays of light entered Lorne’s body. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the mission tool: Dragon Soul Compass.” “Congratulations on obtaining the mission tool: Dragon’s Treasure Vault.” [Dragon Soul Compass] (Mission Item) Grade: Legendary Introduction: A special treasure of the Dragon Race. It can be used to discover the dragon souls of nearby existences. [Dragon’s Treasure Vault] (Mission Item) Grade: Legendary Introduction: Carrying this treasure, you can obtain a cubic space of 1000x1000x1000 units. “Two legendary treasures!” Lorne was dazzled. Both items were priceless. The Dragon Soul Compass’s function was to search for the location of the dragon souls. Although it was a mission-specific tool, it had a legendary quality and was still very expensive. As for the second Dragon’s Treasure Vault, its value was even more inestimable. After reaching Level 20, an ordinary player only had 100 slots in their space. Moreover, they could only carry small items and materials. The Dragon’s Treasure Vault had a space of 1 billion cubic meters that could contain almost anything one wanted. If not for the fact that it was a mission item, Lorne would have even wanted to keep it for himself. “Wait…” “Why did the Dragon of Light give me this storage item?” Again, Lorne was confused. Was the dragon soul as large as the dragon? At this moment, the Dragon of Light said, “The body of a dragon is extremely strong. Perhaps when you find the soul of a dragon, you can still encounter the corpses of the dragons. If you can really encounter them, please use this Dragon’s Treasure Vault to transport the corpses back. At that time, I will give you enough rewards.” So it was an additional mission. However, this mission target made Lorne’s eyes widen. He had a Monster Merging Simulator. If he really found the corpse of the giant dragon, could he use those corpses as materials to create an invincible bone dragon? <i>Gulp!</i>  Lorne swallowed. To be honest, he was shocked by his bold idea. Using the corpse of a dragon to create a monster was a crazy idea. “In addition, there are two other things I need to remind you of.” The Dragon of Light looked at Lorne and continued, “Firstly, because there is a large amount of dark power left in the ruins of the war, before you enter that area, you must bring the Purification Crystal created by the Blacksmith Guild or the antidote refined by the Alchemist Association.” “Without these tools, as a human, you will be invaded by the power of darkness as you enter the dangerous forest. It will affect your combat strength and taint you with the power of darkness. At that time, it will be extremely troublesome to clean up.” There was poison in the ruins of the war? Upon hearing this news, Lorne fell into deep thought. There was also an immature thought in his mind. At this moment, the Dragon of Light continued to give warnings. “Secondly, the demons of the abyss have been lingering in that area. I’m afraid that you will be affected by them.” “Therefore, I plan to send more people into the ruins, hoping that they can help you confuse the demons of the abyss.” As soon as he finished speaking, suddenly! A grand voice echoed through the entire Iron Skull City. Ding! “Iron Skull City Announcement: Due to the unprecedented war 1,000 years ago, countless soldiers of the Empire fell in the ruins of the war. The Dragon of Light hopes that their souls can be released and their corpses can be rested in their homeland. It has specially issued an event mission to all the players of Iron Skull City—[May the Dead Rest in Peace].” “Mission Description: All players who have reached Level 20 can receive a crusade mission in the Church of Light. Head to the ruins of the war and find the remains of the Empire’s soldiers. Bury them in the Empire Cemetery. You will obtain the reputation of the Order faction from this!” Ding! Ding! The grand announcement sounded three times. All the Iron Skull City players heard this news. Instantly, the entire main city was in an uproar. This was clearly an extremely rare event mission. Moreover, unlike other missions, this mission had no restrictions! As long as one could bring back enough corpses, they would obtain an incomparably crazy reward! Most importantly… The reward for this mission was actually the reputation of the Order faction! Reputation was an extremely rare thing. Before this, only by killing the Boss and completing missions would one obtain 200 Reputation points. Even before Lorne left the Beginner Village, his reputation points had only been around 3,500 points. Now, there was actually a mission. As long as one found enough corpses, they could obtain the corresponding reputation, and there was no upper limit! This was simply a mission tailored for a large guild. It was because they had enough people. The more people there were in such exploratory missions, the greater the reward would be. Furthermore, those large guilds used tens of thousands of people to accumulate the strength of a few top players. Therefore, such a special event mission was completely a chance for the guild leaders to increase their strength. It was no wonder that as soon as this mission appeared, the entire Iron Skull City was in an uproar. Countless large guilds were gathering their forces, ready to march into the [War Ruins] at any moment. … Inside the Church of Light, Lorne looked speechlessly at the banner that floated in the air. He really did not expect that the Dragon of Light would activate such a huge event because of one of his missions. One had to know that the players in a secondary main city were at least ten million. In a popular main city like Iron Skull City, there were more than 30 million players. However, the Dragon of Light casually opened a city-wide event. As expected of the Dragon God of the Order faction. Lorne shook his head and smiled. But at that moment… He suddenly thought of something. Lorne opened the bag and took out a long feather. This was the feather he had obtained from the hands of the Demon Soul King in the Dark Forest. It was filled with question marks, and he did not know what use it had. It was a good opportunity to show it to the Dragon God. If it was something good, he might be able to gain some benefits. In the end. The moment the feather appeared, the eyes of the Light Dragon, Hamut, narrowed immediately. Heavens, what kind of feather was this that made the greatest Dragon God in the Order faction lose its composure!!! “This feather…” The huge golden dragon eyes stared in shock at the black blood-soaked feather in Lorne’s hand. This strange reaction puzzled Lorne. Did this feather have a powerful background? Was this the feather of the Dragon God? Lorne thought about it, then explained the origins of the feather. After hearing this, the Dragon of Light was dejected. “I did not expect you to die in the Dark Forest…” The Dragon of Light pulled the feather to its side, its huge golden eyes filled with sadness. “The unprecedented battle began in Iron Skull City and continued all the way to Seaside City. There were many battles in the mountains, but each place was damaged to a certain extent. After a thousand years of history, most of the mountains returned to their original appearance. Only a small number of them are still affected by the dark forces.” “The Dark Forest is an area affected by the war, but I did not expect that this place so close to Iron Skull City would be the place where Gabriel died…” The Dragon of Light narrated sadly. The contents shocked Lorne, the listener. He would never have imagined that the feather he was holding had come from the Seraph Gabriel. In the background of the Divine Realm, the Dragon of Light had an extremely powerful angel army under its command, and seven of them were the commanders of the army. Seraph Gabriel had been second among the seven commanders. She was powerful and had a prominent identity. At one time, she was the most valued follower of the Dragon of Light. Unfortunately, she died in the great war 1,000 years ago, and the bloodstained feather was buried in the Dark Forest. “Young man, I’m glad you brought me this information. It gives me an answer to mourn. After all, she was once my proudest angel.” “Perhaps I should keep this feather, but since she chose to meet you, that might be fate between the two of you, so keep it.” With that, a holy power beside the Dragon of Light enveloped this feather. He was dispelling the filth from the feathers. Soon, an extremely holy feather landed in front of Lorne. At the same time, a ball of holy power enveloped Lorne. He was brought into the air. The light feather that emitted holy power gradually condensed behind him. Finally, all the light condensed into a pair of holy wings. Ding! “As you have brought back gratifying news for the Dragon of Light, affinity+10!” “Congratulations on obtaining Dragon Race of Order Reputation+100.” “Congratulations on obtaining Order Faction Reputation+10,000.” “Congratulations on obtaining: [Gabriel’s Feather]!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Dragon of Light’s gift: [Angel’s Wings].” A series of rewards appeared. Lorne also landed on the ground at this moment, and the angel wings formed of light feathers behind him gradually vanished. But he could not care less. The moment he landed, Lorne opened his equipment panel. The next second, his pupils constricted. A new equipment diagram appeared in his equipment interface. It was a pair of wings made of light. Unlike other ordinary equipment, there was light circulating on the pair of wings. Just from its appearance, one could clearly sense that this equipment was extraordinary. ———— Equipment: [Angel’s Wings] (Set: 1 / 10) Grade: Mythical (Fragment) Constitution: 2 x Level Intelligence: 2 x Level Strength: 2 x Level Spirit: 2 x Level Agility: 2 x Level Additional effect: Increases the user’s casting range by 30%. Additional effect: Increases the user’s movement speed by 30%. Special Effect: Increases the user’s critical strike effect by 100%. Special Effect: Additional Active Skill [Angel’s Descent]. Special Effect: Divine Power Awakening. Current Divine Power Points: 20 / 20. (Grows with level, Divine Power will automatically be refreshed every morning.) Introduction: An angel’s wings formed by the Dragon of Light using the power of faith. After it is released, you will temporarily have the amplification effect of the power of faith. ———— Active Skill: [Angel’s Descent] Status Description: After activating this effect, the Angel’s Wings will condense behind you, giving you the ability to fly in the air and the ability to conquer with the power of faith. Note: To maintain this effect, consume 1 point of Divine Power every second. Effect 1: Under this effect, you will obtain flying ability. Flying speed is 300% of movement speed. Effect 2: Under this effect, your attack damage is increased by 100%. Effect 3: Under this effect, your attack range will be increased by 200%. Effect 4: Under this effect, your critical strike effect will be increased by 300%. Effect 5: Under this effect, you will be immune to 50% of the damage taken and immune to all ordinary negative magic effects (skills at and below Grade B). You will be highly resistant to high-level negative magic effects (skills above Grade B). ———— “Oh my goodness!” By the time he finished looking at all the equipment effects, Lorne was completely stunned. This was a Mythical-grade equipment! Although it was in the fragment state, the equipment effect it showed was monstrous! Even without the effect of [Angel’s Descent], the amplification effect was extremely terrifying. All five attributes increased by (2 × level) points! According to Lorne’s current level of 20, each attribute increased by 40 points. There were a total of five attributes, which added up to 200 attribute points! One had to know that a top-notch Silver-grade equipment only increased by 15 to 30 points! This equipment was almost ten times stronger than a Silver-grade equipment! Not only that, this equipment also had two super powerful additional effects. Increases casting range and movement speed by 30%! If an archer or mage had such attributes, no player would be his match. Furthermore, this equipment had even more special effects. Not to mention the Divine Power Points, take the increase in strength brought about by [Angel Descent] as an example. After activating it, Lorne would obtain flying ability and increase his movement speed to 300%, as well as 100% attack damage, 200% attack range, and 300% critical strike effect! The critical strike effect and attack damage could be stacked. In other words, the critical damage that Lorne dealt in this state should be 1000%, equivalent to 10 times the damage! Moreover! After using Angel’s Descent, Lorne was also immune to 50% of the damage and most negative effects. With this effect, basically no player could restrict Lorne. Even Boss-level monsters could not restrict his movements with their skills. To be honest, even after so long, Lorne could not calm down. But at that moment, another grand system notification suddenly appeared. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Ding! “As you are equipped with the first Mythical equipment in the entire server, the equipment ranking has been officially activated. Would you like to reveal the information about the equipment [Angel’s Wings]?” ? Equipment Leaderboard? It should not be good for him to expose it in the early stages, right? On the contrary, letting the enemy know about his strength would mean that he would likely be targeted. Thus, Lorne chose to disclose some of the attributes of the equipment. Since he was in the game, it was impossible for him to hide his intention to act cool. After all, Lorne was an ambitious young man. Which young man his age did not want to be famous? ...; Then… In the hundreds of secondary cities in the entire Divine Realm, a scarlet banner appeared above the vision of the billions of players. There was a shocking message on it. Ding! “Full-server announcement: Due to player [Tyrant] triggering the equipment ranking system, special reward is given: +20,000 EXP, +2,000 Reputation, +2 Luck, +20 Gold Coins.” Ding! “Full-server announcement: As Iron Skull City is the first secondary main city in the world to open up the equipment ranking, all players affiliated with this main city will receive a reward: Free Attribute Point x1.” Ding! “Full-server announcement: The main city’s equipment ranking has officially begun. The system will conduct a data evaluation of all the players’ equipment in each main city. The ten best equipment in the city will be screened and the corresponding ranking reward will be given.” “The specific ranking can be checked on the relevant page!” The three announcements were repeated three times. All the players in Iron Skull City cheered when they saw this. As the first main city to open the equipment ranking, everyone could obtain a small gift. Moreover, it also meant that the game progress in Iron Skull City was ahead of all main cities. ...; At the same time, the public chat area of Iron Skull City suddenly became lively. Everyone’s attention was attracted by the Guild Leader of the Domination Guild, Unparalleled Domination. “Damn! Did I see wrongly? Why is this equipment ranking showing a Mythical-grade equipment?” Mythical-grade!!! These two words affected everyone’s nerves. The next moment, everyone opened the rankings on the system interface. All the players who belonged to Iron Skull City could see the top ten equipment with the highest ratings in the main city. ———— &lt; Iron Skull City Equipment Ranking &gt; [First Place]: Angel’s Wings (Mythical), Owner: Tyrant. Reward: Damage+10%. [Second Place]: Lightning Staff (Platinum), Owner: Thor. Reward: Damage+9%. [Third Place]: Dragon Blood Armor (Platinum), Owner: Fire Beacon. Reward: Damage+8%. [Fourth Place]: Flaming Bow (Gold), Owner: Hundred Flowers Umbrella. Reward: Damage+7%. [Fifth Place]: Grand Plate Armor (Gold), Owner: Pot of Wine Reward: Damage+6%. [Sixth Place]: Snow Flower Ring (Gold), Owner: Twinkle Rose. Reward: Damage+5%. [Seventh Place]: Poisonous Armor (Gold), Owner: Crystal Rose. Reward: Damage+4%. [Eighth Place]: Sage’s Wisdom Short Staff (Silver), Owner: Tyrant. Reward: Damage+3%. [Ninth Place]: Sage’s Wisdom Robe (Silver), Owner: Tyrant. Reward: Damage+2%. [Tenth Place]: Sage’s Wisdom Shoulder Guard (Silver), Owner: Tyrant. Reward: Damage+1%. ———— After seeing this, all the solo players went wild. At the moment when everyone was still wearing Bronze and White Iron equipment, and only the elite players of the guild could barely accumulate a set of Bronze equipment, those top-level players actually already had Gold equipment! The second and third places had Platinum-grade equipment! But that was not the most terrifying thing. The truly terrifying thing was the Angel’s Wings that was ranked first. Why was its quality indicated as Mythical!!! “Damn, can this game still be fun now?!” “What absolute fair world? It’s all lies!” “This must be a bug. The server has only been open for a few days, but someone has already obtained a Mythical-grade equipment. What kind of game is this!” “I don’t want to say anything, I want to quietly report it…” “Count me in!” “This game is really costly. I spent more than a million dollars, but I can’t even make it onto the leaderboard.” “A million is nothing. There’s no Silver-grade equipment for sale on the market now. You can’t buy it even if you want to.” “Good equipment can only be dropped by large guilds, but they don’t lack money. Therefore, brothers, quickly join our guild. In the future, if you have equipment, it will be auctioned internally and there will be discount benefits.” The chat channel was completely flooded. Those players with good family backgrounds thought that they had spent money to buy a lot of equipment and their combat strength would definitely be at the top of the game. However, after the leaderboard was released, they realized that the difference between them and the top players was actually so great. At that moment, they felt that the entire game was no longer fun. When the players started to check the attributes of the equipment on the leaderboard, they were completely subdued by the effects of the Gold and Platinum equipment. One had to know that even the attributes of a Silver-grade equipment were about twice that of a Bronze-grade equipment. Gold equipment was definitely even more incredible. Although they could not see all the data on the equipment, they could still imagine the shocking scene. After checking the other equipment, everyone’s eyes focused on the first piece of equipment on the leaderboard. The protagonist was always the last to appear. They wondered if Tyrant would reveal the information about the equipment. After all, the last two Platinum equipment showed absolutely no data. Other than the name of one equipment, no attributes could be seen. While everyone was guessing, the equipment interface opened. The next second, everyone’s eyes widened. ———— Equipment: [Angel’s Wings] (Set: ? / ?) Grade: Mythical (???) Constitution: ??? Intelligence: ??? Strength: ??? Spirit: ??? Agility: ??? Additional effect: Increases the user’s casting range by 30%. Additional effect: Increases the user’s movement speed by 30%. Special effect: ??? Special effect: ??? (Can be inspected) Special effect: ??? Introduction: ??? ———— “Gosh! This is a set!” “This is crazy. It’s a Mythical Set!” “I must be dreaming. How can an equipment add so many attributes?” “It increases all five attributes, and then two additional effects, three special effects. Are you sure this equipment is suitable for appearing at this stage?” “As an archer, as long as I have those two additional effects, I can crush any player.” “+30 Casting Distance, +30% Movement Speed. A mage would immediately be invincible. It’s impossible for anyone to get within 10 yards of him. ” “The first two additional attributes are already so powerful. The special effects later will definitely be even more terrifying.” “Hey, you can check this special effect.” While the players were hysterical, someone discovered a special effect that could be chosen on the equipment interface. With anticipation, he quickly clicked on it. The next moment, his eyes, which had already widened to their limit, became even larger. His round eyeballs nearly left their sockets and rolled to the ground. ———— [???] Skill Description: ??? Effect: ??? Effect: ??? Effect: ??? Effect: ??? Effect: ??? ———— Pfft— All the players who saw this panel almost spat out blood and died. What was up with this equipment?! They had originally thought that adding two additional effects and three special effects was already very sick. In the end, it was just a facade. The true attributes of this equipment were two additional effects and eight special effects! Instantly, the players were hysterical. At this moment, a loud shout sounded throughout the city. “Tyrant, my Domination Guild offers 100 million dollars to purchase the Mythical equipment in your hands. After this deal, the grudge between us will be written off.” This sentence came from the Domination Guild’s [Unparalleled Domination]. Unlike speaking in the chat channel, shouting in the entire city would be heard by all the players. Therefore, it cost a lot. Every time he shouted in the city, the player had to pay 100 gold coins. At this stage, these gold coins were equivalent to 500,000 alliance dollars. When this post appeared, all the players in Iron Skull City Indeed became excited. The high price that Unparalleled Domination offered made them feel like they were in a dream. That was 100 million dollars! It was a huge amount of wealth that an ordinary person could not earn in ten lifetimes. If he used this money to invest in stable enterprises separately, the annual dividend alone would be enough for him to live a rich life. However… Not even a minute passed, when another shout sounded. “Tyrant, my Blazing Fire Guild is interested in buying your divine equipment. We offer 120 million alliance dollars and can open a special channel for you to hold the shares of the Red Fruit Group. You can private chat about the exact amount. It’s not a problem to negotiate online or offline.” This shout came from the leader of the Blazing Fire Guild, Blazing Incineration. Behind every large guild was a large financial group that supported them. Behind the Blazing Fire Guild was the Red Fruit Group, a business empire with a market value of more than 20 billion. If one could hold a stake in the Red Fruit Group, even if it was very, very little, they could be guaranteed to be rich for the rest of their lives without any risk of bankruptcy. Therefore, the entire city was in an uproar again. Who would have thought that using 100 million to buy a piece of game equipment could actually fail? This was simply too crazy. … Then… Another heroic voice sounded. “Brother Tyrant, ignore them. It’s too dangerous to trade with them. If you want to sell your equipment, you can discuss it with me. The price is definitely higher than theirs. I can also grant you the position of the Silver Snow Guild’s vice president!” Twinkle Rose also spoke. The moment her conditions were out, it immediately created an even bigger wave. Whether it was ordinary players or high-level players, they were all attracted by her final conditions. It was because there were rumors that all the members of the Silver Snow Guild were unmarried ladies of the rich circle. If he was lucky enough to enter and have a romantic relationship with a certain lady, at that time, not only would he have a super beautiful wife, but he could also rely on her relationship to change his family background. This was the most direct way to enter high society without working hard! But before the players could recover from their shock, a voice sounded again. “Everyone in Iron Skull City, listen up. Please do not have any intentions of buying my leader’s equipment. If my leader wants to sell it, no matter how much you offer, I will pay you double the price. (+1)” “Everyone in Iron Skull City, listen up (+2).” “Everyone in Iron Skull City, listen up (+3).” Super Rich also paid to shout. When they heard the price he offered, all the players’ brains were frozen solid. They had seen people who would always outbid the others during an auction. However, they had never heard of such a person who offered twice the price immediately. This was a transaction worth hundreds of millions. Double the amount meant that he had to pay at least an additional 100 million alliance dollars! What did this mean? Thinking of this, all the players felt that their world view had been dealt a devastating blow. However, this was not shocking. What was truly speechless was… The shouts that echoed through the entire Iron Skull City did not stop. “…(+5)” “…(+10)” “…(+15)” “…(+20)” “I’m sorry, I’m tired of shouting. Everyone, please shut up. Thank you.” After shouting for 20 times, Super Rich finally stopped. The reason why he stopped was because he was tired from shouting. When they heard the last part, all the players spat out a mouthful of blood. The cost of shouting in the entire city was 100 gold coins per time, but he shouted 20 times in one go. It was equivalent to spending 10 million alliance dollars to shout! What level of tycoon was he to make such a shocking move?!! At this moment, all the players were curious about the identity of Super Rich and were also shocked by Tyrant’s true identity. What kind of person was he to be recognized as a younger brother by the beautiful guild leader, and also a willful tycoon who casually threw ten million dollars as his lackey? The solo players were shocked. The guild leaders of the large guilds were silent. Between them, no one could compare to that willful tycoon in terms of wealth. ….. On the other side, due to the departure of the Dragon of Light, Lorne also left the Church of Light. He ignored the echoing sound in the sky. At this moment, his mind was focused on his mission. There were three missions on him now. ———— Hidden Mission: [Protecting the Elves] (Completed) Epic Mission: [Divine Radiance (1)] Event Mission: [May the Dead Rest in Peace] ———— The first mission was completed. But now Lorne had no idea where to turn it in. As for the next two missions, they were in the ruins of the war. Due to the mission, the relevant map had already appeared. The location of the ruins of the war could be clearly found on the system map. It would take about two to three days to reach the city. The entire war ruins covered a huge area. It was not ideal to explore the entire area. The Dragon of Light did not seem to have the intention to completely cleanse the area. It had set a time limit for this mission. There were only ten days. Therefore, he had to hurry. However, before he set off, he remembered the warning from the Dragon of Light. The other players did not seem to know this news. Didn’t that mean… Lorne’s eyes lit up as he hurried out of the church. “Leader, are you really going to sell your equipment?” “You can’t sell it, Leader. This equipment is very important in the early stages of the game. You can use it to increase your strength. You can definitely earn more money in the future.” “Oh, I understand now. Leader, are you short of money now? It’s okay, don’t sell your equipment. I can lend you money.” Suddenly receiving a private message from Lorne, Super Rich immediately replied several times. From his perspective, not long after he finished shouting, Tyrant sent him a message. Wasn’t it obvious that he wanted to sell the equipment? Thinking of this, Super Rich quickly advised and emphasized the importance of equipment. Lorne shook his head and smiled. Super Rich’s action was indeed very flashy, but he did not expect his taste to be quite good. Although 100 million was a lot of money, a divine equipment could greatly increase the strength of a player. It could allow one to constantly have a level advantage and allow them to obtain huge benefits in the game. It was just like the dungeon in the Beginner Village. On that day, he relied on his strength to earn five million in a day. There was no reason to sell this equipment now. “Don’t worry, I’m not looking for you to sell equipment.” Lorne said, “I was just asking you how many gold coins you still have.” “Gold coins? I spent most of them shouting just now.” “Eh…” Lorne was speechless. He should have known. After all, shouting required 100 gold coins each time. Although Super Rich was rich in reality, the output of gold coins in the game was limited. It was already incredible that he could purchase 2000 gold coins. “Leader, what do you want the gold coins for? I know a few second-hand merchants who sell gold coins. We can buy some gold coins from them at a high price.” Super Rich noticed something and asked. Lorne thought about it and said, “I’ll buy a batch for now, wait for me at the entrance of the church. Let’s go somewhere.” “Good!” … Soon, the two of them left the Church of Light. Lorne led the confused Super Rich into the Blacksmith Guild. Due to his high reputation in the Order faction, Lorne was treated very well. After a simple conversation, he was brought to the internal living room of the Blacksmith Guild by an NPC. Soon, a middle-aged man with strong muscles came to the living room. President Barres looked at Lorne and spoke in a rough tone, “Young adventurer, I heard you want to make a deal with us?” “Of course.” Lorne nodded. “Do you have a sample?” President Barres smiled and tossed over a crystal. It was a transparent crystal that emitted a crystalline light. It felt warm in his hand, as if he was bathing in holy light. Indeed! This was the [Purification Crystal] that the Dragon of Light had mentioned. Perhaps the Dragon God had deliberately helped Lorne, but it had not announced the news of the war ruins to the other players. Therefore, the players did not know that the poison in the ruins of the war would severely affect their condition. With the importance of reputation points to large guilds, they would definitely summon all players who met the requirements to enter that place. Other rogue players would also enter the ruins of the war for their own benefits. At that time, they would all face the problem of the poison. The Purification Crystal and the antidote were two items that could offset this effect, and they would immediately have huge market demand. “How many of these items are in the storage?” Lorne asked. “How many?” President Barres smiled, “There’s quite a lot in the inventory. Other than the ones for sale, the guild has about 300,000 crystals in the warehouse. These purification crystals were originally for the army to clean up the polluted forest, but because such terrain is becoming smaller, they have been in a state of low sales. If you want them, I can give you a lower price.” “Lower by how much?” “8 silver coins each.” President Barres said, “I was going to sell it for 10 silver coins, but I’m giving you a 20% discount.” “What if I want them all?” “All?” Barres could not help but stare at Lorne for a moment. Finally, he smiled and said, “If you want them all, I’ll give you a 50% discount, 5 silver coins per piece.” Lorne extended a finger as he said, “One silver coin.” Barres leaned forward, his eyes wide as he said, “Four.” Lorne was not afraid, at this moment, he extended a finger, “Two.” “I admire your courage, young man.” Barres laughed and finally extended three fingers, “It’s the lowest price.” “Deal.” Lorne accepted the price, then continued, “But I want to postpone the payment.” “You mean delayed payment?” Barres thought he heard a new term. Lorne explained, “9,000 gold coins is a lot. I can’t give you the whole sum for the time being, but I can sign a contract for postponement. From today onwards, if I do not pay for each postponement, I will pay you an additional 0.5% interest. How about it?” “Your plan is very good, but, young man, how do I know if you can repay this sum in the future?” Barres smiled knowingly, as if waiting for Lorne to explain his confidence. Super Rich also looked at Lorne. Although he did not know what his leader wanted to do, as a tycoon who had built a business empire, he could sense the business opportunity here. Now that the negotiations had reached a critical juncture, what would the leader do to persuade the other party? 9,000 gold coins was not a small amount. While the two were curious, suddenly! A holy light suddenly blossomed. A pair of holy wings of light appeared behind Lorne, and an extremely holy aura filled the entire hall. “This… this is…” Barres blinked, thinking he had seen wrongly. What appeared in front of him was actually the strongest soldier of the Church of Light—Angel! How was this possible?! The weakest angel of the Church should be at the ‘Earth Realm’. How could a level 20 adventurer like him enter such a powerful army? Lorne put away his angel wings and asked the stunned Barres, “Will this assure you?” The latter suddenly realized something and laughed. “No problem. Since you are an adventurer valued by the Dragon God, I naturally believe in its judgment.” After gaining trust, the rest was simple. The two quickly signed the contract. Then, Barres accompanied him to the warehouse to collect the goods. “Friend, all the Purification Crystals are here.” Barres pushed open the door to a long, dusty warehouse filled with sparkling white crystals. The Purification Crystal was an individual tool and could not be stacked in the bag. Therefore, 300,000 purification crystals needed 300,000 slots to store in the bag. “Wow, so many crystals. How many trips do we have to take?” Super Rich muttered behind him. The current players only had 100 slots. In other words, they needed to go through 3,000 trips to bring all the crystals out of this place. “Friend, where do you want to move these potions? As long as it’s in the main city, I can get someone to help move them.” Barres thought so too. After all, even an NPC like him had never seen a military bag that could carry so many resources. However… Lorne said nothing. He walked to the small crystal mountain and touched a Purification Crystal. The moment he touched it, a huge area of the brilliant crystal hill disappeared. Lorne continued to touch them, each time bringing away thousands of Purification Crystals. The crystal hill became shorter and shorter. In the Dragon’s Treasure Vault, the crystals gradually formed a small mountain. In less than a minute, the entire crystal hill disappeared from the warehouse. Seeing this magical scene, even Barres was stunned. However, he understood very well. After all, this was an adventurer who could obtain the favor of the Dragon God at Level 20. He definitely had a treasure given by the Dragon God. At the side, Super Rich’s eyes widened as he exclaimed, “Leader, you’re too powerful! That’s 300,000 items!” When he had just entered the game, Super Rich would not have thought anything of it. However, as he came into contact with more and more people, he became increasingly aware of the rules of the game. 300,000 units of supplies was like a huge mountain to the players, but the leader lived up to his reputation. Even this could not stump him. This was really awesome. … “Friend, happy cooperation.” Barres accompanied Lorne outside the guild. At this moment, other customers arrived at the guild. Barres waved and prepared to entertain the guests. But at this moment, Lorne stopped him, “Wait, President Barres. I have something to ask of you.” Hearing this, Barres was confused. But after listening to Lorne’s explanation, Barres immediately accepted it. “No problem, that’s a small matter. It just so happens that I haven’t seen that old guy, Doge, in a while.” Barres laughed. Then, as the guide, he led Lorne and Super Rich to another huge building. What Lorne had entrusted him with was simple. Apart from the Purification Crystal, there was also something that could solve the problem they would face in the ruins of the war. That was the special antidote refined by the Alchemist Association. If Lorne wanted to sell them for a high price, he had to keep both items in his hands. Otherwise, the price of the Purification Crystal would not increase. Therefore, he had to make a trip to the Alchemist Association. The same thing would happen at the Blacksmith Guild, so Lorne brought Barres with him. With him as the middleman, the subsequent conversation would be even smoother. … “Acquire all of them? Delayed payment?” It was the same reaction as Barres had. However, President Doge was clearly much better at business than Barres. He did not need Lorne’s explanation to understand the meaning of the word. But now he wondered why Barres would be the go-between for this young adventurer. This did not seem like his style. As he wondered, Bares pulled him aside and whispered something in his ear. Then, it dawned on Doge. “So Mr. Tyrant has become a member of the Angel Corps. I’m sorry for my impoliteness.” President Doge bowed respectfully, then began to chat with Lorne about the postponement. The subsequent negotiations were very successful. The agreement between Lorne and the Alchemist Association was quickly reached. It was different from the Blacksmith Guild. The Alchemist Association produced a special antidote that only gave 24 hours of protection. The Purification Crystal had seven days of immunity. Therefore, the price of the antidote was even lower. It only cost 50 bronze coins each. Of course, this was also a friendly price. If he sold it to other players, it would cost at least 1 silver coin per serving. Before signing the contract, Lorne added another term, “President Doge, I hope that I will also sell all the antidotes that are produced in the next ten days. During this period, I will purchase all the potions at the price of 50 bronze coins. What do you think?” “That would be great.” President Doge laughed loudly and said, “If Mr. Lorne can really reserve all the production, I will even let most of the alchemists in the guild start refining such potions.” “That’s great.” That was what Lorne had been waiting for. With this treaty, the players of Iron Skull City could not avoid him. At that time, he could sell as many as he wanted. Speaking of which, he really had to thank the Dragon of Light. Without his warning and [Angel’s Wings], this contract would not have been possible. … Then, Lorne left the Alchemist Association feeling satisfied. When he was signing the contract with the two high-level NPCs, Lorne had even obtained their affinity, which was a good harvest. After all, the two of them were important NPCs in Iron Skull City. In the future, there would definitely be more things that would intersect with them. At that time, the high affinity points would be useful. He returned to the streets. Super Rich could not help but ask, “Leader, did you buy so many potions because there’s poison in the ruins of the war?” The words surprised Lorne. But soon, Lorne understood everything. Actually, it was normal to guess all of this. After all, the effect of the antidote was so obvious, it had to be used there. After purchasing hundreds of thousands of potions and crystals, it was obvious that he knew that the other players would definitely go somewhere. At this point, everything became clear. There was only one place that the players would go. It was the ruins of war that was currently having an event mission! “Yes.” Lorne nodded, “According to rumors, there is a special poison in the ruins of the war. These things can be used…” There were some things that did not need to be stated clearly, especially regarding business matters. Almost in the next second, Super Rich said, “I see. But Leader, shouldn’t you be visiting various shops and collecting the rest of their stock too?” Super Rich was indeed a businessman. This kind of profiteer thinking of not giving others a chance and ensuring he earned the most money was engraved in his bones. But Lorne shook his head. Iron Skull City was not a Beginner Village. There were at least a few thousand shops here. Moreover, those shop owners were not as easy to deal with as Barres. To them, only real money mattered. “Got it.” Super Rich immediately nodded, “Leader, you just want most of the meat. However, if you want to deal with so many shops, it’s too difficult to negotiate alone. You have to find enough people to work with.” After some thought, Super Rich looked at Lorne and said, “Leader, can you help me contact the beautiful lady from the Silver Snow Guild?” With human resources and previous contact, plus the fact that Twinkle Rose and Lorne had many connections, the benefits of cooperating with her were definitely the greatest. In the eyes of Super Rich, earning the most gold coins in this cooperation was not the best decision. The best decision was to strengthen his relationship with the leader while earning money. “Alright.” Lorne did not find it troublesome, for he understood the plan. In addition, in his mind, Twinkle Rose was indeed the best partner. After all, the other guilds did not have a good relationship with him. With that in mind, Lorne opened his friend list. He first greeted the big-busted sister. Soon, Twinkle Rose replied. “Little Brother Tyrant, why have you suddenly contacted me? Do you want to go to the ruins of the war with the sisters of the Silver Snow Guild?” Lorne asked, “You haven’t left yet, have you?” “Not yet. We’re preparing to leave in a while. If Little Brother wants to come, you have to hurry.” Twinkle Rose smiled. “Forget it, I’m not free.” Lorne said, “I came to find you because of a piece of news. Before we leave, you’d better contact Super Rich. If you want to thank me in the future, ask me out in real life.” “Pfft, you’re coveting my body, you pervert…” Twinkle Rose replied with a trembling voice, then happily closed the chat. Then, she searched for Super Rich. Since Tyrant had such a suggestion, there had to be a reason. Soon. Twinkle Rose and Super Rich made contact. From the other party, she knew about the situation in the ruins of the war. Without any hesitation, she immediately sent everyone to buy the antidote from the various shops in Iron Skull City. Although the number of antidotes in the shop was very small, there were many shops in Iron Skull City. There were hundreds of thousands of antidotes altogether. … Lorne had no part in their operation. This was mainly because Super Rich had spent more than 10 million in the previous bid. Therefore, he did not mind the small amount of profit given to them. After talking to Super Rich, Lorne left alone. He wanted to go offline and rest. But just as he was about to go offline… Lorne suddenly saw a familiar figure. It was Mayra, the Elf Leader who had just separated. She seemed nervous. Lorne quickly stepped forward to understand the situation and obtain his mission reward. Seeing him come, the worried face forced a smile. “It’s you, Mr. Tyrant.” Mela said absently. “What’s wrong?” Lorne looked at her closely and wondered, “What happened? You look anxious.” “This…” Mayra hesitated. She wondered if she should tell this to the adventurer. But finally, remembering the friendship between Tyrant and the elves, she said, “Alright, I’ll tell you everything.” Shaking off her concerns, Mayra sighed. Then, she began to narrate. “In fact, our elf team came to Iron Skull City to seek help. There were originally 130 people traveling together, but on the way, we encountered the dark army and were obstructed. In the end, the team was scattered.” “Fortunately, we encountered Mr. Tyrant, so we could reach Iron Skull City safely.” “As for the source, I need to talk about the attack on the elves’ camp some time ago.” “A few days ago, the territory of the Night Elves was attacked. A group of Fallen Night Elves, with the help of the demonized orcs, attacked the elves’ territory.” “In the overnight battle, the Elven Princess Aisha with an ancient bloodline was attacked by the power of darkness. Those abominable dark monsters targeted Aisha from the beginning. By the time we realized it, it was already too late.” “The weapon that struck Aisha was specially refined. The moment it injured Aisha, an extremely powerful dark power spread through her body. The extent of its power was something that even the Queen was helpless against.” “Left with no choice, we can only seek help from Iron Skull City…” Mayra explained. Lorne frowned in surprise, “Are the dark forces so arrogant now?” “The elven camp is also in the territory of Iron Skull City. How dare they attack on such a large scale?” Lorne asked. Although the dark forces were very powerful, they should not dare to be so insolent in the territory of the Empire. How could a force like the elves be attacked? Wasn’t this too bold? “Iron Skull City’s situation is much more complicated than you think.” Mayra shook her head and sighed, “The icy plains of calamity in the north is giving Iron Skull City a lot of pressure. Coupled with the fact that Iron Skull City’s territory is very vast, it’s not easy to clean up all the minions of the Dark Abyss in this vast area.” “I see.” Lorne nodded and continued asking, “Has your princess arrived in Iron Skull City?” “She has arrived, but…” Meira bit her lip and wailed, “I did not expect to be too late. The power of darkness has completely spread through the princess’s body. Even the High Priestess of the main city is unable to remove it.” “Even the Dragon God can’t do it?” Lorne felt that the Dragon of Light was the most powerful and holy existence in the Order faction. It was definitely its specialty to repel the darkness. But to his surprise, Mayra still shook her head. “I asked the church just now. The Dragon God has a way to expel the darkness, but that dark power has already mixed with the ancient bloodline in Aisha’s body. If we want to disperse the dark power, we will definitely destroy the ancient bloodline in her body.” “As the initial elf of the Night Elves who was born 200 years ago, Aisha is the last hope of the dying Night Elves. No matter what, there must not be a problem with her bloodline. Otherwise, our Night Elves will go completely extinct…” Mayra wanted to cry, but she held it back and smiled bitterly. If possible, she was willing to suffer in Aisha’s place. Unfortunately, there were no ifs in this world. “Oh…” Lorne pondered upon hearing this. At this moment, a very bold idea occurred to him. Since this Elven Princess Aisha was undoubtedly going to die, could he use her as the basic material to synthesize and then merge with other high-grade materials? After all, the other party was an elf. Furthermore, it was an Elven Princess with an ancient bloodline. Her aptitude was unprecedented. If he could merge this elf, the final pet would be very powerful. There was also a possibility that the Elven Princess might keep the ancient bloodline in her body. Didn’t that mean that he would indirectly gain control of the Night Elves? Thinking of this, Lorne’s eyes gradually lit up. He had even thought of the material to merge it with. First of all, he could use the very special crystal heart as one of the synthesized materials. Crystals represented purity and were the most suitable attribute for elves. Secondly, it was Gabriel’s feather. This feather that had been evolved by the Dragon of Light had the ultimate light attribute. With its infusion, it could definitely defeat the dark power in the Elven Princess’ body. In this case, there was hope. Lorne gripped Mayra’s shoulder and looked at her earnestly as he asked, “Do you trust me?” The absent-minded Mayra could not help but be stunned. In the end, she nodded and said, “Of course I trust you. Without you, Mr. Tyrant, I would have died in the Dark Forest long ago.” “In that case, bring me to see the Elven Princess!” Lorne’s eyes were filled with desire, as if he had great intentions. This made Mayra show a weird expression. If she did not know that he was a righteous warrior, she would have directly classified him as a rotten and hypocritical human noble. “I have a way to save her!” “Although I cannot guarantee absolute confidence, you already have no hope. Instead of waiting quietly for death, why don’t you let me give it a try!” In order to satisfy his thoughts, Lorne advised firmly. Hearing this, Mayra hesitated. As Lorne had said, they were desperate. If she did not take action, within a few hours, the Elven Princess Aisha would lose her life because of the eruption of the dark power, and she might even degenerate into an evil Dark Elf. This was a result that no one wanted to see. Thinking of this, Mayra bit her lip as she made an extremely difficult decision. Finally, she nodded at Lorne, “Alright, I’ll take you there. However, Mr. Tyrant, the fate of the Night Elves rests on Princess Aisha. I beg of you, do your best.” Ding! “Game Announcement: A hidden main storyline mission has been triggered: [Save the Night Elf Princess Aisha]!” “Mission Description: Due to the scheme of the dark forces, the Night Elf Princess Aisha has been severely injured. The power of darkness is spreading in her body. You must disperse the power of darkness in her body without destroying the ancient bloodline. After completing the mission, you will receive a huge reward!” “Mission Warning: If the Night Elf Princess Aisha dies in your hands, you will be hated by the Night Elves!” A series of notifications appeared. Without any hesitation, Lorne took it and said to Mayra, “Don’t worry, leave it to me.” “Yes, Mr. Tyrant, follow me.” After making this decision, Mayra was filled with confidence in Lorne. Without hesitation, she led him directly to the City Lord’s area. … In Iron Skull City, players could enter most areas, but the City Lord’s area was not something that players could cross. If anyone dared to trespass there, he would be immediately invited by the city guards to the cell to receive punishment. But now, it was different. With Mayra leading the way, Lorne could enter. After all, Mayra was the captain of the Elven Princess’ guards; the city guards would not stop her over such a small matter. Just like that, the two of them quickly passed through the City Lord’s area. After passing through countless corridors, Lorne followed Mayra into a castle. This was the temple of the priests. All the prophecies of darkness in Iron Skull City came from here. As for the Night Elf Princess Aisha, she had been in the recovery magic circle set up by the High Priestess the entire time, using powerful life force to maintain her life. “Leader Mayra.” “Is that Mr. Tyrant?” Standing outside the hall, dozens of elves surrounded it anxiously. Many of the elves recognized Lorne. “I want to go in and see the princess. Open the door.” “Yes.” Mayra was the princess’s personal guard leader. Now that the princess was severely injured, everyone treated her as their leader, so naturally, no one would stop her. Two elves pushed open the closed door and retreated to the side. “Let’s go, Mr. Tyrant.” Mayra led the way. However, after the two of them entered the hall, the door closed again. At this moment, Lorne was stunned. The hall before him was completely different from what he had imagined. In the center of this hall, there was an ancient tree. The surrounding walls were filled with vines. They filled the entire interior space and covered all the windows, making the interior appear dark. But the scene before him was not terrifying. If one only stood there and watched, they would feel extremely quiet, as if they were in a forest at night. Mayra did not move forward. She stood at the entrance and looked at Lorne sadly, “The princess is in that cradle. It’s up to you now, Mr. Tyrant.” Lorne nodded. Then he walked up the vine-covered steps alone. He walked up step by step. In the end, he arrived at the center of the largest tree five meters from the ground. In front of him was a cradle made of intertwined branches. In it lay a very petite elf girl. She had sharp ears and an exquisite appearance. Her skin was pale blue moonlight white, and her long silver hair shimmered. She was the Night Elf Princess, Aisha. Unfortunately, such a beautiful Elven Princess was currently being invaded by the power of darkness. After a while, she would completely die. With a gasp, Lorne checked her condition. He found her in a state of near death. “Fortunately, she’s not dead.” To be a prototype material, she had to be alive. If this Elven Princess died, then she could only be used as a ‘body part material’. After the fusion, everything related to her would basically disappear. “Come, let’s hope nothing unexpected happens.” Lorne took a deep breath and chose the Elven Princess as his prototype material. Ding! “Monster [Night Elf Aisha] has been confirmed as the prototype material. Please confirm other materials.” The synthesis formula appeared. Without thinking, he took out a transparent crystal heart and placed it in the synthesis panel. This crystal heart was a very precious material, but using it to fuse with the Elven Princess was not a waste. In addition, Lorne removed a holy feather from his pouch. This was the purified feather of Gabriel. It was no less precious than the other two materials. In fact, if he only wanted to create a Night Elf, just using one of the materials would be enough. However, considering that the Night Elf, Aisha, had an ancient bloodline, she sounded very powerful and mysterious. Therefore, he placed even greater hopes on it. Furthermore, Lorne wanted an elf pet very much. Therefore, he decided to gamble with all the most precious materials he had. “I hope it succeeds.” Without hesitation, Lorne placed the feather from Seraph Gabriel into the synthesis. Ding! “A prototype monster and two body parts have been identified!” “The synthesis formula is (Night Elf) + (Unknown Crystal Heart) + (Gabriel’s Feather) = (???)” “The cost is 100 gold coins. Would you like to merge?” “Damn!!!” Lorne was shocked to see the cost. Merging this pet actually required 100 gold coins! According to the current price of gold coins on the black market, this was 500,000 alliance dollars! Spending 500,000 to create a pet? This was crazy. Lorne was stunned. He had not expected to have such luxurious spending, just like those rich second-generation heirs. However, even though he was shocked, he still had to merge them. As usual, the higher the cost of synthesis, the higher the final quality of the pet. Thinking about the last time he fused Fire of Death, the cost was only one gold coin, and it allowed Lorne to finally obtain a Silver pet. This time, it was 100 gold coins. <i>100 times as much!</i>  Lorne could not imagine what the final quality of the pet would be. It might be a Silver Boss. It could also be a Gold Boss. After all, when he created the Rimuru, he only spent 5 gold coins to obtain a Bronze-Grade Boss pet. If he were to convert them at this ratio, Lorne would not be shocked even if he created a Platinum-rank boss. With that in mind, Lorne took a deep breath. Fortunately, he still had enough gold coins on him. Previously, because he had given Super Rich a chance to sell the potion, Super Rich had also symbolically given him 50 gold coins as thanks. Coupled with his savings, it just happened to exceed a hundred gold coins. “Merge!” Lorne confirmed the choice. As soon as he finished speaking, an incomparably grand light enveloped the scene. What appeared before him was an extremely ancient and huge magic circle. It continued to expand and slowly rose from the ground. In the end, it was enlarged to the point that even the castle could not contain it and rose to a height of several hundred meters. Standing at the entrance of the city center, he could clearly see three golden magic circles spinning above the distant castle. Bolts of golden light entered the castle. All the players, including the NPCs, saw this change, but no one knew what happened. Even the priests who saw the temple’s change were blocked by the elves outside the temple. Before the personal guard leader of the elves, Mayra, took the initiative to come out, no one could enter the hall, otherwise, even if these elves risked their lives, they would stop the intruders. In the main hall, Lorne looked at the light that filled the sky, attracting the Night Elf and the other two materials and enveloping them in the light cocoon. Soon, he heard a pleasant reminder. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the (???) Monster: Night Elf Aisha?” Ding! “Congratulations on triggering the unique hidden epic quest [Holy Angel’s Resurrection]!” “Mission details: Please help to complete the fusion of the crystal heart. This mission will enter the second stage then!” ??? After hearing this series of notifications, Lorne was stunned. What just happened? Why did he suddenly trigger a hidden mission, and it was an epic hidden mission? The resurrection of the Holy Angel? The second stage? What did this mean? Lorne was confused, but quickly recovered. Now was not the time to think. First, he had to sign a contract before thinking about anything else. Whether this monster was an elf or an angel, he had created it. In the rules of the game, the final creation could be directly taken in as a pet. Therefore, what was there to hesitate about? First, he had to sign a contract and keep it as his pet. This was his top priority. Even without thinking, Lorne was certain about this. Ding! “Congratulations on completing the contract with the ??? Monster [Night Elf, Aisha]!” “Congratulations on obtaining the fifth pet!” After the system notification, Lorne could not help but sigh in relief. Then, he quickly opened Aisha’s attributes panel. ———— [Night Elf] (Aisha) Quality: ??? Status: Rank 1 Level: ??? HP: ??? MP: ??? Physical Attack: ??? Superiority: ??? Skill: ??? Fusion Progress: 0% Owner: Tyrant Introduction: ??? ———— “So many question marks?” Lorne was shocked by the attributes panel in front of him. This was the third time he had seen something of ??? quality. What was even more shocking was that as the owner of the pet, he could not see the specific attributes of this pet. This had never happened before. In addition, there was another strange thing. In the past, after creating monsters, the prototype would change and become a new species. This time, however, the Night Elf Aisha maintained her original race. Not only that, but she also triggered an epic mission. Lorne roughly knew why this mission had appeared. Because the mission was called [Holy Angel’s Resurrection], the most likely trigger was Seraph Gabriel. In that case, the unknown crystal heart was likely left behind by the dead Gabriel. Of course, it was also possible that the effect of Gabriel’s Feather… “Will Gabriel really be revived after completing all the missions?” Lorne curiously thought to himself. After all, that was Gabriel. She had the best combat strength in the world. Of course, this was still very far away. What he needed to solve now was how to explain to Mayra that he had turned the Night Elf, Aisha, into his pet. In the world of the Divine Realm, it was the greatest taboo for elves to become human pets, not to mention this was a princess of the Night Elves… “Heavens!” “Mr. Tyrant, what exactly did you do?” Seeing the huge light gradually fade, Mayra recovered from her shock and could not calm down for a long time. As a Night Elf, she could clearly sense that the dark power in the castle’s main hall had dissipated. Did that mean that Princess Aisha was saved? Mayra rushed up to check on Aisha. Although the princess had not awakened, Mayra could clearly sense that there was no longer any dark aura in the princess’ body. As for the ancient bloodline? That would have to be tested. Mayra quickly took out a special crystal from her pocket. This crystal could sense the existence of an ancient bloodline. But now, Mayra was a little too excited, or more accurately, very nervous. This was because not long ago, she had asked the Dragon of Light, but the reply she received was that it could not remove the power of darkness while ensuring that the ancient bloodline still existed. How could a weak adventurer like Mr. Tyrant do something that even the Dragon of Light could not? Although she trusted him, this could not be accomplished by trust alone. Who knew what the final result would be. Mayra took a deep breath. Then she brought the crystal close to Aisha’s body. The next moment! Swish! An incomparably brilliant light blossomed. “Great, this is great. The bloodline is still here!” Mayra said as she jumped up excitedly. Princess Aisha was not dead and had protected the ancient bloodline in her body. This was like a dream. With the princess around, the Night Elves would have hope. The idea of the Dark Abyss wanting to destroy the Night Elves would never happen. This way, she could also report to the Queen today. Mayra was so excited that she could not help but hug Lorne to express her deepest gratitude. However, Lorne was in no mood to enjoy this moment. He was still considering what to say. This could not be hidden. Because pets could not stay too far away from their masters. If Mayra wanted to bring Aisha back to the elves’ camp, then Lorne had to go with them and keep a distance from her. Otherwise, once the matter was exposed, what awaited him was the pursuit of the entire Night Elves. Just the thought of it made his hair stand on end. After all, he still had more than 50,000 reputation points with the Night Elves. If he suddenly became enemies with the other party, then these reputation points would be lost. This situation would make him very uncomfortable. Mayra calmed herself and then asked curiously, “Mr. Tyrant, what did you do just now?” “Eh…” Lorne hesitated, then vaguely explained, “I don’t know what happened. Before that, there was a very special tool in my bag that could cleanse the power of darkness, so I asked you to bring me here.” “Then, when I was close to the Elven Princess, the tool suddenly disappeared, and then something happened, so I don’t know the specific reason.” “Mayra, you have to believe me!” Lorne looked firmly at the beautiful elf in front of him. He could only find a way to resolve the situation through her. After all, he had saved her life before, and with such a high affinity, he should not be attacked. “Of course I believe you. Even the Dragon of Light is helpless against it, let alone you.” “However, to my surprise, that special tool can do such a thing. It’s unbelievable.” “In addition, because of this matter, you have lost a rare treasure. I will definitely report this to the Elf Queen and give you enough rewards.” Meera looked at him very seriously. “Cough, there’s no need for the reward.” Lorne shook his head awkwardly, “Um, while you’re happy, I want to tell you some bad news…” “It’s okay, go ahead.” Mella maintained her happy smile, “As long as Princess Aisha is fine, no other problems matter.” Lorne whispered, “Does that mean it’s fine if she becomes my pet?” He knew that this matter was very important to the elves, but it had already been done. There might be a turn for the better if he uncovered it earlier. After all, he was the one who had saved Aisha and the future of the Night Elf Race. “Of course…” “What?!!!” Just as Mayra was about to say that it was fine, she suddenly realized something. Her eyes widened as she stared at Lorne in shock. Even her voice was trembling. Clearly, this was far beyond her expectations. “You… you… you signed a master-slave contract with Princess Aisha?!” Mayra recovered herself and asked in shock, confirming that she had not misheard. “Yes.” Lorne nodded helplessly. It could not be helped. This was a fact that could not be avoided. However, he quickly explained after admitting it. Lorne had made it clear that he had no such intention, but as the special tool worked, he suddenly realized that he had signed a contract with Princess Aisha. Nothing was subjective to his will. It was definitely not! In the end, Mayra chose to believe in Lorne, but she quickly bit her lip, “I see. This is troublesome.” “What’s wrong?” Lorne looked at her and continued asking, “Is it serious?” “It’s very serious!” Her expression was extremely serious, “This is an absolute taboo for the elves. There have been cases in the past where elves and humans signed a contract, but it ultimately led to very serious consequences.” “According to the decree passed down by the elves, as the purest element that the gods have sprinkled on the human world, the elves are definitely not allowed to become the slaves of any creature. Otherwise, the elves will completely break off all relations with them!” “More than 200 years ago, because a human expert signed a contract with an elf, the elves declared war on the human empire…” Damn! So fierce?! Lorne was shocked to hear this. Mayra was talking about fighting the entire Human Empire, not just Iron Skull City. The Human Empire had hundreds of secondary cities! The elves had declared war on a huge empire for an elf. It was obvious how determined they were. This was not good news. It could even be said to be terrible. Just think about it, if one was targeted by such a crazy race, it would definitely be a very troublesome scene… “That was a moment that determined the fate of the two races.” “In the end, in order to maintain the peace between the two races, that human expert Zhi Gang ended his life, causing all of this conflict to end here.” With that, Mayra gave Lorne a long look, as if to make him understand the seriousness of the matter. But there was no response from Lorne. Although he was in trouble this time, from the perspective of the players, the consequences were worth it. After all, he had obtained an extremely powerful pet and had even accepted an epic mission. That mission concerned the resurrection of Gabriel. Therefore, even if he had to do it again, Lorne would not hesitate to do it. But just as he was about to accept the worst, Mayra giggled, “Alright, alright, I’ll stop teasing you. It’s not that serious.” “The elves are not so hostile to adventurers, because in ancient times, the elves’ ancestors protected the last Tree of Life with the help of adventurers.” “The elves were born from the Tree of Life, which means that every descendant of the elves needs to be grateful to the adventurers.” “In addition, you saved the princess and saved our Night Elves from extinction, so I think the Queen will not make things difficult for you.” “But you have to pay attention to something.” At this point, Mayra paused, then looked at Lorne with an extremely serious expression, “Princess Aisha is the Queen’s heir. Before she succeeds the throne, she must remain pure, so you must not do anything strange to her!” Pfft… Lorne almost spat out blood. Who would do something strange! After all, he was an ambitious youth of a new generation. How could he be so wretched? She was a young elf, but she had such evil thoughts. Although he was very dissatisfied with this explanation, Lorne was too lazy to explain. He looked directly at Mayra and asked, “Her situation is still very unstable, and because of the contract, she has to stay by my side. I don’t think she can go to the elves for a short period of time. There shouldn’t be a problem, right?” “Not for now.” Mayra said, “Recently, the minions of the Dark Abyss have been wandering around our territory, causing us a lot of trouble. Recently, our race has also entered a state of war, so before the situation stabilizes, the Queen does not want Her Highness to return at this time.” “Therefore, there’s still some buffer time. During this period of time, Mr. Tyrant, you need to raise your strength quickly. In the future, the stronger you are, the higher the success rate of the negotiation. This is the only hint I have for you. I can’t reveal more. I hope you can understand.” “Oh, right. I haven’t given you a reward for escorting us to Iron Skull City.” Only then did Mayra remember. Ding! “Congratulations on completing the mission: [Protecting the Elves]!” “Mission reward: +20,000 EXP, +5,000 Elf Reputation, +20 gold coins.” “Congratulations on obtaining the recognition of the Night Elf Guard Leader, Mayra: Favorability+500.” “Congratulations on obtaining Mayra’s gift: [Sage’s Wisdom Magic Hat] (Silver)!” “Congratulations on obtaining Mayra’s gift: [Eagle Eye] (Pet Skill Book).” A pile of mission rewards was given out. There was nothing else to say. It was mainly the two rewards that were given later. The first was one of the parts of the Sage Set. ———— [Sage’s Wisdom Magic Hat] (Sage Set: 1 / 7) Quality: Silver Magic Attack: +100 Magic Resistance: +40 Spirit: +20 Type: Cloth Armor Level Requirement: 10 Additional effect: Increases magic damage by 5%. Additional effect: Increases 10% magic recovery effect. Introduction: A Wisdom Magic Hat enhanced by a Sage. It can be of great help to the user. ———— The attributes of the equipment were not bad, so he directly changed into them. His attributes had increased significantly, but as a Summoner, he was not too interested in his attributes. Especially for a Summoner like Lorne who had several Boss-level pets, he did not like to check his attributes. Because compared to pets, the difference between the two was too great. However, the final reward made Lorne very concerned. This was a pet skill book. As the name suggested, this was a tool for pets to learn skills. [Eagle Eye] was an archer’s skill. Therefore, he directly let Small Artillery learn it. It gave a 10% increase in accuracy, which meant that the damage output had increased significantly. After dealing with these rewards, Lorne looked at the sleeping Night Elf. The elven girl was still asleep. It just so happened that it was very late now. It was time to go offline and rest. He had to rush to the ruins of the war tomorrow. He had to ensure his mind was sharp. With that in mind, he opened the system interface and went offline. … He exited the game. Lorne quickly dealt with his dinner. Then, he opened the forum and planned to check on the movements of the large guilds regarding the event mission. The result was very unexpected. At this moment, the main page of the discussion forum was completely occupied by information regarding himself. Now that the Divine Realm had been open for two weeks, the large corporations had also figured out the situation in the virtual world. Therefore, they all decided to increase the investment, wanting to attract more poor people to their game factories to provide gold coins resources for the elite players. In order to do this, they used the deeds of [Tyrant] in the game as advertisements. They wanted to buy the divine equipment ranked first on the equipment ranking at a high price of 100 million dollars! Such a terrifying value naturally attracted the attention of the entire world. The poor people rushed into the game factories crazily. They had been poor for too long. Now that they saw an opportunity to turn things around, they rushed like ducks. It was inevitable that everyone would play the game now. When a person’s material life was satisfied, they would crazily pursue spiritual satisfaction. Lorne was not surprised. He only glanced at it casually and then left these posts. Then, he began searching for the key word—[May the Dead Rest in Peace]. The moment he opened it, countless posts appeared. They were all angry posts from large guilds and the team recruitment posts of solo players. After browsing for a while, he realized that there were nearly a thousand Level 20 members in those large guilds! After seeing this information, Lorne was immediately relieved. There were nearly twenty large guilds in Iron Skull City and more than a hundred medium guilds. Coupled with some skilled solo players, there should be about a hundred thousand players who could go to the ruins of the war immediately. Just selling the Purification Crystal to them was enough to recover the cost. In the next few days, countless players would reach Level 20 and enter the ruins of the war. At that time, he would not have to worry about the sales of all the potions. As for how much he would earn? He would be able to see the result in a few days. To the north of Iron Skull City, there was a barren land. This was the camp of the Dark faction, so there should not be any players here. However, the strange thing was that there were not only players here, but there were also a lot of them, like a small main city. It was also because of the increase in players that this place was determined by the system to be the hidden main city of the Dark faction—Blood Shadow City. As for why these players were here? That was because they had betrayed the Order faction and become players of the Dark faction. In the eyes of the players, there was no justice or evil in this world. That was just an interesting background story. What happened inside had nothing to do with the players. The only thing that mattered was their own benefits. If they could level up faster and become stronger in the Dark faction, the players would swarm in. They did not find it shameful. On the contrary, they were very proud when their levels increased faster. While Iron Skull City triggered a large-scale event mission, the dark forces in Blood Shadow City also issued a mission. That was to hunt the players from the Order faction! The more players killed, the greater the reward. Therefore, the guilds of Blood Shadow City were all restless. For example, the Netherworld Guild! It was one of the top guilds in Blood Shadow City. At this moment, a cold youth was using the edge of his sword to kill a monster while listening to the information of his subordinates. “President, according to our intelligence agents in Iron Skull City, the guilds in the city have gathered a large number of people and are rushing to the ruins of the war tonight!” A player reported. “What about the Fire Beacon Guild and the Thunder God Guild?” “They left an hour ago.” “How many people are there in Iron Skull City?” “There are more than 100,000 players from dozens of guilds and some solo players.” “Very good. Looks like we can take action now.” The corners of the young man’s mouth curled up into a cruel smile as he ordered, “Immediately pass the order down. Merge with the other guilds of the Dark faction to use the information advantage and geographical environment to wipe out all the players of the Order faction in the war ruins!” “Yes!” After receiving the order, the player prepared to leave. “Wait…” The dark youth stopped him and asked, “Is there news of Tyrant?” “When our intelligence officers last saw him, he entered the City Lord’s area. We haven’t seen him since.” “Continue lurking. Report immediately if you have any news about him.” “Yes.” The subordinate player left. The cold youth revealed a cruel smile, “Wait for me, Tyrant. Your divine equipment is mine!” … On the second day, Lorne woke up very early. He wore a simple set of casual clothes and headed to the hospital where his sister was staying. Due to the money he had made recently, Lorne moved his sister to a higher care unit. Not only was there a more functional cryo chamber here, but there were also more accurate medical equipment and 24-hour medical staff. Due to the fact that his sister, Roanna, was sick, it was relatively troublesome to move her. It took several days to adjust all the equipment until today. In the hospital, Lorne walked into the nursing room in a special suit. He looked at the weak girl lying in the cryo chamber and could not help but clench his hands. Unknowingly, three years had passed. Roanna lay there in the cold cabin for three years. Looking at her thin figure, Lorne felt his heart ache. Lorne sat beside her and said, “You’ll definitely recover!” He wanted to stay by his sister’s side forever, but he had to hurry. He could not let anyone surpass him in the game. If he wanted to earn enough money, he had to ensure that he had strength that surpassed everyone in the world. In order to let Roanna enjoy the best treatment in the world, he had to make himself work harder. He had to plan every day for the maximum gains. Therefore, at noon, he left the hospital reluctantly. By the time Lorne returned home, it was already past 4pm. “Looks like I have to move to the Energy Zone first.” The poor people needed to be notified in advance to enter the Energy Zone. They could only enter after passing the approval of many departments, but they could not act freely. It was also because of the complicated inspection that Lorne had to spend most of the day on it. But if he were a citizen of the Energy Zone, he would not have to do these checks, and Lorne would have had more time to work on the game. “It will cost a few million dollars to enter the Energy Zone and become a real citizen…” The most basic requirement to become a citizen of the Energy Zone was that one needed an ID card. He needed to buy this, and he might not even be able to buy it. Because the population of the Energy Zone was fixed, a low-level Energy Zone could only accommodate 500,000 people. Therefore, the mission of buying the identity card of the Energy Zone required luck. Or if one had enough money, they could also access a special channel and have a higher chance of obtaining the identity than others. Coupled with other expenses, it would cost at least three million alliance dollars, or even more. “I’ll wait until I earn another five million before doing this.” Lorne set himself a small goal. Five million was a huge amount for ordinary people. But for the current Lorne, this was not a difficult goal. … Soon, it was night time. Lorne put on his helmet and logged into the game. Swish! With a flash of light, Lorne arrived at the familiar Iron Skull City. Because he had logged off here, he was still in the hall of the holy temple. However, at this moment, Lorne had already discovered that the Night Elf was no longer in the cradle, but in his pet space. Lorne summoned her. She was a very petite fairy maiden with pointed ears, exquisite facial features, skin like the moonlight, and long silver hair. It was no wonder that Mayra had specially reminded him that it was indeed difficult to keep his control against such a perfect elf girl. However, Lorne was not shameless enough to take advantage of her. Even if he wanted to do something, it was best to confirm that the other party had self-awareness. Otherwise, it would be no different from a silicon doll. This was a very vivid analogy. Because there was no soul, the elven girl looked very dull, like a soulless shell. From the looks of it, he had to completely merge her with the crystal heart to obtain her consciousness. Lorne looked at the conditions for the merging. Every 10,000 experience points increased the fusion rate by 1%. In other words, to completely merge, Lorne needed to give Aisha 1 million experience points. This was not a small project that could be completed in a few days. It just so happened that he was going to the ruins of the war this time. While completing the mission, he could also obtain experience points by killing monsters. It was killing two birds with one stone. With that in mind, Lorne put Aisha back into the pet space and left the hall. After walking out of the City Lord’s area, Lorne saw that there were still people coming in and going out of Iron Skull City. Most of the high-level players were already gone. All of them headed to the ruins of the war with the large guilds. As for ordinary players? This mission was not something they could participate in. The minimum requirement to accept a mission was to reach Level 20. Clearly, their strength was not enough. In the square, Lorne opened the system map. Due to the relatively far location of the ruins of the war, it would take two to three days to walk there alone. Many areas would be passed by, and there were even Level 50 danger zones inside. Therefore, the path needed to be planned. From the map, the ruins of war were located in the northwest of Iron Skull City. There were several very dangerous areas in the middle. To reach their destination safely, they had to bypass these dangerous areas. Otherwise, if they encountered high-level monsters, they would be killed. Moreover, there were no resurrection points in these forests. So once someone died, they would return to Iron Skull City. To return to their previous area, they would need to walk for another two or three days. There were also ravines, valleys, and cliffs that needed to be avoided. It was because of this that Lorne was not in a hurry. He stood in the city and carefully checked the map, planning his own path. About ten minutes later, a winding path appeared on the system map interface. His idea was to first set off from the main city and head northwest. First, he would pass through the Level 20 map [Clear Wind Valley], then go around [Seven Stars Valley], and then cross the vast Barbarian Forest. He would be able to leave the forest in two to three days and reach the edge of his destination. This was a slightly more risky path, because the Barbarian Forest had monsters between Level 20 and Level 40. However, Lorne did not mind it too much. Even if he could not defeat a Level 40 monster, it was relatively easy for him to escape. After determining the route, Lorne began the journey that would take several days. … Two days later, the team that had set off on the night of the event had already arrived at their destination. At the edge of the ruins of the war, there was an expeditionary army camp. It was where the Empire Army had been stationed more than a thousand years ago. After the war ended, in order to prevent the undead mages from wantonly resurrecting the dead in the ruins of the war, the empire had sent legions here. However, because of the increasing frequency of wars at the border recently, all the internal legions were transferred to the front line, and this huge camp was abandoned. Now that the players had entered this region, this abandoned army camp had also become a temporary resting place for them. The guilds chose to regroup their teams here and left the supply group here. Because the journey was long and there were no resurrection points nearby, supplies were very important. After leaving the transport personnel behind, the high-level players of the large guilds rushed into the forest ahead. But as they entered the map’s range… “Damn! What’s going on? Why am I poisoned?” “Where did this debuff come from?” “Why did my attack power decrease?” “My attributes are also falling, all of them are decreasing at the same time!” “Damn, how can we still play like this!” “Play my ass!” The players were shocked by the sudden buff. The effect of this negative buff was very terrifying. After being poisoned, it would cause the player’s entire attributes to be weakened. As time passed, the attributes would decrease more and more. The eventual result was -30% in all attributes. Seeing this scene, all the players became hysterical. It had to be known that just traveling to this place took nearly three days! When they reached the destination, they realized that they did not have the ability to kill the monsters here. This was too absurd! … On the other side, the beautiful women of the Silver Snow Guild also encountered such a problem. As soon as they entered the forest, they realized that their attributes were decreasing. They were already at a disadvantage against high-level monsters, with this reduction of attributes, they would not be able to continue the mission. “Why didn’t anyone remind us that this map is poisonous?!” “That’s right. This is simply a scam.” “Are we going back to the city?” “I can’t accept this. I clearly spent three days rushing here!” The beautiful players of the Silver Snow Guild were all frowning. In order to complete a mission, they had spent several days marching without much improvement. Now, even the ordinary players were almost catching up to them. If they went back just like that, it would be too uncomfortable. However, staying here was not a solution. If they could not solve the problem of the debuff, they could not enter the war ruins to hunt monsters. Thinking of this, the ladies of the Silver Snow Guild were all anxious. At this moment, as the guild leader, Twinkle Rose stood up. “Don’t worry, I have a way.” A confident smile appeared on Twinkle Rose’s face, and she sent the details of the antidote to the party channel. [Special Poison-Antidote Potion] Effect: Dispel the effects of various toxins on the body. Immunity Duration: 24 hours. Instantly, everyone looked over. When they received the potions, they received a new notification. (It can remove the ‘Dark Corrosion’ effect) “Heavens, sisters, we’re saved!” The beautiful players of Silver Snow Guild cheered. With this potion, they could enter the forest to start their mission. “Wow, our Guild Leader sure knows what to expect.” “Guild Leader is awesome.” “I want to warm the bed for you tonight. Don’t stop me.” “I want to hug, kiss, and raise you high…” Because the guild was filled with female players, the scope of their conversation was very wide. After being praised by countless sisters for a long time, Twinkle Rose felt a little smug. Of course, she knew very well that the Silver Snow Guild could lead all the other large guilds because of the information from Tyrant. Because of Tyrant’s reminder, she worked with Super Rich to collect all the antidotes in Iron Skull City. In their guild storage, there were a total of 100,000 antidotes. At this moment, a beautiful vice president suggested, “Sister Twinkle, no wonder you asked us to collect the potions before we came here. So it’s because of this matter. However, we have so many antidotes in our warehouse, so it shouldn’t be able to be used up. Why don’t we sell some potions and earn some income?” Because the distance from Iron Skull City to the ruins of the war was too far, the value of the antidote that could solve the problem was high. If they could sell a portion of it, they could definitely earn a huge amount of gold coins during this period of time. “That’s what I was intending to do…” “What’s our price?” At the mention of selling potions, all the sisters became excited. “1 silver coin?” “2 silver coins!” “3 silver coins!” “Why don’t we try for a gold coin?” “Wow, Fie, you’re too greedy…” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Due to the huge distance between Iron Skull City and the ruins of the war, the players had spent three days rushing here. Now that they could not enter the forest, it made them very anxious. There were even some who could not stand the wait and rushed into the forest, but they were quickly sent back to Iron Skull City. ? Most of the monsters in this forest were Level 30, and a large number of elite monsters and even Bronze monsters wandered around. With the current attributes of the players, it was impossible for them to fight an elite monster alone, not to mention that their attributes had been reduced. If one rushed into the forest abruptly, he would only die. Facing this scene, all the players who came here were in a dilemma. They were unwilling to return to Iron Skull City, but they could not enter the ruins of the war to kill monsters. These waiting days were too torturous. But at that moment, an important news suddenly appeared in the army camp’s regional channel. “This is the Silver Snow Guild. The antidote we’re selling can dispel the debuff in the forest. Each bottle costs 3 silver coins. The quantity is limited. Hurry up and buy it.” When the anxious players saw this information, they immediately looked at the effect of the potion crazily, as if they were looking at their last hope. Then, the entire scene was in an uproar… “I want ten bottles!” “We want 100 bottles!” “Beautiful sister, we want 500 bottles. This is 15 gold coins. Please keep it.” “Please sell us 400 bottles of potion, thank you.” “I beg you, beautiful sisters, please sell me the antidotes…” Instantly, countless players arrived at the Silver Snow Guild’s camp. ...; After some discussion, Twinkle Rose was finally priced at 3 silver coins per bottle. These potions were bought by her and Super Rich at the retail price of 1 silver coin per bottle. Now, she was selling the potion to these guild players at three times the price. This was definitely a terrifying profit. 3 silver coins was equivalent to 150 alliance dollars. It was very expensive to buy a bottle of potion at this price. After all, this potion could only allow one to be immune to poison and enter the map smoothly. It could not help one obtain any other benefits directly. Moreover, it only had 24 hours of use. They had to buy a potion tomorrow, or else they would return to the current situation. Although they knew that they had been cheated, the other players could not refuse. After all, only the Silver Snow Guild had these potions at this stage. Even if their guild could purchase the same potion in the main city, the transportation time was three days. They could not wait that long. Therefore, it could be seen that despite the high price of the potion, the players still rushed into the Silver Snow Guild’s camp crazily. ...; “Has the big-busted sister started selling?” On a hill, Lorne was leading his pets through the forest when he saw the message from the Silver Snow Guild. Three silver coins was indeed the most accurate price, but it also depended on the occasion. At a time when everyone was extremely anxious, she could easily raise the price of the potion to 5 silver coins. Although the sales would not be huge, it could help her earn more. This was because the antidote was limited. Even if it was produced in the future, it was far from letting everyone have it. Therefore, she did not have to worry about the sales of the potions in the next few days. “Big-busted Sister should have other considerations…” Lorne thought so. After all, the Silver Snow Guild was a large guild. They needed to accumulate reputation and prepare for the future hegemony of Iron Skull City. Unlike a loner like him, he did not care about the thoughts of others. He only needed to plunder wealth. “Looks like I have to speed up. A huge amount of wealth is waving at me…” Lorne quickly closed the chat panel and looked at the battlefield ahead. He had not reached his destination. During this period of time, he had been killing monsters in the Barbarian Forest. Originally, Lorne wanted to quickly cross the forest and reach the ruins of the war. But accidents always happened so suddenly. On the way, Lorne noticed a very important problem. That was the level of the pets. “Roar…” Directly ahead, the pets were attacking a group of marsh crocodiles. Surprisingly, although they were only ordinary monsters, the pets were having a tough time. As an elite pet, Little Mantis only dealt 81 damage each time. It did not even reach three digits. This was too rare for Lorne who had been clearing monsters all the time. ———— [Marsh Crocodile] Quality: Normal Monster Level: 25 HP: 2745 / 4500 Skill: [Death Spin], [Bloodthirsty Bite] Introduction: A giant crocodile that lives in the swamp forest. It has a huge body and sharp teeth. It will ambush any creatures that pass by. ———— It could be seen that after the players reached Class One, the monsters in the main city also received a huge increase in attributes. However, such attributes were not enough to stop him. It was so strange. Currently, [Little Mantis] only dealt 81 damage. The Silver monster [Venom] only dealt 155 points of damage. One had to know that the Level 10 [Venom] had a limit of 910 Attack points, but it only dealt less than 155 damage. This was ridiculous. Lorne was stunned on the spot. After checking the combat panel, he understood everything. It turned out that this was because the difference in level between the two sides was too great, causing a level suppression effect! ———— [Level Suppression Effect] Detailed explanation: When the difference between the player and the monster was more than five levels, the higher level party would receive 20% damage reduction and additional 20% damage output when attacking. Every 5 levels difference would result in an additional 20% damage reduction. When the gap between the two sides reached 20 levels, the higher level party would be immune to all damage and all control effects of the lower level party. ———— This mechanism only appeared after entering the main city. It was no wonder that Lorne did not know about it. But then again… This was a huge blow to Lorne. This was because his damage output came from his pets. However, because he had just entered the main city, his pets were only Level 10. The map clearly stated that the ruins of war were high-level maps between Level 30 and Level 50. With his pets’ level, there was no way for him to deal with monsters above Level 30. Therefore, Lorne could only slow down. He began killing monsters in the Level 20 map. Barbarian Forest was a Level 20 to 40 map, so the level suppression effect was not very severe. Fortunately, yesterday, “Small Artillery” had already reached Level 18. Even if it was suppressed by the level difference, its damage output would not be too affected. Therefore, the gains these two days was very rich. Just the experience points alone were close to a million. However, Lorne had not chosen to awaken Aisha. The priority now was to raise the level of the team as soon as possible and eliminate the effect of level suppression. Only then could he obtain higher efficiency. Ding! “Congratulations to your pet [Source of Poison – Venom], for reaching Level 20!” “Your pet ‘Venom’ has awakened its skill—Fan Arrow!” Lorne used all the experience he had gained in the past two days to raise the two archers in the team. Now, “Small Artillery” and “Venom” were both Level 20 and could easily kill targets below Level 35. As for Little Mantis… Lorne did not raise it. Although its attributes were very powerful at the current stage, it was the weakest in the team. It just so happened that its level was also much lower, so he simply did not let it level up. In a while, in the map of the ruins of the war, he would try to create a new pet and replace Little Mantis. Right now, the team still needed a tank. This way, the two archers could be divided into two combat teams. At that time, the team’s combat strength would definitely be more outstanding. “You’ll be free soon.” Lorne touched its head and said softly. The Death Scythe Mantis was his proud work, and he wanted to bring this little guy with him. However, his strength had increased too quickly now. Little Mantis’s potential could not keep up with the quality of the team. Therefore, he could only endure the pain and let it go. Picking up the dozen bronze coins on the ground, Lorne looked at the skill that Venom had awakened. ———— Skill: [Fan Arrow] Effect: Fire nine arrows at an arc of 45 degrees, maximum range of 20 yards. Deals 100% physical damage to all targets hit. (Note: Each arrow will be blocked by the first target it hits.) ———— It was identical to the skill of Small Artillery, with no difference at all. It was the same for attributes. After reaching Level 20, their attributes had reached a terrifying level. ———— [Source of Poison] (Venom) Grade: Silver HP: 12,600 / 12,600 Physical Attack: 1080-1560 Defense: 420 Skill: … Introduction: … ———— The upper limit of 1560 Attack Points could deal extremely terrifying damage even under the suppression of level. “Roar! Roar! Roar!” At this moment, several marsh crocodiles suddenly crawled out from the side. They charged forward, baring their fangs and brandishing their claws. But before they could get close, a series of arrows struck their heads. Slam! Slam! Slam! Almost instantly, the arrows pierced through their heads. -1015 -1003 -1027 -1009 … A series of terrifying damage floated in the air, declaring the death of the few Level 25 monsters. The Marsh Crocodile only had 3,500 health points and could not block the attacks of the two archers. Beside him, Rimuru was not idle. It bounced through the shallow swamp, searching for a new target. Its level was relatively low. However, as a Bronze-Grade Boss, Rimuru had 175,000 HP. There was no need to worry about encountering danger. “Now, it’s Aisha’s turn.” For the moment, Lorne ignored Rimuru. It did not have to level up as quickly as possible. In any case, it required more experience than Aisha. Instead of leveling it up, it was better to satisfy his curiosity. Right now, Lorne wanted to know the specific attributes of Aisha, and at the same time, wanted to know what the second phase of the mission was. “Come out, Aisha.” Lorne waved the short staff in his hand. In the next moment, an extremely complicated and ancient magic circle appeared. After emitting a brilliant light, a small figure appeared in front of Lorne. The elven girl was still so dull. Lorne stepped forward and pulled up her hood. Night Elves were considered assassins. When they went out to do missions, they liked to hide themselves in their robes, causing others to be unable to see their exquisite faces under the hood. Looking at his most beautiful pet up close, Lorne thought of something interesting. Would this pet suffer from split personality? Although she looked like a Night Elf Princess, she still had the ‘Holy Angel’ on her. That was definitely a supreme existence. If she revived one day, would Aisha still exist? Or would a Holy Angel appear and become his additional pet? This was something to look forward to. “Let’s go, Aisha. Master will bring you to level up.” Taking the dazed elf girl by the hand, Lorne led her deeper into the forest. In order to increase the efficiency of farming monsters, Lorne divided the team into two groups again to expand the scope of his raid. In the Divine Realm, ordinary pets could stay as far away from their masters as 100 yards. Since Lorne’s pets were of high quality, they could stay 200 to 500 yards away from him. This distance was definitely far enough. At the very least, it was difficult to see the other party in the forest. He did not have to worry about getting lost. It was because the master could clearly see the location of his pets on the map and recall them. … “Ding! You have killed a marsh crocodile. EXP+50 (+100).” “Ding! You have killed a marsh crocodile…” “Ding!” “Ding!” Under the monstrous attack of the two powerful Silver pets, the crocodiles in the shallow swamp fell one by one, giving Lorne a huge amount of experience. With the efficiency of the two teams, Lorne could kill 6-10 monsters in a minute. If not for the lack of clarity regarding the monsters’ location, the final output would not have been this low. In addition, part of the reason was that the defense of Venom and Little Mantis’s team was too weak, causing their efficiency to be affected. But even so, Lorne benefited greatly. In the past two days, he had obtained nearly a million experience points. In the following period of time, his income would be higher. This was because Lorne already had two Level 20 Silver pets. … After farming for more than three hours, Lorne found a place where monsters gathered. He could finally go all out. He let Rimuru attract the monsters. Then, he got Small Artillery and Venom to stand in the gap behind him and deal the damage. The sky whistled. Countless burning black fireballs shot out, turning the area ahead into a sea of flames. At the same time, a series of green arrows bombarded the ground. The arrows stabbed into the ground and began to emit green poison. -923 -917 -935 -929 -941 A series of damage numbers popped up in front of him. Because both pets had reached Level 20, the level suppression effect was only 20%. Coupled with the additional damage from the arrows, they dealt over a thousand AOE damage. Roar! Roar! Dozens of yards around, the roar of a swamp alligator could be heard. Lorne stood with Aisha at the side of the hill, watching the magnificent scene. In less than a minute, the ground was covered in corpses. The entire area was flooded with bronze coins that glistened with the light. It had to be said that the rewards for high-level monsters were indeed rich. After cleaning up more than a hundred corpses of the marsh crocodiles, Lorne received 6,654 bronze coins and a large pile of crocodile skin. There were only a few White Iron equipment. They could not be sold for a decent price, but they could be taken to the Blacksmith Guild to be recycled. That was not a bad income. Lorne took away all the loot and poured all the experience points he had into Aisha’s body to help her complete the fusion of the crystal heart as soon as possible. Ding! “Fusion progress: 1%.” “Fusion progress: 2%.” “Fusion progress: 3%.” “Fusion progress: 4%.” 10,000 experience points could only give Aisha 1% of the progress. There was no need to worry about this matter. All that mattered was that it was completed before today. “The ruins of the war are near the Lake of Death.” Lorne opened the map again. The ruins of the war covered a very large area, including the Windless Forest, the Illusionary Moon Mountain Range, the Lake of Death, the Fog Swamp, and other large maps. The northernmost location was the border of Iron Skull City. That was where the war had broken out and poured into the city. In order to maintain the peace and stability of that region, the elves, humans, and dwarfs had all constructed defensive forces there. “In order to find the dragon souls, I should go to the core battlefield, right?” From the mission map, Lorne saw that the core battlefield was located deeper than the event area. From this, it could be inferred that the former was more difficult. However, the harder the mission, the greater the reward. Lorne was also filled with anticipation regarding the Divine Radiance that came from the Divine Dragon of Order. A power that was so revered by the Dragon of Light definitely had extraordinary effects. … Ding! “Fusion progress: 10 %…” After seeing the map, Lorne continued to sweep through the forest. Due to the powerful output of his pets, the following battles were very victorious. In just an hour, he had already made Aisha’s fusion progress exceed 10%. According to this direction, they would soon reach the expeditionary army camp. But Lorne did not do so. His plan was to complete Aisha’s fusion mission before he reached the camp. Therefore, he chose to circle around and wander through the forest. According to Lorne’s expectations, he should arrive at the expeditionary army camp before dawn today and allow Aisha to complete the fusion process. It was a perfect plan. But at that moment, suddenly, the Dragon Soul Compass in Lorne’s inventory shook violently. The needle on the compass spun crazily and finally stopped in one direction. Lorne’s eyes lit up. The use of [Dragon Soul Compass] was to find the location of the dragon soul. Its reaction meant that there were traces of a dragon soul nearby! “Strange, this is not the area of the ruins of the war, right?” Lorne was confused, but he remembered that he had obtained [Gabriel’s Feather] in the Dark Forest, so he was not surprised. The war back then was huge and affected so many areas. It was normal for the dragons to die in the surrounding forest. He wondered if there were any dragon skeletons. If there was, he could use the dragon skeleton to create a pet. It would be a surprise. … He followed the instructions. After traveling through the forest for about ten minutes, Lorne arrived at a graveyard. There were ruined tombs everywhere. Some skeletons were even abandoned on the ground, scattered in all directions in the forest. Lorne moved on. At this moment, the surroundings had changed greatly. This place was deathly silent. The surrounding trees were also badly weathered, and the plants were even pitch-black like statues, giving off a strange feeling. “What happened?” Lorne looked at the compass. The pointer on it began to spin crazily. A single direction was not indicated, as if there were things all around that made it react. But strangely, there was nothing unusual around. Apart from a slightly intact tomb that he saw. “Could it be underground?” To make the needle react in such a way, it meant that there was a very close target nearby. Since there was no one above the ground, it had to be underground. Lorne stepped forward and began to examine the grave. A thousand years had passed. How could a grave be so intact? There had to be something going on inside. Clang! Lorne tapped the tombstone with the short staff in his hand. In the next second, a durability bar appeared above the tombstone. This meant that it could be destroyed. Without a word, Lorne had the two archers in the team attack the tombstone. The two longbows sounded one after another, more than ten arrows fired at the same time. The durability of the tombstone was instantly emptied. Crack! Cracks appeared on the tombstone, and then a transparent mirror seemed to be shattered. It was a barrier set up by someone. Only by shattering this enchantment could he find the entrance to the tomb. At this moment, a small magic circle appeared in front of the tombstone. It was the only way to enter the underground dungeon. Without any hesitation, Lorne stood up. In the next second, light flashed and he vanished on the spot. When it appeared again, Lorne found himself underground. What appeared in front of him was a dark passageway. There was a cold aura around it that made one’s hair stand on end. Aisha suddenly had a reaction. She felt very uneasy. Perhaps it was because of the Holy Angel in her body, but she instinctively rejected it. Lorne did not force her. He let her return to the pet space and ordered, “Rimuru, move forward.” Those with high HP led the way, this was true in any game. The little guy did not know fear as it bounced deeper into the grave. As he gradually went deeper, a very pungent smell came. It was the rotting smell of the undead. Lorne had learned about it in the Beginner Village dungeon. While adjusting his sense of smell, he suddenly looked deep into the grave path. Monsters were coming! There was the sound of bones grinding. “Creak…” Soon, a group of terrifying skeleton monsters appeared in the tunnel. They were dressed in rotting armor and held sabers and battle shields in their hands. Crimson soul fire floated in their dark eyes as they stared at Lorne and his pets. ———— [Skeleton Soldier] (Ordinary) Level: 27 Attributes: … ———— A Level 27 ordinary monster had ordinary attributes. However, Lorne had a bad feeling about this, for wherever there were skeleton soldiers, there would definitely be undead mages. These fellows who walked in the cemetery and stole the corpses of soldiers had the power to resurrect the undead. If they found the corpse of a dragon… That would be terrifying. -1601 -999 -1625 -2600! (Critical) … The defense of the Skeletal Warriors was not high. As long as one was not hit by their [Charge] skill, there was no problem. Moreover, these monsters were afraid of the Fire of Death. When Small Artillery hits them, it dealt an additional 50% damage. Thus, it could be seen. The single attack damage of Small Artillery was 1,600 points. However, Venom only dealt 1,000 points of damage. The difference in damage between the two sides was huge. As for the Skeletal Warriors, they could only keep half of their health after two rounds of rain of arrows. In addition, their speed was not high, so they were killed before they could get close to Lorne and the others. In less than half a minute, Lorne stepped deeper into the cave on a pile of shattered bones. This underground cave was very dark and long, as if there was no end to it. Fortunately, Lorne had so many pets beside him, so he was not afraid of such a game environment. He kept walking forward. Fifteen minutes later, Lorne noticed the change in the cave. It seemed that the deeper he went, the wider the cave became. At first, the range was only about three meters, but now, it was six to seven meters wide. Moreover, there were blue rocks embedded in the surroundings. Occasionally, there would be a special totem mark engraved on them. From these details, it was not difficult to tell that the master of this cave was not simple. Lorne continued walking with his pets until he finally arrived at a huge palace. This was a transfer station. In front of the palace, three huge intersections appeared. Without a doubt, two of the three entrances were very dangerous. Only one was relatively safe. This was a test of luck. But Lorne was in no hurry to choose. Standing in front of the palace, he took out the Dragon Soul Compass from his bag. Then, he checked the direction in which the compass needle was swaying. Finally, he could clearly see that the leftmost intersection had the most powerful reaction. Clearly, that was the true goal. “Let’s go!” Lorne let Rimuru lead the way, then led the rest of the pets into the leftmost cave. When he walked down this path, the monsters he encountered increased in number, and there were often elite or even Bronze monsters among them. To the current players, this might be a very difficult obstacle. But that posed no threat to Lorne. As this continued, after walking for half an hour, he no longer knew where he was. But at that moment, he finally saw a faint light ahead. It was a huge palace! In the palace, there was a sinister netherworld fire. A huge skeleton projection appeared on the wall. It seemed to be performing a mysterious and strange ritual. Lorne stepped forward. When he arrived at the entrance of the palace, his eyes widened. Just ahead, Lorne saw a shocking dragon skeleton in the hall. Countless skeletons were scattered around. They were all prostrating on the ground, as if in a prayer ritual. There was also a circle of skeleton mages around the dragon. In each of their hands was a black magic book. Their scarlet eyes were obtaining relevant knowledge from the magic book. Then, black energy poured from the bottom of their feet into a huge magic circle on the ground. In addition, above the dragon skeleton, a cloaked skeleton was opening its hands and casting strange magic. It was a Lich – an existence stronger than the undead mage! Undead mages were once humans who studied undead magic. In essence, they were living creatures. However, it was different for the Lich. Liches were already dead. For some reason, they had regained their life and awakened their own consciousness. To be precise, they were ‘creatures’ that had been revived from dead corpses. Because they were already dead, they had a more accurate grasp of the power of the undead, which also gave them greater strength. As for the scene before him, it seemed to want to resurrect this thousand-year-old dragon… Ding! “Warning! You have been discovered by the powerful [Lich]. Battle has begun!” As Lorne thought this, an alarm sounded. The next moment, all the undead monsters in the hall looked over. “Who is it! How dare you intrude into my territory!” The Lich in the air waved its bone claws fiercely. Immediately, the skeletons on the ground received the order and roared at Lorne, charging at him. There were hundreds of monsters! They came from all directions, causing one’s scalp to turn numb. Lorne quickly retreated, then commanded his pets to retreat as he attacked. Arrows covered the entire entrance of the palace. Then, his archers fired the Fan Arrows, instantly raising the kill count to 10 stacks. ———— [Frenzied Shooting] (10 Stacks): +10% Critical Strike chance, +30% Attack Speed, +50% Critical Strike effect. (Duration: 20 seconds) ———— For “Small Artillery” and “Venom”, this skill could more than double their damage output. Arrows shot from the hands of the two pets, killing the undead monsters. -1597 -2580 (Critical) -1629 -4450! (Critical) -1601 … Among the countless damage numbers, a terrifying one suddenly appeared. Even Lorne jumped. He only knew after checking the combat notification interface. It turned out that Small Artillery had triggered the critical hit effect. Due to its Attack reaching 1560 points, in addition to the 50% Critical Hit effect of [Frenzied Shooting] and the 50% additional damage caused by the “Fire of Death” effect, in the end, the critical damage was 4,450 points. This was too shocking. If other players saw this, they might post it online again and report him for cheating. Swish! Swish! Swish! Swish! With the 30% increase in attack speed, the frequency of the two pets firing arrows increased tremendously. Even if there were hundreds of skeletons in front of them, they could not withstand such a violent attack. Almost every second, a few skeletons fell. In less than two minutes, all the monsters at the scene had been killed. But at that moment… The Lich Boss in the sky swooped down and blocked the entrance of the palace. At the same time, it clawed with its bone claws and used its skill. “Revive, you lowly skeletons!” The Lich Boss shouted, and the skeletons scattered on the ground immediately began to tremble. In the end, they gathered together and became new skeleton monsters. Damn, shameless! It was already abominable for an undead mage to summon dozens of creatures. But with just one sentence, the Lich revived hundreds of skeletons! This skill was too disgusting. Lorne identified its attributes panel, then waved his short staff and used the same type of skill. <i>“Come out, Demon Hounds from Hell!”</i>  This was the first time that Lorne had used this skill in a battle with a boss. A huge magic circle appeared on the ground, and countless light balls appeared. Then, the light dissipated, and hideous hellhounds appeared in front of the skeleton monsters. This was an orange skill with an S-grade quality. Therefore, it had a greater visual impact than the Boss’s move. The number of hellhounds summoned was tied to the player’s level, which was (10 × level). Lorne was now Level 20! Therefore, he directly summoned 200 hellhounds! Although they only had 20% of Lorne’s attributes, it was still enough to stop the skeleton army. Lorne took the opportunity to step back and keep a distance from the boss. Then, he checked the other party’s attributes panel in the distance. ———— [Lich] Grade: Boss Level: 30 HP: ??? Magic Attack: 1280-1800 Physical Defense: 630 Magic Defense: 650 Skills: [Howling Fear], [Skull Awakening], [Undead Summoning], [Bloodthirsty Berserk], [???] Introduction: Due to the corrosion of special energy, this corpse of the undead mage gained life and became a true undead creature. ———— It could be seen that the boss’s attributes had also become very powerful. The magic attack of the Lich Boss in front of him had already reached the upper limit of 1,800 points. If a non-tank player were to suffer such an attack, they would definitely die instantly. In addition… Because the difference between the two sides was 10 levels, one attribute and one skill effect could not be detected. This was one of the rules that appeared after coming to the main city. In this case, the battle became even more difficult. Fortunately, it was only a Level 30 Boss with only 630 Defense. With the attack power of the Small Artillery and Venom, which was as high as 1560, it would not be too difficult to kill it. -305 -297 The two pets each shot an arrow. The damage was quite close this time. Because the other party was a high-level boss, it was immune to the special effects of the undead flames. Due to the level suppression effect, the attacks of the two pets were reduced by 40%, so they only dealt less than 300 points of damage per attack. Of course, that was still a very decent amount. At the very least, the damage output was much higher than the Boss’ health regeneration. Therefore, as long as he had time, he would definitely be able to kill the other party. As for now, he had to consider the other party’s HP. Although it lost more than 600 HP, its health did not decrease much. Based on its current health bar, its total health could not be estimated. … “Come out, undead wandering in the world!” Seeing that all the skeletons had been killed, the Lich Boss waved its arms again. Lorne felt sick upon seeing this, because he was very familiar with this skill. This was another skill to summon the undead. Countless mounds appeared around the Lich Boss, and undead creatures broke out of the ground. It was a group of Skeletal Warriors with blades and shields. “I bestow upon you bloodthirst and zeal!” A huge magic circle appeared from below the body of the Lich Boss, enveloping all the skeletons. In the next moment, the soul flames in the eyes of these monsters burned madly, and their entire bodies became extremely violent. Lorne checked and found that all the skeletons had received a buff that increased their movement speed by 50%, damage by 50%, and life leech by 100%. “What an absurd combination…” After killing two batches and dozens of monsters, Lorne had the urge to curse. If not for the fact that he was a Summoner, he would have already rushed up with his axe and machete and chopped the boss into mincemeat. Fortunately, this place was very spacious. As long as the two pets had enough space, they could easily kite the monsters to death with their high movement speed. Lorne did not believe that the Lich Boss’s summoning skills would have such a short cooldown. If the cooldown ended before the pets cleared the monsters, he would leave without looking back. With his current strength, he could not deal with such a monstrous boss. But Lorne did not think it was that powerful. Swish! Swish! Swish! Countless arrows tore through the sky, nailing skeleton monsters to the ground one after another. To the two pets, these monsters were nothing. They only needed a minute to finish them all. After all the monsters fell, the Lich Boss did not summon the next batch of puppets immediately. Clearly, several of its skills were on cooldown. Therefore, this was the best opportunity for Lorne to attack. “Kill!” Lorne did not hesitate. The moment the monsters fell, he immediately controlled Small Artillery from afar and fired crazily at the boss. Slam! Slam! Slam! -237 -1480 (Critical) -1500! (Critical) -1450! (Critical) -241 -239 Due to the effects of Frenzied Shooting, Small Artillery had a 10% Critical Strike effect, which played a major role at this moment. Among the six arrows fired by [Rapid Fire], there were several critical hits that instantly maximized the damage. The poison on the other side also dealt very high damage. In the face of two powerful DPS, the boss was as weak as a small monster. Its health dropped by a large amount. From the health bar in front of him, the Boss should have more than 100,000 health points. But it could not exceed 150,000. With this information, Lorne became more confident in the following battle. Next, he only needed to master the boss’s skill cooldown time and the effect of the last skill. There would be no suspense in the entire battle. “Damn human, you’re infuriating the great Lich!” The Boss let out an angry roar, as if it had not expected its health to drop so quickly. In just two minutes, it had lost one-third of its health. That was close to 70,000 health points! To think that this weak human could force it to such a state! It was unforgivable! When its health decreased to a certain extent, a ball of thick black flames rose from the Boss’s body. The two scarlet soul flames that represented its eyes stared at Lorne fiercely like fiery red lanterns. “Revive, you lowly skeletons!” “Come out, undead wandering in the world!” “I bestow upon you bloodthirst and zeal!” The furious boss used two skills at the same time. Due to its special skill, the number of monsters summoned on the spot had also increased greatly. After using two skills, the number of monsters in the scene instantly reached nearly 300. Each one was incomparably crazy. After receiving the order, they all rushed towards Lorne. Unfortunately, despite the 50% increase in movement speed, they were still too slow. They could not even reach Small Artillery. It was impossible for them to catch up to Lorne, who was equipped with [Angel’s Wings] and had also added 4 Agility points each level. -1615 -207 -1609 -2600! (Critical) -4500! (Critical) … Lorne controlled Small Artillery to fire as he retreated. The nearly 300 monsters in front of him were useless against the perfect kiting. Of course, they also bought some time for the boss to recover. At this moment, the boss was madly absorbing the undead’s energy to recover its health. However, the boss’s healing was not as strong as the first undead mage he fought. It took two minutes to recover 40,000 health points. That was pointless. Lorne quickly cleared away the monsters, but he kept about ten of them around. This was to maintain the duration of the Frenzied Shooting. Within 20 seconds, as long as another monster is killed, the cooldown period would be refreshed again for 20 seconds. Lorne extended the duration of [Frenzied Shooting] by using the ten monsters. Seeing that it could not do anything to the human adventurer, the Lich Boss could only summon the skeleton mages who were casting dark magic to its side. Then, it attacked Lorne with a barrage of magic. But that could not change the situation. After another three minutes, the boss’s health was down to 20%. Unwilling to give up, the Lich Boss summoned another few hundred monsters. However, Lorne was not anxious at all. He still followed his previous strategy and eliminated all the monsters before focusing his attention on the Lich Boss. 10% 5% When the boss’s health decreased to 5%, Lorne paused. This was all due to the subconscious usage of the Monster Merging Simulator. Unfortunately, the monster before him did not have any merits that attracted Lorne. Like the Undead Mage, the Lich also had a huge requirement for the territory. Once it left the relatively large area of the skeletons, its combat strength would decrease by at least half. Although the Lich was hard to deal with, that was because there were too many monsters here. If it were in Iron Skull City, Lorne would have been able to kill it easily in less than two minutes. After some thought, he decided to kill it. It took a lot of time and effort to raise a Boss pet. For example, the EXP needed to raise Rimuru would make any informed player’s scalp tingle. From Level 10 to Level 20, it needed more than a million experience points! This was too terrifying. Even Lorne needed a day to accumulate that amount. If another boss came, the workload would double again. Therefore, when choosing the next Boss-level pet, he had to consider carefully before making the final decision. He had to forget about a boss like the Lich. Slash! While thinking, Lorne fired an arrow that accurately struck the boss’s head and dealt an extremely terrifying critical damage. The boss let out a miserable cry after its health was depleted. After losing its origin power, its body could no longer gather. Soon, it turned into a pile of rotten bones that scattered on the ground and died completely. Crash… A large number of equipment, gold coins, and skill books dropped from the corpse of the Lich Boss. Ding! “Congratulations on killing the Boss [Lich] above your level. EXP+20,000 (+40,000)!” Ding! “Congratulations on discovering that the Lich is using undead magic on the corpse of the dragon. It seems to have an ulterior motive. Please inform the Dragon of Light, Hamut, of this discovery. You will receive its reward.” Two notifications popped up. Killing the boss alone gave Lorne 60,000 experience points. Indeed, killing bosses was the best way to get rich. In addition, he had received a special mission. He would be rewarded if he told the Dragon of Light about this. He wondered if there would be some important mission behind this. With that in mind, Lorne looked forward to it. Then… Lorne began to clean up the battlefield. The loot from a Level 30 Boss was very rich. Eight gold coins. Six Bronze items. Two pieces of Silver equipment. They were all Level 30 equipment and could be sold for a good price in the next few days. There were also some gems scattered on the ground. 17 Bronze-grade Enhancement Gems. Five Silver-grade Enhancement Gems. Because many people could not afford Silver equipment, the current Bronze-grade Enhancement Gem should have a huge market. One could be sold for 300 alliance dollars. Silver-grade Enhancement Gems could be sold for 1,000 alliance dollars. Therefore, this was a very good income. As he put all the loot into his bag… Suddenly! An ancient voice sounded, “My soul has finally been freed.” The voice came from the center of the palace. Wisps of white energy were rising from the dragon skeleton. They gradually gathered together, forming a huge dragon made of energy. “The soul of the dragon is not to be sullied. We are the guardians of the Order faction, but those abominable Liches attempted to corrode the soul of the dragon and condense the dragon skeleton into a terrifying undead bone dragon.” The dragon’s soul crouched on the dragon’s skull, giving off an ancient aura. It looked at Lorne with a friendly expression, “Human, thank you for your help. You saved my soul.” “There’s no need to be polite. As a guardian of the Order faction, I have the duty to protect the souls of the dead.” Lorne replied respectfully. Although it was only a spiritual body, it was still a giant dragon’s soul. If he could build a good relationship with it, he might even be able to obtain some rewards. Hearing this, the dragon could not help but size him up again. The next second, its eyes lit up. “You actually gained the recognition of a Great Dragon. Moreover, there seems to be an energy aura that I’m very familiar with…” “Is this what you’re talking about?” Lorne activated [Angel’s Descent], and incomparably holy power immediately spread from his body. The dragon soul bathed in the holy light and seemed to be moistened. It was much more spirited. Unfortunately, Lorne’s angel form could not last long. Moreover, the Divine Power Points were very precious. He only had 20 points per day. Therefore, he only used it for a few seconds before canceling the skill. “I didn’t expect you to obtain the recognition of the Dragon of Light.” The dragon soul looked at Lorne with satisfaction and said, “Although you are still very weak, since you have obtained the power of light, I will give you another gift.” With that, a force burst from the dragon soul and poured on Lorne. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the blessing of the Dragon Soul: Divine Power+2.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the Dragon Soul: Fire Dragon Crystal (Fragment) x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the Dragon Soul: Dragon’s Reverse Scale (Damaged) x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the recognition of the Dragon Soul: Dragon Race of Order Reputation Points+100.” A series of notifications appeared. Lorne’s divine power limit increased from 20 points to 22 points. This reward alone was enough to make him happy. However, the dragon soul was too polite and even gave him three rewards. First was the Fire Dragon Crystal. This was one of the rarest materials in the “Divine Realm”. Only the corpses of dead dragons would produce a small quantity of them. ———— [Fire Dragon Crystal] (Fragment) Grade: Legendary Introduction: A special crystal condensed from a giant dragon’s corpse. It is an extremely rare treasure among the various races, especially among the Goblins. They desire dragon crystals very much. ———— This was a legendary material. Even if it was only a tenth of a fragment, it was still worth a lot. Especially when it was in the hands of Lorne. If he used this dragon crystal fragment to merge monsters in the future, the pet he would obtain would definitely be incomparably powerful. If it inherited the dragon’s power, it would be even more incredible. In addition, there was another material reward. ———— [Dragon’s Reverse Scale] (Damaged) Grade: Legendary Introduction: The hardest dragon scale on a giant dragon. However, due to its long existence, its energy has been depleted. It is only a relatively harder dragon scale now. ———— It was indeed another legendary material. Although there was no energy left, it was hard enough and had a good effect. Lorne put the two materials away and looked at the dragon soul again. To be precise, he looked at the dragon skeleton behind it. After the dragon soul was separated, the dragon skeleton completely weathered, becoming a pile of fossils, losing its original luster. “There’s no need to be surprised. It’s not a complete dragon skeleton. It’s just some dragon bones that the Undead Lich brought out from the Doomsday Forest and forcefully assembled. That’s why it used such a strange undead magic to condense the dragon skeleton into a special bone dragon.” Sensing Lorne’s gaze, the dragon soul explained. Lorne immediately asked a key question, “Then, Sir Dragon, I want to know if there are true dragon skeletons. The mission that the Dragon of Light gave me is to bring back enough dragon souls and dragon skeletons so that the deceased dragons can bathe in the holy light and obtain true freedom.” If he could obtain the relevant information, at the very least, he would not want to wander around the forest like a headless fly. Even if he could obtain a rough direction, it would make the subsequent search more efficient. “This…” The dragon soul fell into deep thought, “The war back then was too chaotic. The entire Iron Skull City and the Icy Plains of Calamity attacked each other, and the battlefield was too vast. Coupled with the fact that too much time had passed, I can no longer remember the exact location.” “However, I still vaguely remember that Lord Walter’s dragon army was near the Lake of Death, facing the army of the undead from the Dark Abyss. Perhaps you can go in that direction…” With that, the dragon soul gradually turned transparent. Lorne quickly absorbed it with the [Dragon’s Treasure Vault]. This was a mission tool. It could preserve the dragon souls and dragon skeletons so that they could maintain their current state and not dissipate into the world. “An assembled dragon skeleton?” “Can this be used to synthesize monsters?” Lorne arrived in front of the dragon skeleton. Although it was a corpse, he could still feel the pressure from the dragon. He tried to choose this dragon skeleton as the prototype material. But then… Ding! “The target cannot be synthesized as a prototype monster!” Indeed, it could not. As the first condition for the prototype monster, it had to be a living monster. Of course, this dragon skeleton could not. As for the dragon soul, Lorne secretly used his skill once. However, the notification he received was that the target was a special mission character and could not be chosen. It was probably due to the influence of the Dragon of Light that this result was like this. Lorne did not feel any emotion because of this. After all, this was just an attempt. It did not matter if it failed. After all, he was already strong enough to crush everyone else, so there was no need to worry about it. In addition… This assembled dragon skeleton could not be considered a mission target. Therefore, in the tomb, Lorne only obtained the soul of a dragon. “Near the Lake of Death?” Lorne opened the map. The Lake of Death was at the edge of the Doomsday Forest. Only a portion of the area was located in the zone of the war ruins. If he went deeper north, he would reach Cold Desolate Dragon City and stand at the border with the Icy Plains of Calamity. He had to ignore that for the time being, it was more important to kill the monsters. Otherwise, he would not be able to complete the goal before dawn. In a valley in the Barbarian Forest, in the gathering spot of a monster. Lorne commanded his pets to fire at a swarm of disgusting forest lizards. Unlike the marsh crocodile, these monsters were only Level 23 and were easier to kill. Moreover, the forest lizards liked to gather in the shade, which made it very convenient for Lorne. While killing the monsters, Lorne also paid attention to the situation in the ruins of the war. He realized that the players of the large guilds had already entered the ruins. There were already people collecting bones and skeletons. Some guilds marked the price of the skeletons, wanting to use this opportunity to raise their reputation in the Order faction. “So rich…” Lorne smiled coldly as he watched them purchase information like maniacs. These rich people always liked to play games. Although there was no monetary conversion system in the game, they could persuade other players to work for them. Therefore, there was no such thing as fairness in this world. … “Ding! You have killed a Forest Lizard!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” In the dark valley, Lorne fought for more than an hour. During this period, he obtained a large amount of bronze coins, hundreds of lizard skins, and a large amount of low quality equipment that he could only sell. By this time, Aisha’s fusion had reached 70%. There were still four hours before dawn. It was not difficult to complete the goal. Lorne did not stop. He led the way to the other side of the hill, where a group of strange, greedy dwarfs wandered. They held stone axes and robbed all the creatures they encountered. Unfortunately, these dwarfs were only ordinary level 25 monsters. They could not kill a rich human adventurer like Lorne. On the contrary, the two pets, Small Artillery and Venom, hunted the ugly dwarfs crazily on both sides of the hill. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the material: [Heart of Greed].” As he cleaned up the battlefield, Lorne obtained an interesting material. Heart of Greed? It was a good name. It felt grand and mighty. “Let’s find a monster to merge.” Lorne was interested in the material. In any case, there was no need to keep the other party as a pet. If he really did not like it, he could release it when the time came. He put away the materials and continued forward. … Finally, after clearing a cave in the wilderness, Lorne discovered an interesting monster. They were a group of talking bat monsters. It was called the ‘Long Tongue Bat’. When he saw the monster, Lorne immediately thought of the ‘Scout’ position. If there was a flying pet in the team, it would be more efficient to find monsters in the future, and there would be no need to wander around aimlessly like this. There was not much to say. He would try to synthesize it first. Lorne grabbed a long-tongued bat and threw it into the synthesis formula. Then, he searched through his bag for the synthesized materials. There were many materials that could be synthesized. But not many were suitable. Lorne could only choose some muscles that increased its strength, and then he threw in a Heart of Greed. Ding! “A prototype material and body part materials have been confirmed. The synthesis formula is: (Long Tongue Bat) + (Jungle Panther’s Muscle) + (Heart of Greed) = (???)” “The cost is 1 gold coin. Would you like to merge?” This actually cost 1 gold coin? The cost of the merge surprised Lorne. To be honest, these materials were very low-level. The prototype monster was only an ordinary monster, but he did not expect it to have such high potential. “Merge.” Lorne quickly answered. The next moment, the system notification sounded. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining a Bronze-Grade Monster: Greedy Long Tongue Bat!” With that, the light at the scene dissipated. What appeared in front of Lorne was a huge bat that looked a little human. It was covered in thick skin and had no fur. Its human-like face was very wretched, and it looked like an overly smart merchant. As for its tail, it was very long and thin. This entire body looked very different from ordinary bats. If he wanted to let Lorne judge, he wanted to classify the creature as part of the manta ray category. The moment the Greedy Long Tongue Bat saw Lorne, it immediately said respectfully, “Oh, my dear master, thank you for your help. Please let me stay by your side and contribute my strength.” Looking at such an active pet, even Lorne could not help but be stunned. Then he shook his head and smiled. Lorne was not sure what he had created, but he had a feeling that this guy was not normal at all. ———— [Greedy Long Tongue Bat] (Contract Possible) Grade: Bronze Level: 1 (0 / 1200) HP: 1500 / 1500 Magic Attack: 150-220 Defense: 50 Superiority: 94% Introduction: A greedy long-tongued bat. Don’t let it hear your secret, or else you will have to give it enough gold coins to shut it up. ———— “The attributes are not bad.” Lorne nodded, surprised. Perhaps because the monsters in the main city had stronger basic attributes, the monsters that were created in the end also had attributes that were far superior to before. As a Silver monster, Small Artillery only had 260 Attack Points at Level 1. It only had 40 more Attack Points than the long tongue bat. It seemed that the synthesis formula was very good, this could be seen from the superiority level. Pets that reached 90% superiority were very successful examples. ‘Should I swap out Little Mantis?’ Lorne rubbed his chin in thought. Little Mantis was basically useless in battle. If the long tongue bat replaced it, the damage output of the team might not increase, but their investigative ability would definitely increase greatly. With that in mind, Lorne decided to switch pets. However, the quality of the long tongue bat in front of him was slightly inferior. Under the previous hill, Lorne had obtained a few higher quality Hearts of Greed, so he wanted to create a better quality long tongue bat. … Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining a Bronze-Grade Monster: Greedy Long Tongue Bat!” “Congratulations on obtaining an Elite Monster: Greedy Long Tongue Bat!” “Congratulations on obtaining an Ordinary Monster: Greedy Long Tongue Bat!” “…” “Congratulations on obtaining the Silver Monster: Greedy Long Tongue Bat!” After more than an hour, Lorne finally created a long tongue bat that he was satisfied with. The moment he had the scout, Lorne had been eager to test its effect. The long tongue bats that he created earlier were released and seemed to have smelled gold coins as they rushed into the ruins. Then, one great tragedy happened after the other. As they listened to the secrets of the monsters and players, many were soon blackmailed. “Hey, Master. There’s a pack of jungle wolves 300 meters to the east of the forest.” “Kekeke, this is too interesting. There’s a group of sleeping red-spotted pigs at the western hilltop.” “Oh, there are five dwarfs making soup 200 meters ahead.” “My god, there are more than a hundred small spiders 500 meters to the right.” “…” In the following period of time, Lorne’s efficiency in killing monsters was very high. All of this came from the information of the long tongue bat. As a flying scout, it had a unique advantage in finding monsters from above. Although it was limited by the game system, the maximum altitude of the long tongue bat was limited to ten meters. That did not affect its investigation. Because it was a bat, the long tongue bat could fly quickly in the forest and understand the surrounding situation. When it found a suitable target, Lorne would lead his pets to kill the monster packs. This reduced the time wasted in finding monsters. … Soon, it was 10:30 pm. Lorne fought monsters in the Barbarian Forest for the entire day. Apart from eating and dealing with his physical needs, he spent the rest of the day in high-intensity combat. Now, he had finally achieved his goal today. A million experience points had been accumulated. At this moment, the last portion of the experience points was being poured into Aisha’s body. Fusion Progress: 95% Fusion Progress: 96% Fusion Progress: 97% Fusion Progress: 98% Fusion Progress: 99% Fusion Progress: 100% When he injected a million experience points… An extremely pleasant reminder finally sounded in Lorne’s ears. Ding! “Congratulations to your pet [Night Elf Aisha] for completing the fusion of the crystal heart and regaining its memory.” Ding! “Congratulations on completing the first stage of the mission [Holy Angel’s Resurrection]. You have received the blessing of the Holy Angel: Luck+5, Free Attribute Points+50.” Ding! “Congratulations on entering the second stage of your mission [Holy Angel’s Resurrection]. Please bring Aisha to the elves’ land and let her receive the nourishment of the Ancient Tree of Life to become the purest elemental body.” Three consecutive notifications appeared on Lorne’s interface. After completing the first phase of the mission, Lorne received a nice reward of 5 Luck and 50 Free Attribute Points. It had to be said that the Holy Angel was really generous. In addition, Lorne automatically accepted the second phase of the mission. The mission requirement was to bring Aisha to the elves’ land to receive the nourishment of the Tree of Life. This was a fatal mission requirement. After all, Lorne had abducted the Elven Princess. After doing such a thing, he still dared to enter their territory to do a mission? Was he courting death? As he thought this, the next moment, a new notification sounded. Ding! “It is detected that your pet has a high-level consciousness. As its master, you can enter and check the life experiences of the contracted pet to increase the affinity between the two sides.” High-level consciousness? Lorne saw an important term. From the looks of it, the long tongue bat should have a low-level consciousness. After all, he had not received such a reminder when he subdued it. “It’s good to go and see the life of the elves. I wonder if it’s so exciting.” Lorne looked forward to it. Then, he chose to view the memory. The next second, with a flash of light, Lorne reached an empty space. There were countless images around him that recorded Aisha’s life at various ages. “As expected of a beautiful elf world…” When he checked Aisha’s childhood memories, Lorne could not help but sigh. In his eyes, he saw a beautiful world. There was the most beautiful forest, the most unique tree house, the fluorescent path, the vine bridge, and various huge plants. As the most favored elf maiden in the entire race, Aisha’s childhood was so perfect that it felt dreamlike. But by the time she was 14, everything had changed. A group of terrifying Dark Elves had entered the land of the Night Elves. They had once been a member of this race and had contributed to everything here. But now, they were personally destroying the home that they had protected. It was because of this sudden war that the beautiful homes of the Night Elves were destroyed. Moreover, such battles began to revolve around the Night Elves. Sixteen years later, which was recently, the Dark Elves attacked again, launching a fatal assault. Then, everything progressed until now. “Elves really live long. They’re still so young at 30 years old.” Lorne could not help but marvel at Aisha’s age. Then… His expression suddenly changed. “What’s that?!” Lorne’s eyes widened as his gaze focused on a strange scene. This was a scene that was not part of Aisha’s life. It was like the end of the world. All the mountains were destroyed, and the rising smoke covered the entire sky. “This is the memory of the Holy Angel?” That was possible. After all, it was impossible for Aisha to experience such a terrifying thing at such a young age. In that case, could it be that the cause of the death of the Holy Angel was recorded? One had to know that the Holy Angel was an existence with the highest combat strength in the world. Even she had died in the war. It was too curious. “Let me see the glory of the Holy Angel.” Lorne did not think too much. He only took a deep breath and entered the memory. At that moment, a powerful attraction appeared, sucking Lorne into the world of memory. When he regained his vision, Lorne found himself standing on a dark land. The world before him was in ruins. Wherever his gaze landed, there was no intact land. Everything in this world seemed to have been bombarded by missiles. It was silent and lifeless. At that moment, there was a rumble in the sky. Lorne looked up and saw two figures fighting in the sky. One was covered in scarlet blood energy, and the other was a six-winged angel who emitted an extremely holy power of light. The battle between them seemed to have reached its most intense state. An incomparably grand light enveloped the entire world. After an earth-shattering explosion, the two figures in the sky landed in one direction. The angel fell toward Lorne. The black, blood-red figure plummeted towards the border of the land. Standing there, Lorne could clearly see a sparkling angel fall nearby. However, when he walked over to investigate, he found a crystal heart and a black bloodstained feather in the ruins. “It’s really her, Holy Angel Gabriel…” Lorne took a deep breath as he looked at the destroyed land. Although he had only seen a fragment of the past, the scene before him was enough to make him remember it for the rest of his life. The top forces of this world were too powerful. They truly had the power to destroy the entire world. If this game really had the ability to materialize, then these powerful angels and demons would subvert the civilization on Earth. Even the most powerful nuclear weapons on Earth could not compare to the power they unleashed. But that did not make him feel afraid. On the contrary, he was very excited. He did not care about such a possibility for the time being. However, he wanted to master this power in the game very much. “I wonder if the players will be as powerful as them after reaching Level 100…” With a wistful glance, Lorne withdrew from Aisha’s memory. … Ding! “Due to the foundation of the contract between you and the Night Elf, Aisha, the affinity level is 100 points. The current affinity level is [Acquaintance].” Ding! “Due to the Monster Merging Simulator, the basic affinity between you and the Night Elf, Aisha, is 100,000 points. The current affinity level is [Idolization].” Ding! “Warning: The affinity of the pet will affect their performance in battle. A high affinity will stimulate the potential of the pet and unleash power beyond its attributes. Therefore, please maintain a good relationship with your pet.” As soon as he left Aisha’s memory, Lorne heard a series of notifications. When he heard that the affinity between him and Aisha had reached 100,000 points, Lorne was extremely shocked. This notification had not appeared among all the monsters that he had created previously, and there was no affinity system between him and the previous pets. But now, not only did this system appear, but the initial value had reached 100,000 points! This was too terrifying. After all, he had helped Mayra so much previously, but until now, the affinity between the two sides had not exceeded 1,000 points. The difference between 1,000 and 100,000 was 100 times. If not for the Monster Merging Simulator, perhaps Lorne would not have been able to increase his affinity to this level. “Is it because of the high-level consciousness as well?” Lorne thought for a moment, then was overcome with joy. No matter what the reason was, right now, he and Aisha had 100,000 affinity points. This affinity not only increased Aisha’s strength greatly, but it could also do things that surpassed friendship. Previously, Lorne had said that “Divine Realm” was 100% realistic, almost like a real world. In this world, as long as the game progress reached a certain level, the wisdom of monsters and humans would be no different. Therefore, there was such a humanized setting. As long as the players and NPCs had sufficient affinity, they could do anything, including those shameful acts. However, in order to do that, the affinity between the two sides had to at least reach the level of [Close Friend]. Lorne had thought it impossible, but now that idea was wavering. “Who are you guys?” The elven girl looked curiously at the surrounding pets. Small Artillery and Venom could not help but take two steps back, their bodies involuntarily feeling fear. Perhaps he was afraid of the aura of the Holy Angel in her body. “Are you ugly monsters also followers of our master?” The elf girl did not like the two undeads and the not-so-cute long-tongued bat. It was Rimuru on the ground who looked at her curiously that caught her attention. Aisha bent down and picked up the Slime King from the ground. The little guy did not resist and just stayed quietly in Aisha’s hand. “Looks like slimes are quite popular.” Lorne walked up and smiled, “Aisha, let Master examine you… Oh, no, check your attributes.” “Yes, Master.” The elven girl looked up at Lorne obediently. The relationship between NPCs and players was very simple. As long as they had a good affinity with each other, they would do whatever they could. Now that there was 100,000 affinity points between Lorne and Aisha, they were only one step away from becoming close friends. The two interacted intimately. It could be seen that this Night Elf Princess, who should have been high up in the air, was enjoying Lorne’s touch very much. There was deep trust towards Lorne in her silver eyes. ———— [Night Elf] (Aisha) Quality: ??? Class: Phantom Assassin (Legendary) Status: Rank 1 Level: 1 (0/10,000) HP: 62,000 (Master’s HP × 10) Physical Attack: 2252-3664 (Master’s Magic Attack × 4) Physical Defense: 854 (Master’s Defense × 2) Superiority: 100% Owner: Tyrant Skill: [Phantom Backstab]: Flicker to the back of the target. The first attack will definitely be a critical hit and increase attack speed by 200%. Duration: 2 seconds. Skill: [Traceless Phantom]: An Invisibility-type skill. User can be immune to low damage. It will not lose invisibility and will increase movement speed by 100%. Skill: [Slow Dagger]: All basic attack skills will reduce the target’s movement speed by 15%. Skill: [Phantom Massacre]: For every target killed, the cooldown of the [Traceless Phantom] skill will be reset, and the next attack will be a critical hit. Skill: [Absolute Dodge]: There is a 25% chance of dodging any attack. Skill: [Elf Companion]: When elves sign a contract with other species, their attributes will be affected by their master’s attributes. Introduction: A Night Elf Princess with powerful innate abilities. She is a Legendary-Grade Phantom Assassin. ———— “My god…” Looking at Aisha’s attributes panel, Lorne felt dizzy. Although her health was not as high as Rimuru’s, Aisha had an Attack limit of 3,600! Even a Level 20 Silver pet, “Small Artillery”, had less than half of Aisha’s attack power. This was ridiculous. If he did not consider the effect of level suppression, any one of her attacks could kill an ordinary Level 20 monster. If she used her skill, Aisha could instantly deal tens of thousands of damage. This was a level that no pet in Lorne’s team could do, and it was also a damage that no player or monster could withstand. However, that was not Aisha’s most terrifying power. Her true terror lay in the skill [Phantom Massacre]. As long as Aisha could kill a target, she could stay invisible indefinitely. Think about it. If she killed her way into the enemy archer’s ranks, she could kill them with a single slash and keep herself invisible. In such a situation, Aisha alone could quickly slay all of the non-tank class enemies. Just the thought of it was terrifying. Lorne had not expected to obtain such a terrifying pet at this time. Now that he had an Elven Princess, he had to teach her well. “Aisha, Master will help you raise your level.” Lorne still had some experience that could help Aisha raise her level. “Really?” Aisha blinked her large gem-like eyes, looking very adorable as she said, “Due to the contract, the elf bond made me lose my original strength. I thought it would be very difficult for me to recover my strength.” “Of course.” Lorne caressed her head gently. Although the experience requirement was very high, it was still relatively easy to raise her level to 10. Without thinking, he poured the tens of thousands of experience points he had into Aisha. Ding! “Congratulations! Your pet (Aisha) has successfully reached Level 2. Obtained: Skill Points+3.” “Congratulations!” “Congratulations!” There was not many experience points left on Lorne, so he only raised Aisha’s level to 4. Unlike other pets, Aisha’s attributes did not change. After increasing her level, she only obtained three Skill Points. Due to the fact that she was Level 4, there were already 12 Skill Points on her interface. Without hesitation, Lorne helped her distribute the Skill Points. Aisha was already very powerful, and high-level skills could allow her damage output to undergo a qualitative change. As for the attributes… In order to raise Aisha’s attributes, Lorne needed to raise his own stats. This matter could not change for the time being. After all, he was wearing only a Silver Set now, and it was difficult for him to level up in a short time. “Looks like I need to change it a little in the future.” In the past, in order to preserve his life, Lorne had distributed points with the ratio of 3 Constitution and 2 Agility. But now that he had Aisha, there had to be a change. After some consideration, it seemed that 3 Constitution, 4 Intelligence, and 3 Agility was a good ratio. … “Come, Aisha, let master help you change some new equipment.” Lorne smiled meaningfully. Affinity was to let players integrate into the game so that everyone would forget that this was a virtual world. When one had a high affinity, they would naturally obtain the benefits that belonged to the players. For example, after reaching the level of [Idolization], he could personally change equipment for pets. Therefore, Lorne led Aisha into the grove and personally equipped her with several excellent leather armor. While changing, the hot-blooded young man, Lorne, could not control his emotions and did something bold to the elf, so he was warned by the system in the next second. Ding! “Game Announcement: Aisha believes that your relationship is not deep enough for her to progress further. Your frivolous actions have caused her affinity with you to change: -1.” “Affinity: -1.” “Affinity: -1.” “…” “I’m innocent. I just wanted to check Aisha’s body…” Lorne wanted to cry. Helping Aisha put on her hood, Lorne began leading the elf girl toward the expeditionary army camp. … “Ding! You have killed a Jungle Wolf. EXP+45 (+90).” “Ding! You have killed a Forest Bull…” “Ding!” “Ding!” On the way, Lorne did not let go of the opportunity to earn experience. Aisha now had extremely powerful strength, but because her level was too low, she could not join such a battle. In order to achieve a greater victory in the ruins of the war, Lorne had to quickly raise Aisha’s level. It would be best if she reached Level 20. Only then could the level suppression affect Aisha less. In addition, during this period of time, Lorne kept an eye on the Dragon Soul Compass. Unfortunately, along the way, the Dragon Soul Compass was still, and no dragon soul appeared around it. … Not long ago, in Iron Skull City… After the large guilds discovered that there were potions that could neutralize the poison, they immediately sent people to find the antidote in Iron Skull City. But soon, they spat out blood from anger. It was because the entire main city’s antidote had been bought. Not only that, but even the main city’s Alchemist Association did not sell antidotes. They even publicly stated that all the antidotes in the Alchemist Association had their own distributors. The guild would no longer sell any individuals or organizations. When they heard this news, all the people from the large guilds gritted their teeth. Then, the entire chat channel and forum were occupied by the purchasing agents of large guilds. “A large amount of antidote requests to be bought. I am from the [Blazing Fire Guild], and the price we offer is high.” “I would like to purchase an antidote for 3 silver coins per bottle. The quantity is unlimited!” “I would like to make a stable purchase. 3 silver coins and 10 bronze coins for one. Please contact me if you have stock.” “[Holy Light Guild] offers 3 silver coins each.” … At the same time, in the expeditionary army camp, the players here were even crazier. “Without the antidote, there’s no way to enter the ruins of the war to kill monsters. Please sell them to us in private. It’s not easy for us solo players to come here!” “Did the Silver Snow Guild get the inside information? They monopolized the antidotes in Iron Skull City!” “That player called Super Rich also has a lot of potions. He’s earning like crazy.” “I’m so jealous!” The entire regional chat channel was flooded. After experiencing the [Dark Corrosion] effect, they began to purchase antidotes crazily. But there was a shortage of potions. In order to ensure that their people could participate in the missions in the ruins of the war in the future, large guilds bought many potions. In such an intense market, it was too difficult for solo players to buy potions. Especially at this time, the Silver Snow Guild directly stopped selling the antidotes. “I’m sorry, everyone. The antidotes of our Silver Snow Guild have been sold out. There’s nothing left.” “It’s sold out, it’s sold out.” “Everyone, go buy it from Super Rich. We don’t have any more.” At the selling location of the Silver Snow Guild, the beautiful women helplessly persuaded the players who came to ask to buy it to leave. After everyone left, they found Twinkle Rose, who was killing monsters in the forest. “Sister President, we sold 80,000 potions from our warehouse. We made a total of 2,400 gold coins!” A beautiful player in charge of the finances calculated and said, “However, did we set the price too low?” “It’s indeed too low. I heard that Super Rich set the price at 4 silver coins at the beginning. Later, his business became too popular, and he even raised the price to 5 silver coins. He immediately made a killing.” The beautiful archer beside her said seriously. Pfft— Twinkle Rose, who was waving her silver sword, nearly spat out blood. Whose sisters were they? “We’re doing this to build up our reputation in the future. Otherwise, if everyone thinks we’re profiteers, who would be willing to join our guild?” “But doesn’t our guild only accept young ladies?” “You! Come to my room tonight!” “No, leader, I can’t stand it…” “Brothers, there’s no more potion. Don’t surround me.” “I really don’t have any left. Brother, believe me…” “Speak properly. Put away your saber first.” In the other direction of the camp, Super Rich was surrounded by a group of players. However, without the potion, he could only explain to everyone one by one. It took him a lot of effort to persuade the customers to leave. After everyone left, Super Rich calculated his gains. This time, he had collected a total of 200,000 bottles of potions from the shops in Iron Skull City, half of which was given to the Silver Snow Guild. The remaining 100,000 bottles of potion were shipped here by more than a hundred people. Because the price of the potion was much higher than that of the beautiful women of the Silver Snow Guild, the final income was much higher. Excluding the cost, the final net profit should be 4,500 gold coins. This was equivalent to more than 20 million alliance dollars. Although this money was nothing to Super Rich, such a busy experience made Super Rich feel like he had returned to several decades ago. Didn’t he run around like this when he was still a distributor? Looking at the gold coins in his bag, Super Rich felt a sense of accomplishment that he had not felt in a long time. Unfortunately… If not for the fact that those large guilds liked to bully others, he would definitely have been able to raise the price of the potion to 6 silver coins, or even 10 silver coins! “It’s all thanks to you, leader. Otherwise, I wouldn’t have made so much money.” Super Rich could not help but sigh. He could have such a result all because of the information of Tyrant. If not for this, he would not have known about this business opportunity. What was Leader Tyrant doing? Just as Super Rich thought this, suddenly! His gaze landed on the nearby forest. At the edge of the forest, a familiar figure walked out. It was the leader he thanked in his heart. He quickly greeted him. “Leader!” Super Rich ran up excitedly and said, “You’re finally here. Those players are crazy. My potions have been snatched up.” Lorne saw him packing up and could not help but ask, “Why are you only closing your stall now?” “In order to sell them at a high price, I chose to sell them in batches. Otherwise, I would have run out of stock within the first few hours.” Super Rich had an excellent business sense and knew how to use the same goods to earn the most benefits. Therefore, there was no need for Lorne to think too much. Now, he only needed to follow his method to obtain enough profits. With that in mind, Lorne did not hesitate and immediately set up his stall in an area of the expeditionary army camp. Goods: Antidote Potion Price: 3 Silver Coins Quantity: 100,000 bottles First, he took out a portion of the potions to rile up the market. Then, he opened the regional chat of the expeditionary army camp and spoke. “Friends of Iron Skull City, in order to repay society, I have spent a large sum of money to send a batch of antidotes from Iron Skull City. If you want to purchase them, please arrive at the location of the stall as soon as possible to purchase them. The price is lower than 3 silver coins per bottle. The amount is limited, so the sale will end immediately.” “Friends of Iron Skull City…” “Friends of Iron Skull City…” Three silver coins per bottle? The players thought that they had misheard. However, when they saw the identity of the person who shouted, they immediately went crazy. The person selling the potion was actually Tyrant who had been famous recently. He had divine equipment on him, but he dared to come here so brazenly? “Gosh, this is going to be fun.” “Those large guilds are looking for him. He actually has the time to sell equipment!” “There’s going to be a good show.” “I’ll buy the potions first. Otherwise, I won’t be able to buy it later.” “Only selling it for 3 silver coins per set? What a kind-hearted merchant.” “Brothers, let’s hurry up. When the people from the large guilds come, they might take all the potions away.” After the players received the news, they rushed to the target location. Compared to the super-rich ones who had increased their prices in succession, Tyrant, who only sold for 3 silver coins, was the kindest person in the world. The players rushed over. They bought a few bottles and prepared the items they needed for the next few days. Then, the people from the large guilds arrived. They bought more than 10,000 bottles of potions, emptying the remaining stock. The remaining players who came later could only stand on the spot and sigh. At that moment, Lorne’s second batch of potions quickly arrived. There was another 100,000 doses. The price increased to 4 silver coins. Seeing this scene, all the players cursed. In the previous second, the potion was only three silver coins, but in the next second, the potion was four silver coins! This rate of price increase was even more detestable than that shameless Super Rich. It was no wonder that Super Rich had been standing behind Tyrant. It turned out that snakes and rats were in cahoots! However, although everyone was cursing Lorne’s actions, their actions were very honest. All of them ran to the stall with silver coins and began to purchase the potions crazily. On the Internet, people were very fierce, but in reality, they were submissive. This was a fact. Under the cover of large capital, ordinary players like them could not resist at all. If they did not buy Lorne’s potion, they would not be able to farm monsters in the ruins of the war. They would have wasted three days of traveling. This was a result that no player was willing to accept. Soon, 100,000 potions were sold out. Lorne did not stop. He put down another 100,000 bottles of antidote, this time for 5 silver coins. Seeing that the price was rising again, the players became even crazier. He did not know what they were thinking. It seemed that the more expensive the potion was, the crazier they would be and the more they would buy. Seeing this scene, Super Rich was the most knowledgeable. When his career had just begun, he did such a thing as well. Those who bought potions crazily did not necessarily need this potion. They were just a group of “stockholders”. If they bought it at a lower commodity price now, after the price of the potions in the market increased, they could sell the goods to earn a profit. This was no different from speculating. Such a situation occurred mainly because of the importance of the antidote to the War Ruins dungeon, and they knew very well that there was almost no stock in Iron Skull City. Therefore, in the current period of time, as long as there were potions, they would definitely be able to earn money. … “Sister Guild Leader, look. Tyrant is playing the same trick as Super Rich.” “They’re also selling antidotes, but they made 30% more than us…” In the direction of the Silver Snow Guild, a group of beautiful players looked enviously in Lorne’s direction. Twinkle Rose, who had returned to the camp to replenish her supplies, could not help but clench her fists. She had been too careless., way too careless. How could she have sold all the potions for three silver coins? If she had not sold them all, the net profit from keeping them until now would have at least doubled. That was close to ten million dollars. She could have bought many branded bags.?<i>Waah…</i> Because many players saw the potential of the antidote potion, they bought it in large quantities. Before long, the third batch of potions was sold out. These three batches of potions had a total of 300,000 bottles, bringing him an income of 12,000 gold coins. To be honest, even Super Rich was shocked by the speed at which he made money. It had only been three days since he started operating. In just three days, he had earned 50 to 60 million net income. This efficiency was comparable to a large corporation with tens of thousands of people. This was not all of Leader Tyrant’s income. Super Rich knew very well that there were still 300,000 Purification Crystals in Tyrant’s inventory. The value of this batch of goods was much higher than the potions. If he sold all of them, he could earn at least 200 million. … At this moment, Lorne put up the last batch of potions he had. The price was then 10 silver coins! Instantly, the entire scene was in an uproar. “F*ck, 10 silver coins? Why don’t you rob me instead?” “The price doubled while I was drinking water?!” “This is too f*cking ridiculous!” “You call this giving back to society? Pfft!” “Unscrupulous merchant!” “This kind of antidote only costs one silver coin per bottle in the shop of Iron Skull City. If you sell it for 10 silver coins now, won’t your conscience hurt at 10 times the price?” “Even robbing a bank can’t get as much money…” All the players’ emotions exploded. They collectively condemned Lorne for his immoral behavior. But at that moment, Lorne spoke in the chat, explaining that this batch of potions was the last batch of antidotes he had and that there would not be too many in the next few days. Therefore, they had to buy it as soon as possible! Hearing this news, the players continued cursing incessantly. However, countless players came to the scene to trade with Lorne. … “F*ck, I’ve never eaten such an expensive medicine in real life…” “Being exploited by large capitalists in reality and being exploited by Tyrant in the game, it’s really hard for people to live…” “You unscrupulous merchant, quickly give me 500 bottles of potion!” “This kind of person is really detestable. Boss, I want 1,000 bottles…” They cursed as they traded. In fact, compared to them, Lorne was not a profiteer. Because after a while, this batch of potions bought at the price of 10 silver coins per bottle would definitely be sold to other players at a higher price. Therefore, the real profiteers were them. … 10 silver coins for a bottle of potion was a very high price, so the selling speed decreased a lot. It took him an hour to sell all of them. Lorne made 10,000 gold coins. At this moment, there were no antidotes left in his bag. However, he still opened the regional chat channel. “Hey~ Brothers and sisters of Iron Skull City, in order to let everyone carry out the mission in the ruins of the war in peace, I have once again spent a huge sum of money to transport a batch of antidotes from Iron Skull City. Those who want to buy them can go to this location (click for coordinates). The quantity is limited, so the sale can stop at any moment.” Damn!!! Upon hearing this information, all the players who had bought the antidote surrounded Lorne in fury. Because he had said that this was the last batch of antidotes, everyone endured the expensive price and bought these potions. But now, Tyrant was selling another batch. Wouldn’t the players who had accumulated a large stock of potions lose so much that they would not have a penny left after this? “Damn you, didn’t you say that was the last batch of antidotes?” “That’s right. To think that we trusted you so much!” “Evil merchant, return my hard-earned money!” “Return my hard-earned money!” A group of players began to question Lorne, trying to use a collective voice to pressure him to return the silver coins he had cheated. However, Lorne calmly organized his items. “Friends, I’m not lying to you. That is indeed the last batch of antidote I have.” “Then why are you selling more potions?” A player was furious. “Please look carefully, this is not an antidote,” Lorne smiled as he said. Then, he sent the information picture of the Purification Crystal to the chat. When they saw the information, all the “stockholders” felt despair. This tool was even more effective than the antidote! One crystal could ensure that a player was not corroded by darkness for seven days. In this case, wouldn’t the antidote in their hands be unsellable? Without these Purification Crystals, they could still sell these potions again for 11-12 silver coins in the next few days. But now, it was impossible. Not to mention a dozen silver coins, it was hard to say if they could even keep the price of 10 silver coins. If the number of Purification Crystals in Tyrant’s hands was large, the value of the antidote would plummet. At that time, it might drop to three silver coins or even lower. As for them, the players who had accumulated a large amount of potions, they would lose everything. … “30 silver coins for a Purification Crystal. It can last for seven days and prevent the Dark Corrosion from affecting you. This seems to be much more cost-effective than the potion.” “I want one!” “Give me three!” “Boss, give me ten!” “…” In the entire expeditionary army camp, there were 100,000 players in the first batch alone. After another three days of travel, many players in the main city had already reached Level 20. They had set off two days ago and were gradually reaching the ruins of the war. Up until now, the second batch of Level 20 players had also arrived. Therefore, there were at least 200,000 players in the current expeditionary army camp. In the next few days, this number would multiply. Therefore, there was no need for Lorne to worry about sales. These items would be sold out soon. As expected, the Purification Crystals worth 30 silver coins were sold out in a short period of time. The Purification Crystals brought him 30,000 gold coins. The previous antidote sale had given him 22,000 gold coins. In addition, there were 200,000 Purification Crystals in Lorne’s pocket. After selling all these crystals, Lorne would really become a true billionaire overnight. It would be wonderful. “Heavens, Guild Leader, this Tyrant has already made 100 million, right?” The beautiful archer from the Silver Snow Guild said in an infatuated tone. The other beauties also casted envious looks at him. Although all of them were born into famous families, they were still young and wished to have such an experience. This way, they would have the right to speak in the family and reject the marriage arranged by the family. Twinkle Rose also looked enviously at the stall in front but said stubbornly, “Don’t envy him. Our reputation is much better than his.” … Super Rich could not help but mutter, “Leader, you’re too kind-hearted.” A Purification Crystal that could last for seven days was only sold for 30 silver coins. This was too kind. If it were his own goods, this product would definitely be sold at 40 silver coins. After all, the average price of the poison potion could reach 5 silver coins. This crystal was equivalent to seven bottles of potion. Although it was expensive to sell for 40 silver coins, those large guilds would still buy them. “It is quite cheap indeed.” Lorne felt the same way. He did not think of himself as a qualified capitalist. After all, he was not at the level where he wanted to suck everyone dry. After nearly two hours, the second batch of potions was sold out. At this moment, there were still about 100,000 Purification Crystals in Lorne’s bag. This time, he did not choose to hoard them, but instead set them up in the stall for 30 silver coins. After selling these crystals, he went offline to count the money. He had killed monsters for the entire day, it was time to relax. While Lorne was planning this, suddenly! A team pushed through the crowd and walked out. It was a guild member from [World Destruction]. Hundreds of them pushed aside the surrounding players who were buying potions. One of the players pointed at Lorne and said, “Deputy Guild Leader, he was the one who purposely cheated us of 5,000 gold coins!” Upon hearing that, Lorne glanced at him. It turned out to be the second-hand merchant who had snatched the antidote earlier. Seeing that the potion bought at 10 silver coins was about to cause them a severe loss, he actually called the [World Destruction Guild] behind him to come find Lorne. This was interesting. “10 silver coins for a bottle of antidote. You are truly daring.” The player who brought them here arrogantly walked to the stall and looked at Lorne in disdain, “Tyrant, I believe you don’t want to make a big deal out of this, and you don’t want to provoke our World Destruction Guild. In that case, we’ll give you a chance. As long as you sell these Purification Crystals to us for 20 silver coins, our guild can let bygones be bygones. How about it?” As the Deputy Guild Leader of the World Destruction Guild, Cross Fire was confident enough. Even if he was facing a famous player like Lorne, he still showed a domineering attitude. “30 silver coins, not a cent less.” Lorne did not budge. “Do you have nothing to say for purposely scamming the funds of our guild?” Cross Fire’s expression immediately turned unfriendly. “In other words, you’re calling this a fraud?” Lorne frowned. This World Destruction Guild really knew how to cause trouble. Even if they lost money, they should blame their poor judgment. How could they come looking for him? “Leader, it’s them. When I sold the antidote earlier, they forced me not to raise the price. If I don’t behave, they’ll use force.” Super Rich whispered. However, Lorne did not care at all. His expression even turned cold, “I had never forced anyone to buy a potion from me. It’s best if you guys can understand the situation.” “Oh? Does that mean that our World Destruction Guild is in the wrong?” Cross Fire smiled coldly as he unsheathed his machete, “Friend, I’m discussing this with you nicely now. If you really don’t know your place, don’t blame us for being rude!” “Being rude?” Hearing this, the corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up. He looked at Cross Fire and smiled meaningfully, “Since you say so, I’ll change my rule.” “Have you thought it through?” “No, no, no.” Lorne shook his head, then stuck out a finger, “I’ve decided that all players from the World Destruction Guild who want to buy the Purification Crystals will pay one gold coin each!” “F*ck you!” Cross Fire was enraged as he slashed with the machete in his hand. However, Lorne easily dodged it. “Attack, kill Tyrant and make him drop all his crystals!” Cross Fire lost his temper and issued the order to kill. For a moment, hundreds of players from the World Destruction Guild waved their weapons. It was a spectacular sight. “Leader, run. You have too many gold coins on you. I’ll help you block them!” Super Rich stepped forward and stood in front of Lorne. Although his level and fighting skills were pathetic, he was abnormally heroic at this moment. “Run?” Behind him, the corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up. He was not moved by the hundreds of enemies before him. Instead, he took out his short staff. Then, he waved the Sage’s Wisdom Short Staff in his hand. “Come out, Demon Hounds from Hell!” As soon as he finished speaking, a huge magic circle appeared on the ground, and hundreds of hideous hellhounds appeared. … “Gosh! Where are the monsters coming from?” “Why are there so many summoned monsters?!” “Is this Tyrant’s skill? Oh my god!” “No wonder Tyrant was not worried. He is already so powerful!” “Are you sure this is a Summoner?” “I’m also a Summoner. Why can I only summon one wild wolf?” The surrounding players were all shocked. The players from the World Destruction Guild were also shocked by the scene before them. They clearly had the advantage in numbers, but now, there were more than two hundred monsters. They had actually become the disadvantaged party. Fortunately, these hellhounds were ordinary in strength. With a few slashes, the monsters would be quickly wiped out. But as they thought so, suddenly! A black figure appeared in the crowd. In the eyes of a Priest player from the World Destruction Guild, a figure in a cloak flashed past. Her slender arms swept across elegantly, and then two damage numbers appeared above the player’s head. -1345 -2800 (Critical) (Ordinary Attack+Backstab) instantly dealt 4,000+damage. At the current stage, most players, including Warriors, would rarely have more than 4,000 health points if they did not put all their attribute points into constitution. Therefore, he was naturally killed instantly. After killing the other party, the cloaked girl entered stealth mode again. Then, a player beside her was directly killed by a critical hit. -2800 (Critical) -2910 (Critical) -2790 (Critical) -2870 (Critical) -2810 The cloaked girl’s skills were used like they had no cooldown. She walked in the darkness forever, and every strike dealt critical damage. At this stage, in order to increase their damage output, the cloth-armor class professional players would not increase their defense. Only an unspecialized Priest would do something so silly. However, because of this, their health points were only about 1,500. Some did not even have 1,000. Facing the damage of nearly 3,000 points from Aisha, these people had no room to fight back. 5 kills! 10 kills! 15 kills! 20 kills! Almost in an instant, Aisha transformed into a phantom that weaved through all the enemies and used her sharp blades to cut off the heads of a large number of players. Seeing this scene, all the surrounding players widened their eyes. “My god, I see over 2,800 damage!” “How can there be such a powerful existence!” “What was that? It disappeared in an instant!” “Could it be a ghost?” “Why is that shadow always dealing critical damage!” … “Deputy Guild Leader!” “An assassin is hiding near us. All the long-range attackers in our team have died!” A group of Shield Warrior players looked at the souls of their teammates who fell behind them, but there was nothing they could do. The assassin’s skill was too powerful. It could actually remain invisible indefinitely! “Damn it!” Cross Fire was furious, “Forget about these hellhounds. Let’s rush over and kill Tyrant first!” When fighting a Summoner like Lorne, it was always best to kill him. As long as he was killed, his pets would automatically disappear. Otherwise, in such a situation, all of them would have been killed by that assassin pet. “Kill!” Under the command of the ‘Cross Fire’, all the players of the World Destruction Guild rushed forward. Dozens of them pointed their blades at Lorne. However, before they could get close, black arrows set the area on fire. Swish! Swish! Swish! Countless arrows fell like mad. At the same time, a green rain of arrows covered everyone’s path. -1155 -1099 -1217 -1223… High damage numbers popped up on the heads of the players. Their health points instantly decreased to more than 2,000 points. This level of damage made the surrounding players shocked. These were all Level 20 elite players, there were tens of them! Tyrant had reduced their health by half in such a short time! Moreover, the attack speed of the two archer pets in front of him was very fast. Two arrows shot out from their hands every second, harvesting the Warrior players in front of them. In addition, there was an assassin hiding in the darkness. The sharp blades in her hands were like the scythe of the Death God. Every time she waved them, she would take a life. Seeing this scene, the surrounding players even forgot to breathe. Only at this moment did they truly see how terrifying a player equipped with a divine equipment was. … “Damn it, I’ll kill you even if I die!” The eyes of ‘Cross Fire’ shone with a ferocious light. The battle had just begun for less than a minute, but he had already lost dozens of elite players. Not to mention that everyone had lost a level, they had also been sent back to the main city. If he wanted to come to this place again, it would take at least three days. To the World Destruction Guild, this was a huge loss! If he did not kill this culprit, it would be hard to resolve the hatred in his heart! Cross Fire went crazy. He raised his machete and charged at Tyrant. With three Silver-grade equipment on him, he could definitely hack that hateful guy into mincemeat! “Hey, big face, you can’t be disrespectful to our great master!” In the sky, the long-tongued bat swooped down. A ball of thick fog emerged from its body, and twenty small bats spread out. They surrounded the head of the Cross Fire and interfered with his vision. This was originally a long-tongued bat’s escape skill, but it was also very effective in interfering with enemies. Cross Fire immediately lost his sense of direction. Before he could get rid of the annoying bats, he realized that his health was decreasing rapidly. Pew! Pew! Pew! -1001 -1017 -993 Three arrows landed on him, instantly taking all his health points. Cross Fire blacked out as his body fell to the ground, then turned into a ball of white light. It was ridiculous! One had to know that the Cross Fire had three Silver-grade items on him, but he was also instantly killed?! It had taken him three days to reach the current location! Here, he was sent back to the main city before he could even dig up the skeleton of an Iron Skull City’s Warrior. Who could stand this? “Boss!” Beside him, the Shield Warrior player who had been protecting Cross Fire was also stunned. However, before he could think too much, he was killed by a series of arrows. Around him, the other players also encountered the same thing. Countless arrows poured down, and the players from the World Destruction Guild were all killed. From the beginning of the battle to the end, Lorne had not moved. The entire battle was completed by the pets. What surprised him the most was Aisha’s combat strength. Although she was only Level 6, she dealt the most terrifying damage in the team. All of this was thanks to her 3660+ Attack points. Even if the damage was reduced by 60%, she could still control the entire battlefield. “Master, it’s because I am too weak. Otherwise, those warriors would not have been able to reach you.” Aisha came to Lorne and lowered her head in self-blame. “It’s not your fault. You’ve only been awake for a short time. It’s already very impressive that you can do this.” With a soft smile, Lorne raised a hand to remove Aisha’s hood and caress her silver hair. Aisha stood rooted to the ground, staring at Lorne. Only when she realized that she was being stared at did she close her eyes, shyly enjoying the warmth of the moment. As an elf, Aisha’s skin was so smooth that it made all women jealous, especially as a Night Elf. It made her snow-white skin have a hint of silver under it. “Other than Master, all humans are greedy. How detestable.” Seeing the surrounding players’ gazes gather, Aisha could not help but frown. Lorne pulled up her hood, “Go back first. After selling these potions, I need to rest.” “Yes.” A light appeared over Aisha, and in the next second, she was gone. Lorne ordered Super Rich to clean up the battlefield. Then, as if nothing had happened, he continued manning his stall. After dealing with the remaining Purification Crystals, Lorne entered the forest and found a hiding spot to go offline. In a high-level Energy Zone, it was already late at night, but the place was not dark. Instead, it was more beautiful than in the day. Countless beautiful lights lit up, illuminating every corner of the place. A luxurious flying energy motorcade landed on the platform of a building. A group of people walked out and went straight to the ground of the building. Here, there was the largest nightclub in this area. At the bottommost layer, there was a secret base with thousands of game cabins. The team arrived in the main hall of the base. The big man with the slicked-back hair smoked a high-end cigar. He crossed his legs and held the few sexy women in bold clothes close to him. He was the big boss behind the World Destruction Guild, the current leader of the Marshall Family, and also the current leader of the [World Destruction Guild] in the game. At this moment, a Paragon Deluxe game cabin opened and a tall young man walked out. He was one of the Deputy Guild Leaders of the World Destruction Guild, Player ID: Cross Fire. “Damn it, that kid is really f*cking courting death!” Cross Fire stormed out. “Explosives, what’s wrong?” Speck glanced at him. ‘Explosives’ had been his right-hand man all along. He had that nickname because of his bad temper. “At the expeditionary army camp just now, we fought with that kid, Tyrant. Damn it, that kid is really too f*cking incredible. He killed more than a hundred of us alone. What the heck!” “Tyrant? Why did you fight him?” “It’s all because of the antidote. I wanted to monopolize a batch of potions and earn some gold coins. Who knew that this scoundrel deliberately set a trap for me to buy tens of thousands of potions for 10 silver coins? Then, he sold the Purification Crystal that could cure poison for seven days, causing us to lose tens of millions of dollars!” With that, he played the video that he had just recorded. When they saw the scene, the surrounding lackeys and women were shocked. Especially the two women. They also played as a Summoner, but their combat strength was basically zero. It was not comparable with the other party’s powerful combat strength. “Ah—” A big-busted woman suddenly cried out in pain. Her big chest was being squeezed, and there was a poisonous, cold killing intent in Speck’s eyes. He watched this video several times before finally relaxing on the sofa. He took a deep puff of his cigar and said, “This kid is really capable. If only we could recruit him into our guild…” “Recruit him? This kid just killed more than a hundred of our elites!” Explosives had a murderous look on his face. He wanted to rush into the video and kill that arrogant brat with his own hands! “If he’s willing to join, I’ll let him kill even ten thousand people, much less a hundred.” Speck puffed out a breath of smoke, then shook his head and said, “Unfortunately, this kid doesn’t look like he’s that easy to recruit. Get someone to come into contact with him first. No matter how much it costs, we’ll accept his condition. It’d be best if we can find out his location in reality. Only then will we have the initiative.” “What if this kid doesn’t know how to appreciate our kindness?” “If he can’t be useful to us, we won’t keep him alive.” The corners of his mouth curled up, as if he had just said something extremely simple. Having been in the business world for many years, he was already used to such situations. People who could not be bought over with money or women could only be treated to a round of bullets. In short, he could not let the other party affect his development. … At the same time, after the battle in the expeditionary army camp ended, countless players recorded the image of Tyrant’s Night Elf pet. Then, the topic about Aisha became popular in the entire player forum. “Damn! Did I see wrongly?” “Heavens, how is this fairy so beautiful?” “Can someone tell me why an elf became a human’s pet?” “Compared to this elf, celebrities are disgusting.” “Perfect skin, exquisite facial features, and silver hair. How can there be such a perfect creature in the world?” “Mom, I think I’m in love…” Almost all the players were excited by the appearance of Aisha. Even Speck, who was hugging a beautiful model in the building, was stunned at this moment. Compared to the perfect fairy girl, these so-called beauties were really ugly to the extreme. They could not make him feel any temptation. Speck had been looking at the elf on the screen, but the two young models beside him were insensible and bothered him, so Speck directly kicked them to the ground. “Looks like Boss is really tempted.” “That’s right. This is the first time I’ve seen Boss so focused on a woman.” “Unfortunately, that’s Tyrant’s pet. It’s probably not a virgin anymore.” “Nonsense. No normal man can remain calm in front of that elf.” … On the other side, Lorne also left the game and returned to reality. Because he had too many gold coins on him, he had to sell all of them. However, when he went offline, he realized that he had encountered a huge problem. During the period when he went offline just now, a huge thing happened in the game “Divine Realm”. That was—the official value of the gold coins had decreased! When he saw this news, Lorne’s heart skipped a beat. The official value of the gold coins decreased, did it not mean that the difficulty of obtaining gold coins decreased? In this case, the price of gold coins on the black market would definitely be affected. He had more than a hundred thousand gold coins to deal with now! Lorne quickly opened the system panel and checked the exchange rate of the gold coins. The result was obvious. The exchange rate of the official gold coins had fallen to: 1: 900. It was 10% lower than before. Lorne was helpless in this situation. In fact, he had expected the gold coins to depreciate recently. This was because after coming to the main city, the number of gold coins dropped by the monsters had increased tremendously. If they continued to purchase at the original price, the world’s economy would quickly be affected. However, he did not expect this to happen so quickly. It was such a coincidence. Lorne quickly opened the black market to check the price of the gold coins. At this moment, the gold coin trading price on the black market had fallen to about 3,000 alliance dollars. The total value dropped by 30%. This was normal. This was because most of the gold coins transactions on the black market were supported by large guilds. Now that they had passed the most difficult early stages, they had built a gaming factory and begun to produce their own resources. In this way, the price of gold coins naturally fell greatly. Lorne searched through the black market for their purchase value and found that they were all about 3,000. He had no choice but to sell it at this price. This was not a loss. It was just that he would earn less. Just as Lorne was about to sell the gold coins in his hand, he suddenly received a message from inside the game. “You haven’t dealt with your gold coins yet, have you?” “Now that the price of gold coins has dropped, little brother, are you worried about the sale of gold coins?” Twinkle Rose sent a smiling emoji. “You have a way?” Lorne asked. “Of course, I have my ways…” In the end, Twinkle Rose typed an ellipsis, implying that she was resourceful and wanted Tyrant to beg for it to satisfy her ego. But Lorne smiled knowingly, “Then help me find a billionaire. I want a young one with the same breast size as you.” “Hmph, men are all lecherous.” In the game, Twinkle Rose giggled at such a conversation, forgetting her plan to watch Tyrant suffer. At this moment, Lorne asked, “How much can you pay?” “The highest price on the black market now is 3,100, but I have a special channel. As long as you beg me, I can give you 3,800.” Twinkle Rose wanted to see Lorne suffer. Since they had known each other, she had not won against Tyrant in chatting. This time, she had to let that evil guy see how powerful she was! “You had antidote potions too and sold them for a lot of gold coins. There’s no reason to buy gold coins anymore. This means that you have an external channel that needs this huge sum of money. In other words, you’re just a middleman.” “In this world, which middleman can make the owner of the goods beg for mercy?” How could Lorne not know what she was thinking? “Although I’m a middleman, you don’t have my channel. It’s impossible for a hundred thousand gold coins to be sold for a high price. I’ll give you another chance. If you beg for mercy now, I can still cooperate with you. Otherwise, you’ll lose at least a hundred million.” “Big-busted Sister, are you sure?” Hearing this, the corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up, and he pretended to sigh in the chat: “Forget it, since you don’t want to buy these gold coins, I’ll go ask if Super Rich wants to buy them.” “No!” “Good brother, I beg you. Sell me the gold coins. The sisters of the Silver Snow Guild are so poor that they can’t even afford clothes.” Twinkle Rose immediately stopped him and spoke in her most aggrieved voice. If it were anyone else, she would not be so nervous. Only this rich and willful tycoon made her hesitate. Not to mention whether Super Rich knew the news, even if he did not, as long as Tyrant opened his mouth to sell the gold coins, he would definitely buy them at the highest price. After all, that guy was such a bootlicker. Twinkle Rose did not want to bet on this matter. She still wanted to use this money to subsidize the guild funds. “Since you’re so sincere in your request, fine.” Without further ado, he placed all the gold coins on the trading platform. Twinkle Rose quickly transferred the money from the virtual account. The moment the deal was struck. In reality, Lorne’s bracelet immediately lit up. Ding! “Message reminder: Your account ending with digits 1244 have been transferred 425,600,000 alliance dollars today. (Virtual Bank of the Divine Realm)” “Message reminder: Respected customer, due to your savings exceeding 40 million in the bank, you have automatically been promoted to a black gold customer. You will enjoy the top banking services in our bank and enjoy preferential treatment in services such as investment, property, and borrowing.” This time, Lorne sold a total of 400,000 antidotes and 300,000 Purification Crystals, earning a total of 112,000 gold coins. The Purification Crystal would not be produced in the future. At the very least, until this event ended, no more Purification Crystals would appear. There were still antidotes being produced. The Alchemist Association’s output was approximately 10,000 bottles per day. After all, they were not needed by the Iron Skull City’s army, so the efficiency of their output was not high. “With so much money, I think I can bring Roanna to a higher-grade Energy Zone now.” Looking at the balance in the account, Lorne could not help but laugh. During this period of time, he had been thinking about when he would return to the Energy Zone. Unfortunately, he could not be too brash in reality. If he suddenly went from the civilian area to the high-level Energy Zone, those who wanted to investigate would definitely be able to find some clues from here. Therefore, for the sake of his own safety, he decided to settle down in the nearby Energy Zone. With that in mind, Lorne went to a website. ———— [Energy Zone Civil Identification Registration] [Status: Approved] ———— This was the application that was submitted a few days ago. It had been approved. As a former member of the Energy Zone, it was not difficult for Lorne to return. The only difficulty was that he could not return to the house he had lived in three years ago. Of course, it was not absolute. In this world, as long as one had enough money, they could obtain everything. For example, the house three years ago. Lorne still had the other party’s contact number. Without any hesitation, he dialed the other party’s number. After a while, the two reached an agreement. Lorne eventually bought the house back at twice the original price. The reason for such a high price was that the house still retained the style from three years ago, which was a huge gain for Lorne. To be honest, Lorne was worried that Roanna would not recognize this world when she woke up, but if this room was still the same as before she fell asleep, it might make it easier for her to accept this world. It was even possible to awaken Roanna’s memory under special circumstances. Therefore, this house had extraordinary meaning. It was also because of this that Lorne gave him an additional 50% of the house price to thank him. After buying the house, Lorne made another call. “I want to buy a villa. The space should be larger and the location can be remote. The estimated price I’ll pay is about five million.” Lorne had no intention of changing the current house, so he bought an additional villa for living. It could not be too expensive to avoid unnecessary trouble. Of course, it could not be too shabby. Therefore, Lorne chose a remote but spacious house. This way, the villa he bought would not be too small and the price would not be too high. Even if someone investigated his real identity, it was impossible to use these small pieces of information to lock down his identity. After all, this was an era of peace. The World Alliance had placed all the information about humans into an independent terminal. To dig out the information inside, it required a very high clearance level. Therefore, there was no need to worry too much about it. All he had to do was maintain a normal lifestyle. After dealing with all of this, Lorne fell asleep. He had other things to do tomorrow and needed to get up early. The next day, Lorne woke up very early. He changed his clothes and left. He planned to enter the Energy Zone today. Life in the slums was not safe. The “slums” actually referred to the environment of the old world. Due to the lack of tighter management, thieves often wandered around, and there were even some overly dangerous figures. Now that Lorne had enough money, he had to leave as soon as possible. After all, there was nothing to be reluctant about. Lorne did not take anything from his room, only carrying items related to his sister. As for the other items, they had actually been sold half a year ago. Lorne said nothing. He got into an old-time car and gradually left the area. Looking at the familiar surroundings, he could not help but sigh. “Commoner District… Goodbye.” … To move from the slums to the Energy Zone, in addition to needing to apply in advance, he also needed to register for the Energy Zone. He could also apply for this online. However! When one was about to enter the Energy Zone, they had to go to the World Alliance’s base to do a thorough inspection. They had to wait until the results were out before obtaining permission to travel to the Energy Zone by plane. To a certain extent, the Energy Zone was like a special fortress. If one wanted to enter, they had to rely on the official military of the World Alliance. Otherwise, once they got close, they would suffer a fatal blow. He did not know why the security was so tight. Perhaps it was to protect the rich, or perhaps it was because of some military activity, but no matter what, it was not something that Lorne needed to care about. He could not come into contact with such a level yet, at least not with his current identity. As the car neared the Alliance’s camp, Lorne saw many armed mechanical warriors. They were not robots, but people in closed combat armor. “Stop the car!” “I’m a Warrior of the World Alliance, ID: ZX31471. Please get out of the car and cooperate with the inspection.” No foreign vehicle was allowed into the area, so Lorne was intercepted by the Alliance’s soldiers. Lorne and the driver got out cooperatively. “Please unlock your Civil Identification Bracelet and wait for inspection.” Civil Identification Bracelet, which was the smart device everyone had, was equivalent to an old-time identity card. At the same time, it was a miniature computer that could be used for holographic projection. When the only button on the bracelet was pressed, the citizen’s identity information panel would appear. The Alliance’s Warrior used the scanning equipment on his helmet to check and record their identities. Finally, he looked at everyone and said respectfully, “There’s no abnormality. Greetings, citizens of the World Alliance. The area ahead is where the World Alliance is stationed. Ordinary cars without permission are not allowed to enter. Those who want to apply for the necessary documents can go to the relevant department to do so.” With that, a map panel appeared in front of Lorne, and there was a voice message. Following the command, he arrived at the identification application area. … “Please choose the Energy Zone that you want to go to.” On the interface in front of Lorne, there was a series of Energy Zone options. The cost of admission to each Energy Zone was different. The higher the level, the higher the cost of protecting the Energy Zone. Lorne did not think too much about it. He chose the lowest-level Energy Zone. Three years ago, he had been a resident of that Energy Zone. Now, he could finally go back. “You have already been checked into the Energy Zone.” “Please go to the inspection office to check on your health.” “In a while, the alliance will send a private plane to send you to the chosen area.” Lorne had recently entered the Energy Zone, but he still had to do a thorough inspection. He could not miss any of it. It was not until two hours later that Lorne received all his examination reports. After finding no infectious diseases, he passed the World Alliance’s health check. Then, at 3pm, Lorne took the World Alliance’s private plane to the designated Energy Zone. … On the plane, all the residents who headed to the Energy Zone received a forced mission! That was to check the living rules of the Energy Zone. Unlike the slums, the Energy Zone had the most advanced technology in the world. Without checking the relevant rules, it was easy to break the law. Although Lorne knew the rules, he had to complete this mandatory mission. He looked at the panel. [Energy Zone Housing Guide] [Energy Zone Transportation Rules] [Energy Zone Facilities] [Usefulness of Skilled Experts in the Energy Zone] [Energy Zone Citizen’s Behavioral Standards] […] It could be seen that there were many rules in the Energy Zone. First, citizens who did not buy a house could live in the Alliance-appointed neighborhood with their admission passes. Moreover, this area was guarded by an army. If one wanted to go out and do something, even if it was a job, they had to apply to the alliance to pass through. In addition, purchasing a house would grant permanent ownership until the citizenship deadline was terminated. During this period, one could act casually as long as they followed the above rules. In addition, cooking was not allowed in the Energy Zone. All food could only be bought using the corresponding services or delivered to the door. In addition, those who checked in would have to pay a certain amount of energy fees per month. This was similar to electricity fees. While enjoying energy and technology, one had to pay the corresponding fees. For such a low-level Energy Zone, the cost was 10,000 alliance dollars per month, according to the population. To the poor people living in the old world, such a price was simply unimaginable. However, that was not a problem for Lorne. What made him curious was the situation in a higher-level Energy Zone. While dealing with his identity card, Lorne checked the prices of other Energy Zones and found that the price increased ten times for each higher-level Energy Zone! This made people curious. For the energy fees of a hundred thousand dollars a month, what sort of expenditure did people have? Lorne was curious too. Unfortunately… The World Alliance divided Energy Zones into different networks. Only high-level Energy Zones could see the situation in low-level Energy Zones. Low-level Energy Zones could only check their own area and even lower-level Energy Zones. Therefore, Lorne did not know the level of technology in the high-level Energy Zones. Therefore, he was filled with anticipation towards them. If not for the fact that this was his and his sister’s home, he might really be sitting on the plane heading to the high-level Energy Zone now. It was around six in the evening when Lorne finally arrived at the small villa he had bought. Although the area was not large, it was orderly and grand after entering. Perhaps because he had been in the slums for too long, Lorne was a little excited. He brought up the holographic model of the villa. There were a total of three levels in the villa. The total area was 480 square meters. As the villa was 160 square meters, it was relatively moderate. The first floor was the living room, dining room, and bedroom. As for the kitchen, there was no design because they were not allowed to cook. There was a game room, gym, and guest room on the second floor. The third floor had the master bedroom and study. Above was the rooftop which had a specially designed swimming pool. It could be said that, in addition to the remote location, the house was in good condition. He finally settled down after a busy day. Lorne slept soundly. … The next morning, Lorne woke up and logged into the game. The activities of Iron Skull City lasted for 10 days. Four days had passed. If Lorne did not enter the game soon, he would not be able to complete the mission given to him by the Dragon of Light. However, as soon as he entered the game, countless pieces of information popped up in his friend list. First, he saw the ones from Super Rich. For some reason, this tycoon had been greeting him punctually every day. Lorne did not reply. As the leader, he had to be a little cool. Other than that, the rest of the information was from Twinkle Rose. Part of it was from the deal last night. Another part was information after midnight. By then, Lorne had already fallen asleep and had not seen it. “Tyrant, quickly go to the forum. Those people from World Destruction are looking for you.” “You can’t agree to their terms. They’re not good people in real life. The company behind them is dirty.” “Tyrant, say something.” “Tyrant?” “Where is he?” “Reply me…” “Tyrant? No way. If you don’t reply, are you in danger?” “Have you been imprisoned by the World Destruction Guild?” “Didn’t I give you my number? Send me a message. I’ll bring people to save you immediately.” “By the way, there’s no reason for you to agree to the World Destruction Guild. You earned 400 million yesterday and have long been financially free. Could it be a beauty trap?” “Looks like it. I’ve long heard that the World Destruction Guild has been training beautiful women to rope in lecherous players like you…” “Oh no, oh no. You’re not replying at this time. It looks like you’ve really fallen for it.” “Tyrant, have you been squeezed dry by those women who are proficient in bed? It’s been a day and you’re still not online?” Twinkle Rose sent him dozens of messages. Especially last night, Twinkle Rose strongly believed that Lorne had already been won over by the World Destruction Guild’s beauty in reality. “Do you think I’ll let anyone squeeze me dry? Of course, unless you volunteer to do it yourself?” He quickly closed the chat between the two of them. It was obvious how crazy the beautiful guild leader would be. Then, Lorne opened the game forum. He was also curious as to why the fellows from the World Destruction Guild were looking for him. However… As soon as the forum was opened, several trending posts appeared. “Shocking! A player sold 100,000 gold coins in a single day, earning hundreds of millions!” “Gaming can also earn you hundreds of millions a day!” “Divine Realm! A virtual world with infinite potential!” “Mastering the potion will mean gaining a trillion-dollar market!” “…” It could be seen that almost all the posts were promoting Lorne’s achievements. In the eyes of most people, playing games meant spending money, not earning money. But today, the news about Tyrant has completely reversed this inherent idea. That was 400 million! Even a large corporation with tens of thousands of people might not have such an income. Furthermore, Tyrant was alone! Such an event was enough to subvert conventional thinking. Those large corporations also used this popularity to promote their game factories and recruit more people to join the guilds, causing the number of guilds to grow crazily. Not only that, even several authoritative news channels in the world were fighting to report on this matter. For some reason, the World Alliance seemed to want everyone to enter the game. Interestingly, Lorne checked and found that many people supported the theory. That was to reduce the world’s energy consumption! They said that the World Alliance wanted to reduce people’s energy consumption in reality through virtual games. For example, if one had a nutrition cabin, they could stay in the game for 24 hours. They would sleep and live inside, and their body in reality would be in the nutrition cabin, ensuring normal survival needs. In this way, the number of people living in reality would decrease relatively, and the energy consumption would naturally decrease. Most favorable, there was increased availability of land. As a result, the world’s environment and supply of resources will continue to improve. It made sense to Lorne after hearing such analysis. If the Divine Realm was treated as a virtual world, then people who enjoyed the non-material world could indeed reduce their energy consumption in reality. It was no wonder that the official news channel of the World Alliance was reporting that he had earned 400 million. “Did the World Alliance develop the Divine Realm because of this?” Lorne felt as if he had understood everything. The only thing that confused him was where the World Alliance had obtained this technology. The simulation of “Divine Realm” had reached 99.999%. Its authenticity was almost no different from that of the real world. ‘Was such a technology developed by the World Alliance?’ Lorne suspected. Of course, it was also possible that his horizons had limited his understanding. After all, even the technology in the Energy Zone was hard to imagine, let alone the World Alliance’s Research Department. Compared to doubt, Lorne wanted to accept this as the truth, because he had a comatose sister. If there was extraordinary technology in the world, then there was a chance that Roanna would wake up. Lorne sighed and closed the post. He continued browsing. At this moment, he found the announcement post from the World Destruction Guild. “Tyrant! I am the Deputy Guild Leader of the World Destruction Guild, Cross Fire. There are some things that we can discuss!” “Tyrant, we had some misunderstandings at the expeditionary army camp yesterday, but our guild leader is magnanimous and will not pursue this matter.” “As long as you choose to join our guild, we can let bygones be bygones. We will also allow you to be the Deputy Guild Leader with an annual salary of more than 100 million. If you are willing, we can immediately sign an agreement.” “Hurry up and reply if you see it.” “Posted by: Cross Fire.” From these words, it could be seen that the World Destruction Guild was still powerful. After all, it was not easy for them to temporarily give up on revenge and take in the enemy. Unfortunately, their words made Lorne want to laugh. They were clearly trying to rope him in, but it made him feel like they were doing him a favor. This attitude? What a joke. Lorne decisively replied: “Tsk!” One word clearly stated his attitude. In the game forum of the Divine Realm, the Player IDs were synced with the game. When Lorne spoke, everyone saw this information. Instantly, the players on the entire forum went crazy. “Hahaha, Boss Tyrant has a bad temper.” “He’s actually rejected the offer of more than a hundred million dollars a year. I can’t understand the world of God Players.” “I’m dying of laughter. Boss Lorne made a few hundred million yesterday. Are you sure you’re not trying to be a beggar by offering him an annual salary of more than a hundred million?” “I really want to be that beggar. Just a million is fine.” … After reading the players’ mockery, Lorne closed the chat. He continued browsing. In the chat history of Twinkle Rose, he had seen something worth paying attention to. That was why he had bought the gold coins yesterday. Yesterday, Twinkle Rose had also sold the potions, so someone had contacted her to purchase the gold coins and planned to collect more. But because they did not have Lorne’s contact number, they wanted to contact him through Twinkle Rose. After all, both of them had sold the antidotes at this time, so it was obvious that they were partners. Therefore, further development occurred. After Twinkle Rose bought the gold coins from Lorne, she explained the situation. The ones who bought the potions behind them were from the Domination Guild and the World Destruction Guild. From Twinkle Rose’s explanation, it could be seen that the Domination Guild had obtained a special mission in the expeditionary army camp. The mission target was a powerful Bone Dragon. Just think about it, he could even obtain a Reputation reward by bringing back the human warrior’s skeleton. If he brought back the dragon skeleton, wouldn’t he be able to obtain a huge amount of reputation points, or even the reputation points of the Church of Light? In addition, this was the only level 30 special Boss that appeared now. It was enough to attract the attention of all the players in the world. It was because of this that the Domination Guild valued this mission so much. In order to defeat this Boss, they combined forces with the World Destruction guild and used a large amount of gold coins to invite the city guards of Iron Skull City to support them, in order to perfectly take down this mission. The specific date was 1pm. At that time, more than 10,000 elite players above Level 20 would gather and kill a Bone Dragon Boss together. In the game, human wave tactics were the most common because players could be revived after death. When ten thousand elite players fought together, as long as they were commanded properly, they could kill any Boss as long as they could break through its defense. “I can’t let it go just like that!” Lorne frowned. Collecting the dragon skeletons was one of the missions entrusted to him by the Dragon of Light. Moreover, the difficulty of collecting them was even higher than that of the dragon soul. It was obvious that this had a higher importance. There was a dragon skeleton appearing now. How could he let it go? Impossible. However, it was not easy to snatch the Boss from ten thousand people. Lorne pondered. If he wanted to do this, he could not fight the other party head-on. However, the dragon skeleton was in a cave. To enter, one had to go through the only entrance. That place had long been surrounded by the World Destruction Guild. It was impossible to enter directly. “Let the long-tongued bat fly in?” The long-tongued bat was the only chance to enter, but Lorne quickly rejected the idea. This was because the long-tongued bat did not have the ability to kill the Boss alone. Its only chance was to wait for the members of the World Destruction Guild to fight the boss and seize the opportunity to kill it. But the success rate was not high, and Lorne did not want to try that. After all, his mission was to take away the dragon soul and the skeleton, not to snatch the opportunity to kill the Boss. “If we can’t infiltrate, what else can we do?” As he pondered, his eyes began to survey the map. At this moment, his gaze focused on a cave in the map. Then his eyes lit up. There was a solution! There was a very bold thought in Lorne’s mind. Yes, he not only wanted to take down this Boss, but he also wanted to give the World Destruction Guild and the Domination Guild a huge present. … In the high-level Energy Zone, inside the underground base of the World Destruction Guild. ‘Explosives’ sat on the sofa and drank. Because he was not in the ruins of the war, he did not have any intention of leveling up recently. Especially when he heard that Boss wanted to give the Deputy Guild Leader position to Tyrant, he felt even worse. There were only three Deputy Guild Leaders of the World Destruction Guild and the other two were major shareholders of the corporation. Only he was the subordinate who worked for the boss. In that case, wouldn’t Tyrant have to replace him? Thinking of this, Explosives felt even worse. However, he could not do anything. After all, this was Boss’s intention. Right now, he could only sit on the sofa in the base and drink alcohol to pass the time. But at that moment… A message suddenly appeared on the bracelet. It was from Tyrant. It was that kid’s reply on the forum! He quickly opened it and was immediately overjoyed. He rejected it! Tyrant rejected it! <i>Hahahahaha!!!</i>  Explosives burst into laughter. To him, Tyrant’s rejection was the best outcome. This way, he could keep his position as the Deputy Guild Leader and take revenge on that scoundrel Tyrant. Thinking of this, Explosives hurriedly brought the news into the conference room. “Boss, that brat Tyrant has replied.” “What did he say?” “Boss, take a look for yourself.” “Damn it, I gave you face but you don’t want it!” When he saw the reply, Speck’s expression turned cold, “You’d better pray that I don’t catch you, or else I’ll make you wish you were dead!” “Boss, why don’t I gather everyone and go find that kid for trouble!” “Don’t be anxious. Let’s first deal with the matter of the Bone Dragon Boss. This time, we want to broadcast to the world and prove the strength of our guild!” “I’ll contact the Dark Guild first and ask them to keep an eye on Tyrant.” “Yes, go ahead.” At the War Ruins. After leaving the expeditionary army camp, Lorne ran towards the forest in the northwest. It took more than an hour to reach the destination. Under the dark sky, a large number of players gathered. Their IDs were displayed above their heads, and they were all labeled “World Destruction” and “Domination”. It was obvious that they were from the two guilds. Due to the preparation of the live stream, the two guilds had already posted a message on the forum, setting the time of the battle to 1pm. It was ten in the morning, so their main force had not gathered yet. “Is it there?” Lorne looked at the cave behind them. There was the first special boss in the entire server. However, to enter the cave, he had to break through the blockade of 200 people. This was not easy. “I have to scheme against them.” Lorne checked the terrain. There was another cave near the hill not far from the cave. This was a very good location. It could avoid the other party’s line of sight but also had enough space. ‘In that case, let’s begin.’ Lorne crept from the forest to the cave and summoned Rimuru. “Rimuru, block this place.” The entrance to the cave was not very large. After Rimuru was enlarged, it could completely seal the entire cave. Then, he let the other pets sweep the area. Soon, a group of skeleton monsters was brought back. Lorne took out a Bronze Sword from his bag and activated his talent. Ding! “A prototype material and a body part material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Skeleton Warrior) + (Bronze Sword) + (???) = ?” “The cost is 1,000 bronze coins. Would you like to merge?” “Merge!” Lorne confirmed. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining a Bronze-Grade Monster: Skeleton Swordsman!” After a flash of light, a skeleton warrior with a bronze sword appeared in front of Lorne. Although the prototype was not much different from before, as long as one looked at the interface, they would realize that this monster was a mini Boss. Other than its lack of health, its attributes were excellent. “Release it.” Lorne did not contract the other party, instead choosing to let it go. As a result, the creature became a wild monster. But Lorne did not let it wander. He led the skeleton swordsman deeper into the cave, then let Rimuru hold it captive. “Roar!” The undead skeleton swordsman immediately turned into a wild monster, roaring crazily as he attacked Rimuru with the sword in his hand. Unfortunately, its attack could not break through Rimuru’s defense. “Let me find you some other friends.” Lorne continued his monster synthesis. The purpose of this was not to obtain pets, but to accumulate enough monsters. Once the cave opened, all the monsters would immediately attack the sealed area of the World Destruction Guild. The people of the World Destruction Guild would definitely be careless. At that time, it would be Lorne’s chance. “Although its Superiority is only 70%, its attributes are very good. It will probably require two or three players to cooperate in order to kill it.” “The World Destruction Guild and the Domination Guild have arranged nearly 300 guards.” “In other words, as long as I create more than a hundred monsters, I will be able to get the effect I want.” Lorne calculated. Under normal circumstances, this plan was very safe. However, in order to ensure that nothing went wrong, he had to prepare more monsters. It would be best if it was twice, or even thrice of the planned amount! In any case, as long as time allowed, he would continue to merge. The more monsters there were, the higher the success rate. … More than an hour later. Lorne continued to create monsters. More and more monsters appeared in the cave. They roared as if protesting the fate of being imprisoned. But Rimuru ignored them. He held them there, not allowing any of the creatures to leave through this exit. As for the monster’s attack? It was useless. The cave was narrow. Only four monsters could attack Rimuru. Four Bronze monsters wanted to kill Rimuru? Impossible. When it was almost noon, there were nearly 300 monsters in this cave. Almost all the skeletons in the vicinity were attracted to the cave by Lorne. All that was left was the batch of monsters closest to the Boss’ cave. Lorne did not let them go. He wanted to capture all these skeletons and launch a surprise attack! … “Strange…” “Was there something over there just now?” A player guarding the entrance looked at a hill in confusion. He seemed to have seen something walk over just now. Why did it suddenly disappear? “You must be kidding me. How can there be anyone?” “Young people should stop playing games. You’re going blind.” “Buy some tonics to eat, brother. You can’t go on like this.” “You don’t know how to cherish it when you are young. When you reach my age, you can only watch others play.” The surrounding players teased. “I’ve been waiting for the latest dish for a week. You have to believe me. Something really went over there.” The more the guard player thought about it, the more confused he became. Suddenly, he thought of something and said, “Speaking of which, have you guys noticed that it has been a long time since a skeleton monster attacked us?” As soon as he said this, the players beside him indeed realized that this was a problem. They looked around. It was strange. Previously, he had seen many skeletons wandering around. But now, they seem to have disappeared. The group was puzzled. At that moment, suddenly! There was a commotion in the forest ahead. A group of extremely furious skeletons charged at them. “Damn!” All the players could not help but curse. They had just said that there were no monsters around, but all of a sudden, they rushed over from the direction in front. Looking at this number, there were at least a few hundred skeletons. But fortunately, they were just a group of Skeleton Warriors. The attributes of the skeletons were not high. If everyone fought their own battles, this fight should be over soon. The players from the two guilds thought so. However, when they officially came into contact with the monster, all the players were stunned. “What happened?” “Why can’t these skeleton monsters be killed?” “Gosh! This is a Bronze-Grade monster!” “Can someone tell me what happened? When did these skeleton monsters become so powerful as if they’re on steroids?!” “What should I do? Who can save this poor child?” The players panicked. The monster in front of them was not something they could resist. A smart player chose to go offline to avoid the monsters. However, before the notification ended, they entered a combat state. Even if they forcefully went offline at this moment, their game character would be controlled by AI and automatically fight. There was no way to avoid this crisis. “Boom…” Countless skeletons charged forward. After finding their opponent, they immediately raised their bronze swords and dealt the most fatal blow to the enemy in front of them. In an instant, countless players died. A large number of white souls appeared on the ground. In just the first round, dozens of players were killed. “Gosh! Why are these bronze monsters so powerful?” The players from the World Destruction Guild were dumbfounded. As the elites of the guild, they had naturally encountered many Bronze monsters. However, that was incomparable to the monster in front of him. In the past, when they formed a team of two or three, they could still kill Bronze-grade monsters. But now? Everyone present was killed by the monsters and could not resist at all. Before they could wail, the skeleton swordsmen began their second wave of assault. This time, they directly took away the lives of more than a hundred players. There were cries everywhere at the scene. It was a tragic sight. At this moment, a white light suddenly flashed. “Damn, did a light fly in just now?” The guard player rubbed his eyes. He seemed to have seen a light flash earlier. Why did it disappear in the blink of an eye? “Brother, have you masturbated too much?” “It’s probably the soul of some player who died. There’s nothing to be surprised about.” “If you still have the mood to chat, quickly think of a way to break through!” “Break through my ass. We can’t outrun them.” “That’s right. I’ve already given up on treatment.” “Let’s gather in the city. I’ll go first.” … While they were fighting outside, Lorne entered the cave. He set off from the forest beside the cave and directly used his Angel’s Descent. Under the angel form, Lorne flew three times faster. Coupled with the fact that he had a high Agility attribute, he was very fast. The dozens of yards crossed almost instantly. This was also why the [Angel’s Wings] was powerful. It could bring him movement speed that was beyond common sense. “There’s not much time left. I have to speed up.” “Long-tongued bat, guard the entrance of the cave. Report to me immediately if anything happens.” “Oh, okay, Master. I’ll work hard.” The long-tongued bat hung above the cave. No creature that entered could escape its ears. Lorne quickly ran deeper into the cave. It was almost noon. Most of the people from the two guilds had gathered. Coupled with the surprise attack that occurred in this area, the other party would definitely come in early to check. If he was blocked in this cave by tens of thousands of players, unless the Dragon of Light descended, he would definitely die. Therefore, he had to end this quickly! “Creak…” After entering the cave, the familiar skeleton monsters appeared. It seemed that he might encounter another Lich. Lorne did not slow down. He commanded all his pets to advance as quickly as possible, heading deeper into the cave. After traveling for a few minutes, he killed countless skeletons. Lorne finally reached his destination. This scene was very similar to the place where he had encountered the dragon soul. Other than the lack of characteristics of the tomb, the overall layout of the cave was basically the same. In this huge cave, there was also a dragon skeleton. But it was different from the previous ones. The dragon skeleton in front of him was black and looked very strange. There was indeed a familiar figure near this dragon skeleton. Undead creature—Lich! “Who is it! How dare you intrude into my territory!” It was a familiar opening line. However, this Lich had more cards up its sleeve. It held a black staff in its hand and waved it the moment it discovered Lorne. “I am your father!” Without hesitation, Lorne began the battle. With the experience from last time, he had already mastered the way to fight such a Boss. First, he pulled away and dealt damage with Small Artillery and Venom. Rimuru and Aisha were responsible for disrupting the boss’s mobility. Unfortunately, Aisha’s level was too low. Otherwise, she alone would be enough to resolve the battle before her. [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows] [Poison Source – Rain of Arrows] [Rapid Fire] [Rapid Fire] The two pets attacked at the same time. After clearing the surrounding monsters, they shot a series of arrows at the Boss. The health of the Lich decreased. It angrily summoned a new skeleton, but to no avail. Under the powerful attacks of Lorne’s two archer pets, the monsters in front of them were quickly wiped out. However, the Lich was still resisting. It continued to wave its staff, but nothing worked. Lorne’s control over the battle left it no chance to recover. Swish! Swish! Swish! Countless arrows hit the Lich accurately. In less than three minutes, its health was already depleted. It was almost near the end of its life. Suddenly, a huge black fog spread out from the Lich. It was a powerful undead power that was poured into the body of the bone dragon. Unlike the dragon soul he had encountered in the Barbarian Forest, the bone dragons here were complete dragon skeletons. With the infusion of undead energy, the black dragon skeleton had revived. Flames gradually rose from the skeleton, and at the same time, the huge dragon head began to move. Two balls of scarlet soul fire suddenly lit up. At this moment, Lorne received a new hint. “Warning!” “Special Boss has awakened. This target is extremely dangerous. Please retreat immediately.” The moment the voice sounded, Lorne had already kept a safe distance from it. Standing at the edge of the battlefield, he opened the system interface. When he was away from the other party, Lorne had already obtained the monster’s interface attributes. But the moment he saw the attributes… Lorne was stunned. He froze on the spot and used his pupils to look at the information in front of him over and over again. He could not believe what he was seeing. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios ———— [Undead Bone Dragon] Grade: Special Boss Level: 30 HP: ??? Physical Attack: 1920-2700 Physical Defense: 50 Magic Defense: 50 Skills: [Dragon’s Claw], [Dragon’s Breath], [Steel Bone Wing], [Frenzied Diving], [Dragon’s Dignity], [???] Introduction: A dead dragon regained its life under the undead magic of the Lich and became a terrifying undead bone dragon.  ———— This was the attributes panel of the Bone Dragon. From it, one could tell how powerful a special-level Boss was. Despite being Level 30, the upper limit of this Boss’s attack was 2700 points, while the previous Lich only had 1,800 points. The combat strength of the two was on a completely different level. But that was not what shocked Lorne. In this battlefield, the only thing that he had to pay attention to was the Boss’ defense. If the Boss’ defense was too high and could not break through it, Lorne could only think of other methods. After all, his pets were only Level 20. But to Lorne’s surprise, the skeletal dragon before him — only had 50 Defense points! “Is there a problem with my identification skill?” Lorne blinked and looked at the information panel again and again. After watching it three times, he finally believed the number. He saw the answer from the skill of the bone dragon. ———— Skill: [Dragon’s Dignity] Physical Defense: 10x surrounding targets. Magic Defense: 10x surrounding targets. Description: The dignity of the Giant Dragon cannot be challenged. The more enemies there are, the stronger it will be. ———— The bone dragon’s defense was tied to the number of enemies it faced. Only Lorne and his four pets were present, so the bone dragon’s defense was very low. “This Boss is simply made for me.” Initially, Lorne was worried that he would not be able to break through the Boss’s defense, but he did not expect such a benefit. 50 points of defense were useless against an attack of 1560 points. In his excitement, Lorne attacked. “Small Artillery” and “Venom” quickly hunted around. The longbow in their hands let out a clang as countless arrows with special effects shot out. -885 -849 -853 -867 ...; High damage numbers appeared. In the battle with the Lich, the single attack of the two pets was only 300 points. But now, there was 850+! Under such high output, one continuous arrow could deal 4,000+ damage. Almost instantly, the Bone Dragon Boss lost tens of thousands of health points. “As expected of a dragon, its health should be more than 300,000, right?” Although the damage was not low, the result was very ordinary. From the health bar alone, it was difficult to determine the Boss’ maximum health. “Roar!” As he pondered… The undead bone dragon let out a roar, and its huge head raised up, spewing out surging black flames. Terrifying flames enveloped an area of dozens of yards. Small Artillery could not dodge in time. After being hit, it lost half of its health. -2,455! Terrifying damage splattered through the air. Fortunately, the health of Little Artillery had already exceeded 10,000 points, and with the support of Rimuru’s health recovery skill, as long as it was not hit by a series of skills, its life was not in danger. ...; “No wonder the World Destruction Guild made so many preparations.” Lorne nodded. Only now did he understand why the two guilds, World Destruction and Domination, called for ten thousand people. If this Boss’s defense mechanism was so special, there would not have been so many people preparing. On the contrary, letting a few powerful top players fight here would be very effective. Then why did they gather such a large army? This was because the Bone Dragon Boss’ attack range was too large. The bone dragon in front of them was huge. Its dragon breath could cover a range of dozens of yards. Under such an attack, no one could safely avoid such an attack. Moreover, the bone dragon’s melee attack range was also very large. Almost every ordinary attack was a terrifying AOE skill. It was because of this consideration that they had gathered such a large number of teams and planned to use their players’ level to trade for wave after wave of attacks to kill this first special Boss in the entire server as soon as possible. If this continued… The World Destruction Guild and the Domination Guild would definitely obtain a satisfactory result. Unfortunately… Now, Lorne had ruined everything. By the time they entered the cave, everyone’s expression would be abnormally interesting. ...; Health Points: 80%. Health Points: 60%. Health Points: 40%. Health Points: 20%. Health Points: 5%. Although the Boss’ skill range was very large, it was not enough to win the entire battle. Under the high output of the two pets, the health points of the Bone Dragon Boss quickly decreased to less than 5%. Lorne immediately activated his talent. How could he let go of a powerful monster like the bone dragon? Even if he had to use 100 or even 1,000 times the experience to level up, Lorne felt that it was very worth it. Ding! “This monster is in a special state. It cannot be synthesized as a prototype!” <i>Huh?</i>  <i>Unable to merge?</i>  Lorne paused. This was not the first time he had encountered such a situation, and the previous few times did not matter. But this time, Lorne found it a pity. After all, this Bone Dragon was domineering and powerful. Furthermore, its skill range was huge. It was simply the best pet candidate. Unfortunately, it could not be synthesized. It could only be used as a mission tool. “Kill him.” Lorne sighed. Under the terrifying attacks of the pets, the Boss quickly fell to the ground. After obtaining victory, Lorne was pleasantly surprised. The Dragon’s Soul had given him a very beneficial reward. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the blessing of the Dragon Soul: Divine Power+2.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the Dragon Soul: Frost Dragon Crystal (Fragment) x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the Dragon Soul: Dragon’s Skeleton (Fragment) x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the recognition of the Dragon Soul: Dragon Race of Order Reputation Points+100.” It was still the soul of the dragon that had consciousness. The undead bone dragon was not the main body of the Boss, which was also the main reason why it could not be combined. That was not the point. Most importantly, Lorne received a series of rewards. In addition to the familiar ‘Divine Power’ and ‘Dragon Crystal’, he also obtained a dragon skeleton fragment this time. This was a legendary material. Although there were very few of them, as long as it was combined with a skeleton monster, the effect would definitely be extraordinary. Grateful, Lorne took all the loot from the ground and quickly left the cave. Due to the special defense mechanism of the undead bone dragon, the entire battle was very simple. In less than five minutes, the entire battle ended. By the time Lorne rushed out of the cave, only ten minutes had passed. It could be seen that there were hundreds of Bronze monsters wandering outside the cave. As for the players of the World Destruction Guild, they should have all died under the hands of these Bronze monsters. Lorne did not stop. With his high speed, he quickly left. Five minutes after he left, suddenly, a large group of players rushed in. Half of them were members of the World Destruction Guild and the Domination Guild. Most of the other players were gathered by them with money. Other than that, there was also a team of NPCs. This was something they had spent countless gold coins to hire. Their goal was to capture the Boss that they had locked onto. Although it cost a lot of money, the two guilds had at least a hundred Boss coordinates. If they could capture all of them, then the money would not be wasted. … On a distant hill. Looking at the thousands of players surrounding him, Lorne’s heart pounded. There were more than ten thousand high-level players who had reached Level 20. If he was blocked by them, he would not be able to escape. At this moment, it had to be said that running after stealing the kill was really exciting. This was especially when surrounded by tens of thousands of players. Indeed— In this world, what was stolen was more enjoyable than what was bought. With a pleasant aftertaste, Lorne quickly left. There was still some time before the show began. If he wanted to see their reaction after they realized that the Boss was gone, he had to wait until 1 pm. He could use this time to test out the reward he had just received. He checked as he walked. After the Boss died, Lorne had gained a lot. First, his divine power reached 24 points. The legendary Dragon Crystal also had two fragments. In addition, he had obtained a fragment of the dragon skeleton, which should be the reward that Lorne was most looking forward to. This was because there were two undead creatures beside him. As Small Artillery and Venom were Silver monsters, if he could synthesize this dragon skeleton fragment, he believed that their attributes would be greatly enhanced. Lorne wondered if he should. After all, this was a legendary material. Although it was only a fragment, it was still not easy to obtain. If possible, Lorne wanted to use it to create a Boss-level monster. Only then would it not let down the reputation of the dragon. With that in mind, Lorne put aside his thoughts and looked at the other loot. Because it was a special Boss, the items dropped this time were very rich. Among them, there were four Silver items, seven Bronze items, five Silver Enhancement Gems, 13 Bronze Enhancement Gems, and 10 Blessing Gems. There was no need to elaborate on the use of the Enhancement Gem. The use of the Blessing Gem was also relatively simple. It was used to forge and increase the success rate of forging. In addition, Lorne obtained a skill book. ———— [Piercing Arrow] (Grade B) Class: Archer Effect 1: Pull the bowstring and begin accumulating strength. With every second of accumulation, the range and damage of the arrow will increase by 50%. It can last for up to three seconds. Effect 2: The arrow will deal 50-200% physical damage to all units in the path and deal the same damage to targets behind. Cooldown: 15 seconds. Consumption: 500 MP. ———— In the Divine Realm, they were two classifications of skills. The first was color. Skills that were differentiated by color had special effects. Typically, such skills had very powerful effects and were of high quality. For example, the orange skill book [Hellhound Summoning] had effects that far exceeded those of Grade S and below. The second type was the standard grade. With the “E-SSS” grade as the standard range. Such skills are often called conventional. What Lorne obtained this time was a common Grade B skill, one exclusive to archers. The effect of the skill was relatively simple. It was like firing a charged arrow that dealt the same penetrative damage to all targets in the path. This was an AOE skill. The damage of the skill was very high, reaching 200%. For archers who lacked AOE damage, such skill books were precious resources. However, as a Summoner, Lorne could not learn this skill directly. He could only let his pets learn this skill. “Small Artillery.” Small Artillery was a pet evolved from an undead archer and belonged to the archer class. It could completely learn this skill, just like how it had learned the [Eagle Eye] skill at the time. Lorne made his decision. Right now, it was the DPS with the highest damage in the team. It was the best choice to give it the skills to deal damage. Compared to Small Artillery, Venom’s output was slightly weaker, because its poison dealt a fixed 5 points of damage. It could not compare to the Fire of Death, which dealt additional 20% damage. Ding! “Your pet has learned a skill: Piercing Arrow.” It was time to raise the pets’ levels. Without another word, Lorne led his pets deeper into the forest. … Near a depression, he found an ogre nest. In this nest, there were dozens of huge ogres sitting together, boiling soup. Lorne commanded Rimuru to attract the monsters. After mobilizing all the monsters and adjusting their positions, Lorne controlled Small Artillery to draw its bow. [Piercing Arrow]! When the skill was activated, a wave of energy immediately condensed in its hand, and then quickly transferred to the entire battle bow. One second! Two seconds! Three seconds! When it was fully charged, Lorne let go of the bowstring. Boom! A powerful arrow shot forth. It was like an electromagnetic cannonball, traveling at a terrifying speed. Almost instantly, the arrow penetrated the bodies of a group of ogres. Because the furthest penetration of the arrow had something to do with the attacker’s attack range, all the monsters within 40 yards of it received the same damage. Countless numbers floated in the air. The poor ogres, who had been cooking a pot of good soup, were pierced by the terrifying arrow. Their health decreased by a large amount, and some of the ogres were directly penetrated, revealing a gaping wound. At the same time, crimson damage numbers appeared above their heads. “It can even deal critical damage?” Lorne did not expect this AOE skill to deal critical damage. With the upper limit of 1560 points of attack of Small Artillery, after triggering the critical hit effect, it could deal a critical hit of up to 6,000 points. Even if the damage was reduced by 40%, the final effect was very impressive. This damage output was really powerful. Among the monsters that were hit, some of the ogres who had their weak spots hit were instantly killed. Even their corpses were sent flying three to five meters away. -3750! -3830! -3590! -3600! Perhaps it was Lorne’s imagination, but he felt that when he released the Piercing Arrow, it was very common to trigger the critical hit effect. Once the critical hit effect was triggered, it would deal six times the damage! Even if it was reduced by 40%, it could still deal more than 3,000 points of damage and directly kill a group of monsters. “It would be even better without the level suppression.” Lorne could not raise Small Artillery’s level because Aisha had not reached Level 20. She was a special existence. Although her grade was not directly stated, her experience requirement was 100 times that of Lorne. This required much more experience than any other pet. Even for Rimuru, the EXP requirement for each level was only one-quarter of hers. It was also because of this that Lorne’s leveling speed was very slow. [Level: 7 (0 / 130,000)] This was the EXP requirement that Aisha needed now. The higher the potential of the pet, the more EXP needed to level up. This was a sensible experience mechanism, but the data before him still made Lorne uncomfortable. This was only Level 7. She already required 130,000 experience points to level up. Moreover, because the monsters in the ruins of the war were very high in level, Aisha could not provide effective damage at all. The team’s farming speed was limited. Fortunately, there was the Piercing Arrow now. With this powerful AOE skill and the rain of arrows from the two pets, it was basically possible to quickly clear a wave of monsters. There was also a huge advantage, that was the help of the long-tongued bat. This was a flying scout. It could quickly provide Lorne with information on the distribution of monsters in the surrounding forest, thereby accelerating the efficiency of farming monsters. It was because of these factors that Lorne was fearless. … “This is the fourth day of the event. I have to raise Aisha’s level before the fifth day ends.” “In the remaining five days, I have to find the dragon souls and dragon skeletons…” Lorne opened the map of the ruins of the war and checked the information regarding the Lake of Death. From the map, it seemed that the place was deeper. He estimated that there would be higher-level monsters. Lorne needed to raise Aisha’s level before he could act. At that time, all the pets around him could reach Level 30. This way, without the level suppression, it would be safer to search for the dragon souls near the Lake of Death. As he thought, Lorne fought, keeping an eye on the time. At 1 pm, Lorne opened the live stream on the forum at the exact time. Then, he searched the World Destruction Guild and found the room where the other party had started the live stream. “Greetings, players from all over the world. I am the World Destruction Outlaw, I am Unparalleled Domination.” “Welcome to the joint crusade of the World Destruction Guild and the Domination Guild. Today, we will show the players of the world how to kill the first Level 30 Special Boss at the Level 20 Stage—Undead Bone Dragon!” The crusade had just begun. The World Destruction Guild Leader and the Domination Guild Leader presided over the area. Under their orders, a team of more than ten thousand people covered the area. … “They’re loaded. They actually hired several thousand elite players.” “They even hired an NPC army?” “Iron Skull City is still powerful. Its overall strength is far above other main cities.” “The Bone Dragon Boss must be extraordinary.” The players watching the live stream were very excited. Even players tens of thousands of kilometers away joined the chat. Other than the top guilds in Iron Skull City, no one could organize such a large-scale crusade. Under such popularity, the viewership of the live-stream soared. In just less than ten seconds, it had attracted the attention of tens of millions of players. It easily took first place in the live stream ranking. … Outside the cave, with ten thousand elites gathered, the Bronze monsters had long been wiped out. From their current state, it seemed that they did not discover the situation inside. The main reason was that they trusted the Boss too much. The upper limit of 2,700 Attack Points was an insurmountable gap for the players. They did not believe that anyone could kill such a Boss alone. “After we enter the cave, everyone will act according to our original plan. Here, I’ll repeat our next battle plan.” “First of all, every 50 people will form a team, including 10 Assassins, 10 Mages, 10 Archers, 10 Warriors, and 10 Priests!” “Don’t panic after entering the final battlefield. Don’t retreat. All the players who die in the battle will receive compensation!” Unparalleled Domination shouted towards the players. Here, there was a need to praise the wisdom of large guilds. It was obvious that their strength was not as bad as their character. Any large guild had a very perfect combat system when fighting. For example, against this Bone Dragon Boss. After knowing the special defense mechanism of the Bone Dragon Boss, they grouped 50 people into one unit. This way, they could control the Boss’ defense to less than 500 points. With the current damage output of elite players, it was not difficult to break through such a defense. … “Shield Warriors, open the way!” “Mages, clear the monsters!” Under Unparalleled Domination’s command, the ten thousand soldiers rushed into the cave. Everyone entered as teams of 50. As soon as the skeleton warriors appeared, they were flattened by the vanguard players. Everyone rushed into the depths of the cave. At the front of the team were members of other guilds who were employed for this mission. This was not a small sum. Once the players died, they had to be compensated a huge sum of money. However, the World Destruction Guild and the Domination Guild had already made up their minds. They had even bought nearly 150,000 gold coins in order to shock the world. While everyone was in high spirits, Cross Fire, the first to enter the deepest part of the cave, suddenly widened his eyes. All the players who came here immediately looked at the scene in disbelief. In this vast area, there was no longer the huge boss they had seen recently, nor was there a group of hideous undead mages. All the monsters disappeared. “Damn!” “Boss! Our boss is missing!” Cross Fire let out a cry. All the higher-ups of the guild who saw this news widened their eyes and rushed to this area. Then… It was like a bolt from the blue. Everyone froze on the spot. “Damn, what’s going on!” Unparalleled Domination roared angrily. In order to create the hype, he had joined forces with the guild to spend nearly a hundred million dollars on global advertising. He even spent tens of thousands of gold coins to hire countless players and NPCs, all for the sake of taking down the Boss in one go and completing the magnificent feat of the entire server. All the players in the world would realize the power of the World Destruction Guild and the Domination Guild. But who would have thought? At this last moment, their Boss Monster had been intercepted! They had clearly checked on the Boss’s situation around 8 in the morning and had even sent hundreds of people to guard the entrance. If a large number of people appeared here, they would definitely be discovered immediately. This situation was too strange, the boss had disappeared for no reason. How could he not be furious? This was a global live broadcast. Not killing the Boss was only a part of the loss. The true loss was for all the players in the world to see this scene. From today onwards, this would be a stain that their Domination Guild would never be able to cleanse!!! “It must have happened during the chaos at noon!” Some players realized something. “Yes! It must be! At that time, hundreds of monsters rushed at us. Moreover, someone saw a light flash into the cave. We thought that we were seeing things, but now it seems that someone must have entered the cave at that time and snatched our kill!” “At noon?” Unparalleled Domination’s expression darkened. He did not believe this conclusion, “The Undead Bone Dragon is a Level 30 Special Boss with attributes comparable to a Silver Boss. We only had the confidence to kill it after gathering 10,000 elites. How could anyone beat us to it!” “That’s possible!” Cross Fire walked out, “Look at the top and on the ground. There are traces of fighting. Not long ago, someone definitely fought an intense battle with the Boss here!” “Who do you think it is?” Everyone was curious. Who could have accomplished such a magnificent feat alone? “Tyrant!” Cross Fire gritted his teeth and said, “At this stage, if anyone can do this, it must be Tyrant! Only he can do this!” When this guess was said, everyone was incomparably shocked. As Cross Fire had said, in the current game, if anyone could do this, it would be Tyrant, because he had the only divine equipment in the entire server. … At this moment, the popularity of the live-stream actually rose to an unprecedented level. The players wanted to see tens of thousands of people fighting the Boss. However! The current situation was more shocking than the crusade. “How can a Boss that only 10,000 elite players can defeat be killed by a single player?” “Are the attributes of the divine equipment really so powerful?” “Iron Skull City is indeed stronger than other cities.” “He must have cheated. Otherwise, he would not have been able to do such a thing.” “Perhaps everyone does not know how terrifying this Boss is, but according to my understanding, this Boss has an attack limit of 2,700 points!” “How can one person defeat such a terrifying Boss?” “God knows how far ahead Tyrant is.” In the livestream, players from all over the world spoke. They were especially curious about Lorne’s strength. Unfortunately, they would never know the extent of Lorne’s power. … Swish! Swish! Swish! On a hill, Lorne led his pets through a barrage of attacks, quickly clearing the monsters in the forest. With the help of the long-tongued bat, Lorne accurately found a large group of monsters each time and turned them into rich experience points. At dawn, Lorne still did not feel tired. Perhaps because of his new skill and such efficient farming, he was very excited. In addition, because of the lack of time, he did not choose to rest but continued killing monsters. After clearing this mountain port, he continued forward and entered a valley. He immediately discovered a group of hideous wolves. -485 -1650! (Critical) -477 -491 It could be seen that when facing high-level monsters, only by dealing a critical hit could the damage be high. Fortunately, the EXP was obtained quickly enough, and Aisha’s level was also rising rapidly. By the time it was an hour past midnight, Lorne poured all the experience he had just gained into Aisha, and immediately, a golden light slanted down. Ding! “Congratulations on leveling your pet Aisha to Level 10!” “Due to reaching Level 10, she has unlocked the talent skill—Phantom Combo!” [Phantom Combo] Effect: Does 3-7 basic attacks to a single target instantly. After killing a target, 30% of the cooldown time will be reduced. Cooldown: 15 seconds. So powerful! 3-7 consecutive basic attacks instantly was too powerful. Aisha’s attack limit was as high as 3,600 points. Once she unleashed seven basic attacks, it would deal more than 20,000 damage. Other than the Boss, no other monster could withstand such a ferocious attack. Not only that, after killing a target, this skill’s cooldown would reduce by 30%, which was a huge boost for Aisha who was already a main damage dealer. Looking at the additional powerful skill in front of him, Lorne could not wait to see Aisha’s performance on the battlefield. At that moment, a grand voice sounded. “Full-server wanted list: Due to Tyrant stealing our guild’s Boss, our World Destruction Guild has joined forces with the Domination Guild to solemnly declare that as long as you kill Tyrant once, you can obtain a reward of 1 million dollars. Any player who provides Tyrant’s real-time location can also use the coordinates of Tyrant to come and receive the corresponding reward (limited to the first three informants). Moreover, if any player gets Tyrant’s Angel’s Wings equipment, our World Destruction Guild is willing to pay 150 million alliance dollars to purchase it, and we can give you the minimum position of commander in our guild!” “Full-server wanted list: …” “Full-server wanted list: …” Blood Shadow City! At the Netherworld Guild headquarters, the Guild Leader [Nether River] was communicating with the NPCs of the dark forces in the city. When he came out, a group of players rushed over. A lackey shouted, “Boss, something bad happened. Someone beat us to it just now!” “Who did this?” “I heard that it was Tyrant, and he stole the Boss under the eyes of ten thousand people alone.” “Tyrant?” Nether River paused for a moment, “Stealing a Level 30 Special Boss in front of ten thousand people? He’s actually this strong…” “What’s their reaction?” The Netherworld Guild and the Domination Guild had a very close relationship. Most of the hunting missions targeting the players were basically provided by the Domination Guild. It would definitely be the same this time. “They’re about to go crazy from anger. There’s a worldwide reward for hunting Tyrant. Boss, look. This is the announcement that Unparalleled Domination made just now.” “150 million?” Nether River smiled. If they really got the divine equipment on Tyrant, who would want this mere 150 million? If he could obtain such a divine tool, coupled with his excellent combat skills, no one in the world would be his match. “Boss, to see Lady Doris, not only do we need a high reputation in the Dark Faction, but we also need the proof of a special mission.” “That brat Tyrant has such a huge presence in front of the Church of Light. It must be related to the Dragon of Light. If we can capture him, we will definitely be able to see Lady Doris. If we can obtain some rewards, that would be awesome.” The lackey was so excited that he was about to drool. “Yes, we have to contact Lady Doris as soon as possible. Only then can we increase our advantage.” Nether River nodded and said, “In that case, we’ll invade the ruins of the war and hunt Tyrant while killing the players of the Light Faction!” “However, the mission of Blood Shadow City has not been completed yet. We can’t mobilize all of them for the time being. Go and ally with the other rogue players and guilds of the Dark Faction. Get them to mobilize immediately and start attacking the enemy players in the ruins of the war to wipe them out!” “As for our Netherworld Guild, let Bloodlust lead the team. With him around, the players of the Light Faction will definitely not be able to escape!” Nether River did not take action personally. However, the Netherworld Guild still sent a powerful combat team to cooperate with the other players in the Blood Shadow City to launch a terrifying attack on the Light Faction players in the ruins of the war. As for Tyrant? His solo combat ability was indeed very powerful. However, in the face of thousands of people, individual strength was meaningless. Therefore, it was best if he prayed that they did not encounter him. Otherwise, they would definitely plunder all the equipment on him, especially that divine equipment. They could not let it go! … “Eh—” When he saw the reward announcement, Lorne was speechless. It had to be said that Unparalleled Domination was really cunning. Lorne knew very well that the Domination Guild would pay a huge price to target him. Therefore, with a reward of one million, he mobilized the players in the entire server to cause trouble for Lorne. Even if it could not cause a substantial blow to Lorne, it could still make his life in the game very uncomfortable, because at any time or place, there might be players who wanted to earn a million from bounties. At this moment, someone sent a private message. “Leader, these bastards are too shameless. Let’s set up a reward too. I’ll pay to kill that bastard until he ends up in the Beginner Village!” Super Rich was furious. “There’s no need. Just treat it as a dog barking.” “But if they keep doing this, Leader, you’ll definitely encounter a lot of trouble.” “Trouble?” Lorne smiled, “How troublesome can it be? If one arrow can’t kill them, two will do. If they can survive, I’ll admit that their armor is tight.” “Eh… That’s true.” Super Rich was very confident in Tyrant’s strength. After a moment of silence, he asked, “By the way, Leader, do you have a girlfriend?” Girlfriend? How could he ask about such a thing? Don’t be ridiculous. “I do.” He was decisive in answering. “I see…” Super Rich said regretfully, “Do you mind changing to another one?” <i>Eh?</i>  <i>Was this how rich people lived?</i>  “What do you want to know?” “Nothing. There’s just a girl who’s very suitable for you, Boss. Why don’t you meet her in the game first?” Super Rich asked carefully. “There’s no need. I don’t have such considerations for the time being.” Lorne rejected him decisively. He was in no mood to date now. To be precise, he did not believe anyone on the Internet, especially in a situation where his identity was so sensitive. No matter who it was, they could not dream of obtaining his real identity. If it was leaked, his safety would no longer be guaranteed. After all, his current value was not something ordinary people could imagine. With his current strength, he could completely help a corporation quickly occupy the virtual world market of “Divine Realm”. This was a huge market like in the real world. If those financial groups knew his true identity, they would definitely send people to assassinate him in reality after failing to rope him in. This had happened before. In a previous game, there was a huge conflict between two large guilds. Later, it became more and more intense. When one of the guilds investigated the accurate location of the higher-ups of the enemy guild, they immediately sent assassins to kill all the higher-ups of the enemy guild in real life. He had to avoid such a dangerous thing. The best way to avoid this was to reduce the number of friends. He ended his conversation with Super Rich. Lorne wandered through the forest. Although Aisha’s level had increased, she was still unable to harm the monsters in this area. Therefore, the farming of experience points was still limited. In addition, after Level 10, the EXP that Aisha needed immediately increased tremendously. Just reaching Level 11 required 380,000 experience points. If he only farmed monsters like this, it might take several days to reach Lorne’s expectations. “Looks like I can only head towards the Lake of Death first.” Lorne did not have that much time. He had to leave now. Only then would he have enough time to find his mission target in the area. Doomsday Forest. Lorne opened the map and headed for the Lake of Death. When he used the vine to cross a rapid river and arrived at a forest filled with bulls, a special situation occurred. [Demonized Bull] Level: 35 Health: ??? Skill: Collision, Bull’s Charge Introduction: The bulls living in the Doomsday Forest have become extremely violent because of the invasion of the dark power. Please do not approach. It could be seen that the monsters here had reached Level 35. This was not good news. The level suppression effect of “Divine Realm” was calculated by the difference in levels. When the difference between the two sides reached 15 levels, the level suppression effect would reach 60%! In other words, Lorne’s damage output would only be 40% effective. Swish! Swish! Swish! Small Artillery drew its bow and fired arrows. -123 -131 -125 -137 Damage that barely broke through their defense appeared. At this speed, it was too difficult to farm monsters in this area. Lorne felt melancholy, but also helpless. In his pet space, Aisha was only Level 11. Therefore, under the influence of the bond between Summoner and pet, Lorne could not allow other pets to level up. Therefore, this was not the best time to attack. Lorne should come after leveling up, but there was no choice now. It was all because of the limited time available. Now, Lorne had only completed two-fifths of the dragon soul in the mission. He could only hope to obtain the remaining three dragon souls near the Lake of Death. Fortunately, the level suppression did not affect agility. Under the high speed of Small Artillery, the demonized bull did not counterattack effectively. Half a minute later… Crack! The level 35 Demonized Bull finally fell to the ground. The loot splattered on the ground. At the same time, it gave Lorne 373 experience points, 73 bronze coins, and a White Iron equipment. “Too slow.” Lorne was not satisfied with this efficiency. With Small Artillery’s damage output, it actually took nearly half a minute to finish this monster. Compared to before, this speed was really too slow. If it was in the Barbarian Forest, killing monsters around Level 20 might take a few seconds to end the battle. But now, it would take half an hour. If he really followed this speed, he did not know how long it would take for Aisha to raise her level. With that in mind, Lorne had to look at his bag. To be precise, it was the materials inside. Lorne had obtained a lot of rare materials from the dragon soul. These materials could allow the two pets to evolve even stronger. “Looks like I can’t be stingy now.” Lorne took out the [Dragon Bone Fragment] from his bag. This material should be the most suitable to fuse with the undead archer. As for the other materials? Lorne felt that he should save them. This time, he had to use the dragon skeleton fragment because of the situation. Under normal circumstances, he would not be willing to merge this material with a Silver monster. After all, it was a legendary material. But he could not think too much about it now. In order to complete this mission, he had to do this. With that in mind, Lorne did not hesitate. He directly activated his talent skill. The next second, the synthesis formula appeared. Without thinking, Lorne placed the Small Artillery inside. Compared to Venom, Small Artillery’s attributes were stronger, and the damage output would increase significantly. After doing this, Lorne also put the dragon bone fragment in. Ding! “A prototype material and a body part material have been confirmed. The synthesis formula is: (Fire of Death) + (Dragon Bone Fragment) = (???)” “The cost is 5 gold coins. Would you like to merge?” 5 gold coins? Previously, when he created the ‘Rimuru’, the cost was also 5 gold coins. The higher the cost, the stronger the product. Didn’t that mean that the monster created this time might be a Boss-level creature? Thinking of this, Lorne’s eyes lit up. Boss monsters and non-boss creatures were on completely different levels. Perhaps the attack power of an ordinary Boss was not much different from that of a Silver monster. However, the health points of the two were completely different. The Boss’ health points were most likely ten times that of ordinary monsters! For example, Small Artillery was a Silver monster and had reached Level 20. Its health was only 12,600. As a Bronze Boss, Rimuru’s health points exceeded 175,000 even if it was only Level 10. If the latter was Level 20, its health would exceed 300,000. The difference between the two was nearly 24 times! “Very good. Now, let’s witness a miracle!” Lorne took a deep breath and chose the option. The next moment, a huge magic circle appeared. In the magic circle, the dragon skeleton fragments turned into powerful energy and poured into the body of Small Artillery. Roar! Roar! Roar! There was a faint dragon roar at the scene. Lorne immediately focused on the light ahead. The light became more and more blinding, and even the color was dyed pale gold. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining a Gold Monster: [Dragon Bone Fire]!” As soon as he finished speaking, the light at the scene gradually dissipated. At this moment, what appeared before Lorne was an undead in a black cloak, black flames burning on its body. This image did not change much from before. The only difference was the luster on the bones. The original Small Artillery was a Silver monster, and its bones were only shimmering with a faint silver light. But now, there was a faint golden light on its body. Perhaps this was the characteristic of a Gold monster. “Its level has fallen to Level 18?” Lorne looked at the level of Small Artillery and found that it had dropped by 2 levels. This was because its quality had increased, so the experience points needed to level up had also increased. Therefore, the original experience points it had could not allow it to reach Level 20. Fortunately, Lorne still had some experience points left. Without much thought, he first let Small Artillery reach Level 20. Swish! Swish! Two consecutive golden lights poured down. Small Artillery reached Level 20 again. Lorne opened its attributes panel again and saw the powerful attributes of the first Gold pet in the entire server. ———— [Dragon Bone Fire] (Small Artillery) Grade: Gold Level: 20 (0 / 209,600) HP: 24,000 Physical Attack: 1800-2460 Defense: 780 Superiority: 90% Skills: [Rapid Fire], [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows], [Fire of Death], [Frenzied Shooting]. Introduction: An undead awakened by the evil power. Due to the enhancement of the dragon’s power, it has become an even more terrifying Dragon Bone Fire. ———— These were Small Artillery’s current attributes. After successfully evolving, all the attributes of Small Artillery had been greatly improved. First of all, its health points went from 12,600 to 24,000! It had almost doubled! The upper limit of its attack power also increased from 1560 points to 2460 points! In total, it gained 900 Attack Power! Other than that, the other attributes also increased to different degrees. The values were between 1.5 and 2 times of before. In addition… Small Artillery’s skills also improved to a certain extent. The higher the skill level, the higher the damage output, naturally the higher the damage output. “Time to continue farming monsters.” “I hope it’s more efficient now.” Lorne looked at the surrounding monsters. Because they had entered deep enough into the map, the monsters here seemed to be above Level 35. This was a very worrying phenomenon. Although he could still clear Level 35 monsters, once the monsters reached Level 40, there was no way to continue playing. This was because when the difference between the two sides reached Level 20, the lower-level party could not cause any damage. That was what worried Lorne. He hoped it would not be so bad. While he was thinking, Small Artillery had already begun farming monsters. The golden hand drew its bow. In the next second, black flames ignited on the arrow and shot out in an instant. -485 High damage broke through the defense. With this damage output, it could kill a Level 35 monster in ten seconds. After gradually becoming familiar with the distribution of monsters in this area, Lorne’s efficiency in killing monsters increased greatly. He first let the long-tongued bat search for the monsters. Then, he let the other pets gather the monsters. In the end, Small Artillery dealt the damage. Small Artillery had the [Piercing Arrow] skill, which was a terrifying AOE skill. Five minutes later, Small Artillery’s [Piercing Arrow] finally triggered another critical hit. The arrows fired by Small Artillery were like a fire dragon roaring. Cold and dark flames were like lasers that destroyed the world! When it penetrated an area, the ground along the way was burned by the flames of the undead. -5400! (Critical) -5380 (Critical) -5420! (Critical) -5500! (Critical) -5270 (Critical) Countless terrifying damage values flew in front of him. Due to the critical strike effect triggered, the amplification of [Piercing Arrow] and the critical strike amplification worked together. Coupled with the fact that Small Artillery had the highest attack power of 2460 points, this arrow dealt incomparably terrifying critical damage. Roar! All the bulls in the surrounding 40 yards fell. Such a terrifying output was not something they could withstand. Small Artillery held its bow and continued to lead them around. When the cooldown of [Piercing Arrow] ended, it would draw its bow and deal a fatal blow to the demonized bulls. Three minutes later, there were dozens of corpses on the ground. Lorne stepped forward to clean up the battlefield. … It had to be said that the critical strike chance of the Divine Realm was really low. In “Divine Realm”, if one did not have a critical hit chance, they would basically fail to trigger any critical hit damage, and it would never happen. Fortunately, because Small Artillery had the [Frenzied Shooting] skill, it had a 10% critical strike chance. Therefore, Lorne often saw critical damage appear. Once the Piercing Arrow triggered the critical hit, the scene would be spectacular. One skill could kill more than a dozen monsters. For example, dozens of monsters in front of him died from such a skill. Lorne touched dozens of corpses and obtained dozens of silver coins, as well as a large pile of bull horns and fur. As for the equipment? The probability of ordinary monsters dropping equipment was very low. This was no exception at the event. Lorne did not care. What he needed the most now was experience points. A level 35 monster gave 115 experience points. As a Summoner, the five pets gave him 225% additional experience points. It was 373 points. It was because of this that Lorne had obtained 15,000 experience points. At this rate, it did not seem to be as difficult to level up as he imagined. Thinking of this, Lorne was filled with confidence. He began to sweep through the area. None of the monsters could escape his claws. …. More than two hours later, Lorne led the way out of the area. He had killed most of the Demonized Bulls here. He hunted nearly 650 Demonized Bulls in total and gained 300,000 experience points, as well as a large amount of materials and bronze coins. Aisha’s level barely reached 12. According to the current leveling speed, he could raise Aisha’s level to 20 before the end of the next day. It was about the expected time. … Not long after Lorne left, several players exploring the map arrived at this area. In the end, they discovered that there was burning ground everywhere, but they did not encounter a single Demonized Bull. This was too strange. After all, there were monsters everywhere. Why was there nothing on this hill? “Gosh, something strange happened.” “This looks like a mark left behind after the battle?” “That shouldn’t be wrong.” “Look, this burnt area is slowly recovering!” The players looked over. The ground was recovering, and the burning marks quickly faded. Seeing this scene, all the players present widened their eyes. As players, they knew very well that such a situation definitely meant that other players were killing monsters to level up! My goodness— This was a Level 35 Monster Zone. How could someone level up here? At the edge of the Doomsday Forest, in a very dark cave. Lorne was leading his pets to shoot crazily at a group of disgusting maggots. This was close to the Lake of Death and was a relatively central location. Logically speaking, the monsters here should be very terrifying. But strangely… Lorne had discovered a group of Level 25 monsters here! The monsters were highly demonized, so their attributes were extremely terrifying. But in Lorne’s eyes, such increased attributes were not a problem. Even if the monsters had double attributes, he was willing to stay here forever. Compared to the level suppression, the double attributes of a Level 25 monster were much milder. “Unfortunately, this is only a cave…” Lorne sighed helplessly as he followed behind his pet. The monsters in this place were very suitable for him. But the place was too small. A cave could not contain too many monsters even if it was deep enough. What Lorne wanted was a few million experience points. Such a small place could not provide him with his needs. Lorne sighed. Then, he followed his pet deeper into the cave. While killing the monsters, he also noticed the various information in the chat. It could be seen that at this moment, most of the elite players had already entered. They swept through the Doomsday Forest crazily. During this period, many accidents occurred in the game. Many players from large guilds encountered one another. Many of them fought over the corpse of a warrior. There were also some solo players who were bullied by the guild players and cursed in the chat. “How leisurely.” Looking at their cursing, Lorne could not help but laugh. There was no need to do this. The map of the ruins of the war was so large, why did they have to fight for the resources in that area? In fact, if they moved to the side, they could still find the skeletons of the Iron Skull City’s warriors. There was no need for conflict. One had to know that it took three days to reach here from the main city. … -1683 -1679 -1691 -4200 (Critical) -1667 In the depths of the cave, Small Artillery drew its bow crazily, and countless arrows shot from its hands. It could be seen that the damage values were very high. Without the effect of level suppression, Small Artillery’s damage output was immediately revealed. Under such terrifying damage, the sticky worms were all nailed to the ground. Their corpses writhed, looking disgusting. At that moment, Lorne saw a pile of rotting bones in the corner. Ding! [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton x1] ———— [Warrior Skeleton] Type: Mission Item Description: Please bring this item back to the Church of Light. You will obtain a high amount of reputation points because of this.] ———— Was this also a mission item? Collecting the corpses of the warriors was an event mission. As an adventurer of Iron Skull City, Lorne naturally received this mission. He would not miss an event like this where he could obtain reputation points by collecting warrior skeletons. Therefore… Before coming to this place, Lorne had actually been searching for the warrior skeletons. After all, he had to search for the dragon skeletons anyway. In that case, he could also complete the event mission. Most of the skeletons he had found were relatively intact. This was the first time he had encountered such scattered skeleton fragments. Ding! [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Knight x1] [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Viscount x1] […] As he put the skeletons into his bag, Lorne received many notifications. It could be seen that these corpses were also of quality. Their previous titles would allow their corpses to bring greater benefits to Lorne. Lorne did not leave a single one behind as he stored them all in the Dragon’s Treasure Vault. He wondered if it was because of the special nature of the cave. The skeletons here were of very high quality, most of them having their own titles. There were even skeletons of marquises inside. There were very few marquis corpses among the corpses of the expeditionary army soldiers. At the very least, Lorne had not encountered any in the forest. “If only I could keep farming forever.” Lorne was liking this place more and more. Unfortunately… Half an hour later, he reached the end of the cave. This was a huge karst cave with some smaller tunnels around it. Like the sewers of the city, it connected the passageways of all the tunnels. Lorne did not enter immediately. At this moment, he was attracted by the layout of the cave. It could be seen that in this cave, the walls in all directions were embedded with glowing crystals. On the ground, there was a special magic circle working. The magic circle was made of black rocks with strange runes engraved on them. Wisps of energy poured down from above. It was a floating black crystal. At this moment, black energy was spreading through the magic circle. Lorne checked the reaction of the Dragon’s Compass and found nothing amiss. In other words, there were no dragon souls or dragon skeletons here. “Without a dragon soul, they still created such a complicated magic circle.” “There must be a scheme!” Lorne did not know what the other party’s true intentions were, but he knew that as long as the magic circle was destroyed, it would be considered a contribution to peace. Therefore… He controlled Small Artillery to draw its bow. A flaming arrow shot out and accurately struck the Dark Gem above. But surprisingly, the flames on the arrow were absorbed. As he wondered, suddenly… From the surrounding small caves, more than a dozen Death Worms rushed out. ———— [Death Worm] Quality: Elite Level: 25 HP: 6500 / 6500 Skill: Death Poison, Self-Destruction. Introduction: The Rotten Lich’s favorite pet. Be careful. Where such creatures appear, there is usually a Rotten Lich nearby. ———— “Rotten Lich?” Lorne did not have a good impression of such a boss. Liches liked to summon their minions. Killing them was too wasteful of his time. As for the worms in front of him? Unlike the previous monsters, the Death Worms in front of him were elite monsters. The attributes were very powerful. Especially with the additional skill [Self-Destruction]. At the last moment after killing the “Death Worm”, the monster would self-destruct, pouring out the poison in its body in an instant, dealing fatal damage to the surrounding enemies. Coupled with the small space in the cave, dealing with these monsters was indeed not easy. However, Lorne did not have such worries and attacked directly. The two archers used their skills at the same time. Instantly, countless arrows covered the area in front of them. -1455 -1453 -1453 -817 -801 -823 These monsters were only Level 25, so Venom dealt very high damage. Under the baptism of such skills, the Death Worms in front of them lost a third of their health. Before the monster could get close, Small Artillery used another AOE skill. [Piercing Arrow]! After accumulating power for three seconds, the damage was doubled! This skill dealt more than 3,000 points of damage. With this wave of attacks, most of the monsters were already low in health. Then, they began to harvest the monsters crazily. Under the high attack speed, countless arrows shot out. The monsters also fell to the ground. These Level 25 elite monsters were not even as threatening as Level 30 ordinary monsters in front of Lorne. Other than spending more time killing monsters, Lorne did not feel any other difficulty. “Strange…” After he killed all the monsters in the field, Lorne could not help but frown. This was because new monsters came out of the small caves. This wave of monsters was the same as the previous ones. They were all Death Worms. There were a total of 30 of them. However, such a group of monsters did not put much pressure on Lorne. On the contrary, Lorne was very excited. This was because the small monsters produced here were different from the ones summoned by the Lich. The Lich’s summoned monsters gave no experience. As for the Death Worms, they provided him with decent experience points. As long as he killed a Death Worm, Lorne would obtain 300 experience points. If he could farm monsters here forever, he could even raise Aisha’s level to Level 20 here. This was the best outcome, but Lorne was more concerned that it was only an illusion. … Ding! [You have killed the Death Worms x5!] [You have killed the Death Worms x7!] [You have killed Death Worms x13!] [You have killed the Death Worms x8!] […] Just like this, in the dark cave, Lorne’s pets fought for over an hour. Finally, they put away their bow. There were no longer any monsters in the cave. Sigh… Lorne sighed to himself. To him, this was a rare monster farming spot. One could not even guess how much he had gained during this period of time. In addition to obtaining countless equipment and other loot, Lorne also obtained an astonishing 270,000 experience points. This was only what he had obtained in an hour. According to the number of kills, 270,000 experience points was equivalent to killing 900 monsters. On average, he had to kill 15 monsters per minute! This was unimaginable in the wilderness! Unfortunately… The monsters in this place were limited, and it was not infinite. Just 900 monsters was not a huge number to Lorne. The 270,000 experience points he had just obtained could not even allow Aisha to level up once. … “Is it related to this magic circle?” Lorne arrived before the magic circle. When he was farming previously, he had discovered that the magic circle would flash once before each wave of monsters appeared. Therefore, if nothing unexpected happened, there had to be a key connection between the two. Lorne even believed that the magic circle was the key to producing the monsters. Thinking of this, he used Identification on the magic circle. [Death Creature Summoning Array] Quality: ??? Status: Out of Energy Energy: 30 / 1000 Effect: Magic circle can be activated by consuming energy to summon the Death Worms from the Sea of Death. “It’s as I thought!” Lorne’s eyes lit up. From the interface, it could be seen that this magic circle was indeed the key to summoning the monsters. However, the summoning array was already out of energy. Without it, the magic circle could not continue summoning monsters. This made him very depressed. After all, to Lorne, who urgently needed experience points, this was a dream location. According to the rate of 900 monsters per hour, he only needed one day to raise Aisha’s level to 20. But now that there was no energy for summoning, the hope he had seen might immediately be destroyed. He hoped that he would not be so unlucky. With a sigh, Lorne carefully checked the information regarding the magic circle. When he opened a hidden panel, his eyes suddenly lit up. [Warrior Corpse] The energy needed was actually the warrior corpse! Lorne’s eyes widened at the information. He was sure that he was not seeing things. On this panel, it did say that as long as enough undead power was injected, the magic circle would be activated again. In the ruins of the war, the undead power was the most concentrated energy element in the entire map. As for why the warrior corpses could be used as energy sources? This was because the corpses of the dead soldiers were the best carriers of the undead power. After many years of accumulation, these corpses condensed extremely rich undead power. “No wonder we found so many corpses of warriors in the tunnel when we entered the cave. This is the reason.” “As for the huge swarm of Death Worms earlier, they should be pets summoned by the Rotten Lich.” Lorne understood everything. At the same time, he felt extremely excited. Now, he was certain that the warrior corpses was indeed the main energy source for activating the magic circle. If that was the case, then everything was much simpler. The warrior corpses happened to be the main target of this event, and there were many being traded in the market. In other words, as long as he was willing to spend money, he could obtain enough energy! With enough energy, it was equivalent to having infinite monsters! With enough monsters, it was equivalent to having endless experience points! If he could really make this magic circle work continuously, then Lorne was definitely confident that he could raise Aisha’s level to 20 in one day! “I wonder how many times I can summon monsters with one warrior corpse?” There were not many of such materials in Lorne’s bag, only about a hundred. These corpses did not seem to satisfy his needs. He estimated that a corpse would at most summon one monster. As he thought, Lorne threw a corpse under the black crystal. The corpse turned into a stream of black energy that entered the crystal. It was the same as the arrow from Small Artillery. As undead power, the method of absorption was no different. Lorne stepped back. At this moment, the magic circle that had obtained energy activated again. Under the black light, a Death Worm walked out of the small cave. “There really is just one.” After killing the monster, Lorne checked the panel of the summoning magic circle again. He found no change in energy reserve. This was good news. If he was not mistaken, every point of energy was equivalent to 30 monsters. “One point is equivalent to 30 monsters. 1,000 points of energy should be equivalent to 30,000 monsters!” “One monster is equivalent to 300 experience points. 30,000 monsters are equivalent to 9 million experience points!” “That’s a lot…” According to Lorne’s calculations, this experience could allow Aisha to reach Level 20. He also let the levels of [Rimuru] and [Long-Tongued Bat] catch up. With that in mind, Lorne threw in another higher-level corpse. Soon, he obtained more important information. That was… Corpses with noble titles could provide more energy. The energy of a Knight was ten times that of an ordinary corpse, but the energy of a Baron was fifty times that of an ordinary corpse! As for the higher-ranked Marquis, the energy produced was 5,000 times that of ordinary corpses! Lorne happened to have a Marquis’s corpse on him that could be used to summon worms for a long time. After checking the resources, Lorne opened the chat channel of the ruins of the war and made an announcement.  “Buying 50,000 warrior corpses at 1.2 times the market price. The minimum is 1,000 corpses in each transaction. Whoever has the goods can message me.” “Buying warrior corpses…” “Buying warrior corpses…” Lorne made many announcements at once. After all, it was a huge business worth a few million dollars. He had to make people trust him. As for why he wanted 50,000? This was to prepare for the other summoning magic circles in the future. Even if he did not find other magic circles in the future, Lorne could use these corpses to exchange for some reputation points. In short, he would not lose out. … At the same time, the entire chat channel of the ruins of the war became lively. “Gosh! It’s Tyrant!” “Even Tyrant is buying corpses?” “This God-tier player is indeed God-tier. He actually has a requirement when purchasing the corpses. The minimum is 1,000 corpses per deal. This is too sick.” “A thousand corpses is worth 20,000 according to the market price. If only I had so many!” “Brothers, we can share. Everyone, save up the corpses and sell them together. Then, we can split the profits.” “Count me in!” “I have 32!” “Count me in. I have 55…” … In a valley of the Doomsday Forest, Twinkle Rose and the others were crazily looting. Because they had bought a lot of equipment from Tyrant, the number of Level 20 players was much higher than that of other large guilds. Therefore, their harvest was even greater. Twinkle Rose held her beautiful face and smiled at the warrior corpses in her bag. There was indeed strength in numbers. In just a few days, there were already more than a hundred thousand corpses. When she returned to Iron Skull City in the future, these corpses would increase the reputation of the guild’s elites by a lot. Thinking of this, Twinkle Rose could not stop smiling. At this moment, she saw a notification crazily flashing on the chat channel of the ruins of the war. “Acquiring the warrior corpses?” Without thinking, Twinkle Rose opened her friend list and contacted Tyrant. Originally, she wanted to distribute all these corpses to the guild elites, but when she saw Lorne’s words, she immediately thought of selling them to him. “Brother Tyrant, is it urgent? I can sell it to you at the market price.” Twinkle Rose sent a message. “No need, I’m almost done.” Lorne rejected it, but then asked, “You should have many people in Iron Skull City, right?” “Yes, why? Can I help you?” “No.” “…” Looking at the reply, Twinkle Rose sent a series of ellipses, representing her speechlessness. Then, she gritted her teeth and sent another message, “Good brother, do you have a business to take care of me? You know that the sisters of the Silver Snow Guild don’t have money to buy bags anymore. You have to help us.” Seeing the message, the corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up, “Since you have made this request, I’ll be generous and help you.” “Get someone to go to the Alchemist Association and use my name to transport the produced antidote to the expeditionary army camp. Then, hand it to Super Rich for sale. After completing the mission, I’ll give each of you a gold coin per day. Do you want to do it?” Even though the gold coins had depreciated, they were still worth 3,000 dollars. It required three days. In other words, the total employment fee was close to 10,000 dollars! Such an errand mission was simply too worth it. “No problem.” Twinkle Rose’s eyes lit up, and she continued, “However, I have a small request. Can you hand the potion to us for sale? We will only accept 5% of the reward. How about it?” “Impossible, you’re too naive. If you sell the potions for three silver coins, I won’t be able to recover the cost.” Lorne rejected her decisively. Although this big-busted sister would definitely not sell it in the same way as before with the experience from last time, even if she suddenly realized something, her understanding of sales could not compare to Super Rich. Pfft— On the other side, Twinkle Rose had the urge to vomit blood. The selling of potions for three silver coins was her greatest sore spot in the past few days. This guy still wanted to use it to mock her. Why was there such a detestable guy? “I accept your employment. Remember to contact the Alchemist Association.” “Yes.” In the end, the two reached a deal. Twinkle Rose definitely had no reason to refuse. After all, her guild members would automatically head to the ruins of the war after reaching Level 20. It would be the same even without the employment fees. Swish! Swish! Swish! As he commanded Rimuru to attract the monsters, he relied on the powerful output of Small Artillery to kill all the Death Worms. In two minutes, another wave of the Death Worms had turned into corpses. After a period of hunting, Lorne discovered more rules. Most importantly, it was the level of the monster. When using a high “noble” corpse to summon, the Death Worm summoned would experience an increase in level. Fortunately, even if its level increased, it would not exceed Level 30. Therefore, this did not affect the rhythm of the battle. At most, it only made Lorne spend more time on each wave of monsters. “These high-level Death Worms have very strong resistance. My attacks can’t break through their defense.” On the battlefield, Aisha, who had been fighting hard, lowered her head and returned to Lorne. It was not that she did not want to fight. On the contrary, she had been working hard recently. However, even she could not avoid the effects of the level suppression. After all, Aisha was only Level 13 now. If it was only a Level 25 monster, she could still deal with it easily. However, once the monster’s level exceeded 28, the situation would be terrible. Aisha’s damage output would be severely affected. At the same time, there were greater risks. This was because level suppression not only gave monsters immunity to damage, but also increased their damage against his pets. Facing the monster’s self-destruction, it was a huge test for Aisha. After only being hit by a few explosions, Aisha’s health decreased to less than half. According to Lorne’s request, she needed to leave the battlefield at this moment and only continue fighting after she recovered her health. “Aisha, don’t worry.” Noticing Aisha’s unhappy expression, Lorne comforted her, “You still need some experience to raise your level. At that time, you will definitely be able to easily avoid the self-destruction damage of the Death Worms.” “Really, Master?” Aisha blinked her large misty eyes, looking abnormally pleasantly surprised, “I’ve been trying very hard to dodge, but I just can’t avoid all the explosions. I thought my aptitude was too poor.” Pfft— Lorne almost spat out a mouthful of blood. This Elven Princess with 3,600 Attack Power actually thought that her aptitude was too poor? If others heard these words, they would probably die of embarrassment. After all, they did not even have 500 Attack Points. … In the blink of an eye, five hours passed. Several lights poured from Aisha’s body. Ding! “Congratulations to your pet [Aisha] for successfully reaching Level 14.” “Congratulations to your pet [Aisha] for successfully reaching Level 15.” “Congratulations to your pet [Aisha] for successfully reaching Level 16.” A series of notifications appeared. Aisha’s level increased. Unfortunately, the attributes did not change much. Her attributes were derived from Lorne’s attributes, so there was no evident changes to her now. However, as Lorne distributed attribute points, her skills improved tremendously. This was especially for the skill that increased movement speed. After leveling up many times, it obtained an even greater amplification effect. This acceleration effect could allow Aisha to easily avoid the self-destruction damage of the Death Worms. Of course, that was not the point. The most important thing now was that she had reached Level 16. This was a very important level boundary. The highest level of the monsters in this cave would not exceed Level 30. Therefore, they would no longer have a level suppression effect on Aisha that reduced damage by more than 60%. In this way, Aisha could truly display her combat strength. There was no hesitation at this moment. Aisha faced the monsters ahead. -1693 -1645 -6000 (Critical) The dagger quickly slashed past, instantly killing a Death Worm. The corpse of the monster immediately began to swell. This was the prelude to self-destruction, and the surrounding enemies only had 1.5 seconds to dodge. Most melee players could not avoid the damage at this time. Even the previous Aisha could not do this sometimes. Once affected by the explosion, even if she did not die, she would lose at least a few thousand health points. But now… Aisha was not troubled by this. Moving at high speed, she could easily avoid the damage of the explosion. All of this came from the increase in damage output. When one could directly kill a monster, they could immediately leave the battlefield after launching an attack. There was no need for the same strategy as before, so Lorne naturally avoided situations where she could not dodge in time. … -6060 (Critical) -1651 -6100 (Critical) -1669 -6120 (Critical) -1617 It could be seen that Aisha had completely become a Death Reaper walking in the darkness. Every time Aisha walked out of the darkness, her sharp blades would quickly draw two saber lights that killed the target in an instant. Moreover, the first slash always dealt critical damage! ———— Skill: [Phantom Massacre]: For every target killed, the cooldown of the [Traceless Phantom] skill will be reset, and the next attack will be a critical hit. ———— This was why Aisha was so powerful. [Phantom Massacre] made her an extremely powerful killing machine. No target could survive two seconds under her sharp blade. As it went on, the rest of the battle was even easier for Lorne. The monster that needed two minutes, or even three minutes, only needed one minute now. If not for the fact that the summoning circle had a cooldown time, Lorne’s EXP gain would have been even more terrifying. Three in the morning! Four in the morning! Five in the morning! Finally, Lorne could not hold on anymore. Playing through the night was indeed not a skill that he could master. For the sake of his health, he should sleep for a while. Lorne prepared to go offline to rest. Before going offline, he looked at the state of the summoning circle. On this day, he had killed about 15,000 Death Worms. It seemed that he could kill all the monsters in this summoning circle before the end of the next day. After going offline, Lorne was extremely tired. Although he was playing games in the virtual world, the mental exhaustion still made his body very tired. After washing up, he fell asleep. The next morning, Lorne went online again. He returned to the dark cave and began a new day of farming monsters. The maximum number of summoned creatures was 30,000, but it could summon up to 900 monsters per hour. If Lorne wanted to convert all the monsters into experience points, he had to spend 33 hours here, without stopping to rest. He had to kill monsters here with the greatest efficiency. He had been farming for about 17 hours yesterday. In other words, Lorne had to spend another day killing monsters here. This was different from what Lorne had planned. But that did not matter. As long as he had enough experience, a day’s delay was completely acceptable. Lorne believed that he would definitely be able to find the remaining three dragon souls in the remaining four days. For the next day, other than eating and going to the washroom, Lorne spent all his time there. The long and boring time taken to kill monsters was really annoying. It was already uncomfortable to repeat the same trick for so long. Furthermore, Lorne was a Summoner. He did not have to fight the entire battle himself. This made the days of standing by the side and paddling even more torturous. Fortunately, there were enough experience points. Lorne felt pain and joy at the same time. After all, the experience points he had obtained during this period of time could be calculated using an astronomical number. Even Aisha’s level increased rapidly. When she first came to this place yesterday, she was only Level 13. Now, she was Level 20. 15,000 monsters provided 4.5 million experience points. Coupled with the experience points gained from farming monsters in the forest, he could raise Aisha’s level to 20. Unfortunately… Aisha’s attributes could not grow just by leveling up. In addition to the change in skill levels, the Level 20 Aisha also awakened a skill. ———— Skill: [Phantom Combo+]: Rapidly hits the target 4-10 times. Each time, the damage is 120%. No critical hit can be triggered, but there can be additional amplification effects. ———— This skill was definitely a killer move. 4-10 combo attacks with damage of 120%. Lorne had not seen such a scary skill before. Although there was no additional critical hit effect, this skill could be used at the same time with an amplification skill. This was a perfect match for the Summoner class. This was because among the Summoners’ skills, there were those that specifically increased the damage output of pets, and the buffs were very strong. For example, the Class Two Skill—[Strength Gift]! It could allow the pet’s next attack to deal an additional 50% damage to the target. Think about it, if this skill combined with the Phantom Combo and dealt another ten consecutive hits, the damage would definitely be sky high. Unfortunately, Lorne had not reached Class Two yet. He could not learn this skill yet, and the shocking scene could not be seen for the time being. … Ding! “Congratulations! Your pet [Rimuru] has successfully reached Level 18.” “Congratulations! Your pet [Rimuru] has successfully reached Level 19.” “Congratulations! Your pet [Rimuru] has successfully reached Level 20.” “Your pet [Rimuru] has awakened its skill—[Solidify]!” After that, the experience points obtained were all used to level up his pets. Lorne had to raise his pets to Level 20 before he could raise his level. At this moment, Aisha had reached her requirement. Then, what he needed to raise now was naturally the Alchemy Slime King (Rimuru) that had not leveled up. The EXP needed was not that high, about a quarter of Aisha’s. When Rimuru reached Level 20, its attributes immediately doubled. The best was of course its health points. At this moment, it had already reached 300,000! This was an extremely terrifying amount of health. Even Boss-level monsters in the wilderness would rarely have such a huge amount of health at this level. In addition, Rimuru had awakened a skill. ———— Skill: [Solidify] Effect: Spits out mucus. When it hits the target, it will quickly solidify. Deals a 2 second immobilization effect on the target and deals 100% damage. Note (1): It can sacrifice its health points to expand the size of the solidified mucus. Every 1,000 health points can increase the volume of the solidified mucus by 100%. Note (2): The size of the mucus will not affect the solidification effect. ———— This was a restrictive skill that could confine the target. It could also become an AOE control skill. To the current team, the existence of such skills was necessary. After Rimuru, it was the long-tongued bat’s turn. Swish! Swish! Swish!! Several rays of light fell, and the long-tongued bat’s level increased. Ding! “Congratulations! Your pet [Long-Tongued Bat] has successfully reached Level 20.” “Your pet [Long-Tongued Bat] has awakened a skill—Super Sound Wave!” After reaching Level 20, the long-tongued bat also awakened a skill. This was a detection skill. ———— Skill: [Super Sound Wave] Effect: Unleash a powerful sound wave at high altitude. Through the signal, it can quickly detect the number and types of creatures in the target area. ———— As a support pet, this skill clearly increased the value of the long-tongued bat to another level. With this skill, finding monsters would be more efficient. To Lorne, this skill was also more valuable than any damage-type skill. … After raising the pets’ levels, Lorne’s level limit was finally unlocked. He could raise his level to 30. However, he was not in a hurry. Lorne wanted to deal with the vast amount of experience points he had after killing all the monsters in the summoning circle. Using it together seemed to give him a greater sense of satisfaction. Of course, he was only doing that because the situation did not require him to level up immediately. Just like now, leveling up or not was not important because Aisha alone could control the entire battlefield, let alone other pets. Her damage output was completely off the roof. Soon, it was dawn. After more than ten hours of hunting, the monsters in the summoning circle were finally wiped out. Lorne sighed, “I can finally raise my level to 30.” Although he had been tired the entire day, the benefits were considerable. In just one day, he had obtained millions of experience points. If these experience points were handed to ordinary players, they could at least raise their levels to 50, or even higher. However, in the hands of Lorne, it would not even be enough for his pets to reach Level 25. However, at this moment, an angry voice suddenly sounded in the cave. “Who is it! How dare you destroy my summoning array!” With a terrifying sound, the walls of the cave began to tremble, as if an earthquake was about to happen. The completely dried black magic circle on the ground cracked. A new magic circle leaked out from the cracked ground. Black fog spread out and gradually formed a black tornado. Ding! [Game Announcement: Due to you destroying the undead creature’s summoning circle, a hidden summoning circle has been triggered. The hidden Boss—Lemus—has arrived here through the summoning circle. Please kill him as soon as possible. You will receive a generous reward!] The sudden system notification shocked Lorne. After seeing the contents of the notification, his eyes immediately became excited. It was a hidden Boss! Lorne had long known that there was a Boss here, but he had not waited for it to descend. He did not expect it to arrive at this time. Rumble!!! When the magic circle was completely activated, a huge figure appeared in the cave. It was a huge rotting corpse. It was three meters tall and covered in rotting black flesh. It emitted an indescribable stench. When it appeared, it stared at Lorne with its unblinking eyes. [Rotten Lich] Grade: Hidden Boss Level: 30 HP: ??? Magic Attack: 1600-2100 Physical Defense: 770 Magic Defense: 920 Skills: [Bone Corrosion Claw], [Undead Summoning], [Rotten Body], [Death Howl], [Frenzied State], [???] Introduction: A Lich that retained its original body. It firmly believes that the body is the final appearance of the undead in the world. Therefore, it began to recover its flesh with death magic. In the end, due to insufficient magic power, its body became a disgusting rotting corpse. From the interface, it could be seen that this was another ruthless Boss. [Rotten Body] allowed this Boss to have extremely powerful damage reduction abilities. Coupled with the most classic summoning skill of the Lich and its powerful attributes, the Boss’ combat strength became abnormally powerful. Unfortunately, its attack limit of 2100 was not enough to make Lorne feel troubled. “Come out, my pets!” The furious Lich raised its two rotting arms and attacked in the air. Countless corpses appeared on the ground on both sides. They lunged at Lorne. “Rimuru, Aisha, I’ll leave the Boss to you.” “Small Artillery, Venom, you’re responsible for clearing the monsters.” Lorne stood calmly and gave the order. He did not move. After all, this was only a small Boss that was even weaker than the Bone Dragon. Even if it was Level 30, it could not harm him at all. Swish! Swish! Swish! -1083 -1079 -1091 -3800! (Critical) -1067 Because the monsters were only Level 30, their damage immunity was 40%. Fortunately, the summoned monsters did not have high health, so the situation was not reversed. After triggering the passive skill of the Gold-grade monster Small Artillery, it directly transformed into a Super Artillery, attacking the monsters in front crazily. [Solidify]! Rimuru spat out a huge ball of mucus, making the Boss stand on the spot as punishment. As a Bronze Boss-level pet, its skill’s hit rate was very high. This was especially when the difference in level was not too great. At the same time, Aisha pulled out the dagger at her waist and quickly appeared behind the Boss, the dagger in her hand spinning rapidly. [Normal Attack] + [Phantom Backstab]! Aisha completed the two attacks in an instant. To be able to complete this in less than a second, this was the technique of a high-level assassin. -3600! (Critical) -4800! (Critical) Two terrifying damage numbers floated. Due to the leveling up of [Phantom Backstab], the skill increase went from the original 200% to 250% Critical Hit Damage. Therefore, the second slash dealt 4,800 points of damage. After completing this operation, the dagger in Aisha’s hand glowed with a moon-white light. She quickly waved it and drew a net made of sword light in the air. [Phantom Combo+]! Aisha’s recently awakened super skill was displayed at this moment. Seemingly due to the little beauty’s luck, she directly triggered the highest 10x combo this time! -1915 -1915 -1915 -1915 -1915… Ten high damage numbers danced in the air. Although there was no critical hit effect, she dealt nearly 20,000 damage. The Boss retreated repeatedly as its health decreased by a large amount. Just as it was about to counterattack, it was shocked to discover that Aisha had disappeared! This was the skill of an assassin. When attacking the Boss alone, they would immediately deal damage. Then, they would use an invisibility skill to pull away from the Boss. This way, one could kill the Boss without any injuries. Of course, to complete such an action, one needed powerful combat awareness and maneuverability. Otherwise, when the Boss counterattacked, one might die from not dodging in time. “Damn human brat, listen to the wails of death!” After failing to find Aisha, the Rotten Lich immediately targeted Lorne. An extremely terrifying wail sounded from his pitch-black throat. This was a mind control skill with the effect of causing confusion. “Are you trying to deafen me?” Lorne frowned. When the other party activated his skill, he waved the short staff in his hand, and an incomparably huge magic circle covered the entire cave. Woof! Woof! Woof! In the huge magic circle, hundreds of hideous hellhounds appeared. Lorne did not have any skill to dodge for the time being, so he could only use it to restrain the Boss and spend the time being controlled. Hundreds of hellhounds charged at the Boss. Their hideous mouths opened and bit at the Boss crazily. In the two seconds that Lorne was controlled, the Boss did not harm him at all. Instead, the summoned monsters were quickly decreasing. Small Artillery was a Gold-grade monster after all. Its damage output was not low. Coupled with its high attack speed, the damage output was like a machine gun. The summoned monsters could not withstand such damage and were quickly wiped out. After doing this, Small Artillery naturally targeted the Boss. Countless arrows hit the Boss and dealt very good damage. During the fight… Aisha appeared from the darkness again with a dagger in hand. Sharp blades that were glowing with a cold light danced in her hands as she attacked the Boss at an extremely fast speed. Her Attack was as high as 3,660 points. Even ordinary attacks could deal high damage. Furthermore, her skills had very low cooldown. The moment the skills were refreshed, Aisha immediately went all-out, launching a new round of fatal attacks on the Boss. -1655 -4800! (Critical) -1915 -1915 -1915 A series of damage numbers appeared. In just two seconds, Aisha dealt 11 consecutive hits. The Boss’ health instantly decreased by 25,000. As its health decreased, the rotting flesh on the Boss began to fall off. It was like a rotting tree that could no longer keep the withered leaves. “Grow, my undead body!” After losing 40,000 health points, the Rotten Lich began to recover its health. Black energy enveloped it. Its life was gradually healing. +1000 +1000 +1000 +1000… In just a few seconds, its health had recovered by 10,000 points. “Liches are really a shameless race.” Lorne had encountered undead bosses too many times. Each one was so troublesome. The Boss in front of him had actually recovered 10,000 health points in five seconds. It was too sick. If not for the fact that his pets had been upgraded, this battle might last a long time. “Attack together, quickly end the battle!” Lorne did not like playing such a game with it. The sooner this battle ended, the easier it would be for him to raise his level. At this moment, the pets who had received the order rushed towards the Boss. [Phantom Backstab]! [Phantom Combo+]! [Fan Arrow]! [Fan Arrow]! The main force of the battle was still Aisha, but as long-range DPS, Small Artillery and Venom were naturally not idle. The three pets instantly barraged with their skills. Instantly, dozens of damage numbers floated in the air. Facing such terrifying attacks, the Boss had no room to resist. Its health decreased crazily, and the rotting flesh on its body turned into black residue and fell to the ground. In the end, all that was left was a bare skeleton. At the same time, its hundreds of thousands of health points evaporated. Crack— Under Aisha’s continuous critical hits, the Boss’ health points were completely emptied. In the end, it could not support itself and fell to the ground unwillingly. It could be seen that the Boss had also completely escaped the corrosion of the undead power, revealing pure white bones. “I’m… finally free…” A soul floated out. Lorne wanted to capture it and bring it with him as a synthesis material. However, the system’s response was: Unable to capture it. The soul just now was clearly a special effect. What was truly valuable was the pile of white bones on the ground. Ding! “Congratulations on killing the hidden Boss [Rotten Lich] above your level. EXP+60,000 (+120,000)!” The hidden Boss was generous, giving Lorne 180,000 experience points. But what made Lorne more curious was the pile of white bones. Ding! [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Earl x1] This was indeed a corpse with a noble identity. The Earl was a very high-level noble. He should be able to exchange for a lot of reputation points. Lorne put the corpse away. Then, he began to clean up the loot on the ground. When he killed the Boss earlier, a large pile of gold coins and gems dropped on the ground. There were also equipment and items with different luster mixed in. Gold coins: 11 Bronze equipment: 4 Silver equipment: 3 Gold equipment: 1 The last Gold equipment caught Lorne’s attention. [Death Substitution Necklace] (1 / 1) Quality: Silver Attributes: None Special Effect: Death Substitution. After receiving a fatal attack, the death substitution effect of the ring will be triggered. After the wearer dies, they can immediately be revived and recover all their HP and MP. (After the effect is triggered, the equipment will no longer be usable.) Who would have thought that this was a resurrection item! The special effect of this equipment was simply too useful. Especially in the ruins of the war, in this map, when the player died, they would directly return to Iron Skull City. With this equipment, they could revive on the spot and instantly recover their health, which was equivalent to having an additional life. Lorne put the equipment on. As for the other loot, they were not precious. At the very least, none could not surprise Lorne. After dealing with all the gains in the cave, Lorne began to focus on the experience points. The summoning magic circle here could summon a total of 30,000 death worms, producing 9 million experience points. Almost half of the experience points were used on Aisha. Now, he only had 4.2 million experience points left. These experience points could allow Lorne to reach Level 30 and raise his pets’ levels. Except for Aisha, of course. She had no hope of reaching Level 30. The experience points she needed were more than the sum of the others in the team. Therefore, in order to maximize the combat strength of the team, Lorne’s target this time should be Small Artillery. While thinking, Lorne began to raise his level. Ding! “Congratulations on using 14,000 experience points to raise your level to 21.” “Congratulations on using 20,000 experience points to raise your level to 22.” “Congratulations on using 26,000 experience points to raise your level to 23.” “Congratulations on using 32,000 experience points to raise your level to 24.” “…” Ding! “Congratulations on reaching Level 30. You have received [Pet Space]+1.” …. After reaching Level 20, the experience points that players needed exceeded 10,000 points. To Lorne, this consumption was not a problem. After all, he could hunt for a million experience points in a day. But to his chagrin, Aisha’s need to level up had reached an absurd level. Her experience requirement was 100 times that of Lorne himself. In other words, Aisha needed a total of 1.4 million experience points to go from Level 20 to Level 21! This— Lorne fell silent. He did not know if he should be happy or sad. Without a doubt, 1.4 million experience points was a difficult amount to obtain. If not for the discovery of the undead creature summoning array this time, he would have needed at least a day to barely gather the experience points. With this in mind, he understood the difficulty of leveling up Aisha. With a long sigh, Lorne opened his panel. Due to his 10-star aptitude, he obtained 100 Free Attribute Points after leveling up ten times. In the past, he had added points based on the ratio of 3 Constitution and 2 Agility. But now, he could no longer do that. This was because his attributes would directly affect Aisha’s attributes. Therefore, Lorne had to add Intelligence. In addition, as an assassin, Aisha needed high Agility. With this in mind, the final decision became clear. “60 Intelligence and 40 Agility.” Lorne added his free attributes and opened his attributes panel. ID: [Tyrant] Class: Official Summoner Level: 30 (0 / 156,000) Talent: [Monster Merging Simulator (???)] HP: 6600 / 6600 Magic Attack: 853-1706 Physical Defense: 447 EXP: 3,734,100 Reputation: 4,700 Dragon Race of Order Reputation: 700 Night Elf Race Reputation: 50,520 Luck: 5 Possession: 174 Gold Coins, 99 Silver Coins, 12 Bronze Coins. These were Lorne’s attributes. After leveling up, there were not many attributes increased. Only his Magic Attack had a huge increase. The other attributes basically only had dozens of points more. Lorne did not care much about the data. To be honest, if not for the fact that his attributes were tied to Aisha, he would not have even wanted to check his interface. [Night Elf] (Aisha) Quality: ??? Class: Phantom Assassin (Legendary) Status: Rank 1 Level: 20 (0 / 1.4 million) HP: 66,000 (Master’s HP × 10) Physical Attack: 3412-5540 (Master’s Magic Attack × 4) Physical Defense: 894 (Master’s Defense × 2) Superiority: 100% Owner: Tyrant Skills: [Phantom Backstab], [Traceless Phantom], [Slow Dagger], [Phantom Massacre], [Absolute Dodge], [Phantom Combo+], [Elf Companion] Introduction: A Night Elf Princess with powerful innate abilities. She is a Legendary-Grade Phantom Assassin. After Lorne’s attributes increased, Aisha’s attributes also increased greatly, especially the Physical Attack stat. The upper limit of her attack increased from 3,664 to 5,540 points. It was close to 2,000 points more! This was the power of four times the attributes. As long as Lorne increased his magic attack by 1 point, Aisha would increase her physical attack by 4 points. From this mechanism, one could clearly see Aisha’s potential. One had to know that Lorne was still wearing the previous Silver Set. Its attributes could no longer keep up with his level. If he could change into a Level 30 equipment set, his attributes would also increase greatly. “I’ll level up Small Artillery with the remaining experience points.” Apart from Aisha and Rimuru, Small Artillery had the greatest potential. Increasing its level could increase the team’s combat ability in the shortest time with the least resources. … Ding! “Congratulations on using 210,000 experience points to raise your pet “Small Artillery” to Level 21.” “Congratulations on using 300,000 experience points to raise your pet “Small Artillery” to Level 22.” “Congratulations on using 390,000 experience points to raise your pet “Small Artillery” to Level 23.” “Congratulations on using 480,000 experience points to raise your pet “Small Artillery” to Level 24.” “…” With the support of a few million experience points, Small Artillery’s level increased all the way to Level 27. There was no more experience points left on Lorne. As for the attributes of Small Artillery? At this moment, there was already a huge improvement. [Dragon Bone Fire] (Small Artillery) Grade: Gold Level: 27 (0 / 840,000) HP: 31,000 Physical Attack: 2325-3177 Defense: 1007 Superiority: 90% Skills: [Rapid Fire], [Fire of Death – Rain of Arrows], [Fire of Death], [Fan Arrow], [Eagle Eye], [Frenzied Shooting] Introduction: An undead awakened by the evil power. Due to the enhancement of the dragon’s power, it has become an even more terrifying Dragon Bone Fire. Its Attack exceeded 3,000 points. This was a huge boost. With such attributes and levels, Lorne truly had the confidence to sweep through the Lake of Death. “Let me see the location of the Lake of Death.” After spending the experience points, Lorne opened the map. The Lake of Death and the Doomsday Forest intersected. It was a large map. Its coverage was very long and narrow. Other than the size of the lake, it also covered a portion of the mountains and forests. The northern region was close to the Forsaken Land. The Shadow City where the rebel players gathered was also in that direction. What bordered the western region was the territory of the gnomes and elves. Because of Aisha, it was best to avoid the forest for the time being. As for the southern region, it was where Lorne was now, in a boundless Doomsday Forest. Lake of Death. The distribution of monsters here was very complicated, there were monsters from Level 30 to Level 100. Due to the lack of obvious divisions in the monster region, Lorne had to be extremely careful. He had to try not to approach the core region of the Lake of Death, or even the edge of the lake. Lorne followed the instructions of the dragon soul and began exploring the northwest. The pets were all separated and were responsible for guarding against the surrounding situation. As a flying unit, the long tongue bat had a critical role in this unknown forest. It was also because of its warning that Lorne arrived safely. “This place is really dangerous!” With the information of the long tongue bat, Lorne circled the valley ahead. Perhaps because the battle between the dragon “Walter” and the undead bone dragon was happening in this area, the undead power here was stronger. Naturally, the monsters they encountered would be very terrifying. But such risks did not affect Lorne’s confidence. In his eyes, the higher the difficulty of the mission, the greater the reward. Moreover, he was also filled with anticipation for the dragon, “Walter”. As an existence that could command the army of dragons, his corpse was definitely more valuable. Moreover, it was very likely that the other dragons would die near him. If Lorne could find him, he would definitely be able to obtain countless dragon skeletons and rewards. …. Ding! [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Knight x1] [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Viscount x1] [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Viscount x1] [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Baron x1] […] […] Walking through the forest around the Lake of Death, Lorne found a large number of corpses. However, the strange thing was that there did not seem to be any low-level warrior skeletons here. At the very least, since entering this area, Lorne had not found an ordinary warrior skeleton here. He gathered all the skeletons he had encountered. This was an event mission. It could be exchanged for a large amount of reputation points. Moreover, they were all high-quality corpses. He believed that when he submitted the mission in the end, he would definitely obtain a huge reward. Unfortunately, there was no movement from the Dragon Compass all along the way, and this meant that they didn’t encounter any dragon corpses on the way. … At the same time, in the forest near the [Expeditionary Army Camp], this place was filled with countless players. Cross Fire of the World Destruction Guild appeared here again. A few days ago, he had been sent back to Iron Skull City by Lorne with a bow and arrow. Originally, he needed three days to come here, but because of the experience summarized by countless players, he finally obtained a safer shortcut. Any player who set off from this path only needed to spend about two days to reach the expeditionary army camp. This was how the Cross Fire arrived. “Damn it, that brat Tyrant made me spend more than two days to return here. If I find out where he is, I will definitely find someone to cut him into mincemeat!” Cross Fire walked angrily in the forest. This could not be blamed on his fiery temper. This fellow was too detestable. It had been five days since the ten-day event began, but as one of the Deputy Guild Leaders of the World Destruction Guild, he had only “just arrived” at this place. In order to reach this place as soon as possible, he did not sleep for 48 hours. Because of that, he arrived here today. “Brother Cross Fire, go and rest first.” “Boss, you haven’t rested for two days and two nights. If you continue, you will die of exhaustion!” “That’s right, Boss. Even if you don’t die suddenly, you will definitely have kidney deficiency!” The surrounding lackeys advised. They were really worried about Cross Fire’s body. Although the game did not require the body to move in reality, it consumed a lot of energy. Under normal circumstances, if a player played the game for 24 hours, the mental effect would be too great, causing headaches in reality. This situation was not due to the game, but because humans would experience fatigue during brain activity, just like how the computer’s mainframe was heating up during high-intensity operations. “Alright, since all of you say so, I’ll go to sleep first and clear the forest with you in the morning!” Cross Fire nodded and prepared to go offline to rest. He had not rested for two days and two nights. Now, he indeed felt a headache. If he continued to engage in high-intensity battles and increased the burden on his mind, he might really die on the spot. But at that moment, a very strange-looking bat landed on the tree trunk above them. This was one of the long tongue bats that Lorne had let go. The players of the World Destruction Guild, who had never seen such a monster, were shocked. Just as they were about to draw their bows and kill the long tongue bat monster, it flapped its wings and wandered around the surrounding forest. Finally, it landed on the tree again. The long tongue bat looked at everyone and giggled, “Hey, aren’t these the young adventurers of Iron Skull City?” “Oh, you’re so weak.” “You who grew up under the protection of the main city are no match for those people.” “But it doesn’t matter. Give me five gold coins and I’ll tell you the information!” The long tongue bat spoke in human language, which attracted Cross Fire’s attention. In the game world, most monsters that could communicate were likely special NPCs. As an experienced player, how could he let go of such a good opportunity? He put away the saber in his hand and took out a bag of gold coins. “Oh, what a generous human adventurer. Your image is as fascinating as your wealth.” The long tongue bat separated a small bat and took the gold coins. After counting, there were exactly five. Then, it looked at Cross Fire again, “Young human adventurers, quickly leave this place. There is a group of people rushing here. They are much stronger than you.” “What do you mean?” Cross Fire could not understand. “Oh, young human adventurer, you know I like gold coins. If you want to know more information, you can try to give me some gold coins, such as ten perhaps?” The long tongue bat revealed the face of a shrewd merchant. Seeing this scene, Cross Fire had the urge to kill. This monster was really detestable. It had clearly obtained five gold coins, but there was no useful information. Not only that, but it also wanted more gold coins! Ten gold coins was not a small amount. In other words, it was a total of 30,000 alliance dollars. However, in order to complete the hidden mission, he had to endure it. Cross Fire gritted his teeth and took out ten gold coins again. “Oh, what a generous adventurer.” The long tongue bat that had obtained the gold coins said happily, “Not long ago, some petty assassins were traveling quickly through the forest towards this area.” “Assassins?” Hearing the news, Cross Fire drew his saber and charged at the long tongue bat. Unfortunately, his speed was not enough to threaten the flying creature. The ferocious attack undoubtedly missed. “Damn, even a bat monster dares to trick me!” Cross Fire spat, “At least you ran quickly. Otherwise, I will definitely capture you and roast you on the iron rack for three days!” Cross Fire naturally did not care about this information. Now, more than 100,000 people from large guilds had come, and the number of assassins was uncountable. It was normal for there to be assassin groups traveling through the forest. In the end, he actually lost 15 gold coins because of this dogshit “information”! This was f*cking ridiculous! Cross Fire cursed as he put away his weapon. He did not hesitate to open the log off menu, preparing to vent his anger in reality. But just as he was about to complete it… Suddenly! A black figure appeared behind Cross Fire, and a silver light slashed across the back of his neck. Slam! Slam! Slam! -957 -1675 -2100 (Critical) In an instant, three consecutive strikes poured out like a flood. The speed was astonishing. Three terrifying damage numbers immediately appeared above Cross Fire. Especially the final critical damage, it directly made the high-level player Cross Fire turn into a ball of light and fly back to Iron Skull City. “F*ck your ancestors!!!” Before dying, Cross Fire let out an angry roar. It had taken him 48 hours, and he had not slept for a minute, to reach the expeditionary army camp from Iron Skull City. However, before he could kill a monster, he was sent back to the city again? Who could accept this! … “Damn!!!” “Cross Fire of the World Destruction Guild has been killed!” “Instant damage of 4,600+, this is a top assassin!” “Is it Mourn?” “Definitely not. Mourn is the Guild Leader of the Assassination Guild. How can he take action personally?” The players who noticed this discussed. Everyone looked at the center of the battlefield. As for the players from the World Destruction Guild? They did not expect their boss to die so suddenly, so they did not recover from their shock. At this moment, at the spot where Cross Fire died, an assassin player in a black cloak appeared. Above his head floated a blood-red ID—[Bloodthirsty]! As one of the Deputy Guild Leaders of the Netherworld Guild, his assassination ability was definitely at the top of the world. When he appeared, all the surrounding players immediately became excited. “He’s a player from the Dark Faction!” “Darkness has invaded. Everyone, be careful!” “It’s actually Bloodthirsty from the Netherworld Guild. How dare you come to the camp of the Light Faction!” “Everyone, attack together!” “Kill, kill these traitors!” The surrounding players panicked. Because they were enemy players of the Dark Faction, now that the other party had invaded the [Expeditionary Army Camp] at the core, ordinary players were naturally nervous. However, the players quickly discovered that this Bloodthirsty was alone. Immediately, everyone unsheathed their blades, wanting to team up and kill the enemy in front of them. “Hehe, a bunch of trash!” The corners of Bloodthirsty’s mouth curled up into a disdainful smile. He took out a special flare and fired it in the air. In the next second, countless assassins rushed out of the forest and attacked the nearby players. Slam! Slam! Slam! -451 -449 -417 -465 -453 Countless damage values danced in the air. Before all the surrounding players could react, they were drowned by the sea of assassins. White light floated out. A few minutes later, all the players from the Light Faction were killed. As for the assassins, they disappeared into the darkness again and rushed in the direction of another player team. Bloodthirsty was the first to set off. His targets were the higher-ups of the guilds. No matter who it was, as long as they held a high position, they were a target. Even if the World Destruction Guild had many business dealings with the Netherworld Guild, it could not affect his plan. Soon, an hour passed. Many guild elites appeared in the resurrection array in Iron Skull City. As the main combat force of the guild, their strength was very outstanding. Such a situation of collective resurrection was usually not seen. But today, it happened. After some investigation, the ordinary players knew the reason. It turned out that the players of the Dark faction had deliberately killed these defenseless guild elites. Such actions naturally enraged the large guilds in Iron Skull City. Almost as soon as they were attacked, the Fire God Guild, Fire Beacon Guild, Cloud Top Guild, Silver Snow Guild, and several other large guilds immediately organized their main forces to counterattack. With the addition of the small guilds and the solo player organizations, the number of people attacking the army had already exceeded 50,000. However, before the army arrived, the assassin players of the Dark faction had already disappeared. The things that went missing along with them were the potions and supplies that the guilds had accumulated near the expeditionary army camp. “Damn it! Those bastards from the Netherworld Guild are courting death!” “The Netherworld Guild is really bold. They actually dare to anger so many large guilds at the same time. Are they not afraid that we will wipe out their guild headquarters?!” “Damn it, I’ll definitely kill all of you traitors this time!” “I’ll contact the guilds and ask them to deal with these rats!” The heads of several guilds were extremely angry. There were even many who issued hunting rewards. As long as they killed a player from the Dark faction, they could make an exception and allow the person join a large guild of the game. Such a promise immediately attracted the attention of countless solo players. Unfortunately, their movements were very messy, and they could not directly target the players of the Dark faction. Other than causing the Dark Assassins to feel some pressure, they could not play a critical role. “Dark Faction players attacked the expeditionary army camp!” “The elite teams of the guilds in Iron Skull City have suffered heavy losses!” “The Deputy Guild Leader of the Fire Beacon Guild sent a warning. What is the choice of the Netherworld Guild?” “Netherworld Guild’s Deputy Guild Leader, Bloodthirsty, is publicly hunting Tyrant!” Near the Lake of Death, Lorne opened the forum. As a result, the moment this panel was opened, it was immediately filled with a large amount of eye-catching information. Lorne checked through them. Soon, he understood the situation of the Dark faction players. It was a group of players who chose to become lackeys for the sake of benefits. It was just like how Doris had recruited Lorne in the Beginner Village dungeon. If Lorne had not insisted and accepted the other party’s recruitment, he would have had the same identity as the players now. “So many assassins?” Lorne thought curiously to himself. In the game, Assassins were harder to nurture. This was because the Assassin class required a lot of skill and required the player to have a very strong game sense. Otherwise, one could not keep up with other players as an Assassin. But it was so strange that the Dark faction had so many assassin players, and each of them was stronger than the players of Iron Skull City of the same level. Of course, the most shocking thing was Bloodthirsty’s damage output. This player called “Bloodthirsty” could actually deal 4,500+damage in an instant. Although it could not compare to Aisha, it was definitely a terrifying damage output among ordinary players. “Hidden class?” Lorne saw another character analysis post. In this post, someone analyzed Bloodthirsty’s attributes and skills in all aspects. They determined that the Bloodthirsty Attack had reached 1,400 points! This was a very high Attack stat. Even if an Assassin player put all their Free Attribute Points into Attack, the final Attack value would only be 800 points. If combined with the increase in equipment, someone who could have an attack power of more than 1,000 was definitely a top player. As for 1,400 points, that was a height that ordinary players could not reach. Coupled with the other party’s skill usage, the final conclusion was that Bloodthirsty had a special Assassin class and had more than three Silver-grade items equipped. “Looks like I should change my equipment.” Lorne’s health was now 6,600 points. He was a player with very high health. However, the level of the equipment on him was still too low. At this stage, even a set of Silver equipment at Level 10 could not keep up with the pace. Unfortunately, there was no suitable equipment in the backpack. He did not want to change equipment that only increased health by a few hundred points. Therefore, he had to maintain his current state for the time being. As for the declaration of hunting him from “Bloodthirsty”? Lorne was not worried. Even if the other party could kill him in an instant, it would be meaningless. This was because he had a Death Substitute Necklace on him. Of course, this was the worst-case scenario. In fact, before attacking Lorne, he had to avoid Aisha’s detection. As a legendary Phantom Assassin, Aisha’s investigative ability was very terrifying. Any movement in the surroundings was under her control. There was also the detection of Lorne and the long tongue bat. The long tongue bat’s ultrasound could detect invisible units. As long as it was beside him, it could definitely find the other party’s location. As for Lorne himself, because of the level suppression effect, he who was at Level 30 could easily detect the invisibility effect of lower-level targets. Also, he had his angel form… This was already five layers of insurance. It was impossible for the other party to break through the five obstacles to kill Lorne. …. Ding! [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Baron x1] [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Baron x1] [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Viscount x1] [Congratulations on obtaining Warrior Skeleton – Baron x1] […] […] After reading the information on the forum, Lorne continued to explore the area. Because of the long tongue bat, he moved relatively quickly in this forest, so he obtained a large number of warrior corpses. Unfortunately, the Dragon Compass did not react at all. Perhaps because he was only moving in the forest at the edge of the Lake of Death and had not approached the main battlefield, this situation resulted. However, Lorne was not in a hurry. After all, he was looking for dragon souls. If they could be easily found, there would be no need for the Dragon of Light to issue such a mission. At that moment, suddenly, the Dragon Soul Compass in Lorne’s inventory began to tremble violently. The pointer on the compass began to spin crazily, and finally, it pointed in the direction of the valley. “There’s finally a reaction!” Overjoyed, Lorne quickly led his pets there. The compass needle pointed at the valley ahead. The environment was very strange. It was pitch-black all around, and it looked lifeless. However, this was the Lake of Death, so such an environment was normal. Lorne took a deep breath and ordered the long tongue bat to investigate. Because there were no fixed monsters in this area, he had to be extremely careful, especially when entering an area related to the dragon skeletons. Soon, the long tongue bat brought back the information. There was no danger in the valley ahead. There was not even a monster. Only then did Lorne follow the compass deeper into the valley. When they were deep enough, monsters finally appeared. There was a group of huge spiders with red poison sacs on their backs. From their appearance, it could be seen that they were not monsters summoned by the undead Lich. Lorne had Small Artillery use Rain of Arrows to clear the way, killing the disgusting monsters. It was too easy for a Level 27 Small Artillery to kill these Level 25 spiders. Almost without any obstruction, Lorne led his pets deeper into the valley. Along the way, they encountered a large number of poisonous spiders, but they were all killed by Small Artillery. Ten minutes later, a huge spider more than four meters tall appeared in front of them. ———— [Poisonous Spider Demon] Grade: Bronze-Grade Boss Level: 29 HP: 150,000 / 150,000 Physical Attack: 1300-1800 Magic Attack: 1200-1700 Physical Defense: 700 Magic Defense: 600 Skills: [Poisonous Spider Web], [Spur of the Spider Spear], [Embryo], [Explosion] Introduction: A spider that grew up in an undead environment. Because it swallowed the power of the undead, it obtained even greater strength. ———— When the Boss saw Lorne arrive, it immediately attacked him. Countless small spiders advanced towards him. But before they could reach Lorne, they were hit by countless arrows. In the next second, the small spiders exploded. This was the characteristic of the poisonous spiders. When killed, they would self-destruct to harm the enemy. Unfortunately, the distance between the two sides was too great, and their explosions could not achieve the desired result. At the same time, Aisha raised her dagger and faced the extremely huge Spider Boss. Because of Lorne’s attributes, Aisha’s strength had also increased unprecedentedly. The pair of daggers danced in her hands, and the cold saber lights intertwined, instantly striking more than ten wounds on the Boss’ long legs. -3461 -10,300! (Critical) -3755 -3755 -3755 Unfortunately, this Spider Boss received the maximum combo hit-count from [Phantom Combo+]. The continuous ten attacks made it feel extreme pain and anguish. Most unfortunately, this Boss was only Level 29, so the level suppression effect only helped it block 20% of the damage. Therefore, there was this magnificent scene. Aisha’s critical strike skill dealt 10,300 damage. Then, it was the 10 consecutive hits of [Phantom Combo+] that dealt 37,000 damage. After calculating all these damage, it was a total of 50,000 points, equivalent to one-third of the Boss’ total health! To be honest, even Lorne could not help but marvel at this scene. That was a Level 29 Bronze Boss, and Aisha was only a Level 20 pet. Despite the difference of nine levels, she still depleted a third of her opponent’s health in less than two seconds! “If I change my equipment, Aisha will probably be able to kill this boss instantly, right?” Lorne was speechless. At this moment, the Boss let out an ear-piercing sound, as if it was angered by the attack just now. Unfortunately, being loud did not mean that it could win. Aisha did not hide into the darkness. She directly used her high speed to attack the Boss crazily. The scene was so bloody, but it also made people feel admiration. Aisha was like a beautiful dancer on the battlefield, playing a sharp waltz that made people feel intoxicated. When she stopped dancing, the Boss was already injured. Its eight long legs could not support its body. Seeing that it was about to die under Aisha’s blade, Lorne suddenly stopped her. Aisha was confused and asked, “What’s wrong, Master?” Lorne touched her head and looked at the Spider Boss. Skill activated! Ding! “Monster [Poisonous Spider Demon] has been confirmed as the prototype. Please identify the other body parts.” The synthesis panel appeared. Indeed, Lorne was prepared to keep the creature as his pet. When he reached Level 30, he had obtained a new pet space. But after thinking for a long time, Lorne could not think of what kind of pet he wanted. Only when he saw this Spider Boss did he remember the greatest weakness of the team. He lacked crowd control abilities. Lorne’s pet team consisted of Aisha (Close-Range DPS), Small Artillery (Long-Range DPS), Venom (Long-Range DPS), Rimuru (Tank), and Long Tongue Bat (Scout). They formed a powerful combat team. Unfortunately, none of the five pets had the ability to restrain enemies. Especially in terms of area-of-effect restriction abilities. Rimuru’s control skill was relatively simple. It could only rely on the Solidify skill to freeze its enemies. But in the face of a swarm of monsters, it was of limited use. Therefore, Lorne needed a pet with crowd control abilities. The Poisonous Spider Demon was a good target. It had decent single-target combat strength and the ability to produce small spiders which could be used to block the monsters. Moreover, the small spider could be detonated, so it had a huge advantage in killing monsters. It was because of this that Lorne began the monster synthesis. As for the materials? Lorne had a goal in mind. When he was sweeping through the Doomsday Forest, he had obtained some relatively high-grade bones. By merging the bones and spider, he would definitely obtain the White Bone Spider. Unfortunately, he had given the dragon skeleton fragment to Small Artillery. Otherwise, the pet he would obtain this time would definitely be more satisfactory. “Since it’s a White Bone Spider, I need to strengthen its bones.” Lorne took out the [Dragon’s Reverse Scale] from his bag. This was a legendary material that was on the same level as the dragon skeleton fragment. On its introduction panel, it could be seen that this was the hardest dragon scale on the dragon. Although it had lost its original energy, it still maintained its toughness. Using it to strengthen the skeleton structure should be the most optimal. “Other than that, I also need to strengthen the White Bone Spider’s offensive aspect.” “First of all, the eight spider legs can be replaced by sickles to increase its close combat damage.” “Secondly, poison is an important element in its magic output. I can merge poison with it and increase the lethality.” Lorne placed the bones and the Dragon’s Reverse Scale inside. Then, he took out a silver scythe and placed it in the fourth choice of the synthesis formula. Finally, Lorne found a poison potion he had picked up from a warrior corpse and placed it in the fifth choice of the synthesis formula. Ding! “A monster prototype and four materials have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Poisonous Spider Demon) + (Bone of the Goat-Headed Demon) + (Dragon’s Reverse Scale) + (Cold Hunter’s Scythe) + (Doris’ Corrosive Poison) = (???)” “The cost is 150 gold coins. Would you like to merge?” 150 gold coins?! Lorne was shocked to see this number. It had only cost 100 gold coins to create Aisha. Could it be that this pet was stronger than Aisha? It did not seem likely. After all, he knew very well how powerful Aisha was. Not to mention a Silver monster, even a Gold Boss might not be comparable to Aisha. As for the monster that appeared this time, Lorne felt that it would be a Silver Boss. The cost of 150 gold coins was probably due to the unprecedented number of materials used. “Let’s give it a try.” Lorne took a deep breath and chose to merge. Buzz— When Lorne made his choice, a huge magic circle appeared. Unlike the previous magic circle, the magic circle in front of him had many small magic circles. Almost every material had a complicated hexagram under them. Under the grand light, the Poisonous Spider Demon and the other four materials turned into balls of light. Under the combination of a large magic circle, they all fused together, finally forming a huge ball of light. The Poisonous Spider Demon was already more than four meters tall, so the ball of light in front of her was astonishingly large. However, this size did not last long. After fusing for a period of time, it gradually shrank. Three meters! Two meters! One meter! The ball of light quickly shrank to a height of one meter, but because it was a spider, even if it was only one meter tall, its overall shape was very large. The light on the surface gradually dissipated, and a spider made of white bones appeared in front of him. Apart from the strange white skeleton body, the eight legs of the bone spider were very special. The tip of each leg was as sharp as a blade. The shape of the entire leg was like a thin but extremely hard sickle. Just looking at it could induce fear. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the Silver Boss: Bone Spider King.” ———— [Bone Spider King] Grade: Silver Boss Level: 1 (0 / 4500) Health: 50,000 / 50,000 Magic Attack: 700-850 Defense: 300 Superiority: 89% Skills: Spur of the Spider Spear: Attacks the target with the Spider Bone Spear. Deals 200% damage and also inflicts a poison effect. Deals 50 points of damage per second for 15 seconds (Unable to stack). Poisonous Spiderweb: Spits out a sticky poison web that binds the target for 2 seconds. Deals 200% damage and inflicts an additional poison effect. (Unable to stack.) Embryo: Gives birth once every 30 seconds. Produces 10 White Bone Spiders at a time. Their level cannot be higher than the creator, but there can be 30 of them at the same time. Explosion: Detonate the small spiders, dealing 100% true damage to targets within 2 yards. Introduction: A spider that grew up in an undead environment. Due to a special mutation, it underwent a strange evolution. ———— These attributes were terrifying! Even Lorne gasped in shock. Although Aisha’s attributes were better, this pet’s attributes were not bad. Moreover, this was the first Silver Boss that Lorne owned. Facing the data in front of him, he felt even more shocked. “850 Attack Limit at Level 1?” Lorne calculated the Spider King’s future Attack and was surprised by the result. According to his estimation, after this Boss reached Level 20, its Attack should be able to exceed 5,000 points! If that was the case, its damage output would be on par with the current Aisha. Moreover, it had a huge advantage. That was health points. As a Boss-level pet, its health points were very high. Compared to Rimuru, who had the same basic health, after it reached Level 20, its health points should be 300,000 points! “Sign the contract!” Lorne accepted the creature. In this case, his sixth pet was decided. In the future battles, the overall strength of the team would also increase greatly. Of course, before that, Lorne had to solve a very important problem. That was the level of this pet. As a Silver pet, the experience requirement of the Bone Spider King was 45 times that of Lorne himself, nearly half that of Aisha. “I already have these bottomless EXP holes, one more makes no difference. Let’s take it slow.” Lorne did not dwell on this issue. In any case, the EXP he needed now was already an astronomical figure, so it did not matter if it increased or not. In short, it was good that his strength had increased. As for other matters, he would slowly resolve them in the future. “Hmm, what should I name this new companion?” Lorne thought about it for a while, but had no good idea. In the end, he could only shake his head and choose the simplest name. “That’s it, Little Spider. Clear and simple.” Lorne directly confirmed the name of the pet and did not ask for the opinion of the mighty spider king beside him. Then, he led the team deeper into the valley. Along the way, poisonous spiders blocked their way. Ignoring them, Lorne headed deeper into the valley. Soon, he arrived at the center of the valley. Following the compass needle, Lorne entered a huge cave. In this cave, he saw a familiar figure—Undead Lich! What a familiar old friend. Lorne had already killed several of them. “Who is it! How dare you intrude into my territory!” The undead Lich noticed Lorne walking in and shouted an ancient chant. “Your father!” Lorne replied, then commanded his pets to attack. With his previous experience, he was naturally more familiar with killing such a monster this time. Moreover, the pets’ levels had increased this time. Without the level suppression, it was too easy to kill this monster. [Phantom Backstab]! [Phantom Combo+]! Aisha was undoubtedly the main damage dealer. She directly faced the Boss and activated all her skills. Small Artillery was not to be outdone. The arrows in its hand were also firing crazily. Under this barrage of attacks, the undead Lich could not resist at all. In just half a minute, the Boss could not hold on anymore and fell to the ground. Without even looking at the loot that dropped on the ground, Lorne threw them into his bag and walked straight to the dragon soul, triggering the conversation. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the blessing of the Dragon Soul: Divine Power+2.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the Dragon Soul: Water Dragon Crystal (Fragment) x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the Dragon Soul: Dragon’s Reverse Scale (Damaged) x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the recognition of the Dragon Soul: Dragon Race of Order Reputation Points+100.” A series of rewards flashed across the interface. Lorne was pleased. Indeed, the dragon soul was generous to give so many rewards at once. Lorne put these rewards in his pocket, then looked at the dragon soul and asked a question that had been lingering in his mind. “Esteemed Dragon, I want to know about Lord Walter.” The dragon, Walter, was the leader of the dragon team. If he was found, there was a high chance of finding the other dragons. “This…” The dragon soul was already on the verge of dissipating, but it, who was exhausted, still patiently explained what it knew. According to the narration, the scope of the battle back then was too large. Lord Walter led the water dragons to fight the bone dragon army of the Dark faction in this Lake of Death. Because most of the dragons in the team were water dragons, they often hid in the Lake of Death and even pulled the bone dragons into the lake to fight. This caused everyone to spread out. Almost no one knew about the outcome of the other dragons. Coupled with the water dragons’ desire for water, they would bury their bodies at the bottom of the lake before they died. Therefore, no one knew where their bodies were in the Lake of Death. In addition, from the description of the dragon soul, Lorne also learned that there was an extremely powerful existence in the deepest part of the Lake of Death. It had the same powerful combat strength as the Dragon of Light, and it had the same lifespan as the world. “Alright, adventurer. I have already told you all I know. My soul is about to dissipate as well. After being tortured by the power of the undead for a thousand years, I desperately want freedom.” With that, the dragon soul closed its eyes and prepared to die. At this moment, Lorne finally activated the Dragon’s Treasure Vault and stored the dragon soul in a special space. This was the third dragon soul. The mission the Dragon of Light gave Lorne was to collect five dragon souls. Therefore, his mission was not over yet. In the following period of time, he had to sweep through everything in the same way as before. Lorne did not complain. He led his pets in one direction. … Ding! “Regional Information: Player [Bloodthirsty] has killed the Fire God Guild’s Deputy Guild Leader, Explosive Flame.” “Regional Information: Player [Bloodthirsty] has killed the Commander of the Sound Waves Guild, Crazy Rock.” “Regional Information…” “Regional Information…” At this moment, there was a bloody war in the forest on the other side. Because the assassins of the Dark faction often sneak attacked, the guilds suffered heavy losses. Especially the top assassin, Bloodthirsty. His targets were the higher-ups of the guilds. As long as there was a target, he would definitely bring a dagger to harvest their lives. Therefore, in the regional communication channel of the “expeditionary army camp”, news of the higher-ups of the guilds being hunted kept flashing. At noon on the sixth day of the event. Several system announcements suddenly sounded in the sky of the entire ruins of the war. Ding! “Regional Announcement: Player [Netherworld – Ghost Shadow] has killed 100 Light Faction players in the Doomsday Forest. Achievement obtained: Predator!” “Regional Announcement: Player [Netherworld – Hunter] has killed 500 Light Faction players in the Doomsday Forest. Achievement obtained: Greedy Hunter!” “Regional Announcement: Player [Netherworld – Bloodthirsty] has killed 1,000 Light Faction players in the Doomsday Forest. Achievement obtained: Bloody Butcher!” It could be seen that the members of the Netherworld Guild had already gone all-out in killing. In just one day, they had killed thousands of players. Especially Bloodthirsty, in such a short time, he had already killed a thousand players, and a large number of them were the higher-ups of the guilds. Just as the notifications were about to stop… Suddenly! An even grander voice sounded. Ding! “Regional Announcement: Iron Skull City has already noticed the abnormality here. It has specially issued a battlefield mission to all adventurers of the Light Faction: [Protecting the Light]!” “Prompt: In this state, the Light Faction players who kill the Dark Faction players will receive double the Light Faction Reputation reward!” “Prompt: When killing the players of the Dark Faction, as long as the player has enough reputation points, a regional announcement will be triggered!” “Prompt: After killing a Dark Faction player with a title, you will obtain a large amount of faction reputation rewards and will definitely drop the most precious equipment on the other party!” “Ding!” “Ding!” This was the regional announcement of the ruins of the war. All the players in this region would see the news and automatically accept the mission. Lorne was no exception. At this moment, he had also received this mission that had suddenly appeared. This made Lorne, who had not been paying attention to it, suddenly become interested in the Dark faction players. He opened the forum and checked the latest developments of the ruins of the war. Through various videos and analysis posts, it could be seen that under Bloodthirsty’s lead, the assassins of the Dark faction had mixed into the Doomsday Forest. Because most of them were assassins, with their invisibility and movement speed, they could hunt at high speed in the forest and attack all the teams that did missions in the Doomsday Forest. Ordinary small teams were basically unable to resist the attacks of the assassin team. After all, the players of the Dark Faction were stronger than the players of the Light Faction of the same level. The large guilds with experts could not resist these dark assassins. Here, he had to praise the intelligence of the Netherworld Guild. They knew that in terms of numbers, the Dark Faction was no match for the Light Faction. Even against just large guilds, it was difficult to win. However, they thought of another way to resist. That was to kill the Priest players of large guilds! As everyone knew, Priest was the class with the slowest leveling speed among all classes. The first requirement to complete a mission in the ruins of the war was that the players were Level 20. Therefore, the Priest players here were extremely rare and precious. The players of the Dark Faction caught on to this point and attacked the teams of the large guilds crazily, trying to kill all the Priest class players. Even if they took one Priest out while sacrificing two assassins, the players of the Dark faction would still make a killing. This was because their main city, [Blood Shadow City], was located in the north of the ruins of the war. Even if they died, they could return here in a day. The players in Iron Skull City would need at least two days. It was also because they could attack fearlessly and fight without regard for anything that their attacks pressed forward. On the other hand, the players of the Light Faction were worried because of the long journey. That was why they were flustered and were defeated by the other party one by one. In addition, it was worth mentioning that there was a difference between faction reputation and Empire reputation. Faction reputation represented one’s reputation in the Light Faction. The Light Faction also included races like humans, elves, dwarfs, orcs, and even dragons. Simply put, faction reputation could be useful with all of these races. However, the reputation of the Empire was different. Because the Empire Alliance was controlled by the Human Race, the reputation of the Empire was the reputation of the Human Race. However, because the Empire was huge, its status also increased a lot. Under normal circumstances, it was on the same level as faction reputation. However, if the other party was a neutral race that was more xenophobic, then faction reputation would still be superior to the Empire’s reputation. As for the reputation of the Dark Faction? Its effect was the same as the reputation points of the Light Faction. If the reputation of the Dark Faction players could increase to a certain level, they could use their reputation points to meet higher-level NPCs and accept higher-level missions. It was because of this that the dark assassins were so crazy. “You can obtain faction reputation by killing the other faction’s members?” Lorne muttered to himself. The mission just now was very clear. As long as he killed the players of the Dark faction, he would obtain a large amount of faction reputation. Although he did not care much about faction reputation, he needed to develop in the Light faction after all. In order to make it easier to come into contact with other factions in the future, it was not impossible to accumulate faction reputation in advance. Thinking of this, he could not help but focus on the fat sheep, Bloodthirsty. After killing so many players from the Light Faction, not only did he have a large amount of faction reputation, but he also had a red title. If he could kill this Bloodthirsty, the harvest would definitely be very rich. As he pondered… His friend list suddenly lit up. “Brother Tyrant, are you there?” It was a message from Twinkle Rose. “What’s wrong, big-busted sister?” “Sob, the players of the Netherworld Guild are too much. Many of our sisters in the Silver Snow Guild have been attacked. After being disturbed by them, we can’t play anymore.” Twinkle Rose began to wail. Lorne was surprised. He knew the strength of the Silver Snow Guild. It was definitely among the top 30 guilds in Iron Skull City. Could it be that even such a powerful guild could not block the attack of the Dark Guild? “Those guys are simply shameless, especially Bloodthirsty. This scoundrel specifically targeted the Priests in our guild and directly cut off our healing support.” “There are so many of you from the guilds. Can’t you kill him?” “We can’t.” Twinkle Rose said sadly, “Ordinary assassins would not dare to act recklessly against our high-level team. Only that detestable Bloodthirsty has a very special equipment that can turn him invisible. We can’t do anything to him.” “What do you plan to do?” “The guild can’t fight without a Priest. I’m considering bringing them back to Iron Skull City.” Twinkle Rose sighed helplessly and said, “Brother Tyrant, why don’t you help us kill that detestable Bloodthirsty? It just so happens that he’s a red name player now. As long as we kill him, we can drop that very special invisibility equipment on him. Without it, the sisters of the Silver Snow Guild won’t have to be afraid of him.” “Eh…” Lorne hesitated. Originally, he did not want to interfere in this matter, but his faction reputation made his thoughts waver. Now, the special invisibility equipment that Twinkle Rose mentioned made him have some thoughts. Thinking of this, he said, “Go and spread the news that I’m near the Lake of Death in the northwest. Get them to find me. If I really encounter them, I’ll definitely kill them to avenge you, Big-busted Sister!” “Hehe, Brother Tyrant has a conscience.” Twinkle Rose immediately smiled, “With that, I’ll bring my sisters here to persevere a little longer. By the way, you have to be careful too. Bloodthirsty is not alone. There’s a huge team of assassins besides him.” “I don’t care about Bloodthirsty, but what I’m really interested in is what you want to repay me with…” Lorne joked. “Let sister think about it…” “Huh? Is there really a chance?” Who knew what the big-busted sister was thinking? She was probably teasing him. Lorne shook his head and smiled, not thinking anymore. He looked at the map and continued in the designated direction. … [Doomsday Forest] “Regional Announcement: Dark Faction player “Bloodthirsty” has killed 1,500 players in a row. He’s on a row!” Not long after, Bloodthirsty killed another 500 people. He was simply an emotionless life harvesting machine. Such a terrifying achievement made all the Light Faction players in the forest nervous. “That Bloodthirsty has gone mad.” “Yeah, a 300-man team died at his hands just now.” “This is too sick. He killed several Deputy Guild Leaders of some large guilds.” “How f*cking awesome!” “I can’t play the game properly. This damned place is too terrifying. I don’t want reputation points anymore. I’ll go back to Iron Skull City to farm monsters.” “Even the large guilds don’t have a place to stay. There’s nothing we can do. Let’s go quickly, lest we be sent back to the city for free.” “Is there really no one who can stop that guy?!” In the regional chat, the solo players were trembling. They were already frightened by the attacks of the Dark faction players and could not muster up any fighting spirit. At this moment, a piece of news gradually spread among the players. The most famous player, [Tyrant], was walking towards the northwest of the Lake of Death! When this news spread, countless players felt despair. It was because they all believed that only Tyrant had the ability to stop Bloodthirsty, he was almost everyone’s last hope. But now, he had gone to the Lake of Death, and Bloodthirsty was in the Doomsday Forest. The two were too far apart. It was impossible for them to meet. Just as all the players were feeling depressed, a shout sounded in the entire region. “As I said, Tyrant is my main target. No matter if you leak this information to distract me, I will find him. If it’s true, I will cut off his head and let you see how powerful the Netherworld Guild is! If this is fake, heh heh, at that time, the entire world will know that the so-called City of Kings, Iron Skull City, is just a gathering place for a bunch of useless people!” [From: Netherworld Guild – Bloodthirsty] Boom!!! When this news spread, the entire chat channel of the Doomsday Forest exploded again. Bloodthirsty wanted to find Tyrant! This was great news! Of course, this could also make all the players in Iron Skull City become the laughing stock of the world. If this was just a temporary plan by a player, then Iron Skull City would definitely be the laughing stock of the world. Not a single player would be able to escape from the shame. While the players were pleasantly surprised and melancholic, another shout was heard. “I’m at the Lake of Death, you can come at any time!” [From: Tyrant] When this information appeared, there was a loud bang. All the players in the Doomsday Forest went crazy. “Roar!” Near the lake, a Level 50 Boss [Mountain Giant King] suddenly separated from the ground and threw a ten-meter-wide fist at Lorne. [Angel’s Descent] Lorne did not act arrogantly. He used Angel’s Descent as soon as possible and flew out of the battle center at three times the speed of light. In the next second, his original spot exploded like a cannonball. The entire ground trembled. “The Lake of Death is indeed dangerous.” Lorne landed in the distant forest and looked at the Boss searching for the enemy in the distance. He could not help but sigh. Ever since he obtained the third dragon soul, he had been sweeping through the forest and used the entire day to reach the edge of the Lake of Death. During this entire day, the chat channel in the Doomsday Forest was very lively. Almost all the players were discussing the situation between [Bloodthirsty] and [Tyrant]. [Bloodthirsty] was sending people to look for traces of Tyrant and often shouted in the chat, wanting to force the other party to fight him directly. From this, it could be seen that Bloodthirsty was determined to get him. Tyrant did not respond for a long time, as if he did not know about this. Many players were saying that Tyrant was afraid and had hidden himself. As for why they were so free, it was because Tyrant had personally accepted Bloodthirsty’s challenge. In other words, no matter the result of the battle in the Lake of Death, it would not affect the other players of Iron Skull City. Coupled with the departure of the most terrifying assassin, Bloodthirsty, they naturally did not feel any pressure now. In addition, there was a group of people analyzing the odds of victory between the two on the forum. Due to the fact that the equipment on Lorne was all Level 10 Silver-grade, even though it was a set, its attributes were not as good as an assortment of Level 20 Silver-grade equipment. Therefore, the players thought more highly of Bloodthirsty in terms of attributes. Fortunately, Lorne did not take this to heart. Otherwise, if he saw that these people were looking down on him despite helping them to lure Bloodthirsty away, he would definitely be so angry that his nose would emit smoke. Then again, Lorne was in a terrible state. Ever since he came to this position, the probability of him encountering a strong Boss had become very high. He had encountered Level 50, Level 60, and even Level 70 Bosses. Fortunately, he still had the skill [Angel’s Descent] on him. Otherwise, it would have been difficult for him to walk through this area so easily. “Don’t die by the hands of the monsters before you can find me.” Lorne closed the forum. Because he still had a mission on him, he would definitely not be stupid enough to fight the other party like a child. In any case, he had already mentioned the location. Whether they could encounter or not depended on the other party’s luck. Then, he opened the map. There was a location on the map, which was also where Lorne was heading. If the dragon’s information was correct, then this was the most likely place to find Walter. It said that the final battlefield between Walter and the bone dragon leader had been transferred from the center of the Lake of Death to the lake. Finally, the dragon magic tore the ground apart, forming a huge ravine. Then, everything returned to peace. From this description, it was obvious that there was an important piece of information. That was, there was a huge ravine where Walter died! As the most powerful creature in the world, the dragon’s strongest attack definitely had the effect of destroying everything in its path. Moreover, Walter was a Dragon Commander, so his combat strength was definitely extraordinary. Therefore, Lorne believed that the greatest trace near the Lake of Death was the place with the greatest hope of finding Walter. “We still have to walk for half a day. I hope you don’t disappoint me.” Lorne put away the map and continued forward. … Soon, the eighth day arrived. Lorne had been at the target location for more than ten hours. Previously, he had thought that this region was not very large. Only after entering did he discover that the map was actually so huge. It would take at least two days to explore this entire area. Lorne did not know if his judgment was right, so he could only bite the bullet and search. When it was noon, he was about to go offline to finish lunch when the [Dragon’s Compass] in his bag suddenly shook. The pointer on it spun crazily. “Something’s wrong!” Lorne’s eyes lit up. After the needle of the Dragon’s Compass stopped, he immediately followed it. Soon, Lorne arrived deep in the ravine and stood in front of an abyss. “The corpse is under the abyss, and it’s a very powerful dragon!” From the reaction of the needle, it could be seen that the energy waves emitted by this dragon were stronger than the previous few. Lorne put the compass away and looked into the abyss. If he wanted to obtain the dragon soul, he had to go to the bottom. “The duration of the angel form might not last. I should explore it first.” Lorne let the long tongue bat fly into the abyss. Soon, the long tongue bat returned with the information. It turned out that this abyss was nearly 300 meters deep. There were no traces of other creatures at the bottom for the time being. It seemed that there were no monsters. As for the dragon’s situation, he should only know after checking it. With that in mind, Lorne walked towards the surrounding vines. With the flying speed of the [Angel’s Descent], he could safely reach the 300-meter abyss. But Lorne wanted to keep his divine power to prepare for the battle ahead. Therefore, it was safer to climb. Fortunately, the surrounding vines were thick enough and connected together. It was not difficult to climb down. Lorne climbed down and spent half an hour before reaching the bottom of the abyss. The abyss was huge, more than 300 meters wide. Even the Mountain Giant King could move freely in it. “The abyss in the ravine should have been specially created, right?” Lorne looked excited. To be able to create such a huge abyss in this place, that dragon must be very powerful. It was most likely the Dragon Commander, Walter! Moreover, since it could choose to die here, it meant that Walter still had a body at the time. If no one had been here before, then Walter’s corpse must still be here!!! After entering the ravine, the surrounding atmosphere suddenly became quiet. At the bottom of this pitch-black abyss, there was no sound, nor did any creatures appear. This place was like a purgatory of the human world. It was filled with strangeness. Lorne summoned his pets again. With his companions by his side, the atmosphere in the abyss was no longer as tense. Ten minutes! Half an hour later! An hour later! Lorne made his way deeper into the abyss, but there was no end to it other than darkness. To be honest, if not for the fact that the Dragon Compass had been guiding him, he would not have been able to explore so far in a dark place. A few minutes later, Lorne turned into a cave. The next second, he was shocked. The cave was filled with brilliant light. The surrounding walls were embedded with various colored Night Pearls. The light was also emitted from their bodies. “Damn, these should be gems. They will definitely be worth a lot of money!” Lorne looked greedily at the gems around him and could not help but dig with his dagger, but the walls were harder than he had expected. No matter how hard he tried, he could not dig out any of the gems from the walls. It seemed that this was only a map effect and not a resource that could be taken away. Sigh… Lorne sighed. He continued forward, but there were still too many gems in front of him. However, after walking for so long, he did not see any monsters. This was too strange. In the past, there should have been undead monsters wandering in such caves. Why was there nothing today? Curious, Lorne explored deeper. When he spent more than ten minutes reaching the deepest part of the cave, his pupils dilated again. In that incomparably huge cave, there was a living black dragon! Unlike the undead dragon, this dragon had a body of its own. It was not a skeleton, but a real body made of flesh and blood! At this moment, a system notification sounded. Ding! “Congratulations on discovering the hidden nest of the Dragon, Walter!” “This is… a living… dragon?” Lorne was shocked. One had to know that a thousand years had passed since the huge war! A thousand years! This dragon was still alive?! Lorne suspected that, to his knowledge, even if dragons were the strongest creatures, they did not have such a long life. Like the elves who claimed to have longevity, dragons lived between 200 and 500 years. As for the thousand-year-old dragon, other than the Dragon of Light in the Church of Light, there were no other dragons with such a record. With doubts in his heart, he slowly walked up and opened the other party’s attributes panel when he was close enough. ———— [Dragon Commander Walter] Quality: ??? Status: Extremely Weak Level: ??? HP: 500,000 / 500,000 Physical Attack: ??? Physical Defense: ??? Magic Defense: ??? Skills: [Dragon’s Claw], [Dragon’s Breath], [Steel Bone Wing], [Dragon Stomp], [Dragon’s Bite], [Dragon Scale Armor], [???] Introduction: The dragon, Walter, is one of the four dragon commanders under the Dragon of Light. In the Mythical War a thousand years ago, he was severely injured and could no longer move. He prepared a grave for himself, but when he was about to die, he was corroded by the power of the undead, causing him to gradually become an undead. Fortunately, Walter’s will had been resisting, so he did not completely demonize. ———— Good lord, it was indeed Walter. Moreover, the guy’s identity was beyond his expectations. It turned out that he was not an ordinary dragon leader, but one of the four dragon commanders under the Dragon of Light. Such an identity was extremely noble. As the dragon who was closest to light, it was a great insult to his former glory to be able to survive underground because of the undead power. But Walter could not die, for once his will slackened, the power of chaos would occupy his body, turning him into a dark minion. “This is a little troublesome…” Lorne felt that it was difficult, but he did not feel completely hopeless. Although Walter relied on the power of the undead to survive, he was also weakened by the corrosion of the undead. From the interface that only had 500,000 health points, it could be seen that his other attributes were very limited. Therefore, now was the best opportunity to kill him. If Lorne missed this opportunity, it would be difficult for him to defeat the other party in the future. At this critical moment, he received another private message in his friend list. “Brother Tyrant, what are you doing?” Without the influence of Bloodthirsty, Twinkle Rose was in a very good mood. “Kissing a dragon.” Lorne casually replied. The following battle was definitely very challenging. He hoped that the other party’s level was not too high. Otherwise, it was impossible to obtain victory with just these pets who were not even Level 30. “You’re pretty hardcore.” Twinkle Rose smiled as she typed a message and sent it, “Is it because you’ve been alone for too long?” “Yes, I’m a thirty-year-old virgin waiting for your liberation.” “Tsk, tsk, tsk!!” On the other side, Twinkle Rose smiled widely and continued, “How can a bad guy like you be a virgin? I don’t believe it. Quick, let me see what kind of monster you are fighting?” “This scene is too scary. It’s not suitable for children.” “I’m no longer a child. Moreover, you’re not really doing something shameful with a dragon. There’s nothing inappropriate about it.” Twinkle Rose cursed. This time, Lorne did not reply. Instead, he sent a screenshot of the boss. The next second, the big-busted sister was stunned. After a while, she replied, “That’s sick.” <i>Sick?</i>  It was true. After all, he was only a Level 30 player. The opponent in front of him was a living adult dragon! Lorne first memorized the surrounding terrain, then commanded Small Artillery to test the other party’s level. An arrow transformed into a black meteor that instantly struck the dragon’s head. Ding! The sound was like hitting hard iron. To his surprise, the attack dealt 405 damage. This meant that the dragon’s level was not high. Moreover, it could break through armor and defense! With these two conditions, there was definitely hope of killing it. With that in mind, Lorne’s confidence increased. Just as he was about to launch an all-out attack, the dragon, Walter, opened its eyes after being attacked. Its pupils, as large as water tanks, stared at Lorne. “Puny mortal, you have intruded into the territory of the dragons!” The dragon, Walter, had a weak voice, but he was not like the other dragons, who would attack the intruders in a frenzy. It slowly raised its huge head and looked at Lorne in surprise, “I did not expect to sense such a thick dark aura on you. It seems that you are also a fallen human. In that case, mortal, are you willing to follow the great dragon leader, Walter?” Ding! “Game Announcement: Dragon Commander Walter has invited you to be his servant and is willing to give you a large amount of rewards. Do you agree?” “Game Announcement: Dragon Commander Walter has been demonized. If you agree to the invitation, you will automatically become a player of the Dark faction! Please make a careful decision.” <i>‘What?’</i>  <i>‘I’m here to kill you, but you want to take me as your underling?’</i>  Lorne rejected him directly, “Dragon Walter, I will obey the will of the Dragon of Light to free you fallen dragon souls. If you want to leave this damned place, you’d better cooperate.” At this moment, Walter still had some self-awareness. Of course, Lorne wanted to antagonize this demonized body. Only then would he have a chance to kill this powerful demonized dragon. “Small mortal, do you think you can defeat the dragon? Hahahaha, how laughable!” Walter no longer pretended. Due to the corrosion of a thousand years, this undead body had already given birth to a new intelligence. What controlled the body now was the demonized dragon! As soon as he finished speaking, terrifying flames spewed out of the huge dragon mouth. [Dragon’s Breath] Due to the huge size of the dragon, the range of this skill was also astonishingly large. Almost a hundred yards were covered by the surging flames. Fortunately, Lorne kept his distance from the other party. Otherwise, it would have been difficult for him to block this skill alone. “Aisha, Small Artillery, attack!” “Rimuru, Venom, and Long Tongue Bat will resist and interfere!” Lorne quickly gave the order to fight. All the pets had their own missions, but Little Spider ran beside him. It could not be helped. Its level was too low to join such a battlefield. On the battlefield, Small Artillery relied on the advantage of long-range attacks to attack the Boss first. Its attack power was not low. Coupled with its level reaching 27, the level suppression effect was smaller than others, so the damage dealt was also very impressive. As for Aisha, she had already arrived beside the Boss. The sharp blade in her hand quickly turned. [Phantom Backstab]! [Phantom Combo+]! She quickly activated her skills, and a net of blades instantly appeared in the air. Under the cold light, the sharp blades quickly cut through the dragon’s body. -1555 -5500! (Critical) -2193 -2193 -2193 Under the barrage of Aisha who had 5500 Attack, the dragon’s health points decreased very quickly. From the damage numbers floating above the boss’s head, Lorne could tell that its level was not high, only around Level 30. However, its defense should not be low. According to the data on the combat panel, the dragon’s defense should be around 2000 points. This was a very high defense. If it were other players, they might not even be able to deal damage to this Boss. Unfortunately, in Aisha’s hands, these defenses were useless. “Mortal, you are infuriating the great dragon!” The demonized dragon roared and flapped its wings, but because it had not flown for too long, and with the interference of Walter, its flying ability was greatly limited. The huge wings that were flapping did not allow the demonized dragon to fly. It only gave it faster speed. At this moment, Aisha’s [Slow Dagger] skill displayed its might. The slowed dragon could not cross a few hundred yards with its wings alone, so Lorne did not have to worry about his safety. Even if the other party charged at him while enduring the attacks, Lorne still had a way to escape. [Angel’s Descent] Lorne’s three times flying speed gave him the ability to quickly pull away. At the same time, he controlled Rimuru to interfere, causing the Boss to tire out between the two. [Dragon’s Breath]! [Dragon Stomp]! [Dragon’s Tail]! The demonized dragon circled the cave, chasing after the enemies that attacked it. Unfortunately, in its weakened state, its movements were too slow. It could not deal a fatal blow to the enemy. After all, Aisha was an elf herself, so she was born with an Agility bonus. Coupled with the fact that Lorne had always added points to Agility, it was obvious how fast she was now with the boost of her master’s movement speed. Almost every time, she would dodge before the dragon’s attack landed. On the other hand, due to its size, the dragon could not move freely in this slightly narrow cave. It could not even sprint at full speed. -1531 -5800! (Critical) -2077 -2077 -2077 Aisha’s dagger slashed crazily on the dragon. She was the main damage dealer on the battlefield. With a high attack of 5500+, she was the only way to deal a huge blow to the Boss. Under her attacks, the demonized dragon’s health kept decreasing crazily. Almost every minute, it lost 5% of its health. -10,000! (Critical) The dragon’s stomp hit Aisha, who was dealing damage. Immediately, terrifying damage appeared above her head. Lorne was shocked. Who knew how powerful the dragon’s attack was? It dealt 10,000 critical damage! If it were him, this would be enough to send him back to Iron Skull City. Fortunately, Aisha had 60,000 health points. Such damage could not make her lose her combat strength. [Phantom Stealth]! She disappeared into the darkness again and continued fighting the dragon after the skill cooldown was over. The demonized dragon that had not found its target opened its mouth and bit at the nearest Rimuru. -3713 &lt;ol start=”5455″&gt; In two bites, he dealt nearly 10,000 damage. Fortunately, such damage was useless against Rimuru. With 300,000 health points, it could even stand on the spot and fight the dragon for half a minute. With Rimuru blocking the damage, Aisha had no obstacle to continue dealing damage. Under the barrage of attacks, the demonized dragon’s health decreased rapidly. Aisha’s damage output was consistent. Whenever the skill cooldown ended, she would attack immediately. In just two seconds, she would unleash all her attacks. Although she only had two offensive skills, the damage she dealt could exceed 20,000 points. The demonized dragon only had 500,000 health points after all. Under such crazy attacks, these health points could not last long. In less than five minutes, the demonized dragon’s health decreased to 250,000 points. “Mortal, I will give you one last chance. As long as you are willing to submit to the feet of the great Demon Dragon, Walter, I will grant you powerful Dragon language magic!” Still dreaming, Walter tempted Lorne again. “You might not know this, but ever since someone said this to me last time and I failed to beat them to death, I decided that if anyone says this again in the future, I’ll definitely kill them!” Lorne smiled coldly. He was not affected by the other party’s words at all. In fact, because of this speech, he was encouraged. Under his command, the pets worked harder to deal damage. The blades and arrows poured down on the Boss like a flood, quickly reducing its health. Health Points: 50%. Health Points: 30%. Health Points: 10%. Health Points: 5%. Soon, the demonized dragon was close to death. The entire battle was easier than Lorne had imagined. Although this demonized dragon was powerful, its movements were not agile. Against an opponent like Aisha, it could not fight back at all. Furthermore, with the help of other pets, the demonized dragon had no chance of winning. After ten minutes, the Boss was already covered in wounds, as if it was already at its limit. However, Lorne was not careless. Under normal circumstances, a special Boss with 5% health would use a special skill. It was even more possible for a dragon at the level of Walter. Lorne let Aisha control the damage output. Only when the demonized dragon’s health was reduced to 1% did he sigh in relief and approach the other party. This was a living dragon, so of course, Lorne would not kill it easily. As the leader of the dragons, Walter was extremely powerful. If he could subdue this dragon, then Lorne’s strength would definitely rise to a level that other players could not reach. With that in mind, Lorne activated his talent. Buzz— A huge magic circle appeared as complicated and ancient magic runes began to appear around the dragon. <i>Success?!</i>  Lorne’s eyes widened. But soon, the light in his eyes dissipated. The huge magic circle in front of him seemed to have a limit. When it enlarged to the limit, it stopped at that size. That magic circle could not completely turn the demonized dragon into light, so it shattered in the end. Lorne froze on the spot. This was the first time he had encountered such a situation. A synthesis array had clearly appeared just now, but the result was so unexpected. To be honest, Lorne was feeling mixed emotions. Fortunately, after a few failed attempts, he was not in a bad mood. After taking a deep breath, Lorne composed himself. Although he did not obtain the dragon pet this time, he had also defeated Walter. He believed that as the leader of the dragons, the reward would not be simple. “Kill him, Aisha.” Lorne ordered. Then, under a pair of sharp daggers, the demonized dragon’s health points were completely emptied. Boom! Walter’s huge body fell to the ground. After the undead power was defeated, he finally regained control of the body. But also because of the lack of undead power, Walter’s body began to rapidly dry, like a balloon with a hole. At this moment, an incomparably grand voice suddenly sounded in the sky. Ding! “Global Announcement: Congratulations to player [Tyrant] for successfully killing the Dragon Commander, Walter, and becoming the first adventurer to slay a dragon in the world. You have achieved the achievement of Dragon Slayer. You have done a great deed and are now in the annals of history!” “Congratulations player [Tyrant] for obtaining the achievement reward: Free Attribute Points+100, Dragon Slayer (Title)!” “Dragon Slayer (Title): A unique title that only the first adventurer to kill a dragon can obtain! When equipping this title: Critical Hit Damage+100%! (Including Pets)” “Ding!” “Ding!” The announcement for the achievement sounded three times. All the players in the world heard this news. When this announcement ended, another main city announcement appeared. Ding! “Iron Skull City Announcement: Due to player [Tyrant] obtaining the Dragon Slayer title, all adventurers affiliated with Iron Skull City will enjoy the baptism of glory. Reward: Free Attribute Point+1.” “Ding!” “Ding!” The announcement of Iron Skull City was repeated three times. The great news made Lorne feel helpless. He was not a high profile kid, but the system was always making such a fuss. It was too awesome! … Doomsday Forest. Due to the previous declaration of war, everyone was paying attention to Lorne and Bloodthirsty. Many of them were very disgusted by the fact that Lorne had not appeared. They even slandered him on the forum. “I think this Tyrant is a coward.” “Bloodthirsty is so powerful, it’s normal to be afraid.” “That’s right. No matter how powerful a Summoner is, he can’t be a match for an Assassin.” “I originally thought highly of him, but who knew that he would look like this? It’s too disappointing.” “What a coward. He can’t win but still insists on fighting in the regional channel. This is going to be a joke to all the players in the world!” A group of players mocked and ridiculed in the forum. Only by joining a group that stood opposite to the public at this time could they display their superiority. This was the mindset of the Internet trolls. Just as they were feeling smug, suddenly! A grand voice sounded in everyone’s ears. Ding! “Global Announcement: Congratulations player [Tyrant] for successfully killing the Dragon Commander, Walter…” “Ding!” “Ding!” Continuous global announcements sounded. All the players in the world could hear them. At this moment, the players who were mocking him closed their mouths. Their eyes widened as they looked at the announcement notification on the interface in disbelief. In a high-level energy area, at the headquarters of the Cross Coffin Guild. Cross Coffin was a guild that was highly connected to the country’s military. They had chosen the Dark faction, wanting to use the opposing forces to avoid conflict with the other guilds. Not long after entering the Blood Shadow City, they discovered an Epic-grade main storyline mission with the Netherworld Guild! Because of this mission, their Cross Coffin Guild was highly valued by the military and received a huge amount of funds. At this moment, in the headquarters of the base, Lieutenant Colonel Arthur arrived and took over all development authority regarding the mission. With the guidance and information of Lieutenant Colonel Arthur, they finally found the information regarding the mission. It turned out that the information regarding that epic mission was related to one of the four commanders of the Ancient Dragon Race, Walter. Moreover, the place where he died was near the Lake of Death not far from Blood Shadow City. With this hard-earned information, Lieutenant Colonel Arthur immediately arranged for a scout team of more than 5,000 people. He made everyone disperse near the Lake of Death and requested that they investigate the entire region around the Lake of Death. But soon, they encountered huge difficulties. The Bosses that appeared near the Lake of Death were too powerful. Their scouts suffered huge losses during the exploration. Moreover, just now, when they organized their people to enter a valley to explore the interior, they encountered a pseudo-dragon Boss that could not be seen. In less than half a minute, their team of more than a hundred people was wiped out. This result made the guild members somewhat depressed. “Don’t worry about your levels. All the scouts will receive a thousand dollars in economic subsidies if they lose a level during the mission!” Lieutenant Colonel Arthur said confidently. At that moment, suddenly! A golden banner appeared on the large screen in the conference room, and the grand announcement filled the entire conference room. Ding! “Global Announcement: Congratulations player [Tyrant] for successfully killing the Dragon Commander, Walter…” The grand voice echoed for several minutes. When they heard this news, the higher-ups in the guild room were shocked. Lieutenant Colonel Arthur looked at the people from the Netherworld Guild mockingly and said, “Didn’t you send a Deputy Guild Leader to kill that player called Tyrant? Now that he has received the full-server announcement, you still don’t have a clue what happened.” Everyone looked at Lieutenant Colonel Arthur. If not for their fear of the other party’s identity, they would definitely look at him as if he was an idiot. The upper echelon of the Cross Coffin Guild sitting nearby leaned over and reminded him. “What?!!!” Lieutenant Colonel Arthur slammed the table and stood up, shouting, “The mission target was killed by Tyrant?” Only then did he notice the key information on the announcement. That player called Tyrant had killed the dragon, Walter! Didn’t that mean that their mission was impossible to complete? Thinking of this, Lieutenant Colonel Arthur was furious. He roared at everyone, “Aren’t you the strongest Dark faction organization? You can’t even do such a small thing. You’re useless!” “I think the hundred thousand players of your two guilds are not elites at all. They are just pigs. No, even hundreds of thousands of pigs would not allow an ordinary player to kill our mission NPC like that!” Hearing Lieutenant Colonel Arthur’s cursing, everyone present was unwilling to accept it, because during this period of time, it was almost always that guy who was directly responsible for commanding. Now that something happened, he actually pushed all the blame to them. Although they thought so, no one dared to say anything. They could only let the other party reprimand them. Only when Lieutenant Colonel Arthur was tired of cursing did the higher-ups of the Netherworld Guild speak, “Calm down sir. Although the Boss was killed by the other party, it does not mean that there is no hope for this mission. Perhaps that dragon, Walter, is only a clue.” “Moreover, based on our understanding of the game, even if the main NPCs of large missions are accidentally killed, special mission items will drop. Even if they don’t, other NPCs will know about it.” Hearing this, Lieutenant Colonel Arthur’s anger dissipated, but his expression was still cold. He immediately ordered, “Inform everyone to find Tyrant and obtain all the items and information regarding the dragon, Walter, and the divine equipment on him!” “In addition, inform our agents in the various base cities. Their first priority now is to investigate Tyrant’s true identity. Once they find out, we will immediately control him. If the other party does not accept our recruitment, we will directly kill him!” “Yes!” … Near the Lake of Death. Due to a direct conversation with Tyrant a few days ago, Bloodthirsty had temporarily given up on the guild players in Iron Skull City. However, when he approached the Lake of Death in high spirits, he realized the danger in this area. Fortunately, the people beside him were all powerful assassins. With their agility, they could still walk safely in this area. In addition, he also informed the guild players who were doing other missions in the Lake of Death. As long as someone discovered Tyrant’s trail, they would inform him immediately. “Tyrant, do you think you’ll be fine if you hide from me? Stop dreaming. I’ll use these few days to spread the name of the Netherworld Guild across the world!” Bloodthirsty quickly moved through the forest with the dagger in hand. Although he had not really found Tyrant’s location, he was not angry because he had other goals. On the contrary, he was in a good mood. But at that moment, a grand voice sounded. Ding! “Global Announcement: Congratulations player [Tyrant] for successfully killing the Dragon Commander, Walter…” “Ding!” “Ding!” The announcement was repeated three times. Bloodthirsty almost spat out a mouthful of blood. “Damn! I thought you were hiding, but you’re secretly killing a dragon!” Bloodthirsty was furious. One had to know that he treated the other party as an opponent, but this guy was so casual and did not take him seriously at all. It was unforgivable! As the announcement stopped, his friend list suddenly lit up. After hearing the Guild Leader’s story, Bloodthirsty realized that Tyrant had such a huge grudge with their guild. Moreover, the killed dragon was an important NPC for the epic main storyline mission! This was a huge matter! Even if Bloodthirsty had never participated in the operation of the guild, at this critical moment, he could not ignore it. After all, this concerned the cooperation between the guild and the military. At this moment, the assassin player beside him ran up excitedly and said, “Boss, we seem to have discovered Tyrant’s location!” “Where is he?!” “In the canyon towards the northwest!” “Tyrant, let’s see where you can hide now!” Bloodthirsty immediately sent a message to all the assassins. Soon, a large team of more than a hundred elite assassins rushed towards the canyon. Ding! “Congratulations on killing the Dragon Commander, Walter. EXP+50,000 (112,500)!” When the announcement ended, Lorne received another notification. After killing the demonized dragon, he gained 162,500 experience points. To ordinary players, this was a huge number, but it was not of much use to Lorne. Just leveling up Aisha required 1.4 million experience points. These hundreds of thousands of experience points were indeed not worth paying attention to. Lorne closed the notification panel and looked at the announcement panel. Killing the demonized dragon had given him an achievement and an extremely rare title! ———— [Dragon Slayer] Type: Title Grade: Legendary Attributes: None Special Effect: Critical Hit Damage+100%. (Including Pets) Unique Effect: Fighting Spirit of the Dragon Slayer: Deals an additional 10% damage to all dragon-type creatures. Introduction: Only the first adventurer who kills a dragon can obtain this unique title! ———— “Damn, it actually increases damage to dragons by 10%!” Lorne looked at the title’s attributes and was shocked. This was a percentage-based increase in damage! As it was only 10%, it could only deal dozens of extra damage in the early stages of the game. However, this was a special effect that could accompany him for the rest of his gaming life. When he reached Level 100, when the damage of his attacks exceeded 100,000, combined with the Critical Hit and other amplification effects, the final amplification was extremely terrifying. Although this effect could only work on dragon-type monsters, it still excited Lorne. Of course, the true value of this title was beyond that. To Lorne, the effect of increasing critical damage by 100% was the greatest value of this title. Because it could be amplified on pets, its value increased by ten or even a hundred times! At the very least, that was the case in Lorne’s eyes. To him, this was not a legendary title, but a mythical title! “Angel’s Wings provide 100% critical damage. Coupled with the Dragon Slayer title, the total damage is increased by 200%.” Lorne calculated. Yes, as a Mythical equipment, the Critical Hit attribute increase of the Angel’s Wings could also be effective on pets. In this case, the pets could also deal four times the critical damage. If Aisha dealt damage, her skill that had a 100% Critical Hit rate would definitely receive the critical damage amplification. As long as she attacked, she could instantly deal more than 4.5 times the damage. As for Lorne himself, if he used [Angel’s Descent], he would be able to deal 7 times the damage. Just fantasizing about it made him feel extremely comfortable. Then… He looked at the dying Walter. He could no longer support himself and fell to the ground weakly. The flesh on his body gradually weathered. Countless loot scattered on the ground. Lorne put away the loot. The final loot was: Gold coins: 11. Silver-grade: 5 items. Gold-grade: 2 items. 17 Silver-grade Enhancement Gems and 5 Gold-grade Enhancement Gems. 25 Blessing Gems. In addition, there were a few special gems with runes on the ground. ———— [Enchantment Gem] Attribute: Fire Effect: Attack+10 Introduction: It is an equipment enchantment that allows the equipment to gain a special magic effect. Every time the equipment is enchanted, the equipment’s attributes will be increased. ———— The effect of this gem was very similar to that of the Enhancement Gem. However, the Enhancement Gem increased the attributes of the equipment by a percentage, and the Enchantment Gem added additional fixed attributes to the equipment. The only huge difference was that equipment enchantment could be used infinitely, while enhancement could only be used ten times. In addition, Enchantment Gems had different effects. ———— [Fire] = Attack / Magic Attack [Metal] = Armor Penetration [Wood] = HP [Water] = MP [Earth] = Physical / Magic Resistance ———— There were roughly five types of Enchantment Gems. The Enchantment Gem in Lorne’s hand was of the fire attribute, so its effect was to increase attack power. One enchantment could increase Attack or Magic Attack by 10 points. If he could enchant it a hundred times, then even a White Iron equipment could have attributes that surpassed Gold equipment. Of course, this was almost impossible. According to the explanation given by the system, the number of times the equipment could be enchanted had a lot to do with the quality of the equipment itself. When an equipment was only a White Iron equipment, it could not be enchanted more than ten times. If this equipment was lucky enough to succeed ten times, and you continued to enchant it, it would completely collapse and become a pile of useless items with no attributes. “Indeed, games are best experienced by the rich…” Lorne could almost foresee that when everyone looted Enchantment Gems in the future, rich players would definitely crazily enchant their equipment. At that time, the difference in strength between the players would be huge. Lorne put away all the gems. As he was picking up the last gem, his gaze was suddenly attracted by a glowing object under the dragon’s body. “This is?” Lorne stepped forward and pulled out the suppressed glowing object. Surprisingly, this was a very strange equipment. ———— [Protection Barrier] Grade: Platinum Attribute 1: +3000 HP Attribute 2: +300 Defense Special Effect: Activate the equipment to form an energy shield with a range of (5 x 5) yards. It can block the approaching targets and their attacks. Duration: 30 seconds. Durability: 30% of the user’s HP. (When durability reaches zero, Energy Shield will be unusable.) Type: External Equipment Level: 30 Introduction: …. ———— This was an external equipment! Lorne felt that the surprise came too suddenly, exceeding his expectations. Perhaps many rookie players did not know what external equipment was, but Lorne knew very well. External equipment was a special equipment apart from ordinary equipment and rare parts. The only special thing about this equipment was that it did not require an equipment slot. For example, if this equipment was worn on the arm, it would conflict with the wrist guard. Under normal circumstances, when one obtained another pair of equipment that needed to be equipped on the arm, they had to remove their original equipment and vacate their spots to wear them. But external equipment did not have that restriction. It could be used together with wrist guard equipment. Like in Lorne’s case, as long as he chose to use it, it would turn into a light that poured into his wrist guard. From the outside, the wrist guard did not change. However, only Lorne knew that the Platinum-grade equipment had made his health points reach 10,000. One had to know, he was only a Summoner! Despite wearing Level 10 equipment and not adding any points to “Constitution”, his health was still close to 10,000 points! This was an unbelievable attributes panel. Ding! “System Notification: Your equipment [Angel’s Wings] has detected a main body fragment. Would you like to summon it?” Suddenly, the game notification sounded. Lorne also saw that the only Mythical equipment in his inventory was glowing. “Summon!” Lorne immediately made his choice. In the next second, a huge light burst out from his back, and the [Angel’s Wings] automatically appeared. At the same time, immense magic power blossomed from the [Angel’s Wings] and shone a holy light on Walter. Soon, the light sucked out a black bloodstained feather from Walter. The feather was in the same state as the first one Lorne had obtained last time. Before Lorne could examine it further, the feather turned into a white energy that poured into the [Angel’s Wings]. Ding! “Congratulations on absorbing a portion of the original energy of your equipment [Angel’s Wings]. You have received an equipment upgrade!” “Congratulations on successfully increasing the attributes of your equipment [Angel’s Wings]!” The game notification sounded. Lorne checked the attributes of the equipment and found that its attributes had been greatly increased. Its original attributes were 2 x (All attributes). But now, its attributes were 3 x (All attributes). According to Lorne’s current level, the attributes this equipment brought him were 90 points (all attributes). The players had five attributes. After calculating it, he gained a total of 450 points from this equipment. Before leveling up, the attributes that this equipment brought to Lorne were only 300 points. In other words, just by leveling up once, Lorne had obtained 150 “Free Attribute” points! “It’s still considered a fragment now?” Lorne looked at the equipment again and realized that it was still a fragment. It had not recovered completely because of this fusion. This was good news for Lorne. This meant that the [Angel’s Wings] had a higher limit. If he could completely restore this equipment to its complete state, he believed that the attributes that would be given to him in the end would be very astonishing. Lorne took a deep breath to calm himself. Then, he looked at the dragon, Walter. The dragon’s body “died”. It was as if it had undergone a thousand years of change. Its original flesh and blood body had turned into a rotting skeleton. This should be the main reason why it could not be edited into a pet. Lorne sighed. At the same time, he saw a milky-white soul floating out from the rotting skeleton. It was Walter’s soul. “After a thousand years, I’m finally free.” Walter was very excited. Although what awaited him was death, he was still very happy. It was because he had been tortured for a thousand years! Moreover, in this thousand years, his soul had to be constantly vigilant and could not slack off. Otherwise, in the moment of relaxation, that evil power would invade his consciousness. He originally thought that he was really going to fall into darkness this time. Fortunately, the arrival of this human adventurer freed him from the invasion of the undead power. Even death was an extremely happy thing for him. “Human Adventurer, I heard that you were entrusted by the Dragon God to come here. Did the Dragon God foresee my situation and specially send you to help me?” Walter looked at Lorne expectantly. “No.” Lorne shook his head mercilessly, “The Dragon of Light only asked me to collect the dragon souls, that’s all.” “I’ve disappointed the Dragon God.” Walter’s expression turned dim, “To a dragon, degenerating into a demonic dragon is a great humiliation, not to mention that I’m one of the commanders of the Radiant Church.” “You don’t have to blame yourself.” Lorne looked at him and said, “In that war, all those who fought for the light were the most heroic warriors. The Dragon God will be proud of you.” “Thank you for your comfort, young human adventurer.” Walter said, “Although it was a coincidence that you saved me this time, I still have to thank you for your help. Originally, I wanted to give you a very high-level hidden class, but now that you’re following the Dragon God, I believe that he has long chosen a more legendary path for you. Your future achievements will definitely surpass mine.” <i>‘Eh…’</i>  <i>‘Aren’t you thinking too much?’</i>  At this moment, Lorne wanted to say this, for the Dragon of Light had not prepared anything for him. Divine Radiance was a special power. Could it be considered a hidden class? Lorne felt hopeful. After all, the other party had described this power as something amazing. If it could not raise his strength in all aspects, then the power of this “Divine Radiance” was too weak. “Um, Sir Walter, since you can’t give me a hidden class, shouldn’t you give me some other rewards?” Lorne asked bluntly. There was no need to be polite to NPCs. After all, equipment was just a pile of data in their hands. It was up to them to give as much as they could. “Of course, young human warrior, I have discovered that you have many high potential followers around you. Their experience requirement is too high, causing your leveling speed to be limited.” “So, let me help you with that.” Walter shot a light into Lorne. The next second, his game interface popped up, and a notification sounded. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the blessing of the Divine Power of Dragon Commander Walter. Talent: [Master of Experience]!” ———— [Master of Experience] Grade: Legendary Effect: With this talent, your EXP gained will increase by 100%! ———— “Damn!!!” This was a legendary talent! To the players, talent skills were the most difficult to obtain. Almost 90% of players would only have their initial talent at the later stages of the game. As for awakening a new talent? This was a very difficult thing. Other than completing a special mission, it was basically impossible. He did not expect Walter to give a new talent skill, a legendary one at that. “Experience gained increases by 100%?” “Will this effect work together with my experience bonus as a Summoner?” As a Summoner, Lorne had an additional 225% experience bonus. If the effect of this talent could stack it, he would gain 225% additional experience points. Unfortunately, there were no other monsters here, so Lorne could only put aside his desire to test it. “Young human adventurer, this reward is not enough to express my gratitude to you, so I still want to give you other treasures.” Walter said, “Dragons like jewelry and also have the most exquisite investigative ability in the world. This ability can help us find rich mining areas and divide them into mining areas. We can dig up all the underground minerals and use them to decorate our dragon nest.” “Now, I give you this ability. I hope it can help you effectively.” With that, Walter flapped his dragon wings, and a light shone on Lorne. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the shared talent of Dragon Commander Walter. You have received talent: [Treasure Seeking]!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios ———— [Treasure Hunting] Grade: Legendary Effect: Can discover underground mineral resources within a certain range. Introduction: A natural ability of the purebred dragons. Walter is even more extraordinary in this aspect. If you have his treasure seeking ability, you will be able to find all the minerals underground. ———— Seeing this, Lorne did not know how to express his emotions. Who would have thought that in just a few seconds, he would obtain another talent? Moreover, this was another legendary talent! Unlike the previous experience bonus, this talent’s effect was to detect the surrounding mineral veins. In terms of use, its value was definitely higher than the EXP bonus. This was an incredible talent. If the NPCs in Iron Skull City knew that Lorne could detect the exact location of mines, they would definitely treat him as the most important adventurer in Iron Skull City and enjoy the highest treatment. Of course, he could not rule out the possibility that they would capture and force him to work for them. After all, to a faction, methods that could survey mineral resources were absolute “nuclear weapons”. Therefore, Lorne did not want to reveal his ability to the public. As a new generation youth who had undergone nine years of compulsory education, he knew the true value of this talent. Perhaps to individual players, it was not useful in increasing their strength. But if one needed to build their own faction in the future, this talent would grant them endless wealth in their territory. Seeing that he had another talent, Lorne was completely immersed in joy. He thought that was the end of the reward. But at this moment, Walter spoke again, “Young human adventurer, I have noticed that you have a unique charisma that attracts many creatures with powerful potential to follow you. This is a natural requirement for a great leader. I also hope that you can go further down this path.” With that, Walter shot out another stream of light. With that, a light poured over Lorne. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the blessing of the Divine Power of Dragon Commander Walter. Pet Space+1!” Heavens… Seeing the reward, Lorne did not know what to say. This dragon was really generous. Not only did it give Lorne two Legendary talents, but it also gave him a pet space. As a powerful Summoner, Lorne really needed more pet spaces to strengthen himself. However, the experience of leveling up his pets now was a little unbearable for Lorne. Adding up all the experience points needed by his pets, it was about 200 times that of his own. In other words, if others needed 10,000 experience points to level up, Lorne would need 2 million experience points. This was a terrifying number. Therefore, after considering this, Lorne decided that his seventh pet would no longer be a Boss-level pet. This was because the EXP needed to level up a Boss-level pet was too high. From the overall strength of the current team, the seventh pet only needed to be responsible for dealing damage. If he considered it this way, it would be best to create a mage-type pet. Simply because magic was the type of damage that the team currently lacked. Lorne already had some thoughts. At this moment, the dragon, Walter, was extremely weak. Its soul gradually dimmed and was already at the edge of dissipating. “Then, young human adventurer, please accept my final blessing of Divine Power…” With that, Walter flapped his wings again, and golden light poured down. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the blessing of Dragon Commander Walter: Divine Power+10.” “Congratulations on obtaining Dragon Commander Walter’s gift: Water Dragon Crystal x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of Dragon Commander Walter: Dragon’s Reverse Scale (Damaged) x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of Dragon Commander Walter: Dragon Bone Fragment (Damaged) x21.” “Congratulations on obtaining Dragon Commander Walter’s gift: Dragon Horn x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the recognition of Dragon Commander Walter: Dragon Race of Order Reputation+3100.” At this moment, a series of system rewards appeared. Looking at the information that flashed in front of him, Lorne’s eyes brimmed with tears. This dragon was too good to him. Not to mention the previous rewards, just the conventional rewards were much more than the other dragons. This made Lorne’s Divine Power rise to 36 points. In addition, Lorne obtained a dragon crystal and a dragon horn. Although he did not know the specific use of the Water Dragon Crystal for the time being, as a complete legendary material, it was definitely priceless. As for the dragon horn? It was in a similar state as the dragon scale and had lost its strength. However, it was considered a complete body part. If he used it to create monsters, he believed that the final result would be ten or even a hundred times better than the Dragon’s Scale. ...; “Young human adventurer, my soul is about to dissipate, but I have an important piece of information to tell you…” Lorne had almost used the Dragon’s Treasure Vault, but he dismissed the thought after hearing it. From this sentence, he could tell that the other party had a special hidden mission. “Lord Walter, if there’s anything, just say it.” “It’s like this…” Walter slowly explained everything he knew. His voice became weaker and weaker, clearly at the end of his life. “That’s the specific situation. Alright, young human adventurer, I’m going to leave this world. I’ve been corroded by the undead power for 1,000 years. It’s time for me to truly be free.” With that, the soul of the dragon, Walter, was about to dissipate. At this moment, Lorne quickly said, “Lord Walter, I have something else to ask of you.” “What is it?” “It’s nothing much. It’s just the gems in this cave. Can you give them to me as a reward? Anyway, you won’t need them in the future…” Lorne pointed at the wall. The gems on it were glowing. It was obvious from their appearance that they were of high quality. “These Night Pearls were collected from the surrounding mountains when I had a premonition of my death. They are very precious gems, but they have accompanied me for a thousand years and can be considered to have completed their mission. In that case, I’ll give them all to you. I hope these gems can help you in the future.” “In addition, I noticed a group of Fallen Dark Assassins gathered around. Although they are many in number, as an adventurer valued by the Dragon God, you can definitely defeat them easily.” “Goodbye, young man!” With a final farewell, the dragon, Walter, flapped its wings. Instantly, the cave rumbled, and all the gems turned to light as they entered Lorne’s bag. His body gradually dissipated at the last moment. Without hesitation, Lorne used the Dragon’s Treasure Vault to take away the other party’s soul and the weathered body. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the dragon, Walter. Night Pearl+5,000!” “Congratulations on obtaining the mission item: Dragon Soul!” “Congratulations on obtaining the mission item: Dragon Skeleton!” … To his surprise, there were more than 5,000 Night Pearls in the cave. Moreover, these Night Pearls were very rare materials. As an ornament valued by the dragons, the Night Pearls were also extraordinary in other races. But now was not the time to talk about this. Walter had given Lorne a warning. It turned out that there were already many assassin players from the Dark faction lurking around this place. If nothing unexpected happened, it should be the team led by [Bloodthirsty]. Lorne put the dragon skeleton into his bag and walked out of the cave. Opening the map, he could see a large number of red dots. In “Divine Realm”, every red dot on the map represented a target of the enemy camp. Therefore, there should be more than 300 to 400 high-level assassins lurking near this map. Fortunately, he was under the cliff. Those assassins did not dare to rashly come down from the cliff. After all, they did not have the flying equipment [Angel’s Wings]. If they failed, they would directly fall to their death. “Interesting.” Lorne was not worried. On the contrary, he smiled. Since the other party was so friendly, he should arrange a different surprise for them. “Aisha, go up first. Those assassins are hiding near these rocks. Once the battle begins, Small Artillery and Venom will use their AOE skills to cover these two spots.” As he climbed the vines, Lorne made the most thorough plan. … “Gosh, is Tyrant really down there?” “That’s right. Our people saw him enter this canyon with their own eyes and did not leave. As long as he did not go offline, he must still be in this canyon.” “We’ve checked the surroundings of the canyon but haven’t found him. If he’s still in the canyon, he should be under this abyss.” “How long do we have to wait?” “Don’t be anxious. In order to ensure that nothing goes wrong, we’ve called all our friends here. At that time, thousands of people will surround and kill him. Even if Tyrant has a pair of wings, he won’t be able to escape!” Near the cliff, among the rocks, hundreds of players were hiding behind the rocks. Above their heads, the prefix of the Netherworld Guild was hanging. Clearly, they were from the same faction as Bloodthirsty. Because they had not seen their target for a long time, everyone was in a more relaxed state. Just as they were chatting happily, an invisible figure quickly got up from the vines and pulled out a dagger from its waist, infiltrating the army of assassins. Slash! A cold dagger slashed through the neck of a player. In an instant, the player became a white soul. In the sky, there was a terrifying damage number. -16,000 (Critical) This was a five-digit amount of damage! The surrounding assassin players were all stunned. Their pupils dilated countless times, and they could not believe their eyes. Before they could react, another player nearby was killed. This time, it was still a critical hit. As for the assassin who attacked them, the moment it attacked, it disappeared into the darkness again. This speed was astonishing, so fast that no one could see its appearance. “It’s Tyrant’s Elf Assassin!” The dead players could not speak, but they could use their friend information function to inform everyone of the information on their combat panel. When they heard this information, the assassin group panicked. Many people were afraid because they were assassins and knew very well how terrifying permanent invisibility was. A few days ago, their Deputy Guild Leader [Bloodthirsty] had killed all the elite players of the large guilds in the Doomsday Forest because of a skill that could continuously turn him invisible. But now, such an opponent had suddenly appeared in front of them, so they were naturally afraid. However, before they could think of a solution, countless fireballs suddenly appeared in the sky and poured down on their camp like cannonballs. Boom! Boom! Boom!! All the assassins in the range were injured, losing more than half of their health. But that was not the worst of it. Worst of all, they could not turn invisible. If they could not turn invisible at this time, wouldn’t they be a live target for the Elf Assassin? Aisha moved at an extremely fast speed in the center of the players. The dagger in her hand was like the scythe of the Death God, harvesting the life of a player almost every second. Ding! “You have been attacked by the enemy faction player [Tyrant]. You have received 16,000 damage!” “You have been attacked by the enemy faction player [Tyrant]. You have received 17,100 damage!” “You have been attacked by the enemy faction player [Tyrant]. You have received 15,900 damage!” “You have been attacked by the enemy faction player [Tyrant]. You have received 16,500 damage!” “…” These powerful top assassins were inexplicably injured, and it was a fatal wound. The critical damage was as high as 16,000. Even if they had three lives, they could not withstand it. “Damn it! Tyrant is there!!!” “As long as we kill Tyrant, his pets will die together!” “Brothers, let’s attack together!” “Everyone, attack! Kill Tyrant!” They were all experienced assassins, so they naturally knew how to deal with a Summoner player. No matter how powerful a pet was, if its master was killed, the pet would naturally disappear. Thinking about this, the assassin players who had recovered from their shock looked at Lorne who was climbing up. Woof, woof, woof! At that moment, hundreds of hellhounds appeared beside Lorne. These summoned hellhounds only had a quarter of Lorne’s attributes and had about 2,500 health points. To high-level assassins like them, they were not difficult opponents. However, the problem was that killing these hellhounds required time. On this battlefield, any second was precious, especially when there was an extremely terrifying assassin mixed in the crowd. Her dagger was so terrifying that before one could even see her clearly, their life would already be taken away by it. Ding! “Battle notification: Light Faction player [Tyrant] has terminated the Dark Faction player [Netherworld Underpants]. He has received 150 Light Faction Reputation points!” “Battle notification: Light Faction player [Tyrant] has terminated the Dark Faction player [Netherworld Eating Burger]. He has received 110 Light Faction Reputation Points!” “Battle notification: Light Faction player [Tyrant] has terminated the Dark Faction player [Netherworld I Love Vodka].He has received 170 Light Faction Reputation points!” “Battle notification: Light Faction player [Tyrant] has terminated the Dark Faction player [Netherworld Wealthy Young Master]. He has received 210 Light Faction Reputation points!” “Battle notification: …” How could the players called by Bloodthirsty to surround and kill Tyrant be ordinary people? In the Doomsday Forest, they had also killed a large number of players. After killing dozens of players, they had a ‘bounty’ on them. As long as they were killed by players from the enemy camp, they would lose a large amount of reputation points. However, there was something special about it, which was that they would not lose an additional level. In the game “Divine Realm”, killing players would result in a red name. Moreover, this system was very strict. As long as one had sin values, when they died, they would receive punishment in the form of reduced experience points. Typically, every 5 more points of sin would result in an additional loss of one level after death. For example, at least half of the players in this canyon had recently killed ten players. Originally, after their death, they had to lose at least three or four levels. However, it was different this time. Although the players from the opposing faction that Lorne killed had sin points, they would not receive the red name punishment after death. The only punishment for them now was their reputation points. After they were killed by Lorne, the faction reputation points gained during the event would be emptied. As for Lorne, he would obtain half of the faction reputation points they lost. Therefore, it could be seen that his faction reputation was rising crazily. In just a few seconds, it had reached a height of several thousand. As for the assassins who charged at him, they were all stalled by the hellhounds. Lorne did not have to worry about his safety. Even if someone rushed forward, they would be harvested by the scythe-like legs of his new pet, ‘Little Spider’. Although this little guy was not even Level 10, its attributes were very high. Under the enhancement of its skills, it was not a big deal to deal with a few Level 20 assassin players. … Ding! “Regional Announcement: Light Faction player [Tyrant] has killed 100 players in a row. He is on a killing spree!” After killing a hundred assassin players, the regional announcement sounded. Like before, all the players in the ruins of the war could see it. When the players from the Light Faction saw this news, the entire chat channel was in an uproar. “Gosh! Tyrant encountered that group of Dark Assassins!” “Boss Tyrant is awesome!” “I’m kneeling to God Tyrant now. Killing 100 Dark Assassins is much harder than killing players in the Doomsday Forest.” “Indeed. Assassins are hard to deal with to begin with, not to mention that these assassins like to act in groups. Individual players, or even teams, are no match for them.” “Who said that God Tyrant is afraid? Come out!” “That’s right, a bunch of cowards. You shouted so happily two days ago, why don’t you dare to show your face now?!” “If they dare to show their faces, I’ll smash them with my club. Let’s see if there’s a pile of feces inside!” The players from the Light Faction retaliated crazily. They seemed to have vented their anger and were extremely happy. In fact, it was normal for them to be so excited. After all, they had been attacked by the assassin groups of the Dark faction a few days ago and had not organized an effective counterattack, causing the other party to laugh at the players of Iron Skull City on the Internet. Coupled with the fact that Tyrant had been avoiding battle for the past few days, it fueled the bastards’ arrogance. It could be imagined how angry the players of the Light Faction were. The regional announcement finally gave them a chance to counterattack. Therefore, it could be seen that the entire chat channel, the game forum, and even the real-life news platform were crazily posting related comments. At this moment, suddenly! Another system notification sounded. Ding! “Regional Announcement: Light Faction player [Tyrant] has terminated the Super Massacre of the Dark Faction player [Bloodthirsty]. He has received 9,000 Light Faction Reputation Points!” “Regional Announcement: Light Faction player [Tyrant] has terminated the Super Massacre of the Dark Faction player [Bloodthirsty]. He has received 9,000 Light Faction Reputation Points!” The sudden regional announcement stunned all the players from the Light Faction. Just now, they had thought that Tyrant had encountered the other party for a long time. Now, he might be surrounded by the Dark Assassins and attacked by Bloodthirsty. They were all worried that when Tyrant faced the assassin group, if he was hit by Bloodthirsty’s sneak attack, it might only take a second before everything ended. However, who would have thought that before everyone could discuss this matter, Tyrant, who was fighting in a certain map, had already killed [Bloodthirsty], who left everyone helpless? “What happened?” “Bloodthirsty is dead? My god, how is this possible?!” “Who has a video of the scene? I want to see it!” “How did he die? Bloodthirsty is a world-class assassin. How could he be killed so easily?” All the players were crazy. Even the higher-ups of the large guilds were surprised. Because not long ago, they had fought Bloodthirsty. Everyone knew the strength of the other party. However, such an opponent that everyone was helpless against had actually suddenly died amidst the encirclement. This was truly too unbelievable. In the canyon of the Lake of Death. “Tyrant! Die!” In the chaotic battlefield, a dark figure hid in the darkness. Unlike other assassins, he had left the team a long time ago and was not restrained by the pets and summoned monsters. He drew the dagger from his waist and quickly closed in on Lorne. When the two were close enough, he attacked brazenly. His cold dagger turned, and an incomparably sharp black energy shot out from the blade. This was Bloodthirsty’s sure-kill skill with a stun effect that lasted for 2.5 seconds! [Dark Gouge]! The dagger in Bloodthirsty’s hand stabbed down, determined to kill with one strike! As long as this slash hit, no matter how much health Tyrant had, he was confident that he could be killed instantly. At this moment, Bloodthirsty was so confident. This was because the target in front of him did not notice his attack, nor did it have the ability to. After all, his invisibility and proximity were so perfect. Excitement flashed in Bloodthirsty’s eyes. He even felt that he had seen the Goddess of Victory waving at him. Slash! The dagger stabbed down, but Bloodthirsty was stunned. “It failed?!” Bloodthirsty held the dagger in his hand and was stunned. He had not expected that his attack would fail. This was impossible for him. This was because he had the [Ghost Shadow Necklace]. This equipment gave him a powerful invisibility ability. Not only was it difficult to detect, but he could also use multiple layers of invisibility. After activating the active skill, he could even attack while invisible. With this ability, he could come and go as he pleased in the encirclement of large guilds. He even assassinated several Deputy Guild Leaders of large guilds among a group of experts. After countless battles, Bloodthirsty firmly believed that no player could find his trail. Even if it was a player whose level was higher than his, it was impossible. But now, he had failed! “Are you confused, young man?” Lorne looked at the air beside him and smiled, “Brother, you seriously smell. You were three meters away from me but I could already feel you.” “Body odor? No, I have a special cloak that eliminates smell.” Bloodthirsty sniffed himself in confusion, then suddenly realized that there was no odor. It was obvious that the other party was playing with him. “Damn Tyrant, how dare you fool me. I’ll kill and send you back to the Beginner Village!” Bloodthirsty went berserk. He activated the active skill of the necklace and his body disappeared into the darkness again. This time, the invisibility effect was stronger, and it could also allow him to attack the target while in stealth mode. “Young people don’t listen to advice. Looks like I can only educate you with force.” Lorne shook his head and smiled, then took out his short staff and threw it in one direction. Pfft— The short staff struck something. -487 He dealt very low damage but an extremely insulting number appeared. Although Lorne’s level was very high, he had not added any “Intelligence” previously, so his magic attack was not high, especially since he had not changed his equipment for a long time, causing his magic attack to not exceed 1,000 points. Therefore, without any offensive skills, this was the highest basic attack damage that he could deal. Bloodthirsty was dumbfounded. His health was not in danger, but he could not understand why the other party could see him. He had clearly used the necklace’s active skill! About that, Lorne wanted to say that it was all because the dragon, Walter, had been too good to him. With his current methods, it was indeed difficult to discover the invisible Bloodthirsty. Under normal circumstances, he would be attacked by the Bloodthirsty and might lose the Death Substitution Necklace. The moment the other party appeared, Lorne’s pets had to capture and kill him. Unfortunately, all of this was ruined by Walter. When reminding Lorne that there was an ambush, he also let him see the assassin player’s location, displayed as the red dots on the map. It was also because of this that Lorne could find traces of Bloodthirsty. Although his stealth and evasion skills were perfect, his location was clearly seen on Lorne’s map. “Young man, see how powerful my pet’s eight legs are!” Lorne did not plan to give the other party a chance to recover. If the kid escaped, it would be extremely difficult to capture him again. Therefore, the moment he hit the other party, Lorne also controlled “Little Spider” and the “Long Tongue Bat” that guarded him. The small spider was only Level 8 now, but because of its powerful basic attributes, its attack power had reached 2,550 points! Moreover, Bloodthirsty was only Level 22, so the level suppression effect was only 40%. To be honest, such damage mitigation was not enough to let Bloodthirsty resist the damage of Little Spider. As for the long tongue bat? It was slightly weaker, but because it was Level 20 and had the flying characteristics, its ability to attack on the battlefield was excellent. Under Lorne’s command, the two pets quickly entangled Bloodthirsty. Although he was still invisible, Lorne used the map to easily grasp his location and had his pets restrict his movements. Swish! Swish! Swish! Little Spider’s sickle-like long legs attacked Bloodthirsty like a storm. -1055 -1021 -1037 Terrifying damage numbers appeared above Bloodthirsty’s head. As an assassin player and a top expert in the world, Bloodthirsty was confident in his skills, so he did not add any Constitution Points. Therefore, his health was only 3,500 points now. Fortunately, he had drunk a bottle of potion when he was attacked just now. Otherwise, he would already be dead. “How could this be?” Looking at his health points that instantly evaporated, Bloodthirsty was dumbfounded. His damage output could also instantly deal thousands of damage, but this pet that could only deal 1,000 points of damage was the weakest among Tyrant’s pets? In other words, he could not even defeat the weakest pet of the other party. Was this the true difference between the two?! Previously, he had naively thought that Tyrant had not appeared because he was afraid of his strength. Now that he thought about it, it was really funny. With Tyrant’s current strength, he probably did not treat him, a so-called top assassin in the world, as an opponent. “Tyrant, I have to admit that you are very powerful now.” “But I, Bloodthirsty, will definitely not let this go. I will definitely return to take revenge on you and defeat you with my own hands!” At the last moment, he looked at Lorne with a bloodthirsty expression, as if he wanted to remember his appearance. “How naive of you!” Lorne scoffed. He did not know what this Bloodthirsty was thinking. Had he not seen the difference between the two sides? Not to mention the Legendary Assassin Aisha, he could not even defeat this “Little Spider” beside him. How was he supposed to take revenge? Young people really knew no fear. While Lorne was speechless, his gaze landed on the spot where Bloodthirsty had fallen. There was a necklace that glowed black and red. It seemed extraordinary. Lorne stepped forward and picked up the special necklace from the ground. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the loot: Ghost Shadow Necklace!” [Ghost Shadow Necklace] Grade: Diamond Attributes: None Special Effect: Destruction Strike: When exiting stealth, deal 50% additional damage to the target. Special Effect: Natural Assassin: Enter stealth mode and receive 30% movement speed bonus. Special Effect: Enhanced Stealth: Increase stealth duration by three times. Special Effect: Shadow Stealth: Enters the Shadow Stealth state. Concealment effect will be increased by 100%. You can attack while in the invisible stealth state. During this period of time, the invisibility effect will not be removed. Under this state, 50 MP will be consumed per second. When the MP is completely depleted, the invisibility state will be removed. (When the level difference is too great or when one is injured severely, the invisibility state will be broken.) Type: Necklace Level: None Introduction: …. “I see.” When he saw the interface, Lorne understood everything. No wonder Bloodthirsty could rely on his own strength to make countless large guilds helpless in the Doomsday Forest. It was all because of this powerful Ghost Shadow Necklace. To his surprise, this equipment was actually Diamond-grade! In Iron Skull City, the highest-grade equipment was naturally the Angel’s Wings belonging to Lorne. This Mythical equipment was one of the top equipment in the world. However, after the Mythical equipment, there were three Platinum equipment, and the rest were Gold equipment. From this, it could be seen that the current quality of equipment was very strictly controlled by the system. According to the normal game progress, Silver-grade equipment was the mainstream equipment at this stage. Gold-grade equipment was the “divine equipment” at this stage, and Platinum equipment was basically obtained under special circumstances. However, no one expected that while everyone was still fighting for the Silver-grade equipment, Bloodthirsty of the Dark Faction had already obtained Diamond-grade equipment! Although this equipment did not have attributes, it surprisingly had four special effects! Each effect was extremely powerful. The first special effect, [Destruction Strike], provided the assassin with high explosive power. The second special effect, [Natural Assassin], provided the assassin with powerful mobility. The third special effect, [Enhanced Stealth], gave the assassin greater stealth ability. The fourth special effect, [Shadow Stealth], allowed the assassin to truly obtain the monstrous ability to turn invisible and kill. When players were in the state of Shadow Stealth, as long as their MP was not depleted, they could remain invisible. Moreover, they would not be exposed even after getting hit by most attacks. “This is really an equipment tailored for me.” Lorne could not bear to part with the equipment. He really felt that it matched him. Look at the fourth effect. As long as the MP was not empty, he could remain invisible. According to the total MP of more than 5,000 points, if he wanted to remain invisible, he could persist for 100 seconds with this equipment. If he continued to use magic potions to replenish himself during this period of time, he would last longer, especially with Rimuru around. Rimuru’s healing skill could not only recover the target’s HP, but also the target’s MP. With its healing frequency and strength, it could definitely make Lorne invisible for more than a few minutes. At this moment, one might be curious as to why Lorne had to stay invisible for so long as a Summoner. It was easy to understand. This was because the Summoner did not need to fight by himself. He only needed to protect himself. This equipment happened to be the greatest protection for him. In addition, when entering some special grounds, he could also secretly enter alone and summon his pets within the map to avoid the guards at the entrance. In short, this equipment meant something significant to Lorne. At this moment, as a member of the Light Faction, after being equipped with this equipment, he directly triggered the equipment ranking. Ding! “Game Announcement: Due to your equipment [Ghost Shadow Necklace] being ranked second on the Iron Skull City Equipment Leaderboard, would you like to reveal the information of your equipment [Ghost Shadow Necklace]?” “Yes, make it public.” Lorne chose to disclose some of the attributes again. Just because an expert revealed a part of the equipment’s attributes, it did not mean the other players could target them. In the game world, strength was the only reliance. When the other party’s equipment attributes were countless times stronger than oneself, no matter how many schemes one had in battle, it could not change the outcome of the battle. … At the same time, in the Doomsday Forest. “Gosh! Look at the equipment ranking. There’s an equipment update!” Someone exclaimed in the chat. In the next second, countless players opened the equipment ranking. &lt; Iron Skull City Equipment Ranking &gt; [First Place]: Angel’s Wings (Mythical), Owner: Tyrant. Reward: Damage+10%. [Second Place]: Ghost Shadow Necklace (Diamond), Owner: Tyrant. Reward: Damage+9%. [Third Place]: Death Substitute Necklace (Platinum), Owner: Tyrant. Reward: Damage+8%. [Fourth Place]: Lightning Staff (Platinum), Owner: Thor. Reward: Damage+7%. … It could be seen that the first place on the list was still the insurmountable Angel’s Wings. However, the Lightning Staff that was originally in second place fell to fourth place at this moment. What replaced it was the equipment that Tyrant had recently obtained, the Ghost Shadow Necklace! Upon seeing the name of this equipment, the players in the Doomsday Forest immediately became excited. “Hahaha, Bloodthirsty is going to cry.” “No wonder Bloodthirsty could ask a few large guilds to encircle him. It’s because he has such powerful equipment!” “It’s actually a Diamond-grade equipment!” “Platinum equipment is worth a few million. This Diamond equipment will probably cost more than ten million!” “Congratulations to Tyrant for earning ten million!” “Master, do you lack a son? I’m willing to change my surname!” The players exploded again. To ordinary players, the equipment ranking was the wealth ranking. Being able to have a spot on it meant that he had a net worth of several million. As for a player like Tyrant who directly occupied the top three spots on the leaderboard, his net worth had already reached more than 100 million dollars. He was a true tycoon. At the same time, in a high-level energy area, in the high-level luxury hotel. Hoses ended his rest. The fun of the game “Divine Realm” was beyond his expectations. Yesterday, he had even slept through the night. From four in the afternoon, he had slept until now. After rejecting the meeting with the Michel family, he lay down in the game cabin again. To be honest, he was a little fascinated by the Divine Realm. Especially after following behind the leader and earning tens of millions for no reason, he increasingly felt that the Divine Realm was the future of the world. In this new game world, the business opportunities were infinite. He believed that as long as he entered early enough, the final benefits would be much higher than the real businesses. It was because of this understanding that he had created a large merchant guild again a few days ago and entered the game, preparing to showcase his skills in the spiritual world. In addition, when he saw his leader easily defeat a team of more than a hundred people that day, he had a different feeling. He seemed to have experienced the passion that he should not have at this age. It was ten thousand times more satisfying than when he was in the underworld back then. However, there was something bothering him recently. In order to let the guild develop, his daughter had been online for a long time recently. She even spent less time with an old man like him. As a father, he naturally wished to help his daughter, but considering her stubborn nature, direct help would definitely be rejected. Therefore, he planned to let his daughter get to know his leader first. But who knew that he was too anxious and too straightforward, causing the leader to reject him directly. This made him very uncomfortable. Sigh… Hoses sighed and put on his helmet. Ding! “Regional Announcement :…” “Regional Announcement :…” As soon as he entered the game, a series of notifications popped up. They were all heroic acts of Tyrant. Hoses immediately turned into the bootlicker, “Super Rich”. He opened the chat and refreshed the channel with paid announcement messages. “Leader is awesome! Leader is the best in the world!” “Leader is awesome! Leader is the best in the world!” “…” Super Rich fully displayed his rich family background and his bootlicking personality. The surrounding players were already numb. However, at this moment, a player called [Crystal Chime] could not help but speak, “How disgusting. Can you not be such a bootlicker? How can a greasy uncle do that?” Seeing this announcement, all the players were shocked. How bold was this person to dare speak to a tycoon like this? In the forest, Super Rich had just come online. When he saw this ID, he was stunned. [Crystal Chime]? Wasn’t this the ID of his little daughter? Damn, as a father, he was actually scolded by his daughter as a bootlicker. How could he still play this game?! … Swish! Swish! Swish! In a forest, a group of Forest Lizards was being attacked. The agile Elf Assassin, Aisha, used her high agility to move back and forth among the monsters. The dagger in her hand quickly slid past, leaving countless wounds on the monsters. Such terrifying damage was not something the weak Forest Lizards could withstand. In less than ten seconds, the group of Level 30 monsters fell to the ground. “Double the experience points?!” Looking at the system interface, Lorne’s eyes widened. After repeatedly confirming, he finally confirmed that the legendary talent [Master of Experience] he had obtained from the dragon, Walter, had given him twice the experience. This double experience included all his other bonuses. In other words, Lorne now had 450% experience points. Compared to before, it had truly doubled! “Great. With this talent, the difficulty of leveling up the pets will decrease by half!” Lorne killed the remaining monsters, then rushed into the depths of the forest and began to sweep through it. Now that he had such a talent skill, he was extremely excited. If he did not farm for more than ten hours today, he would not be able to sleep. Of course, there was something else that drove him forward. It was the information that the dragon, Walter, had given him. Mission: [Search for Cold Desolate Dragon City] Type: Global Competition Mission (Main Mission) Difficulty: Epic Description: A long time ago, the Light Faction was led by the Dragon Race. In order to ensure the peace and stability of the continent, the Dragon Race built the Cold Desolate Dragon City at the border between the Dark Faction and the Light Faction. Countless dragons lived there, but because of the war and history, it disappeared from everyone’s memory. The dragon, Walter, hopes that you can find it and inform the Dragon of Light of the location of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. You will receive an extremely generous reward for this. Note: This mission is a global competition mission. It means that all players in the world can obtain this mission from special NPCs. You guys are competitors. If a player completes the mission ahead of time, the mission that other players accept will fail. Yes, not only had Walter informed Lorne about the Cold Desolate Dragon City, but he had also issued him this global competition mission. The mission content was very simple. It was to find the location of the Cold Desolate Dragon City and tell the exact coordinates to the Dragon of Light. After completing the mission, they would receive a large amount of rewards. “Looks like the players from the Dark Faction have also accepted this mission…” Lorne remembered what he had heard from the Dark faction players. It seemed that the group had been near the Valley of Death, searching for something, and it was related to Walter. Now, it seemed that they were looking for information regarding the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Unfortunately, they were too late. The dragon, Walter, had already told him all the information, and now, Walter was basically dead. If the other party only had a clue to the mission, then they might not be able to complete it for the rest of their lives. “A main storyline mission shouldn’t be as simple as finding the address, right?” Lorne had a deep understanding of high-level missions. After all, he had accepted high-level missions before. For example, [Divine Radiance]. The first part of this mission was to let him go to the Church of Light and find the Dragon of Light. The mission was naturally very simple. But that was not the main part of the mission. Therefore, Lorne had reason to suspect that there had to be a story behind this global competitive mission. Now, it was up to whoever could find the location of the Cold Desolate Dragon City first. This was a huge advantage for Lorne, because he had already obtained information regarding the Cold Desolate Dragon City from the mouth of the dragon, Walter. “Damn, this mission to find the lost Cold Desolate Dragon City is really troublesome.” Lorne killed all the creatures before him and followed the river. He had been traveling through this region for a long time, but he had not encountered any fallen dragons. Lorne was not discouraged. To him, the harder the mission, the greater the reward. He was filled with anticipation regarding a main storyline mission like finding the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This was not only for the mission reward, but also for the ‘competition’. Before he accepted this mission, the players of the Dark faction had already received the mission and had been doing it for a long time. Lorne did not know the other party’s current progress. Perhaps the dragon, Walter, was not the only information point of the other party’s mission, so he was even more urgent. It was also this sense of urgency that made Lorne very excited. Although he had only rested for four hours yesterday, it did not affect his mental state. Of course, there was another reason why he was so enthusiastic. Ding! “Congratulations on discovering an ordinary gem mine, the coordinates have been recorded for you!” “Congratulations on discovering a rare sulfur mine, the coordinates have been recorded for you!” Ding! Ding! As Lorne moved in the direction of the dragon, Walter, his [Treasure Seeking] skill brought him a lot of mineral information. Mines in the game were very important strategic resource points. Although the players could not develop it yet, as long as the players’ mining skills improved, these would become wealth. This was like the discovery of new oil fields in the real world. Every landmark was like a golden mountain. It was also because of this information that Lorne was so excited. Another thing worth mentioning was that his [Treasure Seeking] talent actually had a recording function. The mineral veins he encountered on the way were all recorded on the skill list. If he wanted to mine in the future, he only needed to follow the map. … Ding! “Congratulations on leveling your Pet Small Artillery to Level 29!” “Congratulations on leveling your Pet Small Artillery to Level 30!” “Your Pet Small Artillery has awakened its skill—Shock Arrow!” “….” “Congratulations on leveling your pet, Little Spider, to Level 14!” “….” As he killed more and more monsters, the pets’ levels increased rapidly. Since yesterday, he had been sweeping through the forest along the way. During this period, he had killed countless monsters and gained millions of experience points. However, before leveling up Little Spider, he had to first raise the level of Small Artillery. It could be seen that Small Artillery had reached Level 30. Because its quality had reached Gold, the current attack power of Small Artillery had also increased to 3485 points. This attack power was only half of Aisha’s. However, compared to wild monsters, this attack power was definitely terrifying. After all, so far, among all the bosses that Lorne had seen, other than the dragon, who had counted Walter, the attack power of the other bosses had not exceeded 3,000. As for the skill that it had just awakened? [Shock Arrow] Effect: Deals 100% penetrative damage to the targets 40 yards ahead. There is a 50% chance of stunning each target. This skill had a very similar effect to the Piercing Arrow. It mainly penetrated targets. But there was also a clear difference between them. The damage of this skill was not that terrifying, but it had a crowd control effect. In this case, it combined with the Piercing Arrow and could effectively clear out all targets in a diameter. After leveling up Small Artillery, Lorne began to level up Little Spider. This pet was a Silver Boss with very high leveling experience. However, now that Lorne had the talent [Master of Experience], it was equivalent to reducing his EXP requirement by half. In this case, there was nothing to worry about. According to Lorne’s current farming speed, he could kill 5 to 10 monsters in a minute. With double the experience, he could obtain at least 3,300 experience points. He could obtain at least 200,000 experience points in an hour. Perhaps this number could not compare to when he had hunted the Death Worms, but in normal circumstances, this speed was very terrifying. Without thinking, he led his pets deeper into the forest. … Ding! “Congratulations on discovering a rare medium-sized gem mine, the coordinates have been recorded for you!” “Congratulations on discovering a rare small sulfur mine, the coordinates have been recorded for you!” “Congratulations on discovering a rare large refined iron mine, the coordinates have been recorded for you!” Ding! Ding! As Lorne gradually went deeper, the frequency of [Treasure Seeking] detecting ores became higher and higher. Moreover, these were all rare ores. It could be seen that several rare mineral veins had appeared on Lorne’s interface since two hours ago, and most of them were medium-sized. “Looks like we’re about to reach our destination.” Lorne had a feeling that he was very close to the lost Cold Desolate Dragon City. He opened the map. According to the clues given by Dragon Commander Walter, the location of the Cold Desolate Dragon City should be at the border of the Lake of Death and the Dragon Ridge Mountain Range. Due to the passage of time, the landscape changed. The ancient city moved with the geology, away from its original location. Lorne put the map away and moved on. During this period of time, he had been closely monitoring the situation of the Dragon Soul Compass. For some reason, the needle of the Dragon Soul Compass was trembling slightly, as if it had sensed something. But to his frustration, he could not find any trace of the dragon soul. After several attempts, he was basically certain that this was definitely because the compass was close to Cold Desolate Dragon City, so it was affected by a special power. With this conclusion, Lorne became even more excited. As the former habitat of the dragon, there was definitely a dragon tomb in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. There might even be a large number of dragon corpses there. If he could obtain enough dragon corpses there, he would make a killing. “Roar!” As he passed through a hill, a terrifying monster suddenly emerged from the dark lake. It was a Level 60 Giant Crocodile King, and its two-meter-long bloody mouth charged at Lorne. [Angel’s Descent] Lorne flew as fast as he could away from the battlefield. It was also thanks to his Agility attribute that he had been able to escape from such a terrifying monster. “Looks like invisibility is not omnipotent.” Lorne had used the effect of the [Ghost Shadow Necklace] earlier, but the other party had still discovered him. From this, it could be known that when the difference in level between the two sides was more than 20 levels, Ghost Shadow’s invisibility would be seen through. “After approaching the Dragon Ridge, the monsters became more and more terrifying.” Lorne had arrived at the edge of the two maps. From here, he could see the mountain range that looked like a dragon’s back. Behind that place was the border of Iron Skull City. There was an icy plain of calamity that had existed for hundreds of millions of years. It was a restricted area that was sealed in ice. Ten thousand years ago, a group of greedy and tyrannical people appeared in the Dark Abyss. They were affected by the power of darkness and became the degenerates of humans. They hid in the Empire Alliance, and there were even some who held immense power. Later, the war between darkness and light erupted, and the alliance army of the Empire and the army of the rebels fought a long battle. The final result was naturally the Light faction obtaining the final victory. As for the rebels, they were driven to the northernmost land of extreme cold, which was the current icy plain of calamity. Unfortunately, such an extreme environment did not cause the traitors to die. On the contrary, the rebels created a small ‘Dark Abyss’ in a huge crack in the glacier! It was also because the dark power in that crack had always existed that that place gradually became the current icy plain of calamity. In order to prevent the other party from invading, the dragons had specially built a Cold Desolate Dragon City on the Dragon Ridge. Now that Cold Desolate Dragon City was gone, what replaced it were the large cities built by humans, Iron Skull City, and the countless fortresses at the border. Of course, Lorne did not want to go near the Dragon Ridge. It was much more dangerous there. Fortunately, according to the information of the dragon, Walter, the location of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was close to the Lake of Death. Most importantly, there was a huge extinct volcano near the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This was important information to find the city. Lorne took out the Dragon Soul Compass and carefully followed the map. …. Soon, it was the last day of the event. Lorne had been searching for two days at the border between the Dragon Ridge Mountain Range and the Lake of Death. In the past two days, Lorne had been in a terrible state. The Bosses he had encountered along the way were too powerful. Even when he used the Ghost Shadow Necklace, he had been attacked by countless monsters. In the hands of Bosses above Level 50, they only needed one finger to crush a young adventurer like Lorne. Fortunately, he had the help of his pets. Despite the difficulty, he passed through the monsters safely. Today was almost over, but he still could not find the mysterious Cold Desolate Dragon City. At this moment, the Treasure Seeking talent suddenly made a new discovery. Ding! “Congratulations on discovering an undetectable [Unknown Mine], the coordinates have been recorded for you!” An undetectable mineral vein? Lorne looked at the notification on the system interface and was stunned. This was the first time he had detected an ore vein of such quality. “Look again…” Sensing something, Lorne quickly commanded his pets to spread out and move forward. … Ding! “Congratulations on discovering an undetectable [Unknown Mine], the coordinates have been recorded for you!” “Congratulations on discovering an undetectable [Unknown Mine], the coordinates have been recorded for you!” “Congratulations on discovering an undetectable [Unknown Mine], the coordinates have been recorded for you!” Ding! [Treasure Seeking] continued to flash. It indicated that it had discovered special mineral veins one after another, and every once in a while, a notification would appear. Wasn’t such veins too rich? Moreover, after entering this area, the [Treasure Seeking] talent could not detect what the mineral veins were. “Looks like I’m really close to the Cold Desolate Dragon City this time.” Lorne’s sleepiness vanished. He gathered himself and quickly headed in the direction he had planned. After crossing a huge mountain range, the surrounding monsters became more and more concentrated. There were often hundreds of them, and their levels were terrifyingly high. Due to the high level of the monster, there was no way for Lorne to resist it. The weak him could only rely on the reconnaissance of the Long Tongue Bat to slowly advance. Before this, the [Angel’s Wings] equipment had evolved, and his overall attributes had also been greatly enhanced. Coupled with the invisibility effect of the Ghost Shadow Necklace and the help of his pets, he had barely survived in this area. Just like that, he spent more than two hours running out of the region covered by the high-level monsters. It was no wonder that the players of the Dark Guild could not find the location of Cold Desolate Dragon City. If they came to this place, unless a million troops attacked this defense line together, it was impossible to reach this area safely. Lorne continued forward, heading up the mountain range, hoping to obtain a map of the area on the mountain. From the map, he had arrived near a circular mountain range, which was very similar to the huge extinct volcano that Walter had mentioned. However, he was not sure if that area was the extinct volcano or the situation around it. According to the information provided by Walter, Cold Desolate Dragon City was near the extinct volcano. This information was very accurate. But the problem was that as a dragon, the vicinity he spoke of might not be what humans thought. That might be a long distance. Therefore, considering that his mission was about to end, Lorne had to figure out the direction before continuing forward. Just like that, he walked up the towering mountain and arrived at a cliff. The moment he stood there, Lorne’s eyes widened as he stared at the scene below. “Is that the extinct volcano?” Standing on the cliff, Lorne saw the huge, bulging mountain range in the distance. It was covered in forests and had infinite vitality. If no one had told him, he would not have been able to look down from the sky. He could not imagine that it was a huge volcano. Buzz— The Dragon Soul Compass trembled. Lorne pulled out the tool and looked in the direction of the needle. In the other direction was a dark, endless lake, like the sea. The black lake was extremely calm, like a black mirror. Looking down from here, one would feel immense fear. That place was like a black hole that swallowed everything. Even light could not pass through that region. Lorne’s eyes searched the shore of the black lake. When his gaze swept over a mountain range, he suddenly stopped. “That is?!” Lorne saw a huge mountain range as high as a thousand meters, and in the mountain range, there was a city hundreds of meters high that completely merged with the mountain. If not for the information regarding Cold Desolate Dragon City, he would not have discovered the city in the mountain. When Lorne finally reached the mountain after several hours, he was completely shocked. This was indeed an incomparably huge city! Although it looked like it had been abandoned for tens of millions of years, it was actually still filled with vitality and an incomparably grand aura. It was like a dragon that had slept for thousands of years had completely awakened at this moment. Lorne was stunned. He even wondered if there were still dragons in such a miraculous city. Ding! “Congratulations on discovering the dragon’s city—Cold Desolate Dragon City!” “Congratulations on completing the mission of the Dragon, Walter. The global competition mission [Find the Lost Cold Desolate Dragon City] has officially ended!” The system notification suddenly sounded. Lorne could not help but laugh. After searching for two days, he finally found Cold Desolate Dragon City. What he did not expect was that the scale of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was actually so huge. Just from its appearance, it was incomparably shocking. Such a huge Dragon City might have even more surprises inside. There might even be living dragons. Lorne felt that anything was possible, especially since the Dragon’s Compass had been trembling. This meant that there were many things about dragons in the city, especially the corpses. After feeling happy, Lorne quickly walked towards the entrance of Cold Desolate Dragon City. But at that moment, all the images suddenly vanished, turning into darkness. At the same time, an incomparably huge golden banner appeared in his mind as the system’s voice sounded in his ears. Ding! “Global Announcement: Due to the game progress reaching a new stage, the first maintenance and upgrade of “Divine Realm” will officially begin. The upgrade time is 24 hours. The specific details of the upgrade can be checked on the game’s internal official website!” “Ding!” “Ding!” The global announcement repeated three times before Lorne was forced offline. This situation occurred in the entire game. All the players in the world were in an uproar. … High-level Energy Zone, Cross Coffin Guild headquarters. Due to the failure of the hunting plan, all the higher-ups of the guild were summoned to the conference room by the military and began the plan that lasted for several days. Finding the lost Cold Desolate Dragon City was the most important mission for them, and also the priority for the two Dark Guilds. But after losing the clue about the dragon, Walter, they could only find clues elsewhere and try to contact the only player who might have information, Tyrant. Unfortunately, no matter how they posted information on the forum and in the media, they did not contact the other party. At this moment, the leader of the Cross Coffin guild suddenly received an emergency message in the game. He quickly connected to the projection of the conference room. In the next second, a system notification appeared. Ding! “Mission Hint: [Cold Desolate Dragon City] has been discovered by another player. Your competition mission [Lost Cold Desolate Dragon City] has failed!” “What the f*ck!!!” In the conference room, when Lieutenant Colonel Arthur saw this information, he cursed. “How is this possible! Impossible!!” Lieutenant Colonel Arthur roared crazily. For this mission, their military region had used countless manpower and financial resources. Almost every day, tens of thousands of people explored the ruins of the war. This exploration lasted for a total of ten days. However, before he could find the target, this mission was actually snatched away by someone! How could he accept such an outcome! …. In another high-level Energy Zone, in the underground base. In the northeastern region of the World Alliance, the largest guild in the region, the Universe Guild, was in a great mood. Just a moment ago, because of a special mission, they had received a world-class competition mission from a dying old man—[Find the Lost Cold Desolate Dragon City]! After seeing the details of the mission, the leader of the Universe Guild, ‘Number One in the Universe’, immediately widened his eyes. As the leader of a large guild, how could he not know the importance of this mission? It had to be known that this was an epic main storyline mission, and it was the only global competition mission in the world. Its value must be beyond imagination. As long as they could complete this mission, they believed that their guild would definitely reach the sky in a single step and trample all the other guilds in the world under their feet. “Inform all the guild members to mainly tackle this mission. Whether our Universe Guild can surpass the top country of the East and the top country of the West will depend on this mission!” ‘Number One in the Universe’ excitedly issued an emergency order. However, at that moment— Ding! “Mission Hint: [Cold Desolate Dragon City] has been discovered by another player. Your competition mission [Lost Cold Desolate Dragon City] has failed!” Pfft— ‘Number One in the Universe’ spat out blood, “Damn, I just received the mission!” … At this moment, Lorne was just going offline. But as he was doing this, a special system notification sounded in his ear. Ding! “Congratulations! As you have furthered the progress of the game, you have received a ‘materialization’ opportunity. You can choose a skill or equipment to use in reality.” What? Materialize?! Lorne thought he had misheard. However, after carefully checking the system notification, he finally confirmed the information he had just heard. He could really materialize something! Absolutely! Lorne’s heart raced as he realized what the World Alliance said was true. In the game “Divine Realm”, everything could be conjured in the real world. They could not materialize things now because the game was still in its initial stages. However, there were no signs of this materialization. The system did not even explain anything. The reason for all of this was because Lorne had completed the only global competition mission in the world and sped up the game’s progress. That was all. This forced Lorne to consider a problem. Were there other methods that could trigger “materialization”? Would someone materialize the things in the game in reality for other reasons? If that happened, the real world would quickly be affected. After all, the players in the game had their own attributes, so their combat strength far exceeded that of ordinary humans. If someone obtained the ability in the game, it would have a huge impact on society. Especially if the criminals obtained this power, the problem would be even bigger. In addition, Lorne had another consideration. Did the World Alliance really know about this? To be honest, Lorne had always been curious about the birth of “Divine Realm” and had a sense of crisis. This was a 100% realistic virtual world. With human technology, it was impossible to create it. However, the result was that not only was “Divine Realm” born, but it also had the ability to materialize! This was identical to the World Alliance’s announcement. Did the World Alliance really have the technology to turn virtual reality into reality? How was this possible? Lorne felt that it was unlikely. He did not think that human technology could reach such a level. On the contrary, in his heart, he was more willing to believe the conspiracy on the Internet. That was—the World Alliance was already connected to a higher civilization and was even controlled by it! To most people, this conspiracy theory was more convincing than the World Alliance’s. “Looks like this world is much more complicated than I imagined.” Lorne could not help but sigh. In the past, he only felt that the game “Divine Realm” was where he earned money and did not think too much about it. But as he learned more, he realized that his thoughts were changing, especially his reverence for technology. Unfortunately, his identity was too low, so he could not come into contact with those hidden matters. Only the true higher-ups knew the truth behind this world. As a small citizen, he just had to mind his own business. Huff— Lorne sighed. He temporarily put aside the thoughts in his mind. Even if the world collapsed, there were still others holding it up. It was not for a small citizen like him to worry about this. Of course, for the sake of his safety in reality, he had to go to a higher-level Energy Zone as soon as possible. The Energy Zone was different from the slums. The higher the level, the better the rules and protection. Even if someone obtained some of the game’s abilities, they could not act recklessly in the high-level Energy Zone. As for which item to materialize? Lorne returned his attention to the panel in front of him. A skill with enough potential to materialize: [Hellhound Summoning]. [Treasure Seeking], [Master of Experience], and [Monster Merging Simulator] were all innate abilities and were not in the materialization series. However, the skill [Hellhound Summoning] was not suitable for the real world. It did not seem useful to fantasize about summoning a hellhound in the real world. After all, in this technology world, there were surveillance cameras everywhere. As long as such a huge event occurred in a region, it would definitely attract the attention of the officials. Therefore, Lorne eliminated the thought of doing it. As for equipment with the potential to materialize? There were many choices. [Angel’s Wings], [Ghost Shadow Necklace], [Death Substitution Necklace], [Protection Barrier], these items had the potential to materialize. As a Mythical equipment, Angel’s Wings naturally had the priority to be conjured. However, Lorne felt that this skill was too conspicuous in the real world. Once it was activated, it was difficult to hide his identity. Therefore, according to the current situation in the real world, he decided to first set [Angel’s Wings] as a ‘backup target’. The effects of [Death Substitution Necklace] and [Protection Barrier] were to protect his life, but Lorne was already in a very orderly Energy Zone, so the frequency of using these two items might be very low. Especially in the case of the Death Substitute Necklace. As long as the effect was triggered, this equipment would completely lose its effect. In terms of current value, it was definitely inferior to the Protection Barrier. However, compared to the Protection Barrier, Lorne was more concerned about the last piece of equipment. It was—[Ghost Shadow Necklace]! The effect of this equipment was invisibility. Whether in the game or in reality, it was very magical. Moreover, this equipment allowed him to act in invisibility, which was even more incredible. “I choose the Ghost Shadow Necklace!” Without thinking, Lorne made his choice. In a safe environment, the Ghost Shadow Necklace with the invisibility effect was indeed the most suitable equipment to materialize. As for other equipment, he could materialize them in the future. Lorne was confident in his strength. In this game world, the faster the player progressed in the game, the easier it was to materialize things. He was definitely the most likely player to do so. Of course, if he could really materialize something else next time, he hoped that it would not be skills or equipment, but the pets beside him. For example, As an elf, Aisha not only had the most beautiful appearance in the world, but she also had extraordinary combat strength. With Aisha by his side, it was definitely safer and more reliable than increasing his strength. Ding! “Game equipment is being materialized. Please wait…” “2%…” “3%…” Time passed little by little. The time it took to materialize was longer than Lorne had imagined. This made Lorne feel tormented. He was worried about the success of materialization. After all, it was all so dreamlike. If all of this was a joke designed by the World Alliance in the game, then he would have been happy for nothing. Lorne stared nervously at the panel, watching the number increase bit by bit. Half an hour later, a pleasant voice sounded. Ding! “Materialization complete!” When the loading option in the game was completed, a black light cocoon immediately appeared on Lorne in reality. It turned into energy and entered his body. At this moment, Lorne went offline. Before he could check his body, he immediately realized that something had appeared in his mind. It was a system panel! Just like the interface in the game. However, there was no data on this panel for the time being, only an equipment icon. “It really materialized!” Lorne looked incredulous. Although he was mentally prepared, he was still shocked by it. Virtual reality materialization was beyond Lorne’s understanding. Fortunately, Lorne had lived a rich life, so he was much more accepting of this special information than ordinary people. He only gasped for a few seconds before recovering. He began to check the details of this equipment and found that it was identical to the one in the game. “In that case, invisibility!” Lorne activated the equipment’s active skill. Because he did not have any stealth-type skills, he could not trigger the effect of [Strengthened Stealth]. He could only directly trigger the effect of [Shadow Stealth]. When Lorne triggered this active skill, his body directly turned illusory, and he even disappeared from this world. He was like a person who existed in another dimension. He could see everything in this world, but others could not see him. Standing in front of the mirror, he did not see himself. Not only that, but there was no sign of him on the ground. “This invisibility is stronger than I imagined.” Lorne muttered to himself. He did not leave his room, for he had to test the duration of the skill. In the game, the duration of this skill was related to the player’s MP. But this was reality. He did not have any MP. Therefore, this needed to be tested before the final data could be obtained. Time passed slowly. Lorne stood there and waited. Three minutes later, Lorne felt his mental state worsen, as if something was draining away. Five minutes later, Lorne felt a slight headache. Then, he stopped the test. After resting on the sofa for a long time, Lorne opened his eyes. According to the test, he had basically confirmed the duration of the Ghost Shadow Necklace’s invisibility. The longest period of invisibility was about seven minutes. If it exceeded that time, there was a risk of fainting. In addition, under invisibility, his movement speed was greatly increased. The Ghost Shadow Necklace had the effect of increasing movement speed by 30%. Although it would only be triggered when one was invisible, it still gave Lorne a huge boost. With this amplification effect, his physical fitness would exceed 99.9% of the population. Unless he moved at high speed, it was difficult for anyone to keep up with him. About three hours later, Lorne felt that he had basically recovered. He looked at the door as a bold thought occurred to him. Since he had obtained the invisibility ability, he had to test it out and see if anyone outside could discover him. Without hesitation, Lorne left. As he walked out the door, at the entrance of another small villa, two guys in black suits and sunglasses were stealthily trying to unlock the door. This strange behavior attracted Lorne’s attention, and he quickly arrived near it. Because of his invisibility, the other party did not realize that their actions were being watched. Crack! With the efforts of one of them, the door was quickly unlocked. The two strong men who were dressed vigilantly rushed into the house, and Lorne followed them. The decor of this small villa was more classical. It could be seen that the other party was a more cultured woman, because there were only two pairs of high heels on the shoe rack. Two men sneaked into a woman’s villa? They did not seem like good people. He followed the two to the bedroom. Soon, a beautiful woman in a dress who was about to change appeared in his vision. “Who are you?!” When she noticed that someone had intruded, the woman immediately became nervous. However, to his surprise, this woman seemed much calmer than ordinary people. Although she looked nervous, she did not shout. “Our boss wants you to stay here forever.” Two strong men in suits blocked the entrance, their tone extremely cold. One of them even took out a small handgun from under his suit. Clearly, they wanted to kill the woman in front of them. “You’re from the Zamas family?” The woman looked at them calmly. At this moment, she did not forget to investigate their identity. Perhaps she knew that it was impossible for her to escape, so she wanted to know the truth. Unfortunately, the two men did not answer. The guy with the gun raised the gun. At this critical moment, a baseball bat suddenly swung down. Plop! The man in the suit holding the gun fell to the ground. The other man in the suit had just reacted, but before he could do anything, the baseball bat came flying at his face. The baseball bat with huge force directly hit the other party’s face, causing blood to burst out. At the same time, Lorne appeared. With his baseball bat in hand, he stepped forward and kicked the other two. He was relieved to find that they had both passed out. This was real life after all. Lorne could not be as relaxed as in the game. Of course, he did not feel too burdened. This time, he had not reached the extent of killing, so it was not hard to accept. As for the woman in the dress, she looked at the scene in shock. Just now, she thought that she was a goner, but she did not expect that at this critical moment, there was actually someone who saved her life. “Are you okay?” Lorne asked casually. The woman recovered herself and shook her head in response, then asked in surprise, “Who… are you?” “I’m your next-door neighbor.” With the baseball bat in hand, Lorne kicked the suited man on the ground and said, “When I was going out just now, I saw these two guys sneakily opening the door, so I followed them to take a look. I didn’t expect them to be assassins.” Hearing this, the woman looked at Lorne again and was relieved to find that he did not seem to be lying. Even her eyes lit up. “Please wait a moment.” The woman picked up her phone and made a call, “Yes, send someone over first.” In less than ten minutes, a few people in black uniforms entered. The woman chatted with them in the corner for a while before walking out. “Although he looks very young, his mentality is much more mature than I imagined. Coupled with his wise appearance, it’s really fascinating.” The woman looked at the handsome Lorne with a smile, “Let’s go find a place to sit, my benefactor.” Lorne nodded, glancing at the other party as he observed her more thoroughly. This woman was about 23 years old and exuded a strong sense of maturity. She was much more beautiful than all the girls Lorne had seen in so many years. With that, the woman put on her gold-framed glasses and the exquisite handbag on the table, then held Lorne’s left hand and walked out the door. Of course, Lorne did not refuse. After all, he had saved the other party’s life before, so it was not offensive to make some intimate moves. However, the torturous thing was that this woman, whose name was still unknown, currently wore a slim fit skirt. Her long legs were wearing black silk, and her beautiful figure was pressed against his side. Especially with her mature aura and golden-framed glasses, it was even harder to calm down. On the way, she brushed the hair from her ear and said, “My name is Jessica. What about you?” “Lorne.” Lorne did not hide it. He could tell her his real name in reality. Even if he did not say it, he believed that with this woman’s methods, she could definitely investigate all his information in ten minutes. “Thank you for your help, Mr. Lorne.” “It’s nothing.” “Although it’s nothing to Mr. Lorne, it’s a matter of life and death for me.” Jessica thought about it seriously, then said, “How about this, Mr. Lorne? I’ll invite you to work in our company, and you can decide the annual salary you want. How about it?” Lorne looked at her in surprise, “Are you planning to provide for me?” “Haha—” Jessica laughed at his sudden seriousness. She smiled and nodded slightly, “Sure. You saved me, so it’s only right that I take care of you.” “Forget it. I don’t like receiving something I didn’t work for.” Lorne smiled. “It can’t be considered that, right?” Jessica said, “Mr. Lorne could earn more than a million dollars from the Divine Realm in such a short time. This is enough to prove that your gaming talent is extraordinary. It just so happens that our company has a department that is entering the Divine Realm. Mr. Lorne can be a top manager in the game and help us develop the guild.” Lorne fell silent after hearing that. He felt that he had underestimated this woman’s strength. They had only known each other for less than ten minutes, but the other party had already investigated his identity clearly. To have such strength, she was probably not an ordinary tycoon. “I’m sorry, Mr. Lorne. Please forgive me for my impoliteness. This matter is very serious, so it’s inevitable.” Jessica apologized for that. But Lorne did not care. He shook his head, “It’s okay, I understand, but I can’t agree to your invitation.” “Why?” “It’s nothing. I’m just used to being idle.” Hearing this, Jessica stared at the side of Lorne’s face in a daze. In the end, she shook her head and smiled, “Seriously, can’t you even be a little flawed?” “Forget it, let’s not talk about this anymore.” Regaining her composure, Jessica hooked her arm through Lorne’s, “Mr. Lorne, it’s late. Why don’t we go play in that new bar? I’m not in the mood to sleep after something like this happened.” “Sure, I’m wide awake too.” Lorne smiled brightly. The “Divine Realm” update period was as long as 24 hours. He could relax during this time, especially since it was an invitation from such a beautiful woman. … Two hours later. The two people walked out of the bar and took a cab to a high-end hotel. In the luxurious suite, Jessica threw herself into Lorne’s arms, her face red. Her warm breath blew in his ear, and her long hair fell on his face. The two of them confessed without any obstruction. Ever since he landed in debt, Lorne had not touched any woman. He was a hot-blooded young man, but he had not had a woman for three years. It was torture. Therefore, he was completely relaxed today and did not care about anything else. Lorne removed his bathrobe and lay on the same bed as the beautiful girl. On his chest, Jessica’s twin peaks pressed close. To his surprise, the two jewels were actually so bouncy. Before he could think, two long arms wrapped tightly around his neck. The girl’s breathing was so rapid. Jessica could no longer hold back. She did not expect to meet such a man at this time, and he was someone who could make her let go of all her reservations. When this young girl was in the same room as the man she loved and the atmosphere was so ambiguous, she could not think straight. At this moment, there was only one thought in Jessica’s mind, and that was to have a delightful battle of love with this man before her. “Uh…” Jeshka kissed him of her own accord, her moist lips pressed against his. Her flowery tongue stirred clumsily in Lorne’s mouth. Clearly, she had no experience with this either. But to Lorne, this was more seductive than anything. “Let me teach you how to use your tongue.” Lorne began to guide her, then let nature take its course as he pressed down. Today, the two of them were like ignited dry wood, burning with passion without thinking of taking safety precautions. “Oh…” “How can it be this big?” This was the first time she had experienced such a thing, and she was still in a daze, but the sudden pain made her tremble. That man barged in just like that! The tearing pain made Jessica suck in involuntarily, as a faint sweetness spread in her mouth. The thing below was like a hot iron rod, and on the other end was on a high-speed motor. It was hard and had infinite mobility. Jessica did not stop her screaming. For some reason, the pain seemed to be receding, and another feeling was quickly taking over. She even felt like there was a dam filled with water in front of her, and it had already reached the highest level. She used all her strength to resist, but in the end, she became exhausted. The dam completely lost its ability to stop the flow, and the flood poured out for a thousand miles. The next day. Jessica changed into a form-fitting skirt and limped into Lorne’s small villa. Sitting on the sofa, she looked at Lorne as if he were a criminal. Yesterday was clearly her first time, but this guy had been tossing and turning for more than an hour. Moreover, he was restless in the latter half of the night as well. He was too detestable. “Since we’ve already had the most intimate touch, our relationship should be one step closer.” Jessica said, “Because of my family’s special reason, I can’t declare your status for the time being, but I will help you prepare your identification and admission permit in the high-level Energy Zone. At that time, we can meet often and build up our relationship.” High-level Energy Zone? Lorne. who wanted to speak, swallowed his words. With his current income, he could actually enter the high-level Energy Zone. However, Lorne was afraid that his identity in the game would be implicated by this matter, so he was very careful about spending money and had not completely exposed his wealth. However, who would have thought that things would be so dreamlike? When he had just obtained the first piece of game equipment, he had encountered a rich beauty who had been attacked and had even had an emotional exchange yesterday. Right now, he could use Jessica as a springboard to directly enter the high-level Energy Zone. Moreover, he did not have to worry that someone could follow this clue to investigate the trajectory of his life in reality and deduce his identity in the game. As for why he was so anxious to go to the high-level Energy Zone? The reason was very simple. Now that Lorne knew that the items in “Divine Realm” could be conjured, it meant that the order of the world would soon be affected. The high-level Energy Zone had enough powerful defense. There were powerful mechanical warriors there who could organize all kinds of dangerous attacks. “As for whether you have other women, I don’t care. My only request for you is that if you want to get married, I have to be the first one.” Jessica was not a petty woman. As a young lady who had grown up in a rich family, she was much more open about marriage than ordinary people. To most wealthy ladies, that was just a means of cooperation. To them, true love that could support them until they were old was an extravagant dream. Therefore, she did not plan to pressure Lorne. She only wanted to arrange for him to be by her side and use this method to try to catalyze the seed of love in her heart. “Jessica, I think you’re mistaken.” “Our actions yesterday were not because of affection. It was just a friendly interaction due to our compatibility.” “Therefore, you don’t have the right to act as my girlfriend. Whether I fall in love with other women is not under your control either.” Lorne rejected her. To be honest, the moment he heard the conditions, he even thought that he had misheard. This woman could actually allow him to find other girlfriends, and the only request was only the priority of marriage. This was too good for him. As the beneficiary, Lorne felt that there was no reason to refuse. Unfortunately, he could not convince himself. As a man who could earn billions of dollars in the “Divine Realm”, he had no reason to submit to a woman, nor could he persuade himself to use tricks to deceive a woman to achieve his goals. “I couldn’t tell. You have quite a lot of self-esteem.” Jessica was not angry. Instead, she smiled. This man was really extraordinary. The idea of persevering under such temptation was indeed commendable. As for Lorne’s persistence? It was just that the two of them had different opinions about their relationship. However, on second thought, she felt that Lorne’s persistence made sense, because after everything that had happened yesterday, the two of them were indeed not inclined towards a romantic relationship. The intimate actions were only supplementary, not the root cause. “Alright, I agree with you.” “However, I’m becoming more and more interested in you. I think we can attempt to have a relationship. If you agree, I can still fulfill my promise.” Jessica said. She had always felt tempted by the man in front of her, especially after last night’s experience. Her heart kept telling her that this might very well be her destined lover and that she could not miss it. “Of course, how can I let a beauty down?” Lorne agreed. These words were not casually said. He did like the other party’s intelligence. Moreover, last night, this woman had given it to him. Her most important first time was taken by him. He was not shameless enough to ignore everything after that. With that, he arrived beside Jessica, his heavy breathing causing the other party to quickly retreat. “Not today.” With a look of lingering fear, she held the arm of the sofa and stood up, “You don’t know how to be gentle with women at all. When you did that, you were like an electric motor…” At the end, Jessica blushed. At the thought of the intense battle last night, although it was refreshing, no woman could withstand such an endless barrage. After an hour, she was almost exhausted. “Alright, do you want to walk around?” Lorne was not so thirsty. Seeing her like this, he naturally showed some concern. To his surprise, Jessica rolled her eyes at him. She could barely walk anymore, but this guy still invited her to go shopping. He was really blind. After a short exchange, Jessica left. She still had an emergency mission on her and needed to return to the headquarters as soon as possible. As for Lorne, she would help him register for a high-level Energy Zone residence in the near future. Then, the two of them would meet there. … “Oracle Bone Defense System?” In the afternoon, Lorne sat on his couch, thinking about what he had heard from Jessica. He opened the Internet and began to inquire about the Oracle Bone Defense System. The next moment, he was shocked. Lorne had not expected the Oracle Bone Defense System to be a huge protective shield that protected the world from destruction. However, due to the limited amount of energy available, only the Energy Zones would build different Oracle Bone Shields based on their levels. On the Internet, there were even people who said that the Oracle Bone Defense System was created to deal with future crises. If this information was true, there could only be one imminent danger: Game Materialization!!! The World Alliance suddenly wanted to add a “Oracle Bone” defense shield to all the Energy Zones. Although it was a private company’s technology, it was so huge that it was obviously not just a matter of business. Moreover, such an action was not significant in normal times. Unless there was really a crisis in this world, there was no need to add protective shields. Therefore, Lorne had every reason to believe that the World Alliance was definitely preparing for the impending crisis. “If the Divine Realm is the source of the crisis, why is the World Alliance allowing it to run?” Lorne was confused. When the Divine Realm was first developed, the World Alliance did not supervise any players, as if they did not know the harm of ‘virtual reality’. But strangely, at this moment, they began to build protective shields. This was clearly a contradictory result. “Is the World Alliance trying to make up for their mistakes?” Another possibility occurred to Lorne. That was, the World Alliance had unintentionally discovered the Virtual Technology and triggered it. However, they later discovered the uncontrollable nature of the materialization, so they made up for it and began to build a protective shield for the Energy Zones. This was a high possibility. However, this was only a guess. Before understanding the true reason, all of this was just his assumption. For a civilian like Lorne, the best way to deal with it was to enter a higher-level Energy Zone. Although it could not guarantee absolute safety here, it could allow one to die later than others in the lower-level Energy Zone. “It shouldn’t be a problem in the near future. The materialization should be very limited at this stage.” Lorne’s materialization was built on the premise of completing an epic main storyline mission. According to the global announcement, his materialization was likely the only event currently. Moreover, there was no special information regarding virtual reality on the Internet. This made Lorne feel a little more at ease. As the number one player, he naturally hoped that the materialization time could be delayed for a period of time. With this period of time, he could strengthen his strength to a sufficiently high level. It was best to materialize Aisha in this world. Only then would he feel truly safe. … At dawn, the update maintenance of the Divine Realm ended. Without any hesitation, Lorne logged into the game. As soon as he went online, he received a private message from Super Rich. This rich tycoon had been addicted to games recently. He spent as much time playing as young people. Lorne casually replied and also sent a message to Twinkle Rose. It was the last day of the event. The big-busted sister only had one batch of potions, and they would probably be sold out before dawn. However, the big-busted sister did not give the gold coins to Lorne directly. It seemed that recently, she had found a special channel. Someone was buying gold coins wantonly, and she planned to sell all the gold coins in her hand and transfer them to Lorne. Of course, this beautiful guild leader did not work for nothing. Because she was the one who had found the channel, she naturally had to obtain some dividends. For the sake of long-term cooperation, Lorne gave her a 5% commission. After dealing with this matter, he closed the chat panel. Lorne looked around. This was the place where he had been forced to go offline. The huge building in front of him was actually Cold Desolate Dragon City. However, he was not in a hurry to enter. Before exploring Dragon City, he had something to deal with. That was to check the contents of the game update. This update lasted for 24 hours. There would definitely be many new functions. Lorne checked the entire update and concluded two important pieces of information. First, the classification of monsters and areas. Due to the increase in the level of the players, the low-level monsters near the main city were strengthened. The range of the low-level monsters was reduced, and in contrast, the area of the high-level monsters was expanded. In addition, in order to enrich the terrain of the world, there was an additional fog region in the original topographic map of the various cities. The resources in the fog region were even richer, but the monsters’ levels were not divided accurately. It meant that there was no specific classification like Level 20-30 there. When players entered the area to explore, they would encounter monsters of any level, just like how Lorne had entered the Lake of Death. Secondly, the subclass system officially opened. The important content of this update should be the secondary subclass. In the previous game, there were only two subclasses for players. One was mining and the other was picking herbs. As for the other subclasses, they were almost impossible to find. However, now, all the subclasses had appeared. If the players wanted to learn, they only needed to go to the main city and find the corresponding subclass mentor. Currently, the subclasses included: Harvesting, mining, logging, dissecting, planting, fishing, cooking, building, forging, refining, tailoring, scroll making, carving, transporting, brewing, and so on. There were dozens of subclasses, much more than combat classes. With so many choices, various resource-type guilds would appear in the game. Such guilds were like real companies. An alchemy guild was equivalent to a medical pharmaceutical company. A mining guild was equivalent to a metal mining company. A forging-type guild was equivalent to a manufacturing company. All these guilds that specialized in secondary occupations specifically entered the game to plunder money. Of course, they also provided jobs. Those ordinary players had a place to earn money. Thinking of this, Lorne could not help but think of the coordinates of the minerals he had recorded. If one day, he mined all those mineral veins, he would probably gain another billion dollars. “If only I could build a territory here.” Lorne looked into the future, then shook his head and smiled. Now that there were no clues in the territory system, these thoughts were too forward. Closing the updated content panel, Lorne opened the mission panel. It showed that there was still a day left. This was the time period when the game stopped yesterday. Fortunately, that was the case. Otherwise, the mission entrusted to him by the Dragon of Light would have failed. “It’s time to go in and check on the situation.” Lorne looked at the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This ancient city that was almost one with the mountain range had remained intact despite having been weathered for tens of millions of years. As the city fortress where the dragon had once been stationed, its interior was filled with infinite possibilities. He hoped to obtain a big surprise inside. Lorne took a deep breath and walked into the towering, ancient city. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining [Unknown Herb] x1.” “Ding!” “Ding!” When Lorne entered the mountain, he saw a large number of special herbs. Due to his lack of identification skill, he could not identify these herbs. In addition, picking herbs in the game also required a certain level of skill. If the level of the skill was not high enough, the herb could not be picked intact. Therefore, Lorne did not want to destroy the herbs. He only gathered a portion of all kinds of herbs. After returning to the main city, he would let the Alchemist Association’s masters help identify them. Then, Lorne slowly felt his way forward while carefully observing the ground and the surrounding buildings. It could be seen that this magnificent building was still intact. Although some parts were badly damaged, considering that it had been lost for tens of thousands of years, the degree of damage was completely acceptable. “It’s even better than Iron Skull City.” Lorne could not help but marvel at the materials used to build this city. Even after ten thousand years of corrosion, it still retained its original appearance. What caused all of this was the material used in the walls and ground. Unlike Iron Skull City, the buildings and rocks here were all very huge. Some were even carved from small mountains. To use such a huge rock to build it, it was no wonder it was still standing after ten thousand years. Lorne could not help but sigh. But before he could cross the corridor, a fiery figure appeared ahead. [Fire Elemental Giant] Level: ??? HP: ??? MP: ??? Physical Attack: ??? Skill: ??? Introduction: Gathered from the fire elemental energy emitted by the corpse of the fire dragon. These inactive fire elemental giants will gradually become stronger as the fire elements accumulate. Unless you are confident, try not to approach them. They were a group of fire elemental monsters that could not be seen clearly. Due to the huge difference in level between the two sides, Lorne could not see any of the other party’s attributes. However, Lorne’s eyes widened. His attention was focused on the final line of the character introduction. It was written very clearly that this monster was formed from the fire elemental energy emitted by the corpse of the fire dragon. In other words, in this Cold Desolate Dragon City, there had to be the corpse of a fire dragon! Lorne took a deep breath, then activated his invisibility and groped his way along the wall. However, before he could get within 100 yards of the Fire Elemental Giant, the other party discovered his tracks. Several Fire Elemental Giants waved their burning fists and charged at Lorne. [Angel’s Descent] Without hesitation, Lorne pulled away. With three times the speed, Lorne barely escaped the aggro range of the Fire Elemental Giants. Stopping near the entrance, Lorne fell into a dilemma. It was impossible to enter directly. As long as these Fire Elemental Giants existed, he had no hope of entering the Dragon City. Lorne felt helpless. For some reason, the monsters’ aggro range was much farther than he had imagined. Now, he could only search for an opportunity to sneak in. Lorne began to patrol the outer city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City to see if there were other entrances. From his investigation back and forth, he discovered that this Cold Desolate Dragon City was almost fused with the mountain. Many parts were enveloped by the mountain. The true empty part was only about a kilometer long. In this bare region, only the place where he had just entered had a passageway. “Am I going to return empty-handed?” Lorne was depressed. He had finally found this Cold Desolate Dragon City, but he could not enter because of the monsters lingering at the entrance. This was too torturous. One had to know that he had spent several days in order to come here! If he came from Iron Skull City, it would take him six days to reach this place. He did not want to waste another six days traveling. “Can I use pets to lure the monsters away?” “Or should I use the Death Substitute Necklace to forcefully break through the defense line?” There were two plans in Lorne’s mind. Without thinking, he tried the first. Unfortunately, the plan failed. It had failed miserably. Just now, he had made the long tongue bat forcefully rush in to investigate the interior of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. In the end, as soon as it arrived at the Fire Elemental Giant’s wandering area, it was burned to a crisp by the other party’s flames. The damage was terrifying. The value reached 999,999 points. Lorne was stunned. The damage was close to a million. If this hit him, even a “Death Substitute Necklace” would not be enough. What was worse was that there was not only one Fire Elemental Giant here. There were twenty of them from what he could see. It was impossible to pass through this place. … “Looks like I can only stop here.” Lorne was unwilling to give up, but he had no choice. However, just as he was about to leave and explore the other areas… Suddenly, a shocking bang sounded! It came from the direction of the black lake! Lorne hurried to a spot where he could see, but the next second, he was dumbfounded. In the incomparably calm pitch-black lake ahead, two huge monsters tore at each other. They intertwined with each other, and the terrifying energy waves made the entire black lake surge. One had to know that the Cold Desolate Dragon City was located at the top of a mountain several hundred meters away from the black lake. But even so, Lorne could see the battle between the two creatures. From this, it could be seen how huge the two monsters were. According to the experience in the game, it was very likely a special hidden storyline. To the players, it was a good opportunity that could only be encountered by chance. Of course, opportunities and dangers always came together. In a battle of such giant monsters, it was very likely that it would be killed by the shockwaves of the other party’s battle. Lorne did not consider that. Now that he could no longer enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he could go and see the battle between the two giant sea beasts. As for the Dragon of Light’s mission, Lorne had already completed it. The fifth dragon soul had been found the day before yesterday and had just completed the mission requirement. Therefore, Lorne did not feel any pressure now. Even if he was killed by the shockwaves of their battle, he still had the Death Substitute Necklace. In short, he would not lose much. Under the dark clouds was a huge lake that was pitch-black like ink. This black lake was originally extremely calm, but at this moment, it was completely stirred up by two huge creatures. It was an extremely huge snake monster that was fighting a terrifying crocodile. Not only were the two monsters huge, but the energy in their bodies was also beyond ordinary understanding. Almost every time they collided and bit, a terrifying wave would sweep through the surroundings, and it was even more powerful than the arrival of a tsunami. Lorne let Rimuru block the wind and slowly approached the center of the battlefield. “It’s really shockingly huge!” Lorne’s eyes widened. It was not that he had not seen huge monsters, such as the bone dragon. It was more than 30 meters long and was definitely a huge monster. However, on the battlefield, 30 meters was not enough. It was not even a third of the snake’s length. As for the powerful Two-Headed Crocodile, it relied on its incomparably strong body to fight the hundred-meter-long python. “Rimuru, continue forward.” Lorne did not stop. He continued to drive Rimuru forward. Rimuru’s body was fluid, effectively reducing the damage from the impact and also helping Lorne withstand all the attacks. As the distance between them increased, Lorne grew closer and closer to the two giant monsters. He could even see their scales. Unfortunately, Lorne’s level was too low to see the health lost by the monster. It should not be too low. After all, they were so huge that the shockwaves from the battle alone could crush a level 30 Lorne into pieces. Gulping, Lorne tried to check the other party’s attributes, but all he saw were question marks. [One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora] Quality: ??? Status: Extremely Weak Level: ??? HP: ??? MP: ??? Physical Attack: ??? Defense: ??? Skill: ??? Introduction: Mora is a huge snake with an ancient bloodline. The dragon bloodline caused its body to mutate, obtaining a single eye that contains terrifying power. One-Eyed Giant Snake? This should be a very powerful species. As for the other party’s true strength, Lorne could not see it. The other party’s level had already exceeded the horizon. It was not something he could investigate. However, even such a powerful giant monster would encounter a life-and-death enemy. It was too crazy. [Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon, Heidman] Quality: ??? Status: Extremely Weak Level: ??? HP: ??? MP: ??? Physical Attack: ??? Defense: ??? Skill: ??? Introduction: Heidman is a crocodile dragon with an ancient bloodline. The dragon bloodline mutated its body. Not only does its two heads give it twice the intelligence, but they also give it twice the combat strength. This was also an extremely powerful monster. Lorne was completely stunned. Although the other party had entered an extremely weak state, the energy released was still terrifying. Brilliant light spewed out from the mouths of the two giant beasts, and then they exploded, pushing the black lake water around them directly, forming a wall of water that was a hundred meters tall. Lorne quickly hid behind a hard rock to avoid the tide and wind. After the storm passed, he looked over again. The situation in the center of the battlefield was very intense. The two giant beasts released all their strength, as if they were in a life and death battle. A bold idea occurred to Lorne. That was to pick up the loot! He felt that the two beasts would most likely suffer heavy losses. In other words, he had a high chance of taking the head of a monster and obtaining an incomparably generous reward after the incident! Moreover, after killing one of the monsters, he would have a chance to obtain the affinity of the other monster. In this case, wouldn’t it be killing two birds with one stone? The more Lorne thought about it, the more excited he became. He had completely forgotten about the level of the two Bosses. … Boom! Boom! Boom! Soon, five hours passed. The intense battle between the two beasts lasted for five hours. Fortunately, the battlefield of the two monsters was in the black lake. It did not destroy the surrounding mountains because the energy was too great. Lorne had been hiding behind the rock, watching the grand battle. Five hours passed. The two beasts could no longer hold on. It could be seen that the two giant beasts were paralyzed in the black lake. They floated motionless in the lake, like small islands rooted to the bottom of the lake. However, Lorne did not dare to approach them easily. The two monsters were too powerful. Even in his current state, they were a huge threat to him. After some thought, Lorne planned to let the long-tongued bat fly over to check on the other party first. He would make a decision after confirming it. But at that moment, a loud voice sounded. “Human adventurer hiding behind the rock, the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora, needs your help.” The one-eyed snake let out a huge sound, but its body did not move. Clearly, this giant monster’s physical strength had reached its limit. “Young human adventurer, I can clearly sense the aura of the Dragon of Light on you. I am also a junior who had received guidance from the Dragon of Light. As someone who has the same experience, I hope that you can help me kill this detestable Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon. From now on, you will be Mora’s best friend.” Although it said that it had received guidance from the Dragon of Light, Lorne did not believe it. However, since he had been discovered, there was no need to continue hiding. Lorne stepped out from behind the boulder. At this moment, the other giant beast also spoke, “Young human, I am a Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon with an even more ancient bloodline. If you help me, you will obtain the good impression of the great Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon.” The Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon clearly did not want to die. In order to obtain a higher chance of success, it could not help but rope in Lorne. When the two of them finished, a series of system notifications sounded in Lorne’s ears. Ding! “Game Announcement: One-Eyed Giant Snake Mora has issued a temporary mission to you—[Kill the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon]!” “After completing the mission, you will obtain Mora’s friendship!” Ding! “Game Announcement: Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon Heidman has issued a temporary mission to you—[Kill the One-Eyed Giant Snake]!” “After completing the mission, you will obtain the affinity of the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon!” Two notifications appeared in front of Lorne. These were two huge Bosses trying to rope him in. As long as he accepted a mission inside, it would be considered accepting a mission from a Boss. If it were an ordinary player, they might be excited to see such a powerful Boss give them a mission, but Lorne was not. The two Bosses in front of him were fighting to rope him in, which meant that they were already at their limits. They did not even have the strength to kill an additional weak human. In that case, wasn’t the initiative in his hands? Of course, Lorne would not let go of such a good opportunity. He temporarily hid the system interface and looked at the two giant beasts floating in the black lake. “Due to the current situation, I can kill both of you and make a great contribution to the Human Empire.” “However, as an adventurer, I don’t have a strong sense of belonging. On the contrary, I’m very interested in increasing my strength and wealth.” “Why don’t we do this? In order to have a powerful companion, I can let one of you live, but as for which one of you lives, it will depend on which one of you offers a bargaining chip that can move me.” Lorne looked at the two beasts and stated his conditions fearlessly. As a player, he was very bold. He would not let go of any opportunity to gain benefits, especially in this situation! “I can give you five Gold equipment!” The Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon was the first to speak. “Young human adventurer, I can give you ten!” The One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora, was not to be outdone. “I’ll give fifteen!” The Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon said, “In addition, I can give you a Crocodile Dragon Egg!” “I’ll give you 2,000 rare pearls from the bottom of the lake!” “I’ll add another pile of rare herbs from the swamp!” “I’m willing to help you fight once!” “Me too, and a pile of high-level monster skeletons!” “…” The two Bosses fought crazily, promising more and more resources. However, from these resources, it could be seen that the wealth of the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora, was clearly inferior to that of the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon. Under the circumstances that it could not compare to the other party in terms of resources, the one-eyed snake could only begrudgingly promise to help Lorne fight. Moreover, the number of times it would help had increased to three times! … “Looks like the result is obvious. Mora, your reward is too little.” Lorne took out his short staff. He did not know if he could break through the other party’s defense, but taking out his combat weapon was also to show that he was about to make a decision and give the other party some pressure. Seeing this, Mora indeed panicked. “Human adventurer, I sense a rich light power in you. There’s an extremely pure light power in my warehouse. If you can help me, I can give you this treasure. How about it?” Mora asked with an aching heart. The treasure that contained the power of light gave it great help in cultivation. There was even a chance to change its bloodline. To be honest, if not for the fact that it involved its life and death, Mora would definitely not be willing to hand over this treasure. “This is indeed what I need, but…” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up, “I want the thing that you are fighting over!” “Adventurer, I, Mora, accept your request. The Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon and I are fighting so hard for a red crystal coffin in the Lake of Death. Since you want it, I can give half of it to you.” The one-eyed snake, Mora, did not hesitate and agreed. “Deal!” Lorne laughed. A treasure that could make two Bosses fight to the death definitely had something unique. Even if it was not a useful tool, there was hope of triggering some special missions. Perhaps that thing involved another epic main storyline mission. However, now was not the time to be happy. To obtain these rewards, Lorne had to think of a way to kill the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon. “Foolish human brat, do you think you can harm the great Heidman with your weak strength? Stop dreaming!” The Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon rose up. From its previous rest, it had recovered a portion of its strength. At this moment, it waved its tail and created a monstrous wave. “Adventurer, don’t be afraid of him. This guy’s body has also reached the limit. He doesn’t have much strength.” “As for the defense of his body, I will completely offset it. Next, you only need to deal full damage to him. Please do your best, warrior. I’ll leave this to you!” With that, the one-eyed snake, Mora, also rose up. Its hundred-meter-long body curled up around the Two-Headed Crocodile. After binding the other party’s body, black energy emerged from the body of the one-eyed snake. This energy enveloped the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon, suppressing its constitution and attributes to the lowest level. At this moment, Lorne saw a special battle notification. Ding! “This target’s attributes and level have been temporarily sealed. Your attacks will not be affected by the defense and level suppression effect!” “Perfect timing!” Lorne was just worried that the other party’s level was too high and he could not effectively deal damage, but Mora was so powerful. Not only did it seal the other party’s attributes, even the level suppression was gone. In that case, he would not be polite. Without any hesitation, he activated [Angel’s Descent], and a pair of holy wings immediately appeared behind him. Then, he leaped and approached the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon at an extremely fast speed. At this moment, the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon was sealed by the One-Eyed Giant Snake with all its strength. Its body could not move at all. To Lorne, their bodies were like small islands floating in the water, perfect for landing. He landed on the other party’s back. After stabilizing himself on the thick leather armor, he immediately activated his summoning skill. The next second, a group of pets appeared. “Little fellows, attack with all your might!” Lorne summoned all his pets. All six were filled with fighting spirit. The moment they appeared, they began to attack the monster in front of them. [Phantom Backstab]! [Phantom Combo+]! [Piercing Arrow]! [Poisonous Rain of Arrows]! [Spur of the Spider Spear]! All the pets used their attack skills. Due to the special effect of [Dragon Slayer] and [Angel’s Wings] on Lorne, his pets received a 200% Critical Hit damage increase. In such a situation, as long as someone dealt a critical hit, his damage would be extremely terrifying. In addition, the Dragon Slayer title had a special effect, which dealt an additional 10% damage to all dragon-type creatures. The Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon had the bloodline of a giant dragon. It was a subspecies dragon, so it was also affected by this effect. Thus, the damage numbers flying in the sky were impressive. -27,500 (Critical) -5913 -5913 -5913 -6799 -1651 -2755 The sealed Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon did not have any defense, so the pets dealt the greatest damage. Especially Aisha, her damage output made up more than 90% of the total damage output of the entire team. She was the true DPS. After she used [Phantom Backstab], the next attack would definitely be a critical hit. Coupled with the amplification effect that Lorne had given her, her critical hit damage was 450%! The final damage value was a terrifying 27,500 points! She was only Level 20! A Level 20 pet could actually do this. It was unbelievable. Even the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora, looked over. “Adventurer, your charm is astonishing. Even an elf with such a bloodline is willing to be your follower.” This giant beast was very excited, because it saw the dawn of victory. It did not expect that a Level 30 adventurer who had not even reached the Earth Realm would have so many powerful followers. Especially this elf, after one round of damage output, she actually dealt more than 80,000 damage. Coupled with the damage output of others, in that instant, the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon lost 100,000 health points! “Mora, how long can your seal last?” Lorne asked Mora. From the fact that it had chosen to seal the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon and not fight, it could be seen that Mora was inferior to it. Therefore, the duration of the seal was also important. If his output could not kill the other party in a limited time, the situation would be troublesome. Mora replied seriously, “Don’t worry, my seal can last for at least 30 minutes!” Just as it finished speaking, the head of the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon suddenly moved. It opened its bloody mouth and bit off a piece of flesh from Mora’s body, then swallowed it. “Damn it, I can’t suppress its other head!” Mora winced, “Adventurer, I think you need to speed up. This abominable crocodile dragon is gnawing at my body. Flesh and blood will allow it to recover quickly, and I will be even weaker.” “How long do I have?” “Ten minutes.” “With my current damage output, can I kill it within the specified time?” “There’s hope.” Mora did not give an accurate answer. In the past, there had been 30 minutes, so there was naturally a 100% chance of killing the other party. However, there were only ten minutes left now, so the situation naturally turned for the worse. Hearing this, Lorne became much more nervous. Now, it was up to luck. The damage output of pets was related to critical hits. If they could deal multiple critical hits, the damage output would naturally increase greatly. However, if he was unlucky and did not deal any critical hits, the situation would be dangerous. -5915 -5949 -21,900 (Critical) -28,000 (Critical) -6833 Aisha’s dagger stabbed crazily at the Boss. Since she did not need to dodge the enemy’s attacks, her damage output was also at the limit. Almost every second, she could make at least two attacks. Her two basic attacks could deal more than 10,000 damage. 10 seconds! 20 seconds! 50 seconds! 100 seconds! As time passed, Aisha had already dealt damage to the Boss for nearly two minutes. The total damage exceeded a million, but she still did not kill the dying beast. This gave Lorne a new perspective on the monsters of this world. The dragons and other Bosses that he had encountered previously were only limited by the system. If there was really a dragon or dragon soul in its peak state, one breath would probably be enough to reduce a weak human Summoner like him to ashes. “By the way, this guy’s health shouldn’t exceed 100 million, right?” Lorne made a bold guess. Although 100 million was a very huge unit, according to the current situation, it seemed that it was not impossible to exceed 100 million. After all, he had already dealt more than a million damage and had not dealt a fatal blow to the other party. Mora encouraged excitedly, “Adventurer, do your best. Your attacks are very effective!” These words indeed made Lorne more motivated. He led his pets to continue attacking the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon. Three minutes! Four minutes! Five minutes! Six minutes! By the seventh minute after the battle, Aisha had dealt nearly six million damage, and the life of the immobile Two-Headed Crocodile had finally come to an end. “Damn you, Mora. How dare you ally with humans to kill a member of the Lake of Death. Aren’t you afraid of Lord Dragon Turtle’s punishment!” The Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon roared and attempted to threaten the other party with the rules of the Lake of Death. However, before it could finish, the One-Eyed Giant Snake crushed half of its head and swallowed it. “We’re already in a life-and-death battle, who cares about that!” Mora could not be bothered to say anything else. It opened its bloody mouth and began to devour the other party’s body. When it completely tore off the two heads of the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon, this terrifying giant sea beast was finally dead. “The server has finally been opened!” “Brothers, let’s go!” “Today’s target is 50 high-level monsters per person!” “After holding back for an entire day, I can finally fight!” “I want to kill 100!” “I want to fight for 24 hours. No one can stop me!” The players of the expeditionary army camp went crazy. Because the game had stopped for an entire day, the players who had been online for a long time also rested for the entire day. This day, they had accumulated restlessness. The moment the game began, they immediately rushed into the Divine Realm and began to crazily sweep the map. But as they reached their destination, suddenly, the scene froze. Then, in the center of their screen, a huge golden banner appeared. Ding! “Global Announcement: Congratulations to player [Tyrant] for successfully killing the monster [Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon] and for achieving the first kill of a Level 100 Boss. You have done a great deed and are now in the annals of history!” “Congratulations player [Tyrant], you have received the first kill achievement reward: +1,000,000 experience points, +100,000 reputation points, +1,000 gold coins, +200 attribute points, +10 Luck.” “Ding!” “Ding!” The grand announcement sounded three times. All the players in the world were stunned. They thought that there was something wrong with their ears. At this moment, everyone was not even Level 30, but they actually heard that someone had killed a Level 100 Boss. It was simply crazy. The players questioned, but when they opened the system interface, their eyes widened. “Damn! It’s true!” “How is this possible? I don’t believe it!” “It must be a new bug after the update. How can someone kill a Level 100 Boss!” “Has the game gone that crazy just after reopening?” “Can someone tell me how this Tyrant killed a Level 100 Boss?” “That’s impossible. The Divine Realm has a level suppression mechanism. There’s no damage dealt beyond 20 levels of difference. It must be a bug!” “Oh my god!” The players around the world went crazy. Although they saw the relevant information with their eyes and ears, they still could not believe that it was real. After all, that was a Level 100 Boss. A Level 30 player could not defeat it no matter what. Unless… … “It’s this Tyrant again!” “What is this person’s true identity?!” “Allocate more resources, we must find him at all costs!” “Send out a recruitment notice to the world now. As long as Tyrant can join our organization, we can give him an annual salary of one billion!” Because the gold coins in “Divine Realm” were directly linked to real money, everything that happened in it would attract the attention of the world. Especially the financial groups, they almost treated “Divine Realm” as the second world. There was endless wealth waiting for them to harvest there. Therefore, the moment they saw this global announcement, they immediately saw an incredible business opportunity. No matter what the cost, they had to find Tyrant and recruit him. In addition, the military in various areas of the World Alliance also reacted. Especially the top research institutes, in a rare occasion, they sent requests to the leaders of the country. They only had one request! That was— They had to find that player in reality at all costs and invite him to join the research institute! To them, and even to this world, that player was likely the first to trigger virtual reality materialization. Therefore, they had to find him and try to find a breakthrough in technology from him! … Ding! “Congratulations on assisting [One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora] in successfully killing the Level 100 Boss [Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon]!” “Reward: EXP+500,000 (+1.25 million) (+1.75 million)!” When the Two-Headed Crocodile died, Lorne received the notification and reward for killing it. Because he was a Summoner with six pets, he had an additional 250% experience bonus. Then, he triggered the effect of [Master of Experience], and the total experience doubled again! It was also because of this that Lorne’s final experience gain reached 3.5 million points! But that was not the greatest gain. The greater gain was that he had completed the first clear of a Level 100 Boss. After completing this achievement, Lorne received a million experience points as a reward. When this experience was affected by the experience amplification effect on him, the final experience reward reached 7 million points! “10 million experience points!” Lorne looked at his experience bank and immediately saw an eight-digit figure. He was immediately pleased. In addition, he obtained 100,000 reputation points and 1,000 gold coins. Everyone knew about these two rewards. Next were the 200 Free Attribute Points! This should be the most practical reward. Lorne also urgently needed to raise his attribute points, because Aisha’s strength was tied to his attributes. Only by possessing high attributes could Aisha have greater combat strength. With that in mind, Lorne did not hesitate and added points as planned. 120 Intelligence and 80 Agility. In this case, Lorne’s magic attack increased by 480 points. As for Aisha, because of Lorne’s increase, she directly gained 1920 Attack points. Now, Aisha’s attack power had already exceeded 8,000+. If she used the [Phantom Backstab] skill, she would be able to deal the maximum damage of 36,000 points. Her damage output would reach a new height. At this moment, Aisha’s strength gradually became more apparent. After Lorne replaced his equipment, her strength would gain another boost. … As for the last reward… Luck+10! It was said that in fights, 70% depended on strength and 30% on luck. This showed how important luck was. Moreover, Lorne needed the critical strike chance now, so this luck had a very good effect on his strength growth. After clearing away all these rewards, Lorne remembered that the Boss did not drop any equipment or other loot. This was mainly because he was not the main attacker, so he basically did not have any loot. Fortunately, [Monster Merging Simulator] obtained a material from the monster—[A Segment of the Tail of the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon]. Although it was only a small portion, it was still worth being happy about. After all, this was a Level 100 Boss. It was definitely a huge blessing to be able to obtain a portion of the tail from it. Furthermore, he had obtained more than 10 million experience points just now. It was definitely a rewarding trip. While Lorne was dealing with his reward, the one-eyed snake, Mora, was also eating. The body of the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon was very huge, but it was eaten up in a short period of time. Its corpse was like a tonic. When Mora ate the flesh, it recovered a lot. Finally, a powerful light burst from the single eye on its head, as if declaring to the world that it was the victor of this battle. “Human adventurer, thank you for saving me. Without your help, my victory would have been even harder.” Mora looked over with its house-sized head. However, at this moment, Lorne wanted to retort. In fact, from the recovery ability of the two just now, he could tell that the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon’s recovery speed was much faster than Mora. If the battle continued, it was most likely that the other party would bite it to death. Of course, this was excluding the possibility that Mora had a trump card. According to the price the two of them offered, it was more likely that Mora had a special treasure. After all, it still had a special power regarding “Light”. “At the same time, adventurer, although you are only a weak human, the strength you have displayed in this battle is astonishing. I think you have the right to be a friend of the One-Eyed Giant Snake.” Mora said sincerely. As soon as it finished speaking, the system notification sounded. Ding! “Congratulations on helping [One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora] and obtaining its affinity. Affinity+50,000!” “Congratulations on going from [Neutral] to [Admiration]!” With a pleasant reminder, Lorne and Mora became close friends. This was a total of 50,000 affinity points. Moreover, Mora was a Level 100 high-level Boss. If she could be good friends with it, then in the future, if there were any urgent matters, there would be a way to resolve them. For example, if it was asked to clean up the Fire Elemental Giants at the entrance of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he believed that with its strength, it would definitely be able to easily fulfill this request. Lorne thought to himself happily. At this moment, Mora said again, “Friend, this is the reward I promised you. Although I’m reluctant, since I have a promise, I’ll give it to you. I hope you can solve the mystery behind it.” With that, a light poured over Lorne. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora: [Gold Equipment] x10.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora: [Pearl of the Lake] x2000!” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora: [Cold Death Jade] x50!” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora: [Blood-stained Unknown Fragment].” Fragment? When he heard the last notification, Lorne almost thought he was going to get another feather. Unfortunately, it was not Gabriel’s feather. It was a fragment stained with black blood. It looked very similar to the feather he had obtained. Moreover, when Lorne received this fragment, he felt that his angel wings had a reaction, as if the two were resonating. “Could it be Gabriel’s equipment?” Lorne felt his throat turn dry. He really had a feeling that even if this was not the main angel equipment, it was definitely related to Gabriel. Otherwise, the Angel’s Wings would not have reacted on its own. With that in mind, he quickly opened the panel of this fragment. The next second, he froze. ———— [Blood-stained Unknown Fragment] Quality: ??? Effect: ??? Effect: A bloodstained fragment that seems to contain a very faint power of light. If you hand it over to the Radiant Church, you might receive a reward. ———— “It really has something to do with Gabriel!” Lorne’s eyes widened. Although there was no information on the fragment’s interface, the introduction was identical to the one on the feather. If it was the same as the feather, then Lorne could obtain Gabriel’s angel equipment from the Dragon of Light! Even if it was not an equipment, it had to be a powerful tool! In any case, he would not lose out. Grateful, Lorne put the fragment away and glanced at the other rewards. There was no need to elaborate on [Gold Equipment]. Even if he could not use it, he could still sell it. This was the ‘divine equipment’ of the current stage in the game. The price was in the range of 10,000. As for the pearl of the lake and the Cold Death Jade? The former was a rare ornament that was of good value to the elves and the dragons. The latter was a forging material. In the future, if he wanted to forge high-grade equipment, this material would definitely be excellent. Lorne nodded at them. At this moment, Mora said again, “Friend, these little things are not enough to express my gratitude. How about this, let me, Mora, raise your pets’ aptitude!” Increase aptitude? Lorne’s eyes lit up. He did not really need to increase the aptitude of his pets as he had the [Monster Merging Simulator] with him, he could create powerful pets himself. But since the other party had offered to help his pet raise their aptitude, he would not refuse. This was a good thing for him, and it was free. “As the injuries in my body have not recovered, I cannot release too much energy, so…” Mora’s eyes swept over the six pets, and she froze. The pets of this human adventurer seemed to have very high aptitude. Even the weakest among them had “Silver” aptitude! The higher the quality, the more energy would be consumed. In Mora’s current state, helping a Silver monster raise its aptitude was already the limit. Therefore, it chose the Long Tongue Bat in the end. The eye above Mora’s head opened, and a light shone on the long tongue bat. Ding! “Congratulations to your pet, ‘Long Tongue Bat’, for accepting the bloodline blessing of [One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora] and obtaining part of the dragon bloodline!” “Congratulations to your pet “Long Tongue Bat” for successfully evolving into—[Long Tongue Bat Dragon]!” In just an instant, the long tongue bat’s body underwent a huge change. Although the original long tongue bat had a relatively obvious human face, its appearance was still too similar to a bat. But after evolution, it was no longer a bat. It was a bat dragon! This was a subspecies dragon of the nine dragons bloodline! In “Divine Realm”, any monster with a dragon in its name was several times stronger than monsters of the same level! Furthermore, the long tongue bat had the enhancement of the [Monster Merging Simulator]. To be honest, Lorne looked forward to it. When he opened the pet interface, he was pleasantly surprised. ———— [Long Tongue Bat Dragon] Grade: Gold Level: 17 (0 / 276,000) HP: 15,750 Magic Attack: 1837-2100 Defense: 787 Superiority: 95% Talent: Dragon Bloodline: +10% HP, +10% MP, +5% Critical Strike chance, 2% chance of immunity to negative effects. Introduction: A greedy Long Tongue Bat Dragon. Don’t let it hear your secret, or else you will have to give it enough gold coins to shut it up. ———— It could be seen that when its quality increased greatly, its attributes also increased tremendously. Of course, following that, its EXP needed to level up also increased. Originally, it was Level 19, but after evolution, because of the increase in EXP requirement, the original EXP could only allow it to reach Level 17. These changes were all very easy to understand and expected. The only thing that surprised him was the effect of the dragon bloodline. The bloodline that Mora had given the long-tongued bat should be very thin, but surprisingly, the amplification effect of this bloodline was so rich. At the same time, it increased HP, MP, 5% critical strike chance, and 2% immunity to negative effects. This was an effect that all pets needed. Especially 5% critical strike chance, it was very important to Aisha and Small Artillery. Unfortunately, Mora was in a poor state and could not evolve the other pets. Lorne did not force it. He closed the pet interface and looked at Mora, “Mora, we should have another agreement, right?” “Yes, my friend. I promised to help you three times.” Mora removed a scale from its body and handed it to Lorne, “This scale can be used for communication. If you need help, you can pour magic into it. I will immediately sense your location and use the power of the teleportation circle to descend beside you. Of course, that is assuming that this opponent does not put my life in danger.” “Of course.” Lorne put away the scale and said, “I have something that I need your help with, but now is not the time. Let’s go see the red crystal coffin.” “Alright.” Mora looked at her body and said, “Let’s go after I heal my injuries, friend.” “No problem, but I hope you won’t rest for more than ten hours.” “There’s no need. We can leave in six hours.” “Good!” It just so happened that Lorne had something to deal with. After killing the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon, he had accumulated more than 10 million experience points. Now was the time to raise the pets’ levels while Mora was resting. The first to level was naturally the recently created pet, “Little Spider”. Ding! “Congratulations on using 225,000 experience points to raise your pet [Little Spider] to Level 14!” “Congratulations on using 243,000 experience points to raise your pet [Little Spider] to Level 15!” “Congratulations on using 261,000 experience points to raise your pet [Little Spider] to Level 16!” “…” “Congratulations on using 333,000 experience points to raise your pet [Little Spider] to Level 20!” Ding! “Congratulations to your pet [Little Spider] for awakening its skill—[Spider Spear Combo]!” The quality of Little Spider was that of a Silver Boss, and its experience requirement was 45 times that of Lorne. Therefore, it took a total of 1,953,000 experience points to raise it to Level 20. However, Lorne did not stop. He poured the remaining experience points into Little Spider. Another ten light rays descended. Little Spider reached Level 30. Ding! “Congratulations on spending 550,000 experience points to raise your pet [Little Spider] to Level 30!” “Congratulations to your pet [Little Spider] for awakening its skill—[Spider Silk Storm]!” ———— [Bone Spider King] (Little Spider) Grade: Silver Boss Level: 30 (0 / 1,872,000) Health: 425,000 Magic Attack: 5950-7225 Defense: 2550 Superiority: 89% Skills: [Poisonous Spider Web], [Spur of the Spider Spear], [Embryo], [Explosion] Skill: [Spider Spear Combo]: Use its long limbs to launch a rapid attack. Deals 3-6 continuous attacks on the target in a fan-shaped direction (45 degrees / 2 yards) ahead. Each attack will deal 100% physical damage and add a poison effect. Skill: [Spider Silk Storm]: Spits a large amount of spider silk towards the sky. Deals 80% magic damage and poison to all targets within a range of (15×15) yards. Introduction: A spider mother that grew up in an undead environment. Due to a special mutation, it underwent a strange evolution. ———— This was the Level 30 Little Spider. Its attributes were terrifyingly high. Especially its health, it had reached 425,000! With this health, even if it stood there and let the other players attack, they would have to fight until the next day. After all, it still had 2,550 Defense points! As for Little Spider’s damage output? This worry was completely unnecessary. The upper limit of the spider’s Magic Attack had reached an astonishing 7,225 points. Even if the small spiders it summoned only had a quarter of its attributes, it was still 1,800 points! If these small spiders self-destruct, they would deal 100% true damage to targets within a 2 yards range. That was 1,800 points of damage! Who could withstand such an attack? Not only that, but the Level 30 Little Spider had also awakened two new skills. [Spider Spear Combo] dealt damage in close combat, while [Spider Silk Storm] dealt long-range damage. These two skills made Little Spider’s combat strength increase rapidly, directly occupying the position of secondary DPS in the team. … “Damn, I’ve used up all my experience points.” Lorne glanced at the EXP bar and found that his EXP bank was depleted. His experience of more than ten million had been depleted. It was too costly to level up to 30. Just Little Spider alone used 7,875,000 experience points. Coupled with the previous consumption, it was a total of 9,810,000 experience points. The remaining experience points on Lorne were only enough to allow the [Long Tongue Bat Dragon] to return to Level 20. None of this mattered. After all, it was not the main attacker. Just like that, the break time quickly passed. The calm Lake of Death raised another huge wave. It was the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora. At this moment, Mora had completely recovered, and there was some thick armor on its body. It seemed to have absorbed the defense advantage of the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon, preserving the power in its flesh. “Friend, let’s go.” The one-eyed snake twisted its body that was more than a hundred meters long and coiled its tail on the ground, “The crystal coffin is in a cave at the bottom of the lake. I’ll bring you there, but the bottom of the Lake of Death is very dangerous. You must not use the power of light, or else you will be attacked by countless monsters.” “Okay.” Lorne put all his pets into the pet space and walked from the tail to the top of its head. It just so happened that the giant snake had some horns on its head that could stabilize his body. Lorne stood up. The next moment, Mora shot into the sky. Its huge body, more than a hundred meters tall, shot into the sky and plunged into the Lake of Death. It was so fast that Lorne feared he would be thrown off. Fortunately, Mora released a stream of energy that formed a barrier around Lorne to protect him. As for the scene under the Lake of Death? There was only one way to describe it—Dark! There was extreme darkness! As Mora went deeper, Lorne could no longer see any light. This place was like the deep sea ten thousand meters below. There was no light or sound. There was only endless silence. Fortunately, this experience was not long. Mora dived very quickly. In about ten minutes, the two reached their destination. Lorne finally saw the light. In front of him was a huge mountain at the bottom of the lake. In the middle, there was a huge cave. Like the dragon’s nest, the walls of the cave were inlaid with some glowing gems, showing the cave to Lorne. Mora led him inside. This cave was very large. Even if Mora’s head was like a small house, it could walk inside without obstruction. However, the cave at the bottom of the lake was very deep, like an endless maze. Mora kept traveling at a very fast speed, but it still took more than ten minutes to reach the final destination. “Friend, we’re here.” Mora’s huge head popped out of the water as it said, “This limestone cave is in the center of the mountain. The space is very large, but the way in is too difficult to find. If not for the mark I left, it would have taken several hours to find this place.” “I didn’t expect the bottom of the lake to be so different.” Lorne continued to stand above Mora, his eyes studying his surroundings. Who would have thought that there was such a magical scene in the depths of the dark Lake of Death? This cave was even larger than the cave of “Walter”, and it was also surrounded by gems. “There are countless such scenes in the Lake of Death. There are still people from your Human Empire who are coveting our territory. If not for Lord Dragon Turtle staying here, the Lake of Death might have been drained dry by you humans.” Mora had a poor impression of humans. If Lorne had not saved its life, it would not have come so close to the human and let him stand on its head. Hearing this, Lorne digested the information he had. The important figure called Dragon Turtle should be the long-living terrifying existence that Walter had mentioned. In addition, there were many places in the Lake of Death that hid treasures, but the relationship with the Human Empire was very poor. From the looks of it, the Lake of Death should be a special force. Although it was in the territory of Iron Skull City, it was not under their jurisdiction. … “That’s the treasure we’re fighting for!” As he pondered, Mora led him to the core of the cave. Lorne looked up and was shocked. In the center of the huge cave ahead, there was an incomparably scarlet-red crystal coffin. It floated in the center of the cave, and there were eight totem stone pillars at the edge. Eight black iron chains were born on them, pulling the red crystal coffin forward. Although Lorne did not know what was inside the crystal coffin, as long as he saw the scene before him, he would know that he had encountered something incredible. “Mora, are you sure this is a treasure?” Lorne felt the surrounding atmosphere was strange. The thing in the crystal coffin was probably not good. “Don’t worry, my friend. This crystal coffin looks terrifying, but it’s nothing dangerous. Even if I attack it, it will not react.” From this, it could be seen that this guy had long discovered this place and had tried many methods to open the crystal coffin. But from the looks of it, it should have failed. “What should we do now?” Lorne could not tell what was happening. Other than feeling strange, he did not obtain any clues. “If you cultivate here and absorb the red energy emitted by the crystal coffin, it can speed up your cultivation.” “For this, you fought the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon to the death?” Lorne looked at it, speechless. “Yes, because the space here is limited, we can’t cultivate together. Moreover, the energy released from the crystal coffin is limited, so we can’t both absorb it at the same time.” Eh? No wonder this guy agreed so readily! Lorne was speechless. He regretted it now. If he had known this would happen, he would have killed this guy as well. That way, he could have gained a few million experience points. “Friend, I’m going to cultivate. If you don’t want to stay, I can send you out.” Mora smiled. “Have you really used any methods against that crystal coffin?” Lorne looked up at the crystal coffin floating in the air. He did not believe this treacherous snake. “Of course, if you don’t believe me, you can go ahead and test it. No matter what you do, I won’t object.” Mora coiled up its hundred-meter-long body, then lay its head on its body and faced the crystal coffin, closing its huge vertical eyes. Go ahead and test it? That was what Lorne was thinking. In any case, the path of cultivation was useless to him as a player. In that case, he could only hope to open the crystal coffin and obtain the treasures hidden inside. However, it would probably take some effort to do this. After all, that guy, Mora, had studied it for so long. Even it could not even move this crystal coffin, so it was impossible for him to open it with brute force. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “It should be related to these totems, right?” Lorne arrived near the nearby totem poles. There was a chain tied to the top of this huge stone pillar that was several meters thick. However, the chain was not strong, which meant that the totem poles had other uses. Perhaps as long as he understood the meaning of the totem, he would know everything about this magic circle. However, this touched upon the blind spot of Lorne’s knowledge. As an ordinary player, he had no way of knowing what the totem on it meant. Even if an NPC from Iron Skull City saw these things, it would be difficult to recognize them. After all, the things here had existed for a long time. Lorne could even think that they had been left behind hundreds or even thousands of years ago. . Helpless, Lorne could only check the totems on the eight stone pillars to find any relevant patterns. But the result was not ideal. He did not find any useful information from it. At the last moment when Lorne was about to give up, he casually used the player’s unique “Identification Skill” on the totem stone pillar. The next moment, he was stunned. “Durability?!” Lorne’s eyes widened. He carefully checked the panel in front of him and finally confirmed that the stone pillar was really tough! In the game, if items had durability, it meant that they could be destroyed. With that in mind, Lorne summoned Little Spider and let it use a long-range skill. A ball of dark green poison sprayed towards the totem stone pillar. When it touched, the ball of poison dissipated, turning into a spider web that stuck to the stone pillar. [Poisonous Spider Web] was a long-range control skill of Little Spider. When the poison net hit the stone pillar, a damage number immediately appeared. -7105 “There’s hope!” Lorne was pleasantly surprised to see the damage. From the combat panel, it could be seen that this stone pillar did not have any defense attributes. It only had a special effect of being immune to 50% damage. If that was all, it would be much simpler. Now, the damage of Aisha and Little Spider was very terrifying. Even if they reduced the damage by half, they could still deal extremely terrifying damage. As for why the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora, could not harm it? This should be related to the player’s identity. After all, “Divine Realm” was a game. The players’ priority was higher than the monsters in the game. Moreover, many special scenes could only be entered by players. Although Mora was powerful, in the face of the game system, it was only a ball of data. It was impossible for it to do anything beyond its authority. Therefore, it was Lorne’s chance! “Mora, how long do you usually cultivate here?” Lorne turned to look at the One-Eyed Giant Snake. It did not open its eyes when answering. “Sometimes a few months, sometimes a few hours.” “Can I ask you to leave for the time being?” “Leave? Are you leaving, my friend?” “No, I just want to activate the secret tool that the Dragon of Light gave me. This mysterious tool cannot be seen by anyone outside the Church of Light.” Lorne had a way to shatter the stone pillar, but he did not want to share it with Mora. After all, it was a treasure prepared for the players. “Hahaha…” Mora laughed. It lowered its head and looked at Lorne with its huge golden vertical eye, “My friend, there’s no need to try. With your strength, even if you have a divine artifact on you, it’s impossible for you to open this crystal coffin.” “That’s none of your concern.” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up confidently, “Whether it succeeds or not, I’ll only try once. If I can’t open the crystal coffin today, then this place will belong to you in the future. I won’t come to this meaningless cave again.” “Really?” “Of course.” Lorne said, “I’m not in the mood to stay in this kind of useless place.” “Alright, it’s settled then. I’ll wait for you outside. If you encounter danger, use the scale I gave you. I’ll rush over as soon as possible.” With that, Mora twisted its huge body and walked out of the cave. Lorne had the Long Tongue Bat Dragon use sound waves to probe the surroundings. After confirming that the other party was not spying, he summoned his other pets. “Little fellows, attack with all your might!” Lorne let his pets deal damage. Aisha and Little Spider were the damage dealers in the team. The two of them attacked at the same time, dealing nearly 20,000 damage per second. Moreover, the stone pillar would not move or counterattack, so the two pets could confidently attack with all their might. Just like that, after about a minute, the huge stone pillar’s durability decreased by half and began to crack. In another minute, the durability of the stone pillar was completely emptied. Crack! The cracks spread like a spider web until they covered the entire stone pillar. Finally, with a bang, it collapsed. With a clang, the black iron chain fell to the ground and quickly disintegrated, finally turning into light that vanished completely. “An iron chain formed from magic energy?” Lorne glanced at the other totems. From the looks of it, these totems should be an important part of the magic circle. Who knew what the consequences would be if all of them were destroyed. However, he could not care about it. Since he was already here, he had to give it a try. What if there was hope? Ding! “Your pet [Aisha] has successfully shattered a totem stone pillar!” “Your pet [Little Spider] has successfully shattered a totem stone pillar!” “...;” In just two minutes, the two pets could destroy a totem stone pillar. It was too simple. Moreover, under Lorne’s search, he obtained a red gem and a fragment engraved with totems. ———— [Energy Crystal] Grade: Legendary Effect: Use the energy crystal to set up a magic circle. You can obtain a better effect. ———— This was an energy crystal that was responsible for providing energy to the magic circle on the stone pillars. Although it was temporarily useless, as a legendary material, it would definitely be very useful in the future. As for the other loot? ———— [Stone Giant’s Body Fragment] Grade: Legendary Effect: Special runes appear naturally on the stone giant’s body. If these runes are used to set up a magic circle, the effect of the magic circle will be amplified. ———— This was also a special material related to magic circles, and the way it was produced was very interesting. It was actually a natural rune born from the stone giant. He did not know what kind of person would use such a precious material to set up a magic circle in this place. Ding! “Your pet [Little Spider] has successfully shattered a totem stone pillar!” “Your pet [Aisha] has successfully shattered a totem stone pillar!” “Your pet [Aisha] has successfully shattered a totem stone pillar!” “…” As time passed, the eight surrounding totem stone pillars were destroyed by Lorne. Every totem stone pillar produced an [Energy Crystal] and a [Stone Giant’s Body Fragment]. These were all legendary materials and were extraordinary in value. At this moment, a grand system notification sounded. Ding! “Congratulations on destroying the Incubation Magic Circle. Obtained: EXP+20,000!” “Incubation Magic Circle?” Looking at the information on the interface, Lorne could not help but frown. The name of this magic circle was very interesting. If he understood it literally, didn’t it mean that there was a fetus inside? This place had existed for a long time. If there was really a fetus, it would probably have grown up by now, right? Things were getting troublesome. Lorne looked at the crystal coffin floating in front of him and took a deep breath. Things had already progressed to this point. If he gave up, he would definitely regret it. Moreover, as a player, if he was afraid of such things, he would not be a qualified adventurer. “Human or ghost, let me see your true appearance!” Lorne decided to investigate, but before he made a move, he had to change the Ghost Shadow Necklace to a Death Substitution Necklace. In the event of danger, the Death Substitution Necklace could give him another way out. Then he stepped forward. When he was close enough, he could clearly see the special patterns on the crystal coffin. Moreover, the color on it was like blood, and it looked very strange. Unfortunately, this crystal coffin was not transparent. It was impossible to see what was happening inside from the outside. There was nothing else around. In other words, if Lorne wanted to know what was happening inside, he had to open the crystal coffin completely. “Little Spider, push open the crystal coffin.” Lorne did not hesitate. He had already made up his mind. He would accept whatever came next. The small spider moved its eight long legs forward. After approaching the crystal coffin, its long legs began to push the lid. Gulp— Driven by immense force, the coffin lid moved, and there was a heavy grinding sound. Soon, a corner of the blood-colored crystal coffin was lifted. At this moment, a bloody aura spread over, and scarlet energy spewed out. Everything looked so strange. Fortunately, nothing strange rushed out. Lorne swallowed, then held his chest and moved to the side of the crystal coffin. When he checked the corner of the gap, his pupils dilated several times as he looked extremely shocked. “Heavens…” Lorne froze on the spot. Inside the crystal coffin, there was really a body. Moreover, this body was floating in midair and had not touched the crystal coffin. What was even more astonishing was the liveliness of her body. It was as if she had fallen asleep. If not for the fact that she was lying in the crystal coffin, one would definitely think that she had only fallen asleep. Lorne made the spider increase its strength again, pushing the lid further away. This time, he saw the other party’s appearance. This was an extremely imposing woman. She had fiery red hair, an exquisite appearance, and an extremely perfect body. There was no clothing on her body, only wisps of energy providing some cover. Lorne’s mouth went dry. However, when he saw the lower half of the other party, his eyes widened. “Mermaid!” Lorne gasped. He did not expect that there was a mermaid lying in the crystal coffin! It was obvious after seeing her crystal-scaled tail! “There’s a mermaid buried in the crystal coffin at the bottom of the lake. That sounds right.” Lorne could understand this, but the only thing that confused him was the magic circle called “Incubation”. Was this mermaid beauty born in this crystal coffin? This seemed to be the only way to explain everything. Lorne did not dwell on this issue. He directly used the player’s identification skill on the mermaid. ———— [Naga Queen Domina] Quality: ??? Status: ??? Level: ??? HP: ??? Physical Attack: ??? Physical Defense: ??? Magic Defense: ??? Skill: ??? Introduction: Domina is the ancient Naga Queen and an Abyss Ruler of the Dark Abyss. However, due to the war in the ancient era, Domina’s body was shattered. However, as the blessed child of the world, her heart was preserved and recovered in the Incubation Magic Circle. After thousands of years of recovery, she finally regained her life and strength. ———— Pfft— When he saw who it was, Lorne almost spat out a mouthful of blood. This mermaid was the ancient Naga Queen, and one of the rulers of the Dark Abyss! As long as players knew the history of “Divine Realm”, they knew that the Abyss Ruler was the ruler of the Dark Abyss, and the Dragon of Darkness, Doris, was also one of the Abyss Rulers! In other words, this mermaid was as dangerous as the Dragon of Darkness! “Damn, this is too tense!” Lorne was stunned. This time, not only did he not obtain a reward, but he also released a monster that could destroy the world. This was because the information on the other party clearly stated that she had regained her life and strength. In other words, the Naga Queen should be alive now?! With that in mind, Lorne came to a realization. When he looked at it, he immediately realized that it had opened its scarlet eyes and was staring at him. Oh no, the great demon was awake!! Lorne looked helpless. It seemed that he really had to give it his all this time. Unless the Dragon of Light descended personally, no one could save him from the Naga Queen. … At the same time, in the north of Iron Skull City, a ball of black fire flew over the border and headed for the Lake of Death. Ding! “An unknown powerful existence has descended nearby. You are suppressed by its aura and thus received the following debuff: -90% HP, -90% Attack, -90% Defense, -100% Movement Speed…” Lorne did not know what he had done to encounter such a powerful and terrifying existence every time. At this moment, the Naga Queen floated from the crystal coffin. There was a cold killing intent emanating from her, like a storm. Even if it was not directed at Lorne, it made him shiver. The Naga Queen rose into the air, and her beautiful figure appeared in Lorne’s eyes. It had to be said that this was definitely one of the most perfect bodies in the world. However, before Lorne could admire it, the Naga Queen waved her arm, and countless scarlet energies gathered, forming a close-fitting armor. These armor covered her private body, but they retained the perfect curves of her body. In addition, there was an exquisite red crystal crown on her head. A huge energy circle gradually condensed behind her, making her look like a deity. “What is this place?” Domina asked Lorne directly, but she was looking around. To her, a weak human like Lorne was not worth paying attention to. In order to survive, Lorne naturally cooperated. “This is the bottom of the Lake of Death in the Iron Skull City.” “Lake of Death?” Hearing this term, Domina could not help but think. Her memory and the current situation were so far apart that she could not recall many things. After recalling for a long time, she muttered to herself, “It’s the territory of that old turtle. Looks like I recovered because of him.” After some thought, she finally looked at Lorne, “You’re just a human brat who’s not even at the Earth Realm. How can you be here?” Lorne was only Level 30, and the “Earth Realm” that the NPC referred to was another name for Class Two. In the Empire Alliance, only a Class Two Player could barely become a soldier in the army. Lorne clearly could not meet this requirement, and with his strength, it was impossible for him to reach this place. However, he had come and destroyed the magic circle around the crystal coffin. “I was entrusted by the Dark Dragon, Lady Doris, to come to this region to find the missing Cold Desolate Dragon City.” Lorne wanted to say the Dragon of Light, but he remembered that the other party was from the Dark faction and was enemies with the Dragon of Light, so he immediately said that he was from the Dragon of Darkness. “Dragon of Darkness? Theodore?” Domina looked at him in surprise. Lorne immediately shook his head, “No, it’s Lady Doris.” “Doris?” Domina pondered. In her mind, the Dragon of Darkness was Theodore, but it seemed that the current Dragon of Darkness had changed to a dragon called Doris. In that case, Theodore should be dead. The war back then was too tragic. Almost all the Abyss Rulers had experienced a life and death battle. The odds of Theodore winning against the Dragon of Light were the lowest among them. Therefore, it was normal for him to die. “That’s not right. As a traitor of the Human Race, why do you still have such a great light power on you?” Domina said, “Human brat, you’d better explain yourself!” Eh? Lorne was speechless. After thinking for a while, he said helplessly, “I needed to get close to the Dragon of Light. This city has a special power in the Church of Light. Lady Doris wants me to destroy that power so that she can defeat the Dragon of Light.” “She even told you this. Looks like she trusts you a lot.” Domina said, “In that case, I’ll also give you a mission. Go to the Human Empire and find the location of the Naga Race and hand it to me. After completing the mission, I will give you the reward you deserve.” Ding! “Congratulations on triggering the hidden mission—[Find the Naga Race]!” “Mission Description: Find the coordinates of the Naga Race and inform the Naga Queen, Domina.” “Mission Reward: Unknown.” “Warning: Once your transaction with the Dark Faction is exposed, you will be despised by all the members of the Light Faction. You will not be able to continue accepting missions from the NPCs of the Light Faction.” A series of mission notifications appeared. Lorne could not help but smile bitterly. He did not know why, but it was as if he had a special buff. As long as it was a monster of the Dark faction, they had to rope him in or give him a mission to betray the humans. But there was no way he would not agree. After all, he had already achieved a lot in the Light faction. However, in order to survive, he could only beg for mercy and stabilize the other party first. In addition, he wanted to see if he could obtain any benefits. “Queen, can you give me some rewards first? I’m too weak. This way, I won’t be able to obtain the empire’s trust. At that time, I’ll definitely encounter a lot of trouble looking for information.” Lorne forced himself to ask. As a smart player, he could not miss out on any opportunity to earn money. Hearing this, Domina gave him a disgusted look. In her eyes, humans were the most greedy creatures in the world. Although thousands of years had passed, the evil nature that was engraved in their bones had not changed. However, this was also good. Greedy fellows were always easy to control. “Take it. This is the blood essence of an ancient demon. After using it, your aptitude will immediately increase.” With that, a red bottle flew into Lorne’s hand. ———— [Ancient Demon’s Blood Essence] Grade: Rare Effect: After using it, you will obtain the bloodline of a Frost Demon. Your attributes will be greatly increased. ———— Lorne knew a little about bloodlines. Not long ago, the long tongue bat had obtained the blessing of the One-Eyed Giant Snake’s bloodline, thus obtaining part of the dragon bloodline. This bloodline essence had the same effect as last time. It could greatly increase the user’s aptitude. ———— [Frost Demon Bloodline] Effect 1: +10% HP, +5% MP, +5% Defense. Effect 2: Potential+3. Effect 3: All basic attacks will cause a frost slowing effect. Stackable three times, each reduces 4% speed. ———— The effect of this bloodline was standard. It was not very strong, but it was not weak either. Another worth mentioning was that bloodlines were different from hidden classes. The two could be used together. Unfortunately, Lorne did not like this thing. If he only wanted to sell it for money, that would be fine, but he would not use it himself. He put away the reward and continued to look at Domina, asking tentatively, “Are there any other rewards?” As soon as he finished speaking… Suddenly! A black lightning bolt descended from the sky! Boom! The black lightning attacked Lorne, wanting to kill him! Everything happened too quickly for Lorne to react. But in the next second, he was stunned. This was because a pitch-black spear had appeared in front of him. It was filled with holes, as if it had been corroded by time. Moreover, there was no light emitted from the spear’s body. It looked like an ordinary black iron rod. But such an iron rod actually penetrated the entire mountain! In an instant, it pierced through the ten-thousand-meter tall mountain and accurately struck the target at the center. Yes, it was targeting Lorne. It was supposed to hit. But at that moment, the black iron rod stopped ten centimeters away from Lorne. A snow-white arm gripped the spear tightly, preventing it from moving forward. It was Domina who stopped it. At the same time, this Naga Queen emitted endless killing intent. Her scarlet eyes looked coldly in the direction of the sky. “A mere worm dares to be insolent. If not for the fact that I have not recovered, I will definitely kill you!” Domina murmured, then glowed in a brilliant red light. Lorne’s vision was blocked. There was no special feeling. However, when he regained his vision, he realized that he had already left the bottom of the lake and arrived at a huge rock in the Lake of Death. Domina stood, her eyes on the sky. Lorne followed her gaze and was shocked again. In the sky, a headless horseman with black and red flames burning all over his body walked in the air. Moreover, he emitted a terrifying power that made people suffocate. Abyss Ruler! This was definitely another Abyss Ruler! Lorne stared at him. He saw that it was not a headless horseman, but a headless centaur! He had no head, but there was a hideous mouth on his stomach. “Lady Naga Queen, congratulations on obtaining a new life!” The headless horseman in the sky had no intention of descending. He stood high in the sky and said arrogantly, “However, I want to know why the Naga Queen is protecting a human. Are you coveting his good looks?” With that, the headless centaur laughed. At the same time, a terrifying energy swept in all directions. The calm Lake of Death suddenly churned. “You’re courting death!” Domina was enraged by these words. She flew into the air and charged at the other party like a cannonball. As she charged, her green hands became hideous. Sharp sickle-like claws grew out, and terrifying energy erupted from her body. Domina threw the black spear in her hand first, then quickly closed in on the other party, her right claw slashing forward. Slash! A hideous wound appeared on the headless horseman’s body, but he did not care. Instead, he grabbed the black spear and counterattacked. Black-red energy spewed crazily from his body. The spear was like a giant python, carrying monstrous power as it instantly struck Domina’s left shoulder. Boom!!! A shocking explosion occurred. Like a nuclear bomb explosion, a terrifying energy shockwave instantly swept in all directions. A huge pit was created in the dark Lake of Death, and even the lake water could not be poured back. Lorne was dumbfounded. This was the first time he had seen such powerful experts fight. It was beyond his imagination. Especially after he knew that “Divine Realm” could be materialized, he was extremely looking forward to everything in the game. If he could become so powerful in the game and even fly, did that mean that he could do all of this in reality in the future? Thinking of this, Lorne was lost in thought. The battle in the sky stopped at this moment. Both of them stopped appropriately and ended the battle. This was because the two of them were the rulers of the Dark Abyss. They were on the same side, so it was impossible for them to fight to the death. Moreover, this was Iron Skull City’s territory. Even if the two of them had the top strength in this world, they had to be wary of the human experts in Iron Skull City. If the other party surrounded them, it would be very difficult for them to leave. Domina had just revived, so she naturally did not want to do this. Moreover, her strength had not completely recovered. If it was a life and death battle, she really did not have the confidence to kill the other party. As for the headless horseman? He only wanted to test Domina’s strength. If she did not have the strength of the Abyss Ruler, he would not mind turning her into his meal. However, now that he realized that the other party’s strength was about the same as his, he naturally would not continue fighting. “Looks like you’re really revived, Lady Domina. Let’s go back to the abyss.” The Headless Horseman laughed as if he had forgotten the battle. With a cold glance, Domina sped north of Iron Skull City. … With the departure of the two figures in the sky, the Lake of Death finally returned to calm. Lorne stood on the rock, still in shock. He imagined himself flying in the air. If everything in “Divine Realm” could be conjured, if players could really be as powerful as the Rulers of the Abyss, then he, Lorne, could definitely do it. “Phew—” Lorne took a deep breath, his eyes lighting up. For some reason, he felt like he had a bigger goal in life. Moreover, when he was distracted earlier, he thought of something else. That was his sister’s illness! In reality, her illness seemed to be very difficult to treat. At the very least, until now, no one had been able to diagnose her true condition. However, the virtual reality materialization function of “Divine Realm” reminded Lorne that if anything could be conjured, the potion could naturally be conjured as well. If he brought a divine-level potion back to reality in the future, it would definitely be more magical than technology in reality. It might even be able to directly cure his sister! Thinking of this, Lorne became even more excited. It took him a few minutes to calm down and check the items in his bag. When Domina had given him the mission earlier, she had also given him a scale that belonged to her. ———— [Naga Queen’s Sound Transmission Scale] Quality: Epic Effect: Can be used to contact the Naga Queen. ———— Alright, this was only a voice transmission tool. Lorne gathered his things. At this moment, another storm brewed in the Lake of Death. The One-Eyed Giant Snake carefully swam up. “Friend, what happened?” Mora stuck its head out of the Lake of Death and warily checked her surroundings. After ensuring that no one was around, it looked at Lorne and asked about the situation. “You want to know?” Lorne looked at it meaningfully and extended a finger, “A thousand pearls from the bottom of the lake.” “We’re friends. Can you give us a discount?” “It’s because we’re friends that I only want this price. This is a secret regarding the crystal coffin. If it were anyone else, they would need to pay 3,000 crystals at least!” “Alright.” Hearing the crystal coffin, Mora could not sit still anymore. It took out a thousand pearls and handed them to Lorne. “In the crystal coffin, there’s the corpse of a mermaid.” “And?” Mora went into the cave and saw that the crystal coffin had been opened. It did not see any mermaid. But Lorne did not answer. Instead, he extended a finger. After Mora handed over the money, he explained, “Then, this mermaid revived and brought me here.” Lorne paused again, but Mora gave him a pitiful look. “I’ll give you the last of my savings. Speak clearly.” The last batch that Mora had given him had more than two thousand pearls at the bottom of the lake. Lorne was not so greedy. He directly told it what had happened. Upon hearing about the Abyss Ruler, Mora was immediately stunned. It remembered that when it had been bombing the crystal coffin, if it had really opened it at that time, the other party might have killed it. After all, that was the Naga Queen with the most fiery temper in history! “Let’s go, friend. You have to help me do something.” “What is it?” “I want to enter the ancient ruins on the mountain over there, but there’s a group of [Fire Elemental Giants] blocking my way. I hope you can clear them.” Lorne pointed in the direction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. It was already late. He had to quickly enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City and sweep through it. Then, he would return to Iron Skull City and find the Dragon of Light to submit the mission. “So it’s those little things. No problem. I can kill them easily.” Mora said, “However, I can’t enter that Desolate City. I can only help you clean up the monsters at the entrance. As for what else is inside, I can’t help you.” “You can’t go in?” Lorne was slightly surprised. “Yes, that Desolate City has a special barrier that we can’t enter. I think only adventurers can enter.” Mora smiled, “If not for that, that place would have been wiped out long ago.” “I see.” Lorne was overjoyed. If that Desolate City could only be entered by adventurers, then he would definitely be the first person to find this place. After all, the surrounding map was so dangerous, and no one could come here. Moreover, the Cold Desolate Dragon City had not been destroyed by the monsters. There must be an extremely rich amount of resources inside. It just so happened that he had the Dragon’s Treasure Vault on him. This time, he had to wipe out the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City. While they were thinking, the two of them arrived at the entrance of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. “Friend, watch my performance next.” The One-Eyed Giant Snake coiled outside the door and let out a loud roar. The next moment, the Fire Elemental Giants in the tunnel rushed out. The aggro between the monsters was much farther than that of the players. All Mora needed to do was stay outside and attract all the Fire Elemental Giants. When they rushed out, the giant snake’s body immediately twisted. Its body was extremely huge, so the damage from just its tail was extremely terrifying. The Fire Elemental Giants hit by its tail were sent flying and slammed into the wall. Although one attack could not kill these monsters, that was not all. It was simply playing a game with them. After waving its tail a few times, Mora finally lost interest. It opened its mouth and spat out surging energy, causing the fire elemental giants to retreat. Under this wave of attacks, many monsters’ health was already depleted, and some even fell to the ground. Ding! “Congratulations on assisting [One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora] in killing a Fire Elemental Giant. You received 10,000 (+25,000) experience points (+35,000)!” The monster fell, and Lorne gained a portion of the experience. He had to admit that the system was too friendly. Of course, this was all thanks to the long-range damage of “Small Artillery”. Even if it did not deal any damage, as long as he entered a combat state with the other party, he would obtain a portion of the experience. Because the two of them had 50,000 affinity points, the intimate relationship between the two would give them this special effect. Therefore, Lorne was very happy now. He had done almost nothing, but he had obtained a large amount of experience points. A Fire Elemental Giant could give him 70,000 experience points. This was countless times faster than farming small monsters. “What’s this?” Lorne discovered that after a Fire Elemental Giant died, a ball of red gems would appear on the ground. It emitted a light as if it was burning. After the battle stopped, Lorne stepped forward to clean up the battlefield. He put the countless gold coins and the red gems into his bag. ———— [Fire Elemental Crystal] Quality: Epic Effect: Can be used to forge and defend city buildings. It contains rich fire elemental energy. It is a rare material that is very popular among craftsmen. ———— This thing was indeed dropped by a high-level monster. Its quality had reached the Epic stage. There was no need for Lorne to think too much. All he had to do was pick up the treasures. This thing would definitely be very popular in the future. What was worth mentioning was that Lorne’s [Monster Merging Simulator] had obtained a fire elemental material from the Fire Elemental Giants. As a material dropped from a high-level monster, if he created a pet in the future, the effect would definitely be very outstanding. As for why he did not use it to upgrade ‘Venom’? Lorne did not feel the need. Because the quality of Venom could no longer keep up with the team, and the damage output was very similar to that of Small Artillery, it did not have any presence in the team. At the same time, considering that the monsters in the main city were more powerful now, Lorne wanted to use these monsters as the foundation and create stronger pets. “I should wait until the mission is completed before thinking about my new pets.” Ding! “Congratulations on assisting [One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora] in killing a Fire Elemental Giant. You received 10,000 (+25,000) experience points (+35,000)!” “Ding!” “Ding!” With the free labor of Mora, the monsters at the entrance of the Cold Desolate Dragon City were quickly wiped out. This was the first time that Lorne had been so relaxed since entering the game. It was almost like gaining experience for nothing. Furthermore, a monster gave 70,000 experience points. It was too awesome. Coupled with the fact that Mora was fast at farming monsters, Lorne gained more than a million experience points in just a few minutes. Moreover, he had also picked up a lot of [Fire Elemental Crystals] and the “body parts” he could use later. It was too comfortable. Unfortunately, the monsters at the entrance had been cleared. From here, there was no sign of any monsters. “Friend, the monsters outside have been cleared. Go inside and take a look. If there are monsters, you can lure them out. I’ll help you clear them.” Mora suddenly reminded him. Tears streamed down Lorne’s face. <i>‘Good friend, I won’t forget you!’</i>  Lorne quickly ran into the Cold Desolate Dragon City. When he walked out of the entrance, he saw a group of red figures nearby. They were all Fire Elemental Giants, wandering aimlessly. According to his observations, there should be more than a hundred Fire Elemental Giants in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. If he calculated based on 70,000 experience points each, he could at least obtain 7 million experience points from these monsters! This time, his level was really going to take off. Overjoyed, Lorne quickly summoned all his pets and commanded them to attract the monster’s attention. … Ding! “Congratulations on spending 370,000 experience points to raise your pet [Rimuru] to Level 21.” “Congratulations on spending 385,000 experience points to raise your pet [Rimuru] to Level 22.” “…” “Congratulations on spending 505,000 experience points to raise your pet [Rimuru] to Level 30.” “Congratulations to your pet [Rimuru] for awakening its skill—[Petrification]!” With the experience, Lorne immediately raised his pet’s level. This time, the target was Rimuru. Although it was only a slime, it was a Bronze-Grade Boss. It was the team’s tank mission and was also an important member. From Level 20 to Level 30, Lorne spent 4,375,000 experience points. Although he used a lot of resources, seeing the final result, this expenditure was nothing. ———— Pet: [Slime King, Alchemy] (Rimuru) Quality: Bronze-Grade Boss Level: 30 (0 / 1.04 million) HP: 425,000 Magic Attack: 1020-1360 Physical Defense: 552 Magic Defense: 425 Superiority: 100% Skills: [Sticky Spray], [Healing], [Summoning of the King], [Solidify], [Petrification] Introduction: Originally, it was a ferocious Slime King, but it accidentally fused with a special potion and was enlightened. In the end, it evolved into a Bronze-Grade Boss that was good at healing. ———— It could be seen that Rimuru’s attributes were really not suitable for dealing damage. Even at Level 30, the upper limit of its attack was only 1360 points. Such an attack power was only comparable to a Level 30 Silver monster. It did not match its identity as a Bronze-Grade Boss. But in this team, it still held a lot of weight. This was all because of Rimuru’s powerful healing ability. ———— [Sticky Spray]: Grants (100% + 500) HP/MP Recovery to a friendly target. Deals 100% fixed magic damage to enemy targets. ———— 1360+500 = 1860! Who would not like a ‘healer’ who could recover 1860 health points in one go? Therefore, no matter how bad Rimuru’s attack and defense attributes were, Lorne would keep it by his side. As for the skill that it had just awakened? ———— [Petrification] Effect: Enter the petrified state and turn attack power into defense. However, it cannot attack in this state or activate a skill. Moreover, it cannot trigger the effect of the “Healing” skill. ———— This skill directly made up for the disadvantage of Rimuru’s low defense. With the Petrification skill, Rimuru had 2,112 defense points. Coupled with its 425,000 health points, it was almost impossible for players to kill it. … Ding! “Congratulations on spending 404,000 experience points to raise your pet [Long Tongue Bat Dragon] to Level 30.” “Congratulations to your pet [Long Tongue Bat Dragon] for awakening its skill—[Sonic Flight]!” The remaining experience points began to increase the level of the long tongue bat. It was a Gold monster, and its EXP requirement was 20 times that of Lorne himself, similar to that of Rimuru. It took Lorne 3.5 million experience points to finally raise it to Level 30. ———— [Long Tongue Bat Dragon] (Long Tongue Bat) Grade: Gold Level: 30 (0 / 832,000) HP: 25,500 Magic Attack: 2975-3400 Defense: 1275 Superiority: 95% Introduction: …. ———— This scout had excellent Attack and Defense attributes now. Even if it faced a Level 30 Bronze-Grade Boss, it could still fight. However, Lorne was more concerned about its new skill. ———— [Sonic Flight] Effect: Enters an explosive state. Flight speed increases by 100%. Costs 200 MP per second. ———— Increasing flying speed by 100% was indeed worthy of the name “Sonic Flight”. With this skill, the long tongue bat’s investigative ability would definitely increase by another level. … Rumble!!! At this moment, the Fire Elemental Giants in the Cold Desolate Dragon City were finally wiped out. Of course, Lorne only explored the external buildings. He was too embarrassed to go to the internal ones. After all, Mora had been working for hours. In fact, when killing monsters later, Mora always called them little kids. The reason why it had taken so long was mostly because of the time it took for Lorne to draw the monsters. Now that most of the monsters had been dealt with, Mora could no longer hold back. “Goodbye, friend. Contact me if there’s anything.” With that, Mora plunged into the Lake of Death. Before Lorne could thank it, the other party had already left. He could only take a deep breath, turn around, and officially enter the magnificent Cold Desolate Dragon City. How large was the range of the Cold Desolate Dragon City? Lorne did not know. He only knew that most of the buildings in the Dragon City had merged with the mountain range. If one only estimated the area from the outside, it might be only a few hundred meters long. However, that was definitely not all. After all, an adult dragon was 50 meters long and had a wingspan of 100 meters. To them, such a building that was a few hundred meters tall was like the shell of a snail. They could not stretch out their limbs. It was also because of this that Lorne was confident in the subsequent exploration. He directly passed through the huge passageway at the entrance and officially entered the Cold Desolate Dragon City that had been lost for ten thousand years. Although this city had been lost in history for more than ten thousand years, time did not erase its existence. On the contrary, the traces of history made this ancient city even thicker. The scene before them was still extremely shocking. As he walked, he saw a huge stone pillar. The stone pillars were more than ten meters in diameter and looked like a huge mountain. On the ground were rocks that were more than ten meters long. No matter who saw this scene, they would definitely be shocked. Soon, Lorne arrived at the open square. The area was larger than he had imagined. He could not see where the edge of the square was. Perhaps this was what dragons liked. As large flying creatures, their range of activity was very large. They needed enough space, or else it would be very crowded. Unfortunately, there was no longer any sign of the dragons here. Even the huge fountain in the center was completely dried up. The huge rocks on the fountain were already covered in weeds and moss, revealing a barren scene. Lorne moved forward. When he arrived near the fountain, his gaze was suddenly attracted by a type of red flower in the fountain pool. These flowers only had three leaves. They were scarlet like blood and were even shimmering. Lorne could feel how precious they were just by looking at them. After all, this was the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Everything that was born here was extraordinary. Unfortunately, Lorne did not have a high-level herb-picking skill. He could not identify the species of the herb or collect them properly. “As expected, subclasses are the best.” With a sigh, Lorne moved around the area. However, this fountain pool’s range was really very large. The number of red flowers inside was also astonishing. If these were really high-grade herbs, then he would really be rich. Soon, Lorne passed through the fountain and arrived at the central hall behind. The range of this castle was astonishing. The entire central hall was 300 meters high and had a huge range. At the top was a huge dome. Such a design made the interior space larger and more magnificent. Unfortunately, after ten thousand years of weathering, the situation inside this hall was terrible. It was tattered everywhere, and the surrounding walls were also filled with moss and filth. Lorne searched the hall, trying to find something valuable. But that did not happen. There was nothing in the hall. Even the notch above the throne where the gems were placed was empty. From the looks of it, someone seemed to have snatched all the treasures in the hall before him. Lorne continued to examine the area, but found nothing but a pile of rubble and moss. In the end, he rushed into the back of the hall. There was also a hall here. It was smaller than the outside, but much more exquisite. Even the stone pillars were engraved with exquisite totems. Lorne still did not find any gems or other treasures here. He even thought that there was nothing here. But at that moment, Lorne stopped. His gaze landed on the mural above the throne. This mural seemed a little special. It looked like a portrait of the dragon leaders, but there was actually something else engraved on it. Lorne could feel it, but could not understand it. Therefore, he could only stay here and observe carefully. After checking for more than ten minutes, his eyes suddenly widened in surprise. “It’s a blueprint! This is the reverse drawing of the Dragon City!” Lorne cried out in surprise. At this moment, the parts regarding the blueprint on the mural were all drawn by golden lines. Finally, all the golden lines left the wall and began to intertwine in the air. Ten seconds later, the golden lines turned into a ball of light that entered Lorne’s body. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining: [Cold Desolate Dragon City Construction Blueprint] x1.” The system notification suddenly sounded. Lorne was also stunned by this information. He did not expect that the blueprint for the Dragon City would be hidden in this mural! This was an unexpected surprise! Lorne quickly opened his bag and took out the blueprint he had just obtained. This was not just a picture, but the design of all the buildings in the city. ———— [Cold Desolate Dragon City Construction Blueprint] Grade: Mythical Function: Recorded the designs, materials, and construction details of all the buildings in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Special Effect: Carrying the complete blueprint, you can directly identify most of the building materials. Special Effect: Carrying the complete blueprint, you can ignore the level of the construction skill and directly build according to the blueprint. Special Effect: Carrying the complete blueprint, you can obtain super construction theory and knowledge. Introduction: A blueprint created by the first Dragon of Light. It was originally used to build the Dragon Race’s Emperor City, but due to special reasons, it was not completed. Later, it was modified by other dragons and gradually became the blueprint for the construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. ———— Mythical?! Lorne was stunned. The quality of this map was actually at the Mythical grade, and it was created by the first Dragon of Light. No wonder Cold Desolate Dragon City was so magnificent. However, what shocked Lorne the most was not the origin of the map. It was the special effects of this map. Who would have thought that just possessing a blueprint would allow players to obtain a super high-level construction skill? One had to know that the subclass system was only released today, but now, Lorne directly obtained the “Super Construction Skill”. If other players knew about this, they would definitely be so jealous that they would vomit blood. “Doesn’t this mean that I have the ability to repair the Cold Desolate Dragon City?!” In order to repair the Dragon City, he had to have the complete blueprint of the city. Lorne already had the blueprint, and it had given him the necessary construction ability. In other words, as long as he had enough materials and manpower, he could completely repair this Cold Desolate Dragon City. It would not even be a problem to build another Dragon City! As everyone knew, in the game, if one wanted to build their own territory, they had to first build a guild. After forming an organization, they could build their own guild territory. However, up until now, there had not been any [Guild Establishment Token] in “Divine Realm”. Those so-called large guilds had not actually obtained the recognition of the game. That was just a crowd that they had gathered using practical methods. Therefore, the matter of creating a territory was even further away. Of course, it was necessary to choose an area as the base of the future territory. After all, every map had a different situation. These regional problems would affect the future of the territory. After thinking about this problem, he immediately realized that the ruins of “Cold Desolate Dragon City” were the best location to create a guild territory. This was because it was close to the Lake of Death and belonged to the region of high-level monsters. After the players’ levels increased in the future, this region would be the mainstream leveling area. Moreover, this place was four to five days away from Iron Skull City, so it was difficult for the players to obtain supplies. Therefore, as a territory, the Cold Desolate Dragon City had a huge business opportunity. In addition, Cold Desolate Dragon City could also provide a two-way magic circle to connect with Iron Skull City. The days spent getting there would be reduced to seconds. As the owner, Lorne could collect some toll fees from it. He believed that these players would not waste time on traveling for the sake of their level advantage. Therefore, even if Lorne’s price was slightly higher, they would not give up on this choice. “If I can make this my territory, that would be incredible!” Looking at the surrounding scene, Lorne revealed a greedy expression. If he could treat this Dragon City Ruins as the prototype of his territory, he would definitely be able to save a lot of materials. After all, the range of this Cold Desolate Dragon City was so huge, and the materials used to build it were beyond the expectations of the players. Just the path paved with rocks and bricks underground required a large amount of money. After all, this was a ground facility that even Iron Skull City did not have. “In that case, I have to get a Guild Establishment Token and City Creation Token as soon as possible.” Lorne had his next goal in mind, and he placed it very high. This area was an unoccupied area. If other players found this place and occupied it before him, he would not know where to cry. … Then, Lorne checked the contents of the [Blueprint]. In the end, he realized that his horizons had limited his imagination. It turned out that this place was not the main area of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. The entrance they had just entered was only a passageway that was specially used by the Cold Desolate Dragon City to transport materials. The region he was in was actually only the workshop area of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Due to the huge size of the dragons, they were considered combat troops and were not good at building. Therefore, they would let other races do many things regarding buildings. Therefore, this workshop area was where the vassals of the dragons worked. Seeing this, Lorne did not know what to say. It was only a workshop area, but it was already so grand. Perhaps only the dragons had such confidence. “According to the map, this should be the alchemy workshop…” Lorne looked through the map of the relevant area and found that this was only the alchemy workshop area. Due to the need to farm, there was also a medicinal field near the workshop. Unfortunately, when Lorne arrived at the medicinal field, he did not see any other herbs, only red flowers everywhere. These red flowers should have grown later and were not specially planted. Lorne could not know their true identities, so he could only leave the area for the time being.  Then, he looked at the other facilities in the workshop area. Lorne discovered that every “subclass” had a dedicated workshop. For example, “Forging Workshop”, “Alchemy Workshop”, “Mining Workshop”, and others. Moreover, all the workshops had a huge area. According to Lorne’s current estimation of the area, the area alone should exceed 2,000 hectares. As for the other positions, the initial estimation should exceed 40,000 hectares. This size was beyond Lorne’s imagination. After all, this was only a fortress that resisted the Dark Abyss. Under the construction of the dragon, it was actually so huge. Moreover, this was only a shrunken blueprint. According to the first Dragon of Light, this city should be several times larger. However, Lorne quickly discovered another problem. Although the map showed that the area of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was so huge, in reality, after ten thousand years, there had already been a huge change inside. Most of the main cities were assimilated by the mountains. Countless giant trees and rocks destroyed the main body of the Dragon City, and the range of destruction was very large. According to Lorne’s observations on the cliff, at least a third of the ancient Cold Desolate Dragon City had been assimilated by the mountain range. Especially at the outer city wall, the situation was even worse. The total length of the city wall of Cold Desolate Dragon City was 16,000 kilometers, and the portion that collapsed was 6,000 kilometers. This was a hopeless project to restore. This was because the wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was 70 meters thick and more than 50 meters high. It was truly an impregnable fortress. To repair this huge wall, even a large guild with 100,000 players would need at least ten years to complete it. Lorne was alone. If he really wanted this Dragon City Ruins to be his guild’s territory, then the problem just now was his future work. To be honest, this was definitely an impossible mission. At the very least, he could not do it alone. However, Lorne did not have to work on it himself. After all, as long as he had money, he would definitely be able to find someone to work for him. As the number one player in the world, it was too easy for him to obtain resources. In the deal with the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora, he had obtained 6,000 lake pearls, all of which were wealth. In addition, in Walter’s cave, he had also obtained 3,000 Dragon Race Night Pearls, which were also a huge amount of wealth. However, that was not the most important thing. The most important thing was the players. If he could connect the teleportation array of Cold Desolate Dragon City and Iron Skull City first, at that time, he would be able to obtain an endless amount of wealth and manpower. For low-level players, as long as they used some high-level equipment, they could be used as labor to repair the city wall. Therefore, the only thing that Lorne needed to worry about was the materials needed to build the city. The materials used in this city were very expensive. If he spent money to buy them, it would be an astronomical figure. [City Wall Construction Blueprint] (Cold Desolate Dragon City) Requirement: Legendary-level Construction Skill Material: Ancient Giant Rock, Ancient Limestone Powder. [Alchemy Workshop] (Cold Desolate Dragon City) Requirement: Legendary-level Construction Skill Material: Ancient Giant Rock, Ancient Crystal Test Tube, Ancient Ruby, Ancient Earthly Heat Magic Circle… [Blacksmith Workshop] (Cold Desolate Dragon City) Requirement: Legendary-level Construction Skill Materials: Ancient Giant Rock, Ancient Steel, Ancient Magic Circle… Lorne checked the materials needed for the building and found that they were all high-grade materials. The quality of these things was very high. If he used all the standard materials on them, the cost would be uncountable. If it was replaced with an ordinary material, the attributes of the building would be greatly reduced. “I wonder if there are any additional building materials in Dragon City?” Lorne could only place his hopes on the Dragon City warehouse. He did not want to buy these materials himself. It had to be known that the city wall was 70 meters wide and 50 meters long. Furthermore, it was 6,000 kilometers long. Who knew how many resources it would take to repair this wall. With just him alone, unless he could find a few more dragon nests and plunder all the gems inside, it was impossible to accumulate so much wealth. With that in mind, Lorne immediately looked at the warehouse. If there was still any savings left in this Cold Desolate Dragon City, it should be in the warehouse. Even if someone had searched this city before, they would definitely not move away the huge rocks and building materials. After all, they did not even occupy the main body of the priceless Cold Desolate Dragon City, so there was no value in taking away the construction materials. Then, Lorne left the workshop area and began walking in the other direction. According to the map, the warehouse was located in the west. There was a huge area there, where all the resources were stored. Along the way, Lorne did not find any other valuable resources. The city was much emptier than he had imagined. However, he realized that everything here was extraordinary. Even the tiles under his feet had a powerful background. Ding! “Congratulations on discovering the building material: [Ancient Giant Rock Slab]!” The total blueprint of the buildings in Cold Desolate Dragon City gave Lorne the ability to identify most of the building materials, so he casually checked the surrounding resources. The huge bricks on the ground were actually ancient rocks. [Ancient Giant Rock Slab] Grade: Rare Defense: 1000 Resistance: 80% Durability: 100,000 / 100,000 Introduction: A stone slab made from ancient giant rocks. It has a powerful quality and is extremely sturdy. “Wow, it actually has 100,000 durability!” Lorne’s eyes widened. Typically, rocks, steel, and others were used for their durability. The higher the durability, the harder they were. As for ordinary rocks, their durability was about 2000 points, their defense was 50, and their resistance was 25%. In other words, a player with an attack power of 1,000 points needed to attack three times to break this rock. As for the stone slab in front of him, a player with 1,000 Attack needed at least 5,000 attacks to shatter it. In “Divine Realm”, players dealt the lowest damage when attacking buildings. If the damage dealt was 20% of the building’s defense, then it could inflict the lowest 10% damage. It was because of this rule that players with 1,000 Attack Points had a chance to shatter this stone slab. Otherwise, under normal circumstances, they would not be able to cause any damage. Therefore, from here, it could be seen how firm this city was. It was simply invulnerable. … Ding! “Congratulations on discovering the building material: [Ancient Giant Rock Pillar]!” “Congratulations on discovering the building material: [Ancient Steel Plate]!” “Congratulations on discovering the building material: [Ancient Crystal].” Along the way, Lorne used Identification on various buildings and was completely shocked. To him, this was not a ruin at all, but a “city of treasures” built with expensive materials! Looking at the expensive building materials, the desire to occupy this place became clearer. As for Walter’s mission? Lorne did not care anymore. How could he hand such a good city to the Dragon of Light? Don’t be ridiculous. Even if the Dragon of Light wanted to give him a divine equipment as a reward, he would not accept it. In Lorne’s eyes, this Cold Desolate Dragon City was much more important than a divine artifact. As long as he could turn this Dragon City into his territory, he could not only control the monster resources around him, but he could also immediately develop a large amount of the surrounding minerals. On the way, he had discovered countless mineral veins. If he could develop them all, he would definitely be able to accumulate enough wealth. Even repairing a city would not be a problem. Of course, this idea was still too naive. If Lorne really wanted to achieve this goal, in addition to obtaining the City Creation Token, he had to wait for the players’ game progress. The Lake of Death was a high-level map. Before the players reached the Class Two Advancement, they could not farm monsters in this area. In addition, the Lake of Death itself was a huge threat. There were countless terrifying monsters like the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora, inside. If there was a conflict, it would be very troublesome. In short, to complete Lorne’s goal, he had to consider all factors carefully. There could not be any loopholes! … With that in mind, Lorne arrived at the storage area. As expected, the gems and other treasures here had all disappeared, leaving behind an empty warehouse. That was within his consideration. After all, dragons liked treasures. After they were disbanded, some dragons must have taken away the items inside. “This is?” After leaving the warehouse, Lorne realized that the square of the warehouse area was occupied by a huge mountain. The mountain was hundreds of meters tall and covered in moss and weeds, filling up all the areas to the west. But to his curiosity, the mountain seemed too orderly. It was clearly such a huge mountain range, but the entire thing seemed to have been cut. It was unbelievably neat. Lorne stepped forward to clear the moss, but the next second, he was pleasantly surprised. On this huge mountain, there was actually a group of straight cracks, and there was one every few meters. Clearly, this was not a mountain, but a stack of rocks. Lorne placed his hand on the rock and activated Identification. Ding! “Congratulations on discovering a building material: Ancient Giant Rock!” Indeed, the mountain in front of Lorne was made of ancient rocks. It was difficult to estimate the size of this mountain, because it was connected to the western mountain range of the Cold Desolate Dragon City and had completely fused with these giant rocks. According to his initial estimation, he should be able to repair most of the city walls. This was good news. As long as the city wall was repaired, other buildings were not a problem. After all, the city wall was the main defense against attacks. Other residences and workshops could be built with ordinary materials. The only pity was that there were no other materials here. If he wanted to repair the workshop, these rocks were not enough. Lorne was helpless. Many of the storage rooms in this warehouse area were empty. He wondered who had come here and cleaned up the place. “Strange, why is the dragon nest here?” Opening the map again, Lorne found that the dragon nest that was most likely to have gems was at the back of the Dragon City. The dragon nest marked on the map was very long and narrow, looking like a canal from the map. He left the storage area and passed through the hall that had nothing. He arrived at the back of the city and saw a bottomless abyss. On both sides of the abyss were countless caves that were filled with claw marks. Lorne was familiar with these caves. They were clearly the lair of the dragons, but this place was too steep for him to enter. He could only let the Long Tongue Bat scout the situation. The little guy did not know fear as it charged into the dragons’ nest. With the help of his pet’s shared view, Lorne could see what was happening inside. The cave was dark, and there were no gems inside. However, that did not stop Lorne from exploring. He began to let the Long Tongue Bat investigate the caves below. Time passed little by little. When the Long Tongue Bat reached the hundredth cave, Lorne could no longer hold back. He did not have much time left. There were only a few hours until the mission expired. He could not waste any more time here. Lorne began to follow the abyss. At the edge was another valley. From the map, that was where the dragon had been buried after its death. To Lorne, that place was more tempting. As he thought, he arrived deep in the valley and was quickly shocked by the scene before him. In the interior of this mountain gap, there was an incomparably huge cave, but this was not the key area. The true target was still deeper in the cave. Lorne followed the path deeper underground. The space inside grew larger and darker. Not long after, Lorne saw a huge black skeleton in the corner of the cave. There was faint black smoke coming from the bones. Clearly, the skeleton had been severely corroded by the undead power. As he neared, the black smoke on the skeleton gradually condensed into the appearance of a dragon. “Human? Your aura is very strange.” The dragon soul said in an old voice. “Under the command of Lord Hamut, the Dragon of Light, I came to the ruins of the war to find the dragons corroded by the power of darkness and bring your souls and bodies back to the Church of Light to rest in peace.” “No wonder you have a rich aura of light on you. It seems that you should be deeply loved by Lord Hamut.” The dragon soul said, “A thousand years have passed. Our souls are finally freed.” “Our? Are there other dragons here?” “Yes.” The dragon soul said, “A thousand years ago, the ultimate battle of light and darkness broke out. I once followed Lord Walter to fight the bone dragon army at the Lake of Death, but because there were too many enemies, my companions and I were severely injured by the dark bone dragon, and even the team was completely scattered.” “However, we were lucky to discover the former Cold Desolate Dragon City and used the soul power of the dragons here to maintain a long life. Unfortunately, we did not survive in the end. In the end, because the dark energy was too deeply infected, our souls were unable to leave the ruins of the war.” “Soul power?” “Yes, this is the tomb of the dragon in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. All the dead dragons will be buried here.” The dragon soul said, “Because many dragons will be infected with the power of darkness when they die, they thought of using the soul power of other deceased dragons to dilute the power of darkness on the dragon corpses. It was also because we absorbed the remaining soul power here that we lived for many years.” “Then how did you become like this?” Lorne was curious. The other party had said that the power of the dragon soul could disperse the power of darkness, but they, who had absorbed the power of the dragon soul, were now corroded by the same power of darkness. This was contradictory. “I’m ashamed to say this, but at that time, the first thing we thought of was to heal our injuries and prolong our lives.” “However, after we recovered most of our injuries, we realized that we did not have enough dragon soul power to disperse the dark power, so after that, we all suffered from the corrosion of the dark power.” The dragon soul said in shame. “What about the other dragons?” “They should be in the tomb too. Everyone found a random spot.” “By the way, have you seen the resources in the warehouse of the Cold Desolate Dragon City?” Lorne asked eagerly. These dragons had arrived here a thousand years ago. Perhaps they had also collected some treasures. The dragon soul said, “At that time, there were still many treasures in the Dragon City. We searched everywhere, and the treasures accumulated by everyone were piled up in the nest.” Damn, it really existed!!! Lorne’s eyes widened as he quickly asked, “Where is your nest?” “If you’re thinking of finding treasures, don’t bother. In order to survive, we found the huge beasts of the Lake of Death and used the treasures of the dragons to exchange for many medicinal herbs to prolong their lives, so we sold most of the treasures already.” Damn! If not for the fact that he had promised his mother not to kill anyone this year, the bastard would have been reduced to bone powder by Lorne’s short staff. From the words of the dragon soul, Lorne learned that there were many gems and crystals in the warehouse of Cold Desolate Dragon City, but they had all been spent by the dragons. Fortunately, one of the dragons liked to collect treasures, and before he died, he did not sell the gems he had collected. However, in order to hide from the other dragons, he hid all his treasures. If Lorne searched carefully, there was still hope of finding them. Hearing this, Lorne finally felt better. The dragon also lay weakly on the dragon skeleton, “Thank you, human adventurer. Please accept my reward.” With that, a white light spread from the dragon soul and sprinkled on Lorne. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the blessing of the Dragon Soul: Divine Power+2.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the Dragon Soul: Water Dragon Crystal (Fragment) x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the gift of the Dragon Soul: Dragon’s Skeleton (Fragment) x1.” “Congratulations on obtaining the recognition of the Dragon Soul: Dragon Race of Order Reputation Points+100.” Fortunately, he was not so poor that he was penniless. He finally gave some rewards. With this blessing, Lorne’s total divine power had reached 50 points! This could allow the [Angel’s Descent] skill to last for 50 seconds, and in this state, Lorne was basically invincible. “Human adventurer, please inform the Dragon of Light, Lord Hamut, of the news of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. I believe that the Dragon God will definitely reward you handsomely!” The dragon soul said weakly. “Yes, I will.” Lorne activated the Dragon’s Treasure Vault and took in the dragon soul and skeleton that had reached the end of its life. The next second, the corners of his mouth curled up into a sly smile. These dragons really thought that he would pass on the information of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. They were joking. He would not be foolish enough to give away such a huge treasure that even the Dragon of Light cared about. After dealing with the dragon’s remains, Lorne continued forward. There were other dragons in this underground dragon tomb. He had to find them properly. He could not let go of any of them! Lorne began to search the cave carefully. Soon, he found a large pile of dragon corpses. Unfortunately, the corpses of these dragons had existed for too long. The bones had long lost their spirituality. They were now a pile of useless bones. Not to mention a Mutated Bone Dragon, even stepping on it would shatter the bones into pieces. Lorne tried to use the Dragon’s Treasure Vault to collect a more complete dragon skeleton, but the mission panel did not change. Therefore, these were all true trash and were useless. … “How long is this tomb?” After traveling for more than ten minutes, Lorne realized that the space here was astonishing. It was like an underground kingdom. No wonder that greedy dragon could not be robbed as long as it entered this dragon tomb. Lorne slowly checked the time. It was nine in the morning. More than nine hours had passed since the updated version started. There were still three hours before the event ended. If he could not find the dragon with the treasure within three hours, then Lorne could only leave first. As he thought, he discovered a new dragon ahead. Lorne immediately stepped forward to speak. Soon, white light poured over him. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the blessing of the Dragon Soul: Divine Power+2.” “…” “…” He had obtained another two points of divine power, and there was also the Water Dragon Crystal fragment. These were all wealth. He would definitely need them to build his territory in the future. In addition, Lorne obtained another dragon skeleton. This was the fourth dragon skeleton he had obtained. In the Dragon of Light’s mission, the dragon skeleton was an additional mission requirement. The reward could be higher with every additional one. Thinking of this, Lorne became even more excited. This was because he was basically certain that as long as he discovered the soul of a dragon in this dragon tomb, he would definitely be able to obtain a dragon skeleton! Therefore, Lorne explored even faster. In this dragon tomb, although the scene was strange, there were no monsters, so there was no need to worry too much. All he needed to do was speed up. … Ding! “Congratulations on collecting: Dragon Soul!” “Congratulations on collecting: Dragon Skeleton!” “Congratulations…” “…” As the exploration time increased, the number of dragon souls and dragon skeletons gathered increased. In just two hours, he had already collected 11 dragon souls and 11 dragon skeletons in this tomb. These dragon souls brought him 22 points of divine power, causing his current divine power to reach 70 points. In addition, there were many water dragon crystal fragments accumulated on Lorne’s body. Ding! “Congratulations on collecting 10 water dragon crystal fragments. You can merge them into a complete water dragon crystal. Would you like to merge?” “Merge.” “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining Water Dragon Crystal x1.” A complete Water Dragon Crystal appeared in Lorne’s bag. Although he did not know its value for the time being, he could still sense that this gem should be very precious from the harsh conditions to merge it. Putting the gem away, Lorne did not continue exploring the dragon tomb. He did not have much time. He had to return to Iron Skull City to submit his mission. Lorne was about to take out the teleportation circle of Iron Skull City when he saw a small light. He looked over in surprise and quickly went up to check. He realized that there was also the skeleton of a dragon here, but unlike other dragons, there was a large pile of gems in the abdomen of this corpse that was piled up like a small mountain. Seeing this, Lorne was enlightened. No wonder those dragons said that they could not find the treasure hidden by a dragon. It turned out that it had eaten the treasures. The dragon’s corpse corroded very slowly. When the treasure was exposed, the other dragons were basically on the verge of death. Therefore, these treasures were preserved. Lorne quickly ran up and put the gems and gold coins into his bag. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the Dragon Race’s Night Pearl x5,000!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Ancient Crystal x3500!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Ancient Ruby x4000!” “Congratulations…” Lorne collected resources crazily. The tens of thousands of different gem materials in front of him were all taken away by him. After collecting them, he immediately took out the teleportation scroll. There was no longer any time to waste. He had to hurry back to Iron Skull City to submit the mission, or else the mission would expire. Without hesitation, Lorne crushed the teleportation scroll. In the next moment, an indigo light rose from his body, and he instantly vanished on the spot. Swish! With a flash of light, Lorne appeared in a huge magic circle. After wandering in the dark ruins of the war for a week, he finally returned. Perhaps because the scenery of the Lake of Death was too dark, or because the monsters in the Doomsday Forest were too ugly, he felt that everything he saw in the main city looked good. The Light faction mainly focused on bright decor, while the ruins of war was dark in nature. The difference between the two was so great that Lorne was not used to it. Standing in the resurrection array, Lorne looked around, especially at the players. It could be seen that the mainstream players at this stage were all around Level 23. The elite players who survived the ruins of the war had mostly reached Level 27. For example, the top experts of the guilds had reached Level 29. If nothing unexpected happened, they might break through the limit of Level 30 before tomorrow. Seeing this, Lorne could not help but sigh. Ordinary players had their own benefits. At the very least, they did not have to worry about leveling up. Unlike him, in just ten days, he had spent nearly 30 million experience points to barely raise the levels of his pets. “it seems I still have a pet space unused?” Lorne looked at his pets and realized that there was still an empty spot in his pet space. This was the blessing that Walter had given him at the last moment before he left. However, in his subconscious, he actually thought that he had already placed the [Bone Spider King] in this pet space. He did not know that a pet space had actually been automatically unlocked when he reached Level 30. To think that he had wanted to change “Venom” to free up a new pet space. “Alright. Before I have a good choice, I won’t subdue new monsters for the time being. I have to reach Level 40 soon!” The more pets there were, the greater the pressure to level up. This was also one of the main reasons why Lorne did not dare to subdue too many Boss-level pets. Therefore, his current plan was to first raise his level to 40. At that time, he would consider his new pet. This was because his pets had already reached Level 30. The only ones who had not reached the required level were ‘Aisha’ and ‘Venom’. The EXP requirement for Venom was not a problem. The hardest part was still Aisha’s need to level up. Her experience requirement was about twice that of “Little Spider”. In other words, Lorne had to farm another 20 million experience points, or else Aisha’s level would remain below Level 30 and he would not be able to level up. “Phew…” Taking a deep breath, Lorne pushed aside his thoughts and walked towards the Church of Light in the center of the main city. … Soon, Lorne arrived at the entrance of the church. Just like the first time, this place was filled with people. Because today was the end of the event, countless players came here to submit their missions. Under the guidance of a beautiful priestess, Lorne entered the church and saw the Dragon of Light, Hamut, in an important area. “Young man, you’ve grown faster than I imagined.” The golden dragon in midair looked at Lorne with its incomparably huge golden eyes, “Your followers have all received a huge increase in strength, and your divine power is many times stronger than before.” The Dragon of Light looked at Lorne in satisfaction, then asked, “So, what’s the progress of the mission I gave you?” “In response to your call, I have found 1350 corpses of warriors in the Doomsday Forest. They are all warriors of the Empire. I hope that they can rest in the cemetery as soon as possible.” Lorne handed in the mission first. Although he did not collect many corpses, the quality of these corpses was very high. Most of them had titles. These corpses could be exchanged for more rewards than ordinary corpses. The Dragon of Light nodded, and the corpses of the warriors disappeared. Then, a golden light landed on Lorne. Ding! “Congratulations on completing the mission: May the Dead Rest in Peace!” “Reward: Church of Light Reputation+3105, Empire Reputation+7425!” This mission was completed on the way. The reward was not bad, and the reputation points added up to more than 10,000. Compared to the few hundred reputation points gained from killing the Boss, this mission was clearly filled with benefits. “Dragon God, when I was searching for the dragon souls in the Doomsday Forest, I accidentally discovered a group of undead Liches casting evil undead magic on the dragon skeleton. They seemed to be planning something sinister!” Lorne handed in another mission. This was an information-type mission. Because it involved the battle between the Dark faction and the Light faction, there should be a lot of rewards. Lorne looked forward to it. The Dragon of Light’s expression became much more serious, “Young man, your information is very important. The Dragon of Darkness, Doris, is planning to make a bone dragon army recently. The dragon skeletons in the Doomsday Forest are her targets.” “The bone dragons, who can fly high in the sky, are too dangerous to the fortresses of Iron Skull City. Once they reach a certain size, they might even break through the defense of the border fortress.” “Therefore, we can’t let her succeed!” The Dragon of Light pondered for a moment and muttered, “Perhaps I should increase the exploration of the Doomsday Forest. It just so happens that the adventurers have grown to a certain extent. They can completely train in the Doomsday Forest.” From the sound of it, he wanted to use the Doomsday Forest as the center of attention? Lorne could not help but think of the Cold Desolate Dragon City he had discovered. If he could make it his territory now, he would definitely be able to earn a huge profit from the teleportation array. Unfortunately, this was still too far away. Ding! “As you have reported important military information to the Dragon of Light, Hamut, you have received a reward: Faction Reputation+2,000, Church of Light Reputation+5,000!” The mission reward was given. These reputation points rewards were very good. However, this was only the appetizer, not his main mission. Just as Lorne was about to speak, the Dragon of Light spoke first, “Then, young man, offer up the [Dragon Souls] you have collected. The number of dragon souls will determine my final evaluation of you.” The Dragon of Light looked at Lorne seriously, for this was a mission regarding the Divine Radiance. He hoped that the young man before him could surprise him. “Yes, Lord Dragon God.” Lorne nodded, then began to take out the dragon souls from the Dragon’s Treasure Vault. A ball of dragon soul… Two… Three… Four… Five… The Dragon of Light had given Lorne the mission of finding five dragon souls, so when it saw that Lorne had calmly taken out five dragon souls, it immediately nodded in satisfaction. “Young man, you are stronger than I imagined. Congratulations on successfully completing my test. You will receive a generous mission reward!” With that, the system’s notification sounded in Lorne’s ear. Ding! “Congratulations on completing the mission: [Divine Radiance (1)]!” “Grade A mission reward: …” “Wait—” Before the reward could be given, Lorne interrupted the notification. He looked at the Dragon of Light and said, “Dragon God, I have found more than five dragon souls in the ruins of the war.” “Oh?” The Dragon of Light’s eyes lit up. It was obviously very surprised. Lorne took out a new dragon soul from his bag. Six… Seven… Eight… Nine… Ten… In the blink of an eye, a huge cluster of light appeared in the church. Every ball of light was a sleeping soul of the dragons. Seeing the scene before him, the Dragon of Light could not help but be shocked. He looked at Lorne in surprise, “Young man, I really did not expect that with your strength back then, you could actually find ten dragon souls in the ruins of the war. This is definitely not an achievement that can be tested!” Before the Dragon of Light’s praise could stop, Lorne saw that his mission reward had changed. The mission reward that was originally only A-level directly increased to SS-level at this moment! From the looks of it, as long as he handed in some souls, he could still increase the reward of the mission. “Dragon God, please wait a moment.” Lorne quickly took out the remaining dragon souls from his bag. When he retrieved the 15th dragon soul, he looked at the Dragon of Light and said, “Dragon God, this is the soul of a dragon named Walter. He entrusted me to tell you that he has let down your expectations.” “Walter?” Hearing this name, the expression of the Dragon of Light immediately changed. Its huge golden eyes suddenly constricted, and its sadness surged. Seeing him like this, Lorne was pleased. This time, his mission reward would definitely be rich. “It was my fault. If I could have had an angel team accompany you to fight the bone dragon army, you would not have died.” The Dragon of Light looked at the dragon soul in front of it, and the emotion in its huge golden eyes was slightly sad, “Walter, although you did not win completely, you defeated the bone dragon army in the Lake of Death. You are a heroic warrior of the Light Faction, don’t worry. Next, I will use the power of faith to nourish your soul and think of a way to reconstruct your body and resurrect you…” Damn!!! Lorne could not help but be shocked. The Dragon of Light was really powerful. It could actually resurrect a dead dragon! This would not do. If Walter revived, then wouldn’t the matter of the Cold Desolate Dragon City be impossible to hide? “Dragon God, can you resurrect dead dragons?” Lorne asked nervously. “Yes.” The Dragon of Light nodded, “As long as I use the power of faith in the church, I can repair their souls and help them rebuild their bodies. However, this will take a long time. Moreover, it’s not peaceful recently. I can’t use all my energy to deal with this.” Lorne was overjoyed, “How long will it take?” “It can be as short as a few months or as long as many years.” The Dragon of Light sighed. He also wanted to resurrect Walter as soon as possible, but his strength could not reach that level. Hearing this answer, Lorne sighed heavily. To him, it was the best outcome for Walter to be revived in a few months, because at this time, he could completely turn Cold Desolate Dragon City into his guild territory. “Young man, I’m glad you can find Walter’s soul. He was once one of the four most capable commanders under me.” “The embers of the war seem to be about to reignite. By resurrecting him, the Light Faction will have a stronger foundation.” “As the hero, you should also receive the highest reward for this mission!” With that, the Dragon of Light’s eyes emitted a bright radiance, and golden light poured over Lorne like raindrops. Ding! “Congratulations on thoroughly completing the mission: [Divine Radiance (1)], the Dragon of Light, Hamut, has given you an SSSSS-level mission reward!” Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the mission reward: EXP+1 million (+2.5 million) (+3.5 million)!” “Congratulations on obtaining the mission reward: Empire Reputation+50,000, Light Faction Reputation+10,000!” “Congratulations on obtaining the mission reward: Free Attribute+100, [Class Specific Equipment Set Treasure Chest] (Platinum) x1!” A series of system rewards appeared. However, this was only the mission reward. After this notification, the Dragon of Light gave Lorne an additional reward. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the reward of the Dragon of Light: Divine Power+10!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Dragon of Light’s gift: Light Dragon Crystal x1, Dragon Soul Compass x1, Dragon Treasure Vault x1!” “Congratulations on obtaining the recognition of the Dragon of Light: Dragon of Light’s affinity+100, Dragon Race of Order Reputation+500!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Dragon of Light’s gift: Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia x1!” Looking at the series of information on the system interface, Lorne was so happy that he could not speak. The mission reward was 7 million experience points, 50,000 Empire Reputation, 10,000 Faction Reputation Points, 100 Free Attribute Points, and a Platinum-grade equipment set treasure chest! There was no need to pay attention to the previous rewards. Most importantly, it was the Platinum Treasure Chest! ———— [Class Specific Equipment Set Treasure Chest] Grade: Platinum Effect: After opening it, one of the parts of a Platinum Equipment Set can be obtained. ———— Yes, this was a Platinum equipment set treasure chest! Although there was only one piece of equipment inside, in “Divine Realm”, as long as there was one, one could drop other parts when killing Bosses. It just so happened that Lorne urgently needed to change his equipment. This treasure chest came at the right time. However, now was not the time to open the treasure chest. He still had other missions that he had not completed. Moreover, the most important reward was not this treasure chest! After the mission reward, Lorne received an additional reward from the Dragon of Light. First, it was 10 points of divine power. In this case, Lorne’s divine power reached 80 points! 80 seconds of flying could allow him to deal with more danger and overcome most of the special terrain. Next were the [Light Dragon Crystal], [Dragon Soul Compass], and [Dragon’s Treasure Vault]! To Lorne, the dragon crystal was not unfamiliar. The dragon souls had given him dragon crystal fragments before, and the only difference was that the dragon crystal’s attributes were “Light”! This should be a Dragon Crystal unique to the Dragon of Light. If that was the case, then the value of this Dragon Crystal would definitely be more expensive than other Dragon Crystals of other attributes. In addition, the Dragon of Light gave him the Dragon Soul Compass and the Dragon Treasure Vault. These two special items were definitely the most, most, most precious among all the rewards! These were the two items that Lorne wanted the most. Now, he had finally succeeded. The only worry in Lorne’s heart vanished. As for the subsequent rewards? There was no need to elaborate on the Dragon of Light’s affinity and the Dragon Race of Order reputation. In short, they were very rare. In the end, Lorne obtained a very important reward—[Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia]! ———— [Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia] Grade: Legendary Introduction: A pharmacopoeia passed down from generation to generation by the Dragon of Light. It records a large number of medicinal herb characteristics and potion formulas. Carrying this tool, one can immediately obtain the ability to differentiate high-level medicinal herbs and possess a super-level potion brewing skill and high-level herb-picking skill. (Note: The potion formulas of the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia require enough Dragon Race reputation points to unlock. Moreover, the higher the quality of the potion, the higher the reputation points required for the Dragon Race of Order.) ———— Seeing the effect of the tool, Lorne was stunned. What kind of ability did he need now? He would definitely say that it was herb-picking! This was because there were countless herbs in the alchemy workshop of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. According to the experience of the players, those were definitely high quality special potions and were extremely valuable. If he did not obtain this medicinal book, he would definitely go to the Alchemist Association and let them help identify the medicinal herbs. But now, there was no need. With this pharmacopoeia on him, he could completely differentiate the herbs himself and collect them! In addition, this pharmacopoeia gave him the ability to brew high-grade potions. Lorne checked the potion formulas and found that the potions were all very advanced. The effect was several times stronger than that of Iron Skull City’s potions of the same level! If he built a territory city in the future, then these special potions would definitely become the number one product in the territory! However, it seemed that the high-level potion part of the pharmacopoeia could only be unlocked with a very high Dragon Race reputation. With his current Dragon Race reputation, he could only check the formula for a level 4 potion. ….. “Young man, you found so many dragon souls in the ruins of the war. Did you find the skeletons of the dragons?” The Dragon of Light’s voice cut through Lorne’s delusions. “Yes.” Lorne nodded, then took out the dragon skeletons from his bag. Dragon skeletons were rarer than dragon souls, but because Lorne had found dragon souls in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he had obtained a lot of dragon skeletons. Lorne took them all out. There were a total of 12 dragon skeletons. “Very good.” The Dragon of Light said, “Doris is creating the undead bone dragon. You have collected so many dragon skeletons, which is equivalent to ruining her plan. This is a huge contribution. I should give you the most generous reward.” “Young man, your bloodline is still the most ordinary human bloodline. It can’t bring you greater potential.” Bloodline?! Lorne was pleasantly surprised. As the number one player, he knew very well that bloodline could bring greater strength to players. It was an attribute that was as important as a hidden class. According to the Dragon of Light, it wanted to give him a high-level bloodline! With that in mind, Lorne immediately replied, “Dragon God, I hope to obtain the most powerful bloodline.” “Yes, young man. Since you’re so ambitious, I’ll give you two choices.” The Dragon of Light said, “Firstly, there is a very rare dragon bloodline. This bloodline can allow you to have the same talent as dragons. Although it is not the strongest, it is relatively easy to nurture. Your future path will be very smooth.” “Secondly, there is the Divine Dragon bloodline. This is the bloodline flowing through the body of the Great Divine Dragon of Order. It has the greatest power in this world, but correspondingly, it is the bloodline that is the most difficult to nurture. If you choose this bloodline, your future path will be very bumpy!” “Young man, which do you choose?” The Dragon of Light looked at Lorne again, as if the Dragon God liked to see people make choices. This time, it gave Lorne two options. However, according to previous practices, the latter was definitely the best choice. Especially since he was doing the “Divine Radiance” mission. As the source of the power of the Divine Dragon of Order, he had to use the bloodline of the Divine Dragon of Order to control it. The result was obvious. Lorne answered directly, “Dragon God, I choose the Divine Dragon Bloodline. For the sake of the eternal light of this world, I am willing to walk the most difficult path of growth!” “Young man, I admire your courage, but this is no small matter. I hope you can reconsider and not make a decision in a hurry.” “There’s no need to consider, Dragon God. I’m sure of my choice!” “Alright…” The Dragon of Light no longer advised, but it could be seen from his eyes that this was the result he wanted. Then, a brilliant light blossomed from his body like a golden sun. In the center of the sun, a drop of blood that emitted endless light poured into Lorne. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the Dragon of Light’s gift: Divine Dragon Bloodline!” When the system notification sound disappeared, Lorne immediately felt a warm feeling in his body, as if all the cells in his body had been purified. His attributes had also been greatly enhanced at this moment. Lorne immediately opened his attributes panel to check for information regarding the bloodline. The moment he saw the bloodline information, he was completely stunned. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios ———— [Divine Dragon Bloodline] Grade: Mythical Purity: 10% Effect: +10% HP, +10% MP, +10% Movement Speed, +10% Critical Strike chance, +10% chance of immunity to negative effects, 5-Stars Aptitude. Introduction: The bloodline of a Mythical Dragon. When its purity reaches 100%, your constitution will undergo a qualitative change. ———— It could be seen that this was a Mythical bloodline. Although its purity was only 10%, the effect was very terrifying. HP, MP, movement speed, and critical strike chance were all increased by 10%. Although the attributes that were increased now were not much, when his stats increase in the future, the percentage increase would be more obvious.. Moreover, this was only a bloodline with 10% purity. If one day, Lorne could raise his bloodline to 100%, then this bloodline could directly double his attributes! In addition, this bloodline gave him the 5-Stars Aptitude. Any player in the Divine Realm knew that aptitude represented the Free Attribute Points that players could obtain per level. 5-Stars Aptitude meant 150 Free Attribute Points on the current Lorne. This increase was already terrifying. ...; “Young man, your bloodline is already the most precious bloodline in the world, but your class is too ordinary…” The Dragon of Light’s golden eyes looked at Lorne seriously, as if he had seen everything. Lorne’s eyes widened again. Was the Dragon God going to give him a hidden class? This was a great thing. Lorne quickly said, “Dragon God, I hope to obtain the most powerful hidden class. Only then will I not sully the bloodline of the Divine Dragon of Order.” “Young man, I think you might be mistaken. I don’t want to give you a hidden class, because the path you choose is to inherit the Divine Radiance. Therefore, before you truly master the Divine Radiance, you cannot change your class to another hidden class.” “Moreover, I don’t think there is a class that is suitable for you in this world. A fixed Summoner Hidden Class will only limit your future. Even the Dragon Summoner class is not suitable for you.” “In my opinion, you are a very charming Summoner. So many monsters with powerful potential are willing to follow in your footsteps. I think you should persist in this development and walk your own path. This is very likely to be an opportunity for you to ignite your divine flame.” The Dragon of Light said slowly. Although he did not gain any substantial benefits, Lorne felt that he had a point. Moreover, he had also obtained a very important piece of information, which was—whether or not he could persist in his development would affect the chances of igniting his divine flame! Although Lorne did not understand the true meaning, he knew he had to keep that in mind. This might be a special notification from the game system. In addition, it seemed that the players really had a chance to ignite their divine flame and become as powerful as the Dragon of Light. Coupled with the fact that the Divine Realm could be materialized, Lorne was even more excited. ...; “Although I can’t let you change your class to a hidden class, I can help you make up for your lack of class potential.” The Dragon of Light said, “The strength of a hidden class lies in your potential and the skills you have mastered. Now that you have the bloodline of the Divine Dragon, your aptitude has also increased. In that case, I only need to give you some special skills now and you can make up for another disadvantage.” With that, the Dragon of Light’s eyes shot out a golden light that shone on Lorne. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the guidance of the Dragon of Light. You have successfully learned the skill: [Cooperative Strike]!” “Congratulations on obtaining the guidance of the Dragon of Light. You have successfully learned the skill: [Triple Blink]!” “Congratulations on obtaining the guidance of the Dragon of Light. You have successfully learned the skill: [Damage Transfer]!” “Congratulations on obtaining the guidance of the Dragon of Light. You have successfully learned a skill: [Super Frequency Release]!” In a short moment, Lorne learned four skills. These were skills personally taught by the Dragon of Light. The effects were definitely astonishing! Lorne eagerly opened his skill panel. There were indeed four additional skills inside, and the skill icons were all glowing orange-gold. ———— [Cooperative Strike] (Orange) Quality: ??? Level: 1 Effect: Give your own attack power to the pet to achieve a joint attack effect. This skill can be used together with another skill. Duration: 3 seconds. Cooldown: 30 seconds. Consumption: 1000 MP. ———— This was the first skill that Lorne had obtained, a rare Orange skill. Previously, it had been said that the “color” skills were different from ordinary quality-based skills. Under normal circumstances, skills that were orange in color would at least be S-grade and at the highest SSS-grade. The specific value would depend on the effect of the skill. In Lorne’s eyes, this skill was definitely an SSS-grade top-notch skill. This was because the main damage dealer of the team “Aisha” had a [Phantom Combo+] skill. This skill could not deal critical damage, but it could be effective at the same time as an amplification skill. If Lorne used the [Cooperative Strike] skill on Aisha, her damage output would increase by another level. “Are the other skills as powerful as this?!” Feeling awesome, Lorne closed the panel and checked another skill. ———— [Triple Blink] (Orange) Quality: ??? Level: 1 Effect: Teleport towards a designated location. The distance can reach up to 50 yards at maximum. It can be stored for up to three consecutive uses. Cooldown: 10 seconds. Consumption: 400 MP per use. ———— The effect of this skill was simply ridiculous. Everyone knew that Blink was a Mage player’s signature movement skill. Just the movement alone gave all the melee players a headache. Furthermore, this skill could store three uses! With this skill and the flying effect of the Angel’s Wings, Lorne could basically ignore any attack that flew at him. ...; Then, the third skill. ———— [Damage Transfer] (Orange) Quality: ??? Level: 1 Effect: After binding with a pet, it will share 50% of its master’s damage. However, attacks will deal double the damage to it. Cooldown: 1 hour. Consumption: None. ———— With this skill, Lorne could distribute the damage he suffered to his pets, increasing his survivability. Of course, the damage dealt would be doubled for pets. For example, if he received 100 points of damage, the pet would receive 50% of the damage. 50% was 50 points of damage, but on the pet, it would deal 100 points of damage. However, that did not matter. After all, Lorne’s pets had hundreds of thousands of health points. It was difficult to deal fatal damage to them. Looking at the last skill. ———— [Super Frequency Release] (Orange) Quality: ??? Level: 1 Effect: Directly allow a certain skill of the pet to be refreshed. Cooldown: 60 seconds. Consumption: 1000 MP. ———— Like the first skill, this was also a support skill. In terms of the effect on pets, Lorne felt that this skill was more powerful. It could immediately refresh Aisha’s Phantom Combo+ and deal a second wave of damage. According to the upper limit of Aisha’s current attack, two [Phantom Combo+] attacks would cause her maximum damage to exceed 160,000! No monster could withstand such a frequency of damage. Even a Level 20 Boss might be instantly killed by such damage. From this, it could be seen that these few skills had made a tremendous change in Lorne’s strength. Even without a hidden class, he could still surpass that of any player. … “With these skills, your strength has also reached a certain level. I think I can give you another special mission now.” Special mission? Lorne immediately nodded in agreement. Based on the mission reward today, the missions given by the Dragon of Light in the future were all important. He had to complete them as soon as possible. “A long, long time ago, the dragons once led the Light Faction. At that time, in order to resist the attack of the darkness, the dragons built a grand city on the border and sent countless dragons to guard there, completely dispelling the darkness to the north of the world.” “But many years later, a final battle suddenly erupted. The Dragon Race and the Dark Abyss fought the most intense battle for their territory. Although the Dragon Race won in the end, they also suffered heavy losses. The once huge Dragon Race directly lost 90% of their members…” “Such a race with few members could no longer rule such a huge world. Therefore, the future world was no longer under the dragon’s control…” “Humanity stood out from countless races. They built their empire and redistributed the border, but this also caused the Cold Desolate Dragon City to no longer stand on the border. The isolated Cold Desolate Dragon City faced the attacks of countless monsters, but the remaining dragons still held on bitterly, unwilling to abandon this honored city.” “Year after year passed like this. Due to not stepping into this area, the people of the Light faction began to forget this city.” “After several thousand years of change, the Cold Desolate Dragon City completely disappeared from the history of this world.” At this point, the Dragon of Light was very sad. After a moment of silence, it continued, “As a descendant of the Dragon Race, I have always remembered that glorious city. Now that the Dark Abyss is restless, I think that if we can find the Dragon City standing in the north, we might be able to use it as a foundation to build another defense!” “Therefore, I hope that you can use the power of the [Dragon Soul Compass] and [Angel’s Wings] to find this lost Cold Desolate Dragon City.” Eh… Lorne was speechless. He had thought that it was a profitable mission, but in the end, it was to find Cold Desolate Dragon City. “What do you want me to do, Dragon God?” Lorne asked deliberately. “I hope you can go to the ruins of the war again. I once heard that the Cold Desolate Dragon City is in the ruins of the war. The Dragon Soul Compass I gave you can sense the existence of the Cold Desolate Dragon City from a certain distance. I hope it can help you.” “Don’t worry, Dragon God. I will definitely complete the mission.” Lorne immediately accepted the mission firmly. This made the Dragon of Light very satisfied with him. Lorne struck while the iron was hot. He opened the bag and took out the [Blood-stained Unknown Fragment] from the One-Eyed Giant Snake. This fragment was clearly made of a very special metal that contained rich light power. “This is a fragment of the Angel Set!” When the Dragon of Light saw this fragment, the expression in its eyes became complicated. In the end, it sighed, “It seems that you and Gabriel are indeed fated. This is a fragment of Gabriel’s Angel Set, one of the seven Demigod Equipment Sets in the Church of Light, the [Death Angel Set]. I’m glad to see this set of equipment again, as if Gabriel is still beside me.” “Unfortunately, Gabriel can no longer return.” “The war is still ongoing. This lost Demigod Set should be found and become an important force in the future to resist the Dark Abyss!” With that, a brilliant light shot out of the huge golden eyes and enveloped the small fragment. A moment later, the fragment was reconstructed in the light. Countless lights intertwined and finally formed a pair of exquisite angel boots that emitted a holy and pure light. Then, under the guidance of the Dragon of Light, the pair of angel boots turned into a light that entered Lorne’s body. However, the equipment did not fuse into his body, but into Aisha, who was resting in the pet space. Ding! “Congratulations on finding a piece of the seven Demigod Equipment Set of the Church of Light for the Dragon of Light—Death Angel’s War Boots!” “Congratulations on obtaining the reward: Dragon of Light’s affinity+10, Dragon Race of Order Reputation+100!” “Congratulations to your pet Aisha for obtaining the reward: Equipment Slot+7!” “Congratulations to your pet, Aisha, for obtaining the reward: Death Angel’s War Boots!” A series of notifications appeared. It was also at this moment that the angel boots completely fused with Aisha. On her long legs, the war boots emitted a holy light. They looked beautiful and dazzling. Lorne quickly opened Aisha’s attributes panel and found a new equipment panel. There were a total of seven spots in her equipment list: Weapon, Helmet, Shoulder Guard, Breastplate, Bracer, Leg Armor, and Shoes. Originally, pets could not obtain additional equipment attributes, but this time, with the help of the Dragon of Light, Aisha obtained this ability. In that case, Aisha’s future potential would be greater than that of any other pet. At this moment, combat boots that emitted a holy light appeared on her body. ———— Equipment: [Death Angel’s War Boots] (Set: 1 / 7) Grade: Mythical – Demigod (Fragment) Attributes: [Constitution, Spirit, Intelligence, Strength, Agility] + (Level x 2) Additional effect: Increases the user’s attack speed by 20%. Additional effect: Increases the user’s movement speed by 20%. Special Effect: Increases the user’s critical strike chance by 20%. Introduction: A piece of the Death Angel Equipment Set repaired by the Dragon of Light with the power of faith. Although it is not complete, it can still increase the user’s strength greatly. ———— “It’s different from my Angel Set!” The [Angel’s Wings] on Lorne was a Mythical equipment, but the boots were “Mythical – Demigod”, which meant they were Demigod-grade equipment. The Demigod-grade was close to the Mythical-grade, but it did not have the power to truly become Mythical. Moreover, this set only had seven items, while Lorne’s had ten. Clearly, Lorne’s own equipment set was more precious. It was no wonder that the Dragon of Light did not directly put this equipment on him. Of course, although it was a Demigod-grade equipment, the attributes of these combat boots were still very astonishing. As boots, it added (Level x 2) stats to all five attributes. There were three other special effects: +20% attack speed, +20% movement speed, +20% critical strike chance. These three effects were the ones that Assassins needed the most. It could be said that with this equipment, Aisha’s combat strength would increase by at least 50%! Therefore, this was the best outcome. However, at this moment, from the perspective of the players, Lorne saw that the elf girl, Aisha, was stunned by the boots on her legs. “Master, this equipment…” “It’s for you,” Lorne smiled, “I hope you can display greater combat strength in the future battles.” “Are you really giving it to me?” The elven girl looked at Lorne in disbelief. After receiving his affirmative answer, she nodded earnestly. At this moment, the system notification sounded. Ding! “Congratulations to your pet “Aisha” for obtaining the Demigod-grade equipment [Death Angel’s War Boots]. It is currently ranked second on the Iron Skull City’s equipment ranking and has received a +9% damage reward. Would you like to reveal the details of the equipment for the other players to admire?” “Reveal a portion,” Lorne said. Even when he obtained the Mythical equipment previously, he did not hide it, so this equipment naturally would not be concealed. Therefore, in the next moment, someone suddenly shouted through a loudspeaker in Iron Skull City. “Gosh! Look! The equipment ranking is updated!” This sentence attracted the attention of countless players. They opened the equipment rankings and checked. Then, everyone was stunned. ———— &lt; Iron Skull City Equipment Ranking &gt; [First Place]: Angel’s Wings (Mythical), Owner: Tyrant. Reward: Damage+10%. [Second Place]: Death Angel’s War Boots (Mythical – Demigod), Owner: Aisha (Tyrant) Reward: Damage+9%. … ———— When they saw the equipment that replaced the second place, countless players spat out blood. What the heck was going on? Didn’t the server just start for less than a month? Why were divine equipment appearing one after another? The players were dumbfounded. Originally, Tyrant had obtained a Mythical equipment, but everyone could still convince themselves that it was luck. But now, in just ten days, another Mythical equipment had appeared on the leaderboard! “Can someone tell me what’s ‘Mythical – Demigod’?” “The information is too high-end. Us mortals can’t understand it.” “Strange, why are there two names for the owner of this equipment?” Someone discovered the important information on the leaderboard and immediately caused a wave of commotion in the crowd. Then, countless players analyzed this information and came to a conclusion. “This Aisha should be Tyrant’s pet!” Pfft— As soon as he said this, countless players spat out a mouthful of blood. “Damn, I only obtained a set of Bronze-grade equipment now, but this guy’s pets are all wearing Mythical-grade equipment. Is this the same game?” “God Tyrant is awesome!” “I’m worse than a pet. What’s there to live for in this world?” “This game makes me doubt my life.” “Why isn’t there a report option? This Tyrant is clearly cheating. Is the system not going to do anything?” “I’m kneeling to the God-tier player now.” “Tyrant, I’m your long lost daughter, Daddy!!!” When they realized that Aisha was Lorne’s pet, all the players in the Divine Realm went crazy. The entire game forum was flooded with relevant posts. … Inside the Church of Light. “Your follower is very special. She has a very strong affinity for light, but…” The Dragon of Light looked at Lorne and said, “Her identity is even more special. It might affect your subsequent journey.” “Affect?” Lorne immediately perked up. It seemed that the Dragon of Light was about to give him a new mission. “Yes, the elves themselves are opposed to the communication between elves and humans, especially when signing a master-slave contract.” “Furthermore, she has the royal bloodline of the Night Elves. As one of the successors of the Night Elves, her people might be more hostile to you.” “As for the effect…” “If you want to obtain the qualification to master the ‘Divine Radiance’, you need the recognition of the Chiefs of the Dragon Race, so your second mission is not with me.” The Dragon of Light said slowly. “Please enlighten me, Dragon God.” Lorne nodded. He had a feeling about the development of the mission. After all, this mission was about the Divine Dragon of Order. It could not be so simple. “Your next mission is to go to the western border of Iron Skull City and find the Dragon of Emerald, Lena, in the Elven Kingdom. She is the guardian of the elves and the leader of the Emerald Dragon Race.” Hearing this, Lorne finally understood why the Dragon of Light had said that Aisha’s identity would affect him. It turned out that the second phase of the mission was in the Elven Kingdom. What was worth mentioning here was that the Elven Kingdom was not a race, but a country jointly established by many different types of elves. The Night Elves were only one of them. Aisha was formerly from the Night Elves who lived in Iron Skull City, not in the Elven Kingdom. This made Lorne hesitate, because he had another mission—[Holy Angel’s Resurrection]. The mission was to let Lorne bring Aisha to the elves’ land and let her receive the nourishment of the Ancient Tree of Life to recover her pure elemental body. He did not know if the Ancient Tree of Life was with the Night Elves. If he went to the Elven Kingdom, it would definitely cause more trouble. “Wait, Dragon God, I have another request.” Seeing that the Dragon of Light was about to leave, Lorne quickly called out to it, “Dragon God, as an adventurer who has fought the dark forces many times, I know that one person’s strength cannot affect the situation. Therefore, I would like to ask you to give me a City Creation Token so that I can build a city and cooperate with other adventurers to resist the invasion of the Dark Abyss!” Yes, Lorne was asking for the City Creation Token. This was unavoidable. This was because he had no idea where he was going to find the City Creation Token. It seemed that the game progress had not met the requirements yet, and such a tool had not been announced yet. Therefore, in order to avoid any accidents in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Lorne could only ask the Dragon of Light shamelessly. “Yes, you have a point.” “However, the City Creation Token is not an ordinary tool. Having the City Creation Token means that you have the permission of Iron Skull City to build a personal city within the territory of Iron Skull City.” “Although I am the Dragon of Light, I cannot directly interfere with the system of the Human Empire, so I cannot directly give you the City Creation Token.” “But don’t worry. There has been a war at the border of Iron Skull City recently. According to my understanding, in order to fulfill the military plan, Iron Skull City will issue a special mission to the adventurers recently. The reward is a City Creation Token. I believe that with your strength, it should not be difficult to obtain this reward.” After the Dragon of Light finished speaking, it slowly flew into the spatial vortex above under the circle of angels until it disappeared. Lorne also left the Church of Light. On the way, he opened the mission panel. This was his latest mission. ———— [Divine Radiance (2)] Quality: Epic Content: The Dragon of Light, Hamut, believes that you have the potential to inherit the Divine Radiance, so he has decided to give you the most stringent test. However, in order to truly obtain the qualification to inherit, you need to obtain the recognition of the Dragon Race’s leaders. Therefore, you need to go to any city in the Elven Kingdom, find the Elven Holy Temple, meet the noble [Dragon of Emerald, Lena], and accept her test. Level Recommendation: 40 ———— There was no specific information about the mission. Everything could only be known after meeting the Dragon of Emerald, Lena. As for the ‘suggested level’ above? This was a reminder from the system, making Lorne have an estimation of this mission. It just so happened that Lorne had his own matters to deal with. He could leave after completing them. … After leaving the Church of Light, Lorne began to plan his next step. There were many things he needed to prepare now. First, he had to raise his level to Level 40. This was the most important mission recently. While carrying out this mission, he had other matters to deal with. For example, finding an organization that could repair the city! In “Divine Realm”, three races had a natural advantage in the construction industry. They were: Human, Gnomes, and Titan. These three races each had their own advantages. For example, humans were good at implementing construction plans, gnomes were good at using machinery and design, and titans were good at building large buildings. Lorne was also surprised that mechanical technology was not controlled by humans in this world. For example, in Iron Skull City, Lorne did not see any sophisticated technology here. The only thing that needed technology was a cannon on the city wall, but he had heard that it was specially designed by the gnomes. Perhaps because the magic and sword arts in this world were too powerful, people did not think highly of mechanical technology. This was easy to understand. After all, when everyone could fly on their own, the existence of planes was meaningless. “Gnomes have automated robots?” Lorne’s eyes suddenly widened. He had discovered manpower that suited him best—robots! Although the official information only stated a few things, it filled Lorne with hope. If he could purchase mining robots, he would be able to mine the mineral veins near the Lake of Death. In this way, the funds needed to repair the Cold Desolate Dragon City would be resolved! With that in mind, Lorne’s goal became clear. “There seems to be a small tribe of gnomes under the jurisdiction of Iron Skull City.” “Let’s find Barres first. The gnomes mainly do business with ores. As the leader of the Blacksmith Guild in Iron Skull City, he should know about this.” With that in mind, Lorne headed for the Blacksmith Guild. At this moment, his friend list suddenly lit up. “Brother Tyrant, quickly go to the Alchemist Association and collect all the potions for the next half a year. Hurry, hurry!!!” This was a message from Twinkle Rose. For some reason, she wanted Lorne to buy all the potions for the next six months. The event in the ruins of the war had clearly only lasted for ten days, but now that it had ended, there was no point in hoarding the antidotes. As the guild leader, it was impossible for Twinkle Rose to not know this. Something special must have happened! “Could it be…” A thought suddenly occurred to Lorne. He immediately checked the information of the event and found that the event that was about to end had changed again. ———— Mission: [May the Dead Rest in Peace] Content: The Dragon of Light, Hamut has discovered that the minions of the Dark Faction have infiltrated the ruins of the war. In the ruins, they have polluted the corpses of the soldiers and now issue a mission to all adventurers. All players who have reached Level 20 can receive a raid mission in the Church of Light. Head to the ruins of the war and find the remains of the Empire’s soldiers. Bury them in the Empire Cemetery. You will obtain the reputation of the Empire because of this! ———— From the mission information, it could be seen that this mission was continued because Lorne had reported the Undead Lich’s resurrection of the dragon skeleton. However, the mission reward changed. Last time, it was faction reputation, but this time, it was empire reputation. Moreover, the ratio of using corpses to exchange for reputation points had decreased by ten times! It was difficult for players to complete a mission with such benefits, but large guilds valued reputation points very much. They should send a portion of their people to kill monsters in that area. Therefore, there was still a market for antidotes. Seeing this, Lorne replied to the beautiful guild leader, “Don’t worry, I’m on the way to the Alchemist Association.” Twinkle Rose immediately said happily, “Brother, please sell more potions to me in the future. When I’m free, I’ll come find you. At that time, I’ll definitely shower you with love.” “Remember to clean yourself…” “Tsk, tsk, tsk…” “Tyrant is here!” “Tyrant, don’t go. I’m here to buy medicine!” “Tyrant has escaped. He’s the only one with the antidote!” “Tyrant, take pity on me. It’s not easy for a poor kid like me to earn money!” When Lorne left through the back door of the Church of Light, due to the lack of hidden IDs, countless players quickly recognized him and surrounded him. Because the contract period between the Alchemist Association and Lorne had not passed, these players who returned to the main city were still unable to buy potions from the Alchemist Association or the retail market. Therefore, the moment they saw Lorne, they went crazy. Lorne was also shocked by the players’ enthusiasm. Being surrounded by so many people, if these people flew into a rage and started spitting, he would definitely drown in a second. Therefore, he quickly activated the skill he had just obtained—[Triple Blink]. Swish! Swish! Swish! With three rapid flashes, Lorne appeared 150 yards away, leaving the troublesome area. “Gosh! What’s going on? Where’s Master Tyrant?” The players who were about to denounce Lorne were all surprised. The potion monopoly that they had just surrounded had disappeared under the eyes of hundreds of pairs of eyes. On the surrounding buildings, some players rubbed their eyes and said in surprise, “What happened? Why did I see a figure flash in my vision three times?” “Little Brother, is your Internet unstable? Did you freeze?” His friend comforted him. “Perhaps. My family’s Internet is indeed quite bad.” … Moving away from the crowd, Lorne quickly ran towards the Alchemist Association. His contract with President Doge was about to expire. He had to negotiate with him before the time was up. With the previous cooperation, the following cooperation was more likely. With that in mind, Lorne arrived at his destination. It could be seen that the number of players gathered here was not inferior to that of the Church of Light. Most of them were second-hand merchants and players sent by large guilds to buy supplies. Everyone here thought that they could occupy a good position and buy enough potions at a critical time. At that time, they would sell them and definitely obtain a huge amount of wealth. Lorne did not disturb these people. He directly used the Triple Blink Test and quickly entered the Alchemist Association with a distance of more than a hundred meters. Under the lead of the NPC, he found the Alchemist Association’s Guild Leader in the Alchemist Association’s database—[Doge]. “Adventurer, we meet again.” Seeing Lorne arrive, President Doge put down the herbs in his hand and greeted him with a smile. Because of the contract with Lorne, he sold all the antidotes in the guild. In the following ten days, their guild also produced many potions and obtained a lot of gold coins. Therefore, in his eyes, Lorne was a very important guest. “President Doge, I came this time for the contract between us.” “We expected you to come.” Doge removed his reading glasses and said, “Adventurer, you want to extend the contract, right?” “Indeed!” Lorne said, “I want to extend the contract until the next half a year. During this half a year, the guild will continue to produce. I will purchase them at the same price as before.” With the players’ leveling speed, in the next two months, their level would at most reach Level 40. After reaching this level, the ruins of the war was definitely their ideal training area. In the ruins of the war, not only were there a large number of high-level monsters, but killing them could also accumulate reputation. It was killing two birds with one stone. There was no reason for them to leave. Therefore, Lorne wanted to sign a half-year contract. However, Guild Leader Doge shook his head, “I’m very sorry, Adventurer. Our guild cannot continue to sign such an agreement with you.” “Why?” “Because we recently received a notification from Iron Skull City that a large department needs to focus on refining the antidote to satisfy the needs of the Iron Skull City’s army.” “In addition, Iron Skull City recently plans to let the adventurers start sweeping through the ruins of the war. Our Alchemist Association has been forced to provide the antidotes in the various shops in the main city.” “So our contract can’t continue.” Doge looked at him apologetically, then continued, “However, seeing that we’re on such good terms, I can reserve a portion of the potion for you every day. If you want, I’ll continue to provide it to you at the previous price. How about it?” “That’s great. Thank you for your care, President Doge.” No matter how little the profits were, they were still profits. Of course, Lorne would not let it go. He and President Doge quickly reached an agreement to cooperate. The Alchemist Association reserved 5,000 antidotes for Lorne every day for 50 bronze coins. According to the previous price, this could also bring extremely generous returns to Lorne. But now that the shops in the main city would sell the antidote, it meant that Lorne had to reduce the price to ensure his sales. The price of the shop was 1 silver coin. If Lorne wanted the players to buy the potion he had, the price had to be less than 1 silver coin. If calculated at the price of 90 bronze coins, 5,000 antidotes would bring Lorne a net profit of 60,000. 60,000 coins a day was a terrifying income for anyone, but compared to before, this income was much lower. … “That’s all. I still have something to deal with today, so I won’t accompany you.” After signing the contract again, Doge put on his reading glasses and began to flip through the information, as if he wanted to know about the herb beside him. Seeing this, Lorne’s eyes could not help but light up. He remembered that he still had a red herb that he had not identified. How much could it be worth? However, he did not directly take out the herbs, but instead asked Doge, “Guild Leader, do you have any questions about the herbs in your hand?” “Yes.” President Doge smiled bitterly and said in shame, “To be honest, I’m indeed searching for information regarding this herb. This is a herb that has been kept in the guild warehouse. It’s very precious, but unfortunately, with my experience, I still can’t recognize its name and its medicinal properties.” In the “Divine Realm”, when an alchemist appraised a medicinal herb, they had to raise their herb identification skill to a very high level. Otherwise, they would not be able to identify the medicinal properties of this herb. Although Doge was the Alchemist Association’s Guild Leader, there were still things he did not know, and this medicinal herb was the problem he was currently facing. Seeing this, Lorne knew that it was his turn to perform. “President, I have a certain amount of knowledge regarding medicinal herbs. Can you let me try?” Among the rewards from the Dragon of Light previously, there was the [Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia]. This tool could allow Lorne, who did not have any herb identification skill, to evaluate most herbs. Moreover, this was the Dragon Race’s pharmacopoeia. The records regarding rare herbs were definitely much more complete than the information of other races. “You?” President Doge was stunned for a moment, then shook his head and smiled. He did not believe that a young man who did not even reach the Earth Realm would know this special herb that even he, the Alchemist Association’s President, did not know. Despite this thought, President Doge agreed to Lorne’s request. He placed the herbs on the tray and let Lorne appraise them. Lorne touched the herb and the function of [Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia] was immediately triggered. An attributes panel identified appeared in front of him. ———— [Jade Snake Orchid] Grade: Rare Effect: … Prescription: … Production: … Introduction: … ———— It could be seen that this panel was filled with information. Just the medicinal effect alone had a few hundred words. After all, it was a high-grade medicinal herb. It was understandable that it had many uses. However, at this moment, Lorne could not help but praise the power of the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia. He had only identified a single medicinal herb, but it had actually found a suitable formula. Not only that, but the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia could even identify the location where the herb grew. This function was really too powerful. “President Doge, if I’m not mistaken, this herb should be the Jade Snake Orchid.” Lorne said deliberately. “What?! You’re saying this is the legendary Jade Snake Orchid?!” President Doge was shocked and could not believe his ears. “Indeed!” Lorne nodded calmly and said directly to the information panel in front of him, “This herb is the Jade Snake Orchid. It only grows in a monster nest called the ‘Jade Horn Snake’ and relies on the Jade Horn Snake’s fallen jade horns as nutrients. Therefore, any Jade Snake Orchid contains rich magic power. Typically, alchemists will use this magical herb as a supplementary herb for the potion. This way, the potion’s effect will be even stronger.” “However, the Jade Snake Orchid is also very useful to monsters, so usually, when this herb ripens, it will be directly swallowed by the Jade Horn Snake in the nest, so there are very few mature Jade Snake Orchids in the outside world.” “If you don’t believe me, you can place the Jade Horn Snake’s jade horn fragment on the leaves. This medicinal herb will gradually absorb the energy on the jade horn and grow a new root.” Hearing Lorne describe the medicinal properties of the Jade Serpent Orchid in such detail, Doge basically believed him, but he still wanted to confirm it. Therefore, he found the jade horn fragment and placed it on the medicinal herb’s leaves. It did not take long for the jade horn fragment to lose its magical energy. A long, thin root grew from the root of the herb. If it was given soil, it would regain its vitality. Seeing this, Doge completely believed Lorne’s conclusion. “That’s right! That’s right! This is the Jade Snake Orchid!” Doge laughed loudly, then looked at Lorne in amazement, “Thank you, my friend. There are almost no mature Jade Snake Orchids on the market. I even forgot about this medicinal herb. Fortunately, with your guidance, after knowing that it’s Jade Snake Orchid, I’m even more confident in my next high-level potion refinement!” “I really did not expect you to have such knowledge at such a young age. It makes me, the guild leader, feel ashamed.” Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the admiration of the Alchemist Association’s Guild Leader, [Doge]. Obtained: Doge’s affinity+500!” A system notification suddenly appeared. Seeing the reward, Lorne was in a good mood. This Doge in front of him was the Alchemist Association’s Guild Leader. In the future, if the Cold Desolate Dragon City was built, he might be able to cooperate with them as a main city. At that time, the benefits would definitely be incomparably huge. While Lorne was thinking, Doge had already placed the information on the table back on the shelf and walked out the door. At the same time, he said, “My friend, in the Alchemist Association’s warehouse, there are a large number of herbs that have not been labeled with names and medicinal properties. Can you help us complete this difficult mission?” “Of course.” Lorne accepted the invitation. How could he let go of such a chance to gain affinity for nothing? Therefore, Lorne followed Doge to the Alchemist Association’s warehouse. Under Doge’s lead, Lorne saw one herb after another. These herbs were not labeled. Without hesitation, Lorne began to appraise it. “President Doge, this herb is called the Shining Sunflower. It’s born in the mouth of a scorching volcano and has very rich fire elemental energy. It’s a special combustion agent for smelting ores.” “This herb is called the Ice Lotus. It can only be harvested on a mountain range of ten thousand meters.” “This is called the Earth Dragon Vine. It is a very special corrosive vine. When refining healing potions, it can corrode the poison on other herbs…” “This is a Longevity Fruit. Every fruit needs 100 years to mature.” “…” In the following period of time, Lorne stayed in the Alchemist Association’s warehouse and began to identify various herbs. President Doge was completely stunned. He could not understand how this young man’s knowledge of herbs was so rich. Not only did he know all about rare herbs, but he also knew all the special herbs from the ancient era like the back of his hand. Such knowledge subverted Doge’s world view. … Ding! “You have identified an unknown herb. Doge’s affinity with you+100!” “You…” “You…” On the system notification panel, information kept jumping. Almost every time he identified a medicinal herb, Lorne would obtain 100 affinity points from Doge. When he saw that the affinity between him and Doge was rising crazily, Lorne made up his mind. This time, he had to raise the affinity between him and Doge to the highest limit! “President Doge, I see that the medicinal properties of many of the herbs you marked are not complete. Let me help you guys recover the medicinal properties of these herbs.” Lorne gave up on the idea of quickly completing everything and began to appraise the supplies in the Alchemist Association. Even the medicinal list in the database was used by Lorne to supplement the information. As for Doge beside him, his face was already covered in tears. Their guild had not given this friend anything, but this friend helped them without asking for anything in return. This was too touching!!! Just like that, Lorne led Doge forward and explained the names, effects, and details of all the herbs in the warehouse. Because these were all precious information, Doge quickly brought a book and recorded every word that Lorne said. This was not a small project. As the Alchemist Association of Iron Skull City, the warehouse here had accumulated countless medicinal herbs. Moreover, because Iron Skull City was at the border of the Empire, the unprecedented war had also begun here, so there were also countless medicinal herbs that were difficult to distinguish. However, to Doge’s surprise, no matter how ancient and rare these herbs were, they did not obstruct the adventurer in front of him at all. Almost all the herbs were easily identified by him, and he even introduced the source and special refinement methods in detail. Time slowly passed. Lorne stayed in the Alchemist Association for two days. During this period, other than eating, sleeping, and using the washroom, he basically brought Doge to appraise herbs. To be honest, such a game journey was very torturous, especially when everyone was training crazily. However, Lorne was happy and in pain. The information about the increase in affinity that kept echoing in his ears raised his fighting spirit. … Ding! “Congratulations on reaching 10,000 affinity points with NPC Doge. Doge’s attitude towards you is: Friend! “Congratulations on reaching 50,000 affinity points with NPC Doge. Doge’s attitude towards you is: Admiration!” “Congratulations on reaching 100,000 affinity points with NPC Doge. Doge’s attitude towards you is: Idolization!” By the morning of the third day, the affinity between Lorne and Doge finally broke through 100,000. After all, he was the Guild Leader of the Alchemist Association in Iron Skull City and a high-level NPC. Lorne actually had 100,000 affinity points with him at this moment! This was crazy. With such a relationship, he could completely ask the NPCs to help him issue hidden missions or even invite him to work in his city. At the same time, it was worth noting that compared to players, NPCs had higher loyalty. As long as there were no special circumstances, they would definitely not stand on the opposite side. “My dearest friend, I think that in this world, there are no adventurers who are more friendly to the Alchemist Association than you.” Doge had completely submitted to Lorne’s charisma. At this moment, he was like a student who had just entered a school. He followed behind Lorne and recorded everything he said. After all the herbs were identified, he came to Lorne and said extremely sincerely, “My dearest friend, I sincerely invite you to join the Alchemist Association. I believe that in this honorable guild, your talent will definitely be of the greatest use.” “In addition, I plan to edit the information about the medicinal herbs you just identified into a book of rare medicinal herbs. I will write your name on the author page. In the future, every alchemist who reads this book will thank you for your outstanding contribution. What do you think?” “Sure.” Lorne said, “However, I can’t join the Alchemist Association. In the future, I will definitely build my own territory and create an organization that will gather the top alchemists in the world. At that time, I hope that President Doge can consider coming to me.” “If that day really comes, I will definitely not refuse.” Doge looked at Lorne excitedly. If other adventurers had said this to him, he would not have cared, but this one was different. With his wisdom, he might really be able to complete such a magnificent feat. “By the way, friend, I plan to print and publish your ‘An Introduction to Rare Medicinal Herbs’ book for all alchemists in the world to learn and reference. You can take 70% of the profits during this period. I will be responsible for organizing and arranging it. As the second author, I will obtain 10% of the profits.” “As for the remaining 20%, I plan to set up an alchemist award. I will also name it after you, the ‘Tyrant Award’. I hope that the future alchemists will remember your great contribution to the alchemy world.” Doge looked at Lorne with anticipation. This had always been his dream, and now was the opportunity. He wanted to obtain the approval of this friend. “Yes, I agree with you.” Without thinking, Lorne agreed. Initially, he only wanted to gain some affinity, but who would have thought that not only was Doge preparing to help him publish books, but he was also planning to create a global award? How could he not agree to such a good thing? Especially the matter of setting up an award, the progress of this matter could help Lorne reach the goal of “forming the world’s strongest alchemist organization”. “My dear friend, thank you for your support. I’ll do it later.” Doge was extremely happy. He carefully put away the book in his hand and looked at Lorne again, “Friend, didn’t you buy a batch of potions from us? Do you need me to help you get a shop for selling potions?” A shop? Lorne’s eyes widened at the word. Previously, when he was checking the information of games, he had seen players operating shops. Their annual income exceeded 10 million alliance dollars. One had to know that was an old game before virtual technology. Moreover, the number of players was only tens of millions. It could not compare to the billions of dollars in “Divine Realm”. In those games, he could open a shop and earn tens of millions a year! Then, if he opened a shop in the “Divine Realm”, wouldn’t he be able to directly earn a few hundred million? Moreover, the shops in the game could be taken care of by NPCs. The players did not have to spend much effort. In other words, this was an additional income for no effort. In that case, there was no need to hesitate. “Yes! Yes!” Lorne immediately nodded and asked, “Would it be troublesome to register for a shop in Iron Skull City?” “If you have the identity of an adventurer, it will indeed be very troublesome, but I can let you become an Honorary Elder of our Alchemist Association. This way, I can directly hand over the shops under the guild to you to manage. Other than the basic ownership of the shops being the guild, the rest will be completely managed by you.” “Of course, the monthly rental and employment fees of the shop need to be paid by you. In terms of profits, other than the normal tax deduction, the guild will not take any dividends.” “No problem.” Lorne had no objections. Compared to the income of the shop, the monthly rental and employment fees were nothing. Then, Lorne left the Alchemist Association with Doge. About the shop, Doge decided to help him complete it as soon as possible. When the two of them walked out of the Alchemist Association, there was still a sea of people in front of them. Many players from organizations hoped to buy the antidote as soon as possible, especially the players from the World Destruction Guild. The World Destruction Guild had colluded with the guilds of the Dark Faction. There was even a guild they supported with a lot of money in Blood Shadow City. Therefore, they wanted to develop in the ruins of the war and let the guild players of the two factions level up together to occupy the area where the high-level monsters were active. “Boss, our people have been waiting at the entrance of the Alchemist Association for a long time. How can we be unable to buy the potions?” At the headquarters of the World Destruction Guild, Cross Fire looked at Speck. Most of the potions in the guild had been used up. If there were no more potions, the guild players would have to temporarily leave the war ruins. This was too wasteful of everyone’s time. “It shouldn’t be. The Church of Light just issued a new mission. There should be enough antidotes. Let’s wait a while.” Looking at the huge guild on the screen, Speck thought of that detestable guy, Tyrant. That guy had relied on the antidote to earn hundreds of millions in ten days! The potion was only one silver coin, but in the ruins of the war, the price had increased by four to five times. The profits were also terrifyingly high, much higher than the income of such a black industry. It was simply a huge profit! Just as the two of them were chatting, two people walked out of the Alchemist Association’s entrance on the screen. One of them was Tyrant, and behind him was actually the Alchemist Association’s Guild Leader, Doge! “Damn! No wonder this scoundrel can monopolize the antidote. It turns out that he has some shady business with that old thing, Doge!” Cross Fire looked shocked. Speck also suppressed his envy and said with a dark expression, “Keep an eye on Tyrant. I reckon the next batch of antidotes will still be in his hands!” “Yes, I’ll arrange it now!” … “We’re here.” Doge led Lorne to a busy street and pointed at a shop filled with players, “That’s the shop I prepared for you.” “Thank you.” Lorne quickly opened the main city map and checked the terrain. Soon, he realized that this shop was located in the golden spot in the city. There was a huge resurrection array on the left, and the city gate on the right. Whether it was the players who returned from the city after death or those who were preparing to leave the city, they could easily pass by this shop. When the flow of people in front of a shop was high, its sales would increase. This was an iron rule. Of course, this shop was located in the center of the two key “areas”, and it was easy to lose many customers. After all, everyone liked to buy in the first shop they encountered. This location would indeed be affected. However, it was already incredible that he could obtain his own shop in such a prosperous area. To be honest, Lorne had not expected Doge to hand such a shop to him. “Friend, let’s sign the contract now.” Doge did not waste any time. He directly drafted a contract for the transfer of the shop. There were no additional conditions on it, and he simply wanted to hand this shop over to Lorne for management. When Lorne signed his name, he became the boss of the shop. The system regarding shops was immediately activated. Seeing the unlocked option, Lorne was basically certain that he was the first player to have a personal shop in “Divine Realm”. Ding! “Would you like to continue renting this shop? (Rent: 10,000 gold coins per month)” (Note: Due to the transfer of the shop to an adventurer, this shop will refresh the rental fees. Please submit the corresponding rental fees within three days.) A game notification appeared in front of Lorne. It stated very clearly that if he wanted to operate this shop, he had to pay the monthly rent. 10,000 gold coins was not a small amount. The gold coins that Lorne got from selling potions had been sold to Twinkle Rose again, so he had to prepare some. Of course, this was not difficult. If he wanted money, he could borrow it from Super Rich. He definitely had enough gold coins on him. Indeed, when he heard that Lorne was here to borrow gold coins, Super Rich immediately transferred 20,000 gold coins over. There was no agreement between the two of them. Perhaps this was a true tycoon. This joy was not something Lorne could experience for the time being. “I’ll make the payment.” With the money, Lorne immediately paid the monthly rent. The monthly rental of the shop was 10,000 gold coins, but the shop still needed someone to manage it, so Lorne still had to spend a lot of money to hire a manager. The higher the quality of the manager, the more control they had over the market, and the greater their management ability. Therefore, Lorne was not stingy. He directly spent 5,000 gold coins to hire an Epic-grade shop manager and a few employees with good ‘economy’ skills. As for the remaining 5,000 gold coins, in addition to being used for wholesale items and cash flow, Lorne had another use. He wanted to change the layout of the shop! This shop was a two-story building. The area was not very large, about 200 square meters. Lorne felt that its previous renovation had wasted a lot of space, so he planned to modify it. At this moment, Doge had already gone back to edit the book on herbs, so the rest was left to Lorne to deal with alone. He directly found an NPC who knew how to decorate and chose a simple way to refurbish the shop. That was to tear down all the dividers in the shop. Then, he designed a few counters on both sides. This way, the shop appeared much larger, and the items sold could be seen more clearly by the customers. As for the second floor? Lorne turned it into an auction house. As the number one player in the world, the equipment he had were all “divine equipment” in the eyes of ordinary players. In the future, they would inevitably compete with each other. This way, not only could he make a name for himself, but he could also earn enough benefits. … The work of the NPCs was very fast. Coupled with the simple layout set by Lorne, everything was completed in about ten hours. Lorne brought the hired NPCs into the shop and began distributing work to them. First of all, the left counters specialized in selling potions. All kinds of potions occupied four counters. Then, the right counters specialized in selling equipment and items. It also had four counters. Finally, there was a huge counter in front that specialized in selling high-grade items, equipment, and other precious items. It was managed by the Epic-grade NPC in the shop. She was also the manager of this shop. In the future, the basic operations of the shop would be handled by her. In the beginning, Lorne had other plans, but now that he had a shop, he naturally would not ignore this money making machine. It just so happened that he had a plan to repair the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Therefore, he needed a large amount of funds recently in order to rebuild the Cold Desolate Dragon City in the near future. Lorne first took out the antidotes he had obtained from the Alchemist Association. Then, he looked at the manager, Rona, and asked, “How do you want to price these potions?” “Yes.” Rona counted the number of supplies and said, “According to the price of the antidote in Iron Skull City, it should be set at 1 silver coin. However, our shop has just opened. The price will be 50 bronze coins and we will sell 2,000 bottles. At noon, we will price it at 70 bronze coins and sell 3,000 bottles. At night, we will price it at 90 bronze coins and sell 5,000 bottles.” “This way, the shop can obtain enough popularity immediately.” “Master, is this arrangement okay?” As expected of an Epic NPC, her management plan was very reasonable. “Let’s do as you think.” Lorne nodded, but quickly fell into thought. If he wanted to attract the players from the NPC shops, only the antidote would work. The antidote that Lorne had obtained was only 10,000 bottles, and this was only after he had taken the initiative to ask Doge to help raise the quantity. Otherwise, there were only 5,000 bottles per day. But even with 10,000 antidotes, it could not become a mainstream commodity in the shop. He had to add more items. Lorne took out a pile of Bronze and Silver equipment from his bag. “You can arrange to sell these equipment as well.” “In addition, there are a few Gold items here. You can use the auction to attract people.” The antidote was only the appetizer. Equipment was the main commodity for the business in this shop, especially Silver-grade and Gold-grade equipment. These high-grade equipment would definitely cause a commotion among the players. “Yes, Master.” Rona had a strong operational ability. She could sell the goods on her own. Of course, all her operations had to be reported to Lorne in advance. The plan could only be carried out after obtaining his approval. After arranging all of this, Lorne had to take the most important step. That was publicity! Publicity was a very necessary part. It was not enough to recruit the first batch of customers. However, this was a game. There was no need to advertise everywhere. With Lorne’s own fame, he only needed to shout in the chat channel to achieve all his expectations. Soon, shouts sounded in Iron Skull City. Ding! “Regional Announcement (Sent by Player Tyrant): The first player shop in Iron Skull City, Dragon One, is offering a huge reward for its opening ceremony. The antidotes will cost 50 bronze coins each, and there are also a large number of Silver-grade and Gold-grade items for sale. Those who are interested, hurry up. The quantity is limited, buy it immediately!” “Ding!” “Ding!” The regional announcement of Iron Skull City was very expensive. Lorne shouted three times before giving up. However, these three sentences made all the players in Iron Skull City boil. “Gosh! There are player shops already?!” “Am I playing a fake game?” “50 bronze coins for an antidote? Is this true?” “How can what Tyrant said be false? Brothers, let’s hurry up. If we’re late, we won’t be able to buy anything!” “Crazy, this is really crazy. He’s even selling Gold-grade equipment!” All the players in Iron Skull City were in an uproar. In a few minutes, the entrance of the shop ‘Dragon One’ was filled with countless players. They had all come because of the slogan of 50 bronze coins per antidote, but after coming here, they realized that it was only selling 2000 bottles. If they wanted to buy more, they had to wait until noon and night. “Indeed, capitalists are all shrewd.” “After today, the price of the antidote will probably rise to a few silver coins. I know Tyrant too well.” “It has been proven that monopolies really harm people. We strongly request that the officials of Iron Skull City punish the immoral business practices of Tyrant!” “Fortunately, us solo players are not interested in the ruins of the war. Otherwise, we’ll lose our minds from being exploited like this.” The surrounding players cursed, especially the players who had been exploited once in the ruins of the war. At this moment, they were even tearing up in grief. In the end, they were still wrung dry in the hands of Tyrant. They were not given a chance to profit. It was too detestable! They were all indignant and protested, but in the next second, these people rushed into the shop. This was because the Shop Manager Rona had already begun the Silver-grade auction. Silver-grade equipment was considered top-notch at this moment and was the standard equipment for elite players. Of course, they were not willing to miss it. … “Damn, this Tyrant is way ahead in the game. He can earn money like this!” Speck had always thought that he should be the one doing this, but now, all of it was achieved by his enemies. He was so angry that he gritted his teeth. However, despite his anger, he still had to buy the equipment. The Silver-grade equipment was an important resource for the guild to compete for the progress of the game. They had to snatch it! “Inform our people to auction it now. No matter how much it costs, these high-level equipment are ours!” Speck immediately issued the order. To large guilds, the early stages were the time to compete for the game’s progress. Whoever had the greatest advantage would have the greatest gap in the future, which would expand infinitely until they suppressed all their opponents! Therefore, even if he had a grudge against Tyrant, he had to buy these equipment! Soon, the lackeys who squeezed into the shop received the order from above to obtain high-grade equipment. With Boss’s order, they naturally responded without hesitation. However, just as they piled up the price to the highest and no one wanted to snatch it anymore, suddenly, a rule appeared on the display screen in the shop. ———— [Attention!] [For all products in this shop, members of the World Destruction Guild and the Domination Guild will have to pay triple the price!] ———— Pfft— The underling of the World Destruction Guild, who was about to obtain the Silver equipment, spat out blood. This was too obvious. Even if Tyrant wanted to take revenge, he had to hide it in front of everyone, right? How could he announce his revenge like this!!! The players from the World Destruction Guild cried in their hearts, and the other players at the scene laughed until their tears fell. “I’m dying of laughter. Tyrant really humiliated the other party.” “Hahaha, it’s their fault for making such a high offer, the World Destruction Guild is going to suffer now!” “The people from World Destruction are too disgusting. We should teach them a lesson.” “This World Destruction Guild that has hundreds of thousands of members is nothing in the eyes of Tyrant. Boss Tyrant is so awesome!!!” “Serves them right! How dare they bully us everyday!” The surrounding players mocked. The people from the World Destruction Guild had always been domineering. In the eyes of most players, this was the most detestable evil gang. Now that they saw the other party ‘in trouble’, they naturally did not mind adding insult to injury. “Damn it!” In the headquarters of the World Destruction Guild, Speck’s emotions exploded. There were hundreds of thousands of employees under the corporation, and he had always been the one who set the rules. Since when was it his turn to be stepped on by such a brat?! Even in the game, the guild he led had more than a hundred thousand players. No one had dared to provoke him so brazenly, especially solo players! “Boss, what should we do now?” Cross Fire gritted his teeth, “That scoundrel used the advantage of the game to obtain a large amount of high-grade equipment. If we let the other guilds buy all of them, our pressure will be…” Splat! Before he could finish, Speck angrily slapped him across the face. “What should we do? What should we do now?! Where the f*ck have you been? If not for you provoking Tyrant, would we have been in such trouble? If not for the fact that you could not find out Tyrant’s true identity, would we have ended up in such a passive spot?!” Speck was as angry as an enraged lion, and the ruthlessness of the underworld was clearly displayed at this moment. “Boss…” Cross Fire did not dare to argue. He could only clench his teeth and swallow the blood in his mouth. Then, he said, “Boss, let’s first deal with the matter at hand. Although Tyrant has set the price of three times that of the members of our World Destruction Guild, we can find those players without a prefix in their name and ask them to help us buy our equipment.” “Yes.” Speck sat down again, his face calm again, making it difficult to see what he was really thinking. … Soon, a few players with the name of small guilds appeared near Dragon One. They began to quote a price on the shop’s regional channel. In “Divine Realm”, due to the restriction of the size of the venue, it was marked that during public auction, players could compete on the “shop’s chat channel”. Because they did not have the prefix of the World Destruction Guild and because the offers of these lackeys were very high, they quickly obtained a few Silver-grade items. With these treasures, the lackeys quickly arrived in an alley. Cross Fire had been waiting here for a long time. “How is it? Did you get it?” Cross Fire asked anxiously. Because of what had happened previously, he had been blamed by his boss. This time, he could not allow any problems to occur when buying equipment. Otherwise, his value in his boss’s mind would completely collapse. Without this identity, he was nothing. Cross Fire knew this very well, so he urgently wanted to redeem himself. One of the lackeys said, “Don’t worry, Brother Cross Fire, we have already obtained four Silver-grade items. As long as he continues to auction later, we can continue to use this method to obtain the equipment.” After reaching their expectations, the players of the World Destruction Guild were naturally very happy. But just as they were about to trade all their equipment to Cross Fire… An accident also happened! Cross Fire was about to change into a suitable Silver-grade equipment for himself when a panel suddenly appeared in the next second. “Ding! This equipment cannot be used!” “Gosh, what’s going on?” Cross Fire was stunned. When he regained his senses, he quickly checked the details of the equipment and quickly realized the reason. It turned out that these equipment had a character binding system! As long as the player bought it, the effect would be triggered. Other than the purchaser who could wear the equipment, no one else could wear it! “Tyrant! You will die a horrible death!!” Cross Fire spat out blood. This Tyrant was too detestable. In order to prevent the World Destruction Guild from obtaining the equipment, he had actually set two such disgusting rules. In this case, if the World Destruction Guild wanted to buy equipment from him, they would have to pay three times the price! This was an auction. The price sold here was the limit of the value of equipment. In the end, they still had to pay three times the cost. Even if they were billionaires, they could not afford to spend so much! “Big Brother, what should we do now?” “What else can we do? We either train special players or spend three times the price to buy equipment. There’s no other way.” Helpless, Cross Fire went to see his boss. Then, he was pulled into a cage by Speck and got beaten up. If not for his good physique, he would have been beaten to death. “Spat!” Speck spat out a mouthful of saliva, his eyes shooting out a ferocious killing intent. He said to his subordinates, “Buy them regardless of the cost. These equipment cannot fall into the hands of other guilds.” “In addition, mobilize all our intelligence agents to find this Tyrant in real life. I want to kill him!” … In the shop [Dragon One], under Rona’s management, the popularity of the shop reached its peak. Hundreds of Bronze items were sold out, and the Silver-grade auction continued for ten rounds. There was also a Gold-grade members’ auction at night. All players who wanted to participate had to buy a membership card from the shop, or else they would not be allowed to enter. Membership cards were also divided into levels. Those who wanted to participate in the Gold-grade auction had to have a Gold-grade membership card to register. If there was a Platinum equipment auction in the future, only Platinum members could participate, and so on. It had to be said that Rona’s business idea was indeed very advanced. She knew how to differentiate customers, tie them down, and obtain the initial funds for the shop. Because there were many members, the reserve funds in the shop also increased. Rona immediately arranged for people to go to the Alchemist Association to wholesale high-level conventional potions. Although the shops relied on high-grade equipment to earn a lot of money, the most easily profitable projects in a shop were often the simplest products. For example, HP and MP potions were essential for any player. Although the price was not high, there were many benefits and sales. With the current popularity of the shop, they could still earn a large sum of income. “How crazy…” Lorne checked his current turnover and found that he had earned 3947 gold coins. Among them, 600 Bronze-grade items earned 3,000 gold coins! 10 Silver-grade items earned 500 gold coins! 2000 antidotes earned 10 gold coins! The remaining 437 gold coins were all from selling the HP and MP Potions. The income from selling the equipment was obtained by Lorne himself from killing monsters some time ago, so it could not be used as a profit for the shop. However, the potions could directly add to the profits, which was definitely a considerable amount of income. The price of buying a level 3 HP Potion from the Alchemist Association was 90 bronze coins per bottle. The selling price was 1 silver coin per bottle, which meant that Lorne could earn 10 bronze coins from each bottle. The profit ratio was 10%. In terms of total income, the final profit of the potion was 43.7 gold coins. Then, according to the highest monetary value of the gold coins on the black market now, the total profit of the shop was about 131,000 alliance dollars in the past two hours. This income was definitely terrifying. At the very least, to the current Lorne, such an hourly salary was a dream. Because today was the first day of the opening, there were many curious players, so the turnover was naturally very high. However, in two days, with the same amount of resources invested, the sales of the shops would decrease. After all, there were no special products in the shop, so it could not ensure that players could visit for a long time. There was also a problem that gave Lorne a headache. There were too few antidotes. 10,000 bottles a day was not enough to satisfy his needs. Moreover, other shops were also selling this potion, so the price could not be raised. Lorne had to consider buying them at a higher price so that he could earn greater profits through massive sales despite a small profit margin for each potion. For this matter, he specially found Doge. During this period of time, Doge had been busy editing the book. Due to the need to categorize the herbs, the workload was very high. Therefore, after working for several days, Doge still did not complete his work. After hearing Lorne’s request, Doge thought about it and decided to give him a larger share of the potions. After all, he was now also a member of the Alchemist Association and was also the manager of the shop. According to the rules of Iron Skull City, Doge could completely increase the target sales amount for him. However, these potions could no longer be sold for 50 bronze coins. The Alchemist Association’s output and income also needed to be reviewed by Iron Skull City, so he could not let the funds gap exceed the specified range. Lorne naturally understood this. This time, not only did he not ask for a lower purchase price, but he even offered a price that surprised even Doge. Just like that, after a close discussion between the two, the quantity of the potions in ‘Dragon One’ increased from 10,000 to a shocking million! This was a huge number. After all, this was the daily supply! Under normal circumstances, a shop could apply for between 10,000-50,000 potions per day, but Lorne directly made a deal with Doge. As long as Lorne could sell 1 million potions in a day, the maximum number of potions distributed to Dragon One would be a million! But if not, then everything would stop, and the contract would continue as normal. Without hesitation, Lorne agreed. Of course, in order to obtain such a huge quantity, he naturally lost a large amount of profits per potion. In the beginning, the price of Lorne’s antidote was 50 bronze coins, the cost price in the Alchemist Association. Now, because of the need to answer Iron Skull City’s call and because of the exception of increasing the order, the price of Lorne’s purchase was raised to 95 bronze coins! This was close to the limit of retail sales. Among all the shops in the main city, the price of the antidote was fixed at 1 silver coin, which was 100 bronze coins. In total, Lorne could only make 5 bronze coins per bottle of potion. In addition, other than the transportation cost, the manpower and monthly rent in the shop, and the money to compete with the shop for a lower price, the final profit that could be left to Lorne was only 2 bronze coins per potion. However, with such a huge amount, even if it was only a profit of 1 bronze, the income could reach hundreds of thousands per day. In fact, this was not Lorne’s main goal. There was actually a deeper meaning behind his efforts. First of all, the share of the million potions in his hands was actually snatched from the surrounding shops. In other words, in the future, if there were players in the nearby areas, they could only go to Lorne’s shop to buy enough potions. This way, the customer flow of the Lorne shop was greatly guaranteed. To him, even if the antidote no longer made money, he could use the customer flow to increase the sales of other products to profit. It was also because of this that Lorne had used the highest price to purchase a terrifying number of potions! … After dealing with these matters, Lorne contacted Twinkle Rose and Super Rich. It was not enough to sell a million potions alone. After all, the temptation of this mission was limited. A large number of players would not spend time heading to that area. Therefore, Lorne still needed a channel to distribute them. This profitable business was naturally left to the two of them. The total amount of goods that Lorne gave them was 600,000 bottles a day, and the profit after selling was 10%. If he really counted, it was about 120,000 alliance dollars. For 99.9% of people, 120,000 per day was a dreamlike amount. But to a tycoon like Super Rich, 120,000 was probably just his breakfast money. However, he was very concerned about the matters in the game, especially the ones that Lorne had arranged. Not to mention the 120,000 dollars, even if there was no income, he would still diligently complete this task. After dealing with these matters, Lorne finally resolved everything regarding the shop. Next, he only needed to provide some equipment. He did not have to worry about the rest. It was getting late, so Lorne opened the system panel. ‘Go offline!’ He would rest today and help Aisha level up tomorrow. That was a huge mission requiring tens of millions of experience points. It would probably take a long time to complete. Returning to reality, Lorne did not think further. He ordered a sumptuous dinner to reward himself. Then, after washing up, Lorne lay down on the bed. He opened the watch. The next second, a message notification sounded. It was a message from Jessica. “Lorne, I’ve already helped you deal with everything in the high-level Energy Zone. In the villa I prepared for you, there’s the most perfect medical equipment in the world. You can bring your sister there to recuperate.” “By the way, my sister and I came to the Energy Zone with Father today. We’re going to invite Aunt to go to the headquarters together. We’ll rest in the small villa next to yours tonight. Why don’t you come over later?” Lorne’s eyes lit up when he saw the information. Ever since the exciting battle with Jessica a few days ago, all the cells in his body had been awakened. Coupled with the fact that he had been busy identifying herbs the past few days, he was really tired. Since Jessica was here, he would indulge himself tonight. With that in mind, Lorne smiled wickedly, “Wash up tonight and wait for me.” At night, a group of important figures arrived in this low-level Energy Zone. In the best hotel of the Energy Zone, countless business figures gathered here and held a grand banquet. Almost all the tycoons in the Energy Zone had brought their sons here. This was not a simple charity ball. In the banquet hall today, the world’s top tycoon, Hoses, was present. In order to see this important figure, all the rich merchants with high statuses rushed in. At the same time, they had heard that Hoses’ two daughters would also appear at this party, so they brought their sons with them, hoping to obtain the favor of the two ladies. If such luck really descended, then their family would truly rise to the top and become one of the richest families in the world. Even if they could not gain the favor of the two daughters of Hoses, they wanted to win the heart of the younger sister of the richest man Hoses, the financier of the Waltz Group, Madam Maeve. This beauty from a rich family was slightly more mature, but her appearance and aura were extraordinary. Furthermore, she had been single all this time. If they could pair up with this Madam Maeve, the final result would be as good. However, the two ladies at the banquet sat alone in a place guarded by more than a dozen bodyguards. The young men had no chance to approach them, much less win their hearts. The young masters of the tycoons all focused their attention on that area, filled with desire. Unfortunately, no matter how much they explained to the bodyguards, they could not get close to the two ladies. In the end, they could only shake their heads and sigh. “Sigh, how can the daughter of the richest family in the world like us?” “That’s right. I’m considered rich in this Energy Zone, but in the eyes of the other party, I’m inferior to an ant.” “Unfortunately, I can’t display my talent, or else I would definitely attract the attention of a princess.” “As long as I can marry one of the two, it will be equivalent to gaining tens of billions of assets.” The group of youngsters all sighed inwardly, enjoying the bitterness of the wine. … Unlike the young masters who were sighing outside, the two daughters of the richest families were chatting happily. “Sister, is what you said true?” The younger sister, Nina, blinked her large eyes and looked at her sister in amazement. From her sister, Nina knew what had happened a few days ago. The story of escaping death had shocked her, but later, after hearing that someone had saved her, she was interested in the young man called Lorne. Especially when she heard that in order to save his sister, Lorne had actually lived in the slums with much difficulty. Although he had used all the savings in his family, he had not given up. Up until today, he had still worked hard for the sake of his sister’s life. This attitude alone made Nina curious about him. It was unbelievable that he could still maintain his composure in the face of her sister’s wealth. Moreover, her sister had also said that apart from his poor background, this man was ridiculously perfect. Be it appearance or personality, he was impeccable. Hearing these descriptions, Nina was filled with desire for this man called ‘Lorne’. If not for the fact that this was a party specially organized for her aunt, she even wanted to see the other party now. “Of course.” “Moreover, I have already helped him prepare the admission permit for the high-level Energy Zone. In two days, he can go to the Energy Zone where we live. However, we can’t let Father know about this for the time being, or else he will definitely be very difficult to deal with.” Jessica took a sip of her wine, and her beautiful golden eyes could not help but glance at the young people in the hall. All of them were handsome young men in suits. Unfortunately, their greed and frivolity were too disgusting. It was still Lorne’s calm and domineering aura that was fascinating. “Don’t worry, sister. This is a secret between us. I won’t tell anyone.” Nina widened her eyes and looked at Jessica seriously, “Sister, we had an agreement in the past that we would marry the same person in the future. You haven’t forgotten about that, have you?” “I didn’t forget.” “You have to keep your word. If you have a boyfriend, don’t forget me!” “Of course.” Not only did Jessica purse her red lips, but her face also could not help but turn slightly red. In her mind, the scene of the three of them fighting had actually appeared. Furthermore, she had actually thought that if she had Nina to share the burden, she would at least be able to withstand that fellow’s attack alone. This was a shameful thought. However, Nina’s words also reminded her that the two sisters had indeed been inseparable. Their relationship was so intimate that they were almost glued together. Due to the fear that marriage would separate the two of them, the two had made a pact to find a man that both of them liked in the future. In that case, should he really introduce Lorne to Nina? Thinking of this, Jessica fell into deep thought. … “Brother, what do you think of what happened to Jessica?” In the hall, Maeve, in an off-shoulder black evening gown, pulled Hoses to a corner and asked. “It should be the Zamas family. They want to see the military leader before us and take the construction order for the ‘Oracle Bone Shield’ in the high-level Energy Zone.” “Fortunately, Jessica is fine. However, I won’t let them off. It’s time to clean up these rats who like to hide in the sewers.” There was no emotion on Hoses’ face, and his words were very calm. However, if anyone who had come into contact with him were present, their hearts would definitely jump, because if he said that he wanted to clear the other party, then he would definitely take action and achieve his goal! As soon as he finished speaking, he looked at where Jessica was and said, “By the way, Jessica was just attacked. She must have been shocked. Recently, I noticed that she has been absent-minded. There’s probably something on her mind. I want you to stay with her and help counsel her.” “Alright, Big Brother. I’ll talk to her.” Maeve nodded, then went to the sisters. From here, it could be seen that Jessica still looked troubled. That matter had probably affected her greatly, but she was unwilling to say it out loud. It seemed that she needed someone to talk to. Late at night, the party ended. After hearing Jessica’s suggestion, Hoses and the others arrived at the small villa on the edge of the city. Due to the alcohol, Hoses had already gone to bed. As for Maeve, she had to take care of the two girls, so she rested in the room next to the sisters. After the two elders fell asleep, subtle sounds came from the sisters’ room. “Sister, is he really that strong?” From Jessica, Nina had learned that she and Lorne had had physical contact a few days ago and had done something intimate. Originally, Jessica did not want to say it, but she still wanted to fulfill the promise to her sister, so she did not hide it. After hearing this explosive news, Nina did not have a negative reaction. On the contrary, she was looking forward to meeting Lorne. Because she had heard about Lorne’s background and because Jessica had exaggeratedly described him as perfect, she was very satisfied with the other half that her sister had found. “Yes, I couldn’t even walk that day. That evil guy was too rough in that aspect.” As she spoke, Jessica reflected on how she had felt. For some reason, ever since she had sex with that guy, she had felt so good. She kept thinking about seeing that guy immediately. Fortunately, he had received a response from that guy just now. She believed that she would meet him soon. “Ah!” As Jessica thought this, Nina suddenly cried out. “What’s wrong, Nina?” “Sister, didn’t you say that you were meeting with Lorne? There are people guarding outside our villa. How will he come in?” Nina’s eyes were filled with anxiety. It could be seen that she did not reject Lorne’s arrival. On the contrary, she was looking forward to it. But now, there was a problem. Because of the previous attack, their father, Hoses, had arranged several bodyguards outside the door. Not to mention people, even flies could not fly in. “Ah, what do we do now, sister?” Nina’s eyes were watery and she looked even more nervous than Jessica. “Let’s wait a little longer. If there’s no other way, let’s get up early tomorrow. I’ll secretly bring you to find him.” Only then did her sister, Jessica, remember what had happened today. If she had known earlier, she would have had an excuse to go out and meet Lorne in his villa. But it was too late. At this time, her father would not let them go out. She had no choice but to lie down on the bed obediently and close her eyes to rest as soon as possible. She hoped that tomorrow would come earlier. Because the two sisters discussed that shameful topic, they were too excited, so the two of them hugged each other tightly, seeking satisfaction. Just like that, it was soon 12am. The two sisters were already half asleep. But at that moment, a faint sound came from the door. “Lorne, are you here?” Nina was obsessed with this matter, so she was not deeply asleep. The moment she heard the sound, she woke up and even sat up immediately, staring at the man who had just entered with large, watery eyes. Seeing the unfamiliar girl, Lorne did not panic at all. Instead, he raised his fingers and gestured for Nina to keep her voice down. Nina nodded quickly, her large eyes studying Lorne excitedly. He was as handsome, as steady, and very capable as his sister had said. After all, this villa was surrounded by so many bodyguards, but he could actually come here quietly without alerting everyone. This ability was simply too outstanding! At that moment, Jessica woke up. The moment she saw Lorne, her eyes were filled with surprise. “How did you get in?” Jessica could not help but ask. “I came in long ago. After you sent me the message, I came in early. I’ve been hiding nearby.” Lorne had already prepared an excuse. In fact, he had not lurked here that early. He had used his invisibility skill to follow them into the building when Jessica returned. As for his reasoning, there was actually a loophole. This was because before he entered, Hoses had sent people to check the villa in advance. If he had been here earlier, he would have been discovered long ago. However, the two sisters were extremely happy. They did not think of this loophole. “What about our conversation?” Jessica looked at him, her face red. Nina was nervous too. Lorne said, “I heard everything. Since you think that I suit both your tastes, I don’t mind being together with you two.” “Great!” Nina was very happy. She was finally going to grow up like her sister. “Shh, lower your voice. Don’t wake up the others.” “Then, let’s begin…” Since the sisters accepted him together, Lorne naturally did not object. Moreover, as an energetic man, he would not lose to the two women. The two sisters took off their unnecessary clothes and revealed their perfect bodies. Looking at the shy Nina, who had shrunk into the blanket, the corners of Lorne’s mouth curled into a sinister smile. This little girl kept screaming. This was not a good habit. He had to let her learn to shut her mouth. “Ugh…” Nina tried to keep her mouth open, but the evil thing was too big. She felt like she was forced to swallow a light bulb. Her jaw ached. Moreover, she could not breathe. It was as if the thing wanted to block her throat and prevent her from breathing. She tried to hold on for a long time. Just as she felt like she was about to suffocate, the other party finally let her go. Then, Nina lay weakly on the bed sheet under the moonlight, looking like she had been thoroughly toyed with. As for the demon, Lorne, he had already extended his demon claws towards Jessica. She had already done it before, so it would not be so difficult to enter again. With this, the dragon entered the sea. This night was destined to not be a peaceful one. Perhaps because of the game’s materialization, Lorne’s endurance was beyond imagination. He fought for an entire night and obtained victory in countless battles before finally leaving this hot-blooded battlefield. However, because the battle was too intense, the people next door also had a dream the entire night. The next morning, Maeve woke up groggy. She did not know why, but she had felt a strange voice in her mind last night. She did not know if it was her dream or if the two sisters next door were too noisy at night, but she did not sleep well the entire night. When she came to the living room, she realized that the two sisters were eating breakfast. They were wolfing down their food like workers who had done heavy construction work. They were far from their usual graceful state of chewing slowly. Moreover, the two of them were in very different conditions. Their faces were like flowers that had been watered, beautiful and alluring. However, they looked tired as if they had not slept for the entire night. Seeing this, she asked the two of them suspiciously, “Were the two of you fooling around last night? It felt like you were tearing down a house.” Hearing this, the sisters shook their heads. Very seriously, Nina denied, “Aunt… we… didn’t… we slept very early.” “Hmm?” Maeve frowned, “Nina, what’s wrong with your throat?” She had used it too much last night. After waking up today, Nina’s voice was a little hoarse. But they could not let her know about this. Seeing that Nina could not find an excuse, her sister, Jessica, quickly said, “It’s probably because she ate too much yesterday and hurt her throat.” “Yes, yes, I ate too much.” Nina quickly nodded. “Seriously, don’t eat so much at once in the future. This is only a low-level Energy Zone. The quality of the food here is not very good. It’s not as safe as the food in the high-level Energy Zone. Eat less for breakfast.” Maeve sat across from Nina and instructed her earnestly. Nina quickly asked her sister for help. Jessica quickly stood up and said, “Aunt, let me help you get a sandwich.” This was a ploy to change the subject, but to Jessica’s surprise, as soon as she rose, she felt soreness from her muscles. After the intense workout last night, she had yet to recover. This detail was immediately captured by Maeve. “Jessica, what happened to your leg?” “It’s okay, Aunt. My legs are numb from sitting for too long. I’ll be fine in a while.” Maeve looked at her and frowned. She had a feeling the sisters were different today. They looked strange. Just like that, the three of them quickly finished breakfast. In order to avoid Maeve, Jessica and Nina found an excuse to go out and see the scenery. Maeve still felt something was wrong, so she went to the sisters’ room curiously. When she entered the room, she actually smelled a strange smell. Having never experienced such a thing, Maeve had no idea what it was. However, she was curious about the source of the smell. Maeve could not help but look around. When she looked under the bed, her pupils constricted. Heavens! How could there be such a thing here?! There was a used condom in Maeve’s vision! Could it be that last night… Although Maeve had never experienced such a thing, she knew about condoms. Now that such a thing had appeared in this room, did that mean the two girls had done that? “Impossible, impossible, definitely impossible.” Shocked, Maeve quickly rejected her idea. This was because when they were preparing to move in, this place had already been checked. In other words, there was no one else here last night. Moreover, there were more than a dozen bodyguards guarding outside the villa. It was impossible for anyone to enter. Therefore, this should have been left behind by the previous owner of this house. After all, this villa had only been recently bought as a temporary rest area. Moreover, it was a house in a low-level Energy Zone. It was normal for it to be this dirty. … In another villa, Lorne had expended a lot of energy yesterday, so he slept until noon today. After he woke up, he learned from the information that Jessica and the others had already left. Lorne did not feel any pity. After all, he would be heading to the high-level Energy Zone in a few days. At that time, he would be able to meet the sisters often. It had to be said that the daughter of the richest family was indeed unforgettable, especially to a young man like Lorne. But now was not the time. Yesterday, he had just finished dealing with the business at the shop. After going online today, he would begin leveling up Aisha. Moreover, he had to obtain information about the gnomes. If time permitted, he wanted to go to the gnomes. While thinking, Lorne arrived at a high-level restaurant and happily ate a delicious meal. While he was eating, a few business executives in suits were discussing the topic of “Divine Realm”. “Our company is also preparing to invest in the Divine Realm.” “Yes, the market is too saturated in reality. We have to enter a new market to find a chance of survival.” “In the end, it’s all because of Boss’s poor judgment. If not for that player called [Tyrant] earning tens of millions, he would not have made this decision.” “I also did not expect that Tyrant would have his own shop so early. Moreover, I heard that the sales of that shop yesterday reached 50.55 million dollars!” “More than 50 million? Wow, the profit is probably more than 10 million at least. It’s even more profitable than an excellent medium-sized enterprise!” “This is nothing. I heard that a corporation wants to invest in his shop. It seems that they want to invest 500 million dollars, and they only want 30% of the shares!” “Gosh! Doesn’t this mean that this shop’s market value has reached 1.5 billion?” “This Tyrant has really made a killing. He became rich overnight!” A group of professional executives who were still working in the company were also attracted by the income of ten million dollars. They chatted happily and excitedly. However, at the end of the topic, someone else broke the news. “Have you heard? Someone is offering a reward to find out Tyrant’s real identity. The price seems to be 10 million alliance dollars.” “An identity is so valuable?!” “Perhaps someone doesn’t want Tyrant to live. His game progress is too fast for others, and he has snatched the profits of the big shots.” “I think it was the World Destruction Guild who did it. I heard they have an illegal background and were cheated by Tyrant yesterday. With their temper, they will definitely not let Tyrant go.” “Who knows? There are so many benefits involved. I can understand if anything happens.” “…” Hearing their conversation, Lorne became more wary. Although he and Jessica were close enough, he had to hide his identity in the game. No matter what, he could not put himself in danger. In addition, when he had time, he could also inquire about the information about the World Destruction Guild. When the strength he materialized in the future was stronger, he had to let these guys know the consequences of angering him! “Log in!” In the small villa, Lorne put on his game helmet and entered the game. With a flash of light, he reappeared in Iron Skull City. Ding! “The turnover of your shop, Dragon One, was 14,358.46 gold coins yesterday. The daily expenses were 13,640.54 gold coins, meaning a total profit of 717.92 gold coins.” The moment Lorne entered the game, information regarding the shop’s earnings appeared in front of him. It could be seen that ever since they bought the million antidotes yesterday, the sales of the shop had instantly reached a terrifying height. In alliance dollars, it was equivalent to more than 40 million in total revenue, which was on the same level as the business level of a medium-sized corporation. This was only a gaming shop that was less than 200 square meters! The profits it brought were so terrifying. Even after deducting the cost of yesterday, Lorne still earned 2.15 million alliance dollars. In that case, it would be 64.5 million dollars a month, and 770 million dollars a year! However, to the current Lorne, this income was not enough. He had to obtain more gold coins as soon as possible. To him, the money earned from a shop was only a small amount. The true source of income should be the future Cold Desolate Dragon City! As long as he could repair the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he could obtain countless shops that belonged to him. Moreover, he could also obtain his own Alchemist Association. At that time, he would become a top tycoon in the game and in reality, standing at the top of the two worlds! “Very good. I’ll go find Barres now.” Lorne arrived at the Blacksmith Guild. This was also one of the largest businesses in Iron Skull City. He had to create such an organization in the future. When he entered the Blacksmith Guild, he immediately saw the blacksmiths working with all their might. They seemed to be in a much more fervent state than they had been in the past few days. “President Barres, has there been a war recently?” Lorne found Barres and asked him. “Yes, adventurer.” Barres was reading the report in front of him. When he saw Lorne, he immediately smiled and greeted him. He had already learned from Doge that this adventurer did not only rely on the favor of the Dragon of Light to reach this stage, what he truly relied on was his talent! Although he was still young, he had wisdom that even Doge admired. A genius like him naturally had to be respected enough. He might have to rely on him in the future. “Lord Hamut, the Dragon of Light, discovered that a dark follower had fumbled his way into the ruins of the war. After Iron Skull City knew of the situation, it immediately organized an army to leave the southern front and go to the ruins of the war to eliminate the undead that caused trouble there.” At this point, Barres looked disconsolate, as if he were in trouble. Lorne’s eyes lit up, and he immediately asked, “President, have you encountered a problem?” “That’s right.” Barres smiled bitterly and said, “I just received a new notification from Iron Skull City. Due to the urgent situation in the ruins of the war, the army that rushed over from the southern defense line chose to travel quickly in light equipment. They did not carry most heavy weapons, especially magic cannons. This kind of thing needs high-grade ores to refine enough rare materials to forge. Our guild does not have that many resources for the time being.” In the “Divine Realm”, surveying ore veins was a relatively difficult thing, especially high-grade ore veins. That kind of place was filled with high-level monsters. It was difficult to even enter normally, much less mine in large quantities. Coupled with the fact that Iron Skull City was at war all year round, the consumption of mineral resources was very huge. This led to the Blacksmith Guild needing to purchase resources from other main cities. But it was too late to transport them now. Barres had to deliver the equipment within a few days, which posed a huge problem for him. “President Barres, I heard that the gnomes like to hoard ores. Perhaps you can borrow a batch of resources temporarily from them.” As he was about to find the gnomes, he wanted to find out more. “I’ve thought about it, but it doesn’t work.” Barres shook his head and said helplessly, “The gnomes do have relevant ores and have stored a lot, but they strictly control such resources. Without a good enough friendship and reason, there’s no way to transport any ore from them.” “Um… Guild Leader, I’m the adventurer that the Dragon God values the most and have some understanding of mechanical knowledge. Why don’t you let me go to the gnomes and negotiate with them?” Lorne immediately took the initiative to apply. He had the [Treasure Seeking] skill and could detect the location of the mine. As for the gnome’s robots, even if he could not obtain the ore from the gnomes, he could mine them himself. At that time, he would definitely make a killing. “You?” Barres did not know what to say. This young man did not seem to know his place. Other than the gnomes who had been studying machinery for thousands of years, no one else could master such a thing. But, despite his thoughts, Barres agreed. Because he had no better solution, he could only let this genius adventurer give it a try. There might be a surprise. “The gnomes admire the Dragon God very much. With the Angel’s Wings, you might really be able to persuade those stubborn fellows.” “As for the price of the ores, the highest price I can give you is 5 gold coins per unit. I hope the final ore will not be less than 10,000 units.” Barres offered a high price for Lorne without much expectations. The ores that the Blacksmith Guild needed were at least 100,000 units of ores. Only with so many ores could they have enough magic cannons in the army. However, thinking of the difficulty of the mission, Barres did not want to give the young man too much pressure, so he reduced the requirements a lot. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the mission: [Purchase of High-Grade Ores]!” “Mission Description: Head to the Gnome Tribe and help the Blacksmith Guild purchase enough high-grade ores. The highest price for this purchase is 5 gold coins and the quantity is between 10,000-100,000 units!” “Prompt: The amount of ores you purchase will directly affect the final reward of the mission.” Very good, the mission was obtained. Of course, this mission was not important. Most importantly, he had obtained the coordinates of the Gnome Tribe and had obtained the right to use the teleportation circle because he was handling official business. This was great. Without hesitation, Lorne arrived at the teleportation array leading to the gnomes. With a flash of light, he vanished. Ding! “You have entered the neutral map—[Gnome Mountain Range]!” But when Lorne regained his vision, he found himself in a mountain range covered in rocky hills. From the map, this place belonged to the west of Iron Skull City. It was about the same distance as the Lake of Death. If he wanted to travel on foot, it would take at least three to five days. Lorne changed the map of Iron Skull City to the Gnome Mountain Range, so that he could roughly understand the situation in this area. From the regional map, it could be seen that there was a main city mark on it. It was a city built by the gnomes, and it was also Lorne’s goal this time. “It seems that there are not many people in this Gnome Tribe.” Lorne checked the range of the Gnome City and found that it was only the size of a small town. It was countless times larger than Iron Skull City and was only a third the size of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. As for the distance between it and Lorne, it would take a few hours. Without thinking, he set off. On the way, Lorne moved quickly, almost several times faster than ordinary players. This was all thanks to the high agility attribute that gave him high movement speed. There was a 30% increase in speed given by the divine equipment, and his bloodline provided a 20% increase in speed. Coupled with the addition of entering stealth mode and+30% movement speed, he had a consistent buff of extra 80% in movement speed. In addition, the effect of invisibility was very good. As long as the level of the monster was not above Level 50, it was basically impossible to detect him. The only drawback was that it required MP. Fortunately, Lorne could summon Rimuru. Its skill could recover MP and was very efficient. … “We’re finally here.” After traveling through the mountain range for two hours, Lorne finally arrived at a plain. It was the only plain in the mountain range, suitable for building a city. To Lorne’s shock, it was the appearance of the building. He thought that as a race that liked ores, the gnomes would definitely build a main city filled with rocks. But only then did he realize that he was wrong. The city of the gnomes was not a simple rock city, but a very exquisite “modern city” with metal pipes everywhere! Lorne almost thought that he had returned to the real world. This mechanical smell that belonged to the steampunk style was too unique in this world. While he was stunned, an old gnome walked past the city gate. When he noticed the human adventurer, he immediately walked over and sized him up. “Strange, such a weak human adventurer actually has such a thick aura of light on him. It shouldn’t be…” The old gnome frowned, lowered his head, and pondered. Then, he looked at Lorne again, “Young human adventurer, why have you come to the Gnome Mineral Company?” What? Company? Lorne almost could not react to the term. As a sword and magic game world, the sudden appearance of steampunk mechanical equipment and the modern term ‘company’ was a little shocking to the players’ memory. “I came to buy items. I heard that the gnomes have many special mechanical products.” Lorne did not directly explain his intentions. The gnomes did not have a high affinity with Iron Skull City. If not for the pressure from the Dark Abyss, they would not have formed an alliance with Iron Skull City. “You’re here to buy products?” The old gnome seemed to have heard the funniest thing in the world. Such a person who was not even at the Earth Realm actually dared to say that he came to the gnomes to buy products. It was really interesting. Although the old gnome really looked down on the adventurer in front of him, he did not hesitate after noticing the light aura on him. Instead, he politely invited Lorne into this steel city. It could be seen that this city indeed had very excellent mechanical technology. Metal pipes and mechanical equipment could be seen everywhere. However, unlike energy in reality, the machines in this world used magic energy. This was also the most intelligent aspect of the gnomes. They used magic scrolls to inscribe magic circles in mechanical equipment, so that Energy Crystals could provide the corresponding energy for these industrial equipment. It was unbelievable. Lorne was very interested in these things, his eyes focused on the steel beasts. Seeing that the product he created was appreciated, the old gnome’s opinion of Lorne changed greatly. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the affinity of the NPC Tully. Affinity+100!” Excellent, he obtained affinity the moment they met. It seemed that it was not so difficult to communicate with the gnomes. Lorne immediately looked at the other party and said, “Senior, I have an important order that I need to discuss with the ones in charge of your company. Can you help me notify them?” “Mr. Tyrant, I’m a high-level manager of the Gnome Mineral Company. I’m in charge of all the businesses in the Iron Skull City branch. You can tell me what product you want.” The old gnome friendly led Lorne to the living room. The gnome assistant brought over the product information booklet of the Gnome Company immediately. When he took the letter, Lorne realized that there was an additional option on his interface—[Beginner Gnome Shop]. After opening it, all the products of the Gnome Company appeared on the interface. ———— Category: Material [Ordinary Wood]: Price: 1 silver coin per unit. [Ordinary Rock]: Price: 1 silver coin per unit. [Ordinary Steel]: Price: 5 silver coins per unit. [Ordinary Crystal]: Price: 10 silver coins per unit. […] ———— Category: Equipment [Ordinary Logging Machine]: Price: 10 gold coins per machine. [Ordinary Stone Picking Machine]: Price: 15 gold coins per machine. [Ordinary Exploration Machine]: Price: 20 gold coins per machine. […] ———— Category: … ———— Category: … ———— Category: … ———— It could be seen that there were many basic materials and equipment on the list, but because it was a low-level shop, the equipment’s function was very ordinary, and the quality of the materials was also the most ordinary. These things were clearly not part of Lorne’s plan. However, from these ordinary products, it could be seen that the gnomes had deep control over machinery. The legendary ore mining robots were definitely not baseless. But the only problem now was that to check higher-level shops, one had to have enough affinity and wealth to unlock them. This was a huge problem, because Lorne did not have that much money on him for the time being. Seeing that Lorne was not tempted, the Gnome Shop Manager, Tully, asked, “What’s wrong, Mr. Tyrant? Are you not satisfied with these products?” “Yes.” Lorne nodded, “These things are too ordinary. I want to check more precious products. Can you help me unlock the higher access rights?” “This is against the rules.” Tully shook his head, but then smiled, “However, I would like to ask, Mr. Tyrant, how did you obtain the aura of light? It does not seem to be the simple power of light.” Aura of light? <i>Since you are asking about it, I will show you the power of the Holy Angel.</i>  Lorne directly used [Angel’s Descent]. Holy light blossomed, and a pair of holy light wings appeared behind him. “This! This is…?!” Just like when Barres had seen this scene, Tully was also stunned. He froze on the spot, extremely shocked. When he recovered, Tully immediately said respectfully, “I didn’t expect you to obtain the angel’s inheritance at such a young age. No wonder you have such a rich aura of light.” “In that case, let me help you unlock the highest authority. Although this is not in line with the rules, I’m willing to believe in the judgment of the Dragon God.” An adventurer who had not even reached the Earth Realm had actually inherited the power of an angel. From this, it could be seen how much the Dragon God valued him. Tully was a businessman, so how could he not know what this meant? Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the Gnome Reputation, Reputation+10,000!” “Congratulations on obtaining the affinity of the NPC Tully. Affinity+1000!” “Congratulations on reaching [Friend] affinity with Tully!” A series of notifications appeared. Lorne did not expect the other party to be so generous. He gained 1,000 personal affinity points and 10,000 Gnome Reputation points. Not only that, but the shop information in front of him had also been directly promoted to the highest level. With this authority, he could check all the products sold by the gnomes. Indeed, the reputation of the Dragon of Light was still useful. Overjoyed, Lorne quickly checked. There were a large number of mineral veins near the region where the Cold Desolate Dragon City was located. Moreover, many high-grade mineral veins required people with high-grade mining skills to mine them. It just so happened that the gnomes had such robots for sale. However, when Lorne checked the item’s information, he was dumbfounded. ———— [High-Grade Mining Robot] Price: Not for sale Introduction: A magic robot developed by the mechanical research department of the gnomes. It has a body constructed from precise machinery. It can be provided with the ability of ‘magic crystal’ to allow it to move. It can conduct ore mining in the harsh underground environment. ———— If he only talked about its function, then this robot was completely in line with Lorne’s idea. Moreover, it had high-grade ore extraction technology. If he could buy it, he could immediately bring these robots to the Lake of Death and let them start work as soon as possible to accumulate funds. However, the problem was that this robot was not for sale! Wasn’t this making things difficult for him? “Manager Tully, I hope to purchase your company’s high-level mining robots. I will pay you a sufficient price.” Lorne stated his thoughts. This mining robot was an equipment that he urgently needed. Otherwise, without high-level miners, the mineral veins buried in the ruins of the war would not have been able to be mined. If he could not mine the ores, he would not have money to repair the Cold Desolate Dragon City or to build his own territory. The loss was too great. “Adventurer, the gnome’s mining robots are the highest-grade items that are not for sale. Even the Duke of Iron Skull City will not be able to purchase them.” “Unless, you have the rarest and most precious Dragon Crystal.” Tully smiled and shook his head. In his eyes, this adventurer might really be a genius of Iron Skull City, but he could not have something as rare as the Dragon Crystal. “Is that what you’re talking about?” Lorne took out a palm-sized crystal gem from his bag. It was pure and sparkling. “My god, you, you really have a Dragon Crystal!” Tully immediately jumped up from his seat and leaned forward to carefully examine the gem. After confirming repeatedly, a shocking light immediately burst from his eyes, causing him to fall into a state of ecstasy. This was a real Dragon Crystal! With such a gem, they could trade with dragons! One had to know that the rare materials in this world were all in extremely dangerous places, and dragons were the only existence that could enter such dangerous areas at will. If they needed materials that all races could not find, they had to find the dragons. Their treasure vaults contained anything one could possibly imagine! After the shock, Tully reluctantly retracted his gaze and said, “Adventurer, this Dragon Crystal fragment of yours is indeed expensive, but it’s still not enough to purchase a mining robot.” “If you want to break the rules to purchase the mining robots, you must take out the complete Dragon Crystal. Moreover, a complete Dragon Crystal can only purchase ten high-level mining robots.” “If you have found a high-level mineral vein, just ten mining robots will not be enough. Therefore, I suggest that you cooperate with our company and develop together. We can earn the most benefits for you in the shortest time possible!” “Of course, if you only represent Iron Skull City or the Dragon God, you can ignore my suggestion.” Damn, how cunning. Tully and Lorne had only just met, but he could analyze everything from these actions. Such business sense was ridiculous. He had to admit that the other party was right. Lorne indeed needed to pool a large amount of funds in a short period of time, so he was very concerned about the suggestion from Tully. Because the player’s subclass system had just been released, it was impossible to mine through hiring the players in the short term. At the very least, medium and high-level ores were too much for them. In addition, he could not cooperate with the Iron Skull City. After all, the ruins of the war was under their jurisdiction. If they mined there, why would they divide the profits with him? Therefore, there was only one path for Lorne, and that was to cooperate with the gnomes! “I discovered the mine myself, so I have no reason to share the profits with you, right?” Lorne was not in a hurry to agree. At this moment, he had to ask for more benefits. Otherwise, wouldn’t it be foolish to give others a bigger share? “Of course there’s a reason!” Hearing that Lorne was the one who had discovered the mineral vein, Tully was even more excited. “Adventurer, if you cooperate with us, our Gnome Mineral Company will provide all the equipment needed to mine the vein. Don’t underestimate the logistical scale here.” “In order to mine an ore vein, apart from having your own mining workers, you also need to deal with important matters such as transportation, security, and logistics.” “Especially security. I believe you know that there are terrifying monsters around the high-level mine. To mine in such an area, we need to pay attention to security. If the defense is not in time, those high-level mining workers might be destroyed overnight.” “This will definitely be a huge loss for you.” “In addition, there are many changes in the direction of the underground mine. During the mining process, we need to keep surveying to ensure that the mining direction is correct.” “There’s also the separation of the ores. The resources in any mine are different. If we work hard, the value of the mine can be maximized.” “Just dealing with these matters, you need to invest at least five complete Dragon Crystals to complete it. Moreover, the scale of the mining team will not be too large, only about a dozen or so mining workers. This efficiency is too low. It’s far inferior to the benefits of our cooperation in mining.” After explaining a pile of things, Tully took out the blueprint of the Gnome Mineral Company’s construction team and said, “Look, our company’s mining team is definitely the top in the world. Moreover, we will decide to send our team according to the quality of the mineral vein. If it’s a high-level mineral vein, we will send a high-level mining team and provide protection the entire time. Any problems that happen during the cooperation will be borne by us.” “What about the revenue split?” Lorne was also worried about the monsters in the Lake of Death. If there was a conflict when mining, as the mine owner, he could not deal with those terrifying high-level monsters. “You can choose it yourself.” “From 10% to 90%, you can choose whatever you want. The higher the percentage you give us, the higher our efficiency and involvement. You should understand that.” “Of course.” Lorne nodded. The more they earned, the harder they would work. This was common around the world. As for which option to choose? Lorne had a plan. “Manager Tully, I can take just 50% of the profits, but I have a request.” “What request?” Tully suppressed the excitement in his heart and calmly asked, “As a businessman, how can I not know that the price is equivalent to the benefits?” This adventurer definitely had extraordinary conditions. “In the future, I will build my territory. I want you and all the gnomes in your Gnome Mineral Company to join me!” “What? You want us to betray the company?!” Tully thought he had misheard. Did this young man not know that nearly 50% of the gnomes were members of the Gnome Mineral Company? It was the greatest symbol of the Gnome Kingdom. Although it was not involved in political matters, it had such a noble status. However, a human like him actually wanted them to leave? What a joke. “It’s not betrayal, it’s choosing a better future,” Lorne said. “Mr. Tyrant, I don’t understand where your confidence comes from. I also don’t know what future you can give us. I’m sorry.” “What if I can let you research the Kingdom of the Dragon?” Before Tully could respond, Lorne placed a portion of the construction map of the Cold Desolate Dragon City in front of him. Then, Tully’s expression changed. “This…” “How is this possible!” “Why, why do you have the blueprint for the Kingdom of the Dragon! This is an incredible building personally designed by the first Dragon God!” Tully’s voice was trembling. Although he only glanced at the blueprint, he could still see the marvel of it. This map was only the tip of the iceberg of the entire Kingdom of the Dragon, but it contained an extremely profound layout and design concept. To the gnomes, the Kingdom of the Dragon was a legend and the most revered divine item in their history! In the capital of the Gnome Kingdom, there were a few memory blueprints regarding the Kingdom of the Dragon. The mysteries within made the wise ones of the entire Gnome Kingdom study them for thousands of years. Even until today, they could still benefit from them. From this, it was obvious what the Kingdom of the Dragon meant to the gnomes. “If you are willing to join my territory, you will see the complete blueprint. Moreover, you can study it for as long as you want.” “Really?” “Of course.” Lorne could not understand it himself. He had to hand it to the architects in the future, so it was completely feasible to use it to rope in talents. Hearing this, Tully was indeed tempted. Even the way he looked at Lorne changed greatly. Although this adventurer was so young, he could obtain the recognition of the Dragon God and had a complete map of the Dragon Kingdom. His future was definitely filled with infinite possibilities. Following him might really be a good future! Thinking of this, Tully nodded and said, “Alright, I accept your invitation. If there really comes a day, I’m willing to join your territory and hope that you can follow our agreement today.” “Of course.” At this point, the two officially reached an agreement. Then, they began to discuss some details, such as the requirements for mining, the location, and other things to take note of. Most importantly, there were too many mines. Lorne spent more time thinking about this. He did not hand over all the coordinates of the various mines he found. He only planned to let the Gnome Mineral Company help him mine a portion of them. This number accounted for about one-fifth of the total coordinates. There were exactly a hundred coordinates. However, most of them were ordinary ores. There were only 16 medium-level and four high-level ore mines. Lorne did not want to give too many benefits to the Gnome Mineral Company. He only needed to use this money to repair the Cold Desolate Dragon City and then let Tully bring others to join the Cold Desolate Dragon City. In this way, he would directly have his own mining team. Moreover, the gnomes had the ability to design powerful defensive equipment that could supplement the lack of weapons in the Dragon City. After making an agreement with Tully, Lorne opened the Gnome Shop page and continued choosing materials. A portion of the buildings in the Cold Desolate Dragon City had fused with the mountain. If he wanted to restore the city, he had to dig up the mountain range. Therefore, Lorne chose five high-level mining robots. Mining robots had very powerful excavation abilities and could be excavators in the mountain range. There were also a few other robots with other functions. Because it had been lost for more than ten thousand years, the Cold Desolate Dragon City was overgrown with plants like weeds, moss, and other things. These robots could help clean up the place. It was originally cheaper to use manual cleaning, but the Cold Desolate Dragon City could not be discovered by the outside world for the time being. Therefore, it was necessary to purchase these robots. At the very least, they would not leak the information. After buying the robots, he also had to buy the accompanying “Magic Crystal”. This was the core of the robot’s energy source. The usage of the robot depended on the energy it was provided. This thing was not cheap either. One cost 100 gold coins. It could support a robot to work for 100 hours. Lorne ordered 100. Then, he opened the [Blueprint for the Construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City] and searched for the blueprint for the teleportation magic circle. If he wanted the main city to be useful, he had to have a teleportation array, especially in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This city was near the Lake of Death and was more than four days away from Iron Skull City. Without the teleportation circle, no player would be willing to go there. Without players, he would not be able to earn money. This was not the result that Lorne wanted. However, Lorne encountered a huge problem. The materials to build this ancient magic circle were very rare, and they were all extremely precious materials. It was impossible to find those ancient materials in the shop of the Gnome Branch. Fortunately, there were alternatives. Although using substitutes would affect the strength of the teleportation circle, in this situation, he could not care less. First, he had to build a magic circle that could teleport back and forth. Otherwise, the repair work in the city would not even be known. “100 Space Gems!” “300 Energy Crystals!” “1,000 Five-Colored Ores!” “3 Advanced Space Magic Circles!” “1 Location Setting Magic Circle!” “…” Lorne gathered all the materials he needed and bought a few more sets, just in case. In addition, he needed to buy other items, such as clay, rocks, and other materials for repair. Finally, Lorne stopped at the weapon option. Gnomes were good at mechanical construction. Almost 50% of the magic cannons were created by them, so they had a very mature industrial system and product style. However, these things were really expensive. In fact, in “Divine Realm”, any tool related to machinery was very expensive, and those related to magic tools were even more expensive. As for magic cannons, they were a combination of machinery and magic. The price was terrifying. Moreover, all high-grade magic cannons needed to be specially customized and provided high-grade ores to create. Therefore, on this page, there was no available magic cannon that interested Lorne. He had to place an order before they would start making them. After some thought, Lorne gave up. In fact, heavy defense weapons like magic cannons were what the current Cold Desolate Dragon City needed the most. In the past, because the soldiers in the city were all powerful dragons, Cold Desolate Dragon City was almost not equipped with any defensive weapons. But if Lorne turned it into his territory, the city defense weapons would be necessary. Unfortunately, the range of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was too large. If he wanted to set it up now, the amount of money spent would be an astronomical figure that was definitely not something that Lorne could afford. Therefore, Lorne could only give up on this matter for the time being. He would consider all matters regarding the city defense after he completely turned Cold Desolate Dragon City into his own territory. In any case, Cold Desolate Dragon City was still within the range of Iron Skull City. Moreover, with the help of the One-Eyed Giant Snake, the Dark Faction should not be able to start a large-scale war. Therefore, he still had time to develop. … “Warrior, the total price of these materials that you have chosen is one Dragon Crystal and 600,000 reputation points. Since you are a top customer, we will give you a 20% discount for the high-grade materials, which comes up to one Dragon Crystal and 480,000 reputation points!” Tully said. Indeed, Lorne still had to spend money to buy supplies. After all, Tully was still the manager of the Gnome Mineral Company, and he had to be responsible for his own work. He had not expected that with just a few words, the other party would give him so many resources. However, when he heard the price in the picture, Lorne was stunned. The currency for this purchase was not gold coins, but Gnome Reputation! “Damn!!!” What was going on? Lorne was stunned. When he recovered, he checked carefully and realized that he had forgotten to check the price units of these goods. In the Gnome Shop, medium and lower goods were calculated with gold coins. However, in the high-level shops, the calculation units for all the goods were Gnome Reputation Points! Lorne frowned. He could not help but look at his Gnome Reputation and realized that it was only 3150 points. This pitiful reputation points were given by the system because of his conversation with Tully. Therefore, this was a little awkward. How could he pay without the Gnome Reputation? Did he have to pay on credit? Lorne did not feel that he was so shameless that the other party would directly give him a huge amount of resources worth 600,000 reputation points. As for not wanting these materials? That would not do. After all, he had previously said that he wanted all the gnomes to join his main city, but now, he could not even afford these resources. Wouldn’t that be a loss of reputation as the “City Lord”? How could he raise his dignity in front of the other party in the future? While Lorne was thinking, Tully took the initiative to say, “Adventurer, you should not have much Gnome Reputation, but it’s okay. You can use other rare materials to exchange for them. For example, a Dragon Crystal is enough to deduct all these resources.” “Dragon Crystal? No, I don’t have many.” In fact, Lorne did have a dragon crystal on him, but he did not want to use it to buy these materials. If he wanted to get items not for sale in the future, he would have to rely on it. “Of course, but the rarer the material, the more reputation points will be deducted.” “That’s not a problem. My materials are the rarest.” Lorne was immediately excited, for there were indeed a lot of special materials in his bag. “How many reputation points is this worth?” Lorne took out a red [Fire Crystal] from his bag! This was dropped when they killed the “Fire Elemental Giant”. The Fire Elemental Giant was a high-level special monster. The items dropped from its body should not be bad. When he saw this thing, Tully’s eyes lit up, and he said happily, “This is a Fire Crystal. It will only condense in the purest place of the fire elements, and this crystal contains the aura of a dragon. It’s top-grade material!” “I really didn’t expect you to have such a precious thing.” “However, the Fire Elemental Crystal is more suitable for forging. If we give it to the dwarfs, they should offer a higher price, but here, we can count it as 300 reputation points from one.” The offer was actually 300 points. It seemed that this was indeed a good thing. Lorne had more than a hundred such crystals on him, but considering the difficulty of obtaining them, he did not take them out. “Look at this again.” Lorne took out the pearl from his bag. This was a material he had obtained from the One-Eyed Giant Snake, Mora. These pearls should be very valuable. When he saw this pearl, Tully’s eyes lit up again, “I didn’t expect you to have such a rare luxury item, adventurer. These pearls with special patterns can only be produced at the bottom of the Lake of Death. To the nobles on land, this is a very precious treasure. Therefore, such a pearl can be used in place of the reputation of the gnomes by 500 points.” It was even higher than the value of the Fire Crystal! Lorne was surprised. In his bag, there were a total of 6,000 pearls at the bottom of the lake, which could be used in place of 3 million Gnome Reputation points! From the looks of it, he had too much foresight in exploiting the giant snake. “In that case, I want to buy another 100 intermediate Gnome Robots and 1,000 magic crystals. I want to add another batch of these resources!” Previously, Lorne had thought that he did not have enough funds, so he had abandoned a lot of things. But who would have thought that these pearls at the bottom of the lake were so valuable? There was no need to hesitate now. He directly bought a large amount of resources to first clean up the ruins of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. After some calculations, the materials that Lorne had chosen required a total of 3.5 million reputation points. After a 20% discount, they only required 2.8 million reputation points. Without hesitation, Lorne paid 5,600 pearls. “My dear adventurer, it has been a pleasure working with you.” There was a smile on Tully’s face. In just half an hour, he had sold such a large amount of resources. The performance bonus of the Gnome Mineral Branch in Iron Skull City would also increase greatly. Soon, the two of them arrived at the warehouse. “Where do we need to send these supplies?” asked Tully. This time, Lorne bought a lot of supplies, especially the robots. There were more than a hundred of them. These equipment were very heavy, and he had to use large transport machines to deliver them safely. “No need. I’ll take it away now.” Lorne walked up and placed his hand on the supplies. In the next second, the heavy machinery disappeared. Tully was stunned, “Adventurer, was what you just used the Dragon Race’s ‘Dragon’s Treasure Vault’?” “Yes.” “I see.” Tully smiled, “It seems that the Dragon of Light values you far more than I imagined.” At this moment, a gnome in charge of the design ran over and whispered something in Tully’s ear. The latter immediately smiled. “Adventurer, our engineering department has already designed the mining route.” Tully took the blueprint from the gnome engineer. There were several planned routes drawn on it. He said, “Adventurer, we plan to start mining immediately. After a while, when the engineers have gathered, we will use the airship to send the engineers and equipment to the estimated coordinates. Then, we will begin to work along the border between the Doomsday Forest and the Lake of Death. We will first use all our manpower to mine the ordinary areas and begin a detailed survey of the underground environment of the high-level mines. After we have all investigated, we will assign high-level miners and robots to mine.” “Due to the complicated environment, we plan to mine the ore underground this time. Although the difficulty is higher, such a plan is easier and safer than dealing with the powerful monsters outside.” “As for transportation, that’s a huge problem. Our plan is to place all the minerals on this highland mountain range and then transport them to the company…” “These are our initial plans for the time being. What do you think?” Tully explained everything. As a company dedicated to mining, their experience was unquestionable. However, Lorne cared more about the word “airship”. “How long until your airship reaches the Doomsday Forest?” “It will take about a day or two to set off from here, because we need to transport a lot of equipment. We can’t go at full speed.” Tully’s explanation surprised Lorne. It had to be known that this place was very far from the Doomsday Forest. If ordinary players wanted to run the map, it would take at least a week, or even longer. Their airships could arrive in a day or two despite transporting a large amount of equipment. In this world of swords and magic, it was indeed astonishing. “An airship is a device that has a higher level of confidentiality than a mining robot, but if our cooperation reaches a certain level, the Gnome Mineral Company can sell you one.” Clearly seeing through Lorne’s thoughts, Tully reminded him of this information. Originally, the airship was a high-level equipment in the Gnome Company and could not be sold to any force. However, this adventurer was different. In his hands, he had the original map of the Dragon Kingdom. If he was willing to use it as a bargaining chip, he believed that the Gnome Company could sell him any equipment. Hearing this, Lorne was indeed tempted. However, the time needed to buy this thing was still too far away. At the very least, there would definitely not be such a need during this period of time. The two of them conversed casually for a while. At this moment, Lorne suddenly said, “Mr. Tully, I have a request that I hope you can agree to.” “What is it?” “I want to buy another batch of rare high-grade ores.” “No problem. Please follow me.” Tully generously led Lorne to the nearby warehouse and said, “I wonder which ore you need?” “Star Patterned Iron,” Lorne said. “Star Patterned Iron is the main material for casting magic cannons. Most of the Star Patterned Iron is only mixed in other types of mineral veins. It is very difficult to mine.” Tully opened the panel of the warehouse, pulled out a sample of the Star Patterned Iron, and sent it to Lorne. On Lorne’s mission panel, there was a notification of a mission item. He immediately asked happily, “How much does a unit of Star Patterned Iron cost?” “Please allow me to ask, are you buying it for yourself?” As expected of an experienced businessman, he immediately saw the problem. “No.” Lorne shook his head, “The situation is like this. Recently, Iron Skull City has detected that there are minions of the Dark faction wandering in the ruins of the war. They want to resurrect the dragon corpses inside, which is a huge threat to all lives in the Iron Skull City. Therefore, Iron Skull City has decided to send the army to clean up the ruins of the war. However, because of the sudden incident, it is difficult to supply their equipment. Therefore, I would like to ask you to sell a portion of the rare ores and let Iron Skull City urgently forge equipment to support the army’s crusade.” “I see…” “Alright, we normally don’t sell these ores, but since it’s a request from you, we are also willing to contribute to the peace and stability of the continent.” “Regarding the price of the Star Patterned Iron, for the sake of our partner, we will only charge 4.5 gold coins per piece. However, we have a request. This batch of ores must be bought by you in your own name.” Tully looked earnestly at Lorne, who brightened and silently gave him a thumbs-up. “No problem.” It had to be said that Tully was really cunning. Not only did he directly guess Lorne’s purpose in buying the ores, but he also guessed the highest price Iron Skull City gave him. Finally, and most importantly, he made a request that Lorne had to buy it in his own name! Perhaps many people did not understand the meaning of this action, but as long as they were businessmen, they could tell at a glance. Tully’s request to trade in the name of Lorne meant that the ores had to go through Lorne. Then, there was a possibility that he could operate as a middleman of the two partners. For example, the highest price that Iron Skull City offered was 5 gold coins to buy a unit of ore. Lorne could directly quote them the highest price even though the gnomes sold them at 4.5 gold coins. Lorne could obtain 0.5 gold coins per unit of profit in this transaction! One had to know that the ore requirement for Iron Skull City this time was a total of 100,000 units! If he calculated it all, Lorne could obtain 50,000 gold coins from the deal! Was there anything more comfortable than free money in this world? … Then, the two discussed the details of the cooperation in detail. In the end, Lorne obtained the order for 100,000 Star Patterned Iron Ores and wrote a reply to Iron Skull City. The general opinion was that they only trusted Lorne and needed him to trade. With this letter, it basically confirmed Lorne’s benefits. Moreover, Tully generously let Lorne take the ores away first, because with the ores around, he was not worried that there would be a problem with the trading of these ores. “Adventurer, our mining team and airship are ready. Are you coming with us to the ruins of the war, or are you returning to Iron Skull City?” “Let’s go to the ruins of the war. It’s a good opportunity for me to see your airship.” “I would love to. Please follow me.” Following Tully through the city, Lorne finally arrived at a huge square. In front of him were countless gnome miners and a huge oval object. This was the gnome’s airship. It was very huge. Its entire length was more than a thousand meters, and its total height was nearly a hundred meters. Such a size was about the size of an aircraft carrier. It was a true behemoth. From afar, one could see a huge oval airbag above the airship. It was very similar to the airship in modern history. The only difference between the two was the main engine. In reality, airships flew by helium, and the airships built by the gnomes relied on a huge magic circle to release special gases. There was a magic unit at the tail that provided the lift. It was designed to provide the airship with the impetus to move forward. Under the airship was a huge cabin. It was constructed from high-grade wood and had a lighter weight, increased hardness, and greater tenacity. After everyone stepped into the airship, Tully held a condensed energy crystal and placed it on the center platform of the command platform. In the next moment, all the magic circles on the airship lit up. Then, the airship slowly rose until it was two thousand meters high. Only then did it begin to move forward. “Warrior, this is the crystallization of our gnome technology. This is a ‘Mol-class’ airship, a medium-sized one. It can carry tens of thousands of people and a large amount of equipment at once.” Tully proudly introduced this to Lorne. “Knowledge is power…” Even if Lorne was a modern person, he was still amazed. After all, this was a world of swords and magic. It was incredible that the gnomes could develop such technology. However, ever since he saw the strength of the Abyss Rulers, Lorne had some thoughts that looked down on machinery. Of course, he did not deny the power of technology. After all, not everyone could have the strength of the Abyss Ruler. Such a large machine that could determine the outcome of a war was worthy of recognition. It was just that his dream was very far away. What he wanted to become was a god who surpassed the Abyss Rulers, an invincible existence who could surpass the world. … When the airship crossed countless areas and arrived at the Doomsday Forest, a group of players who were completing a mission there were all stunned. “Gosh! Airplane!!” “Bullsh*t plane. That’s clearly an airship.” “That’s not right. Isn’t this a world of swords and magic? Why are there even airships?” “Did I enter the wrong game?” “It should be the work of the gnomes. In the background introduction given by the officials of the Divine Realm, it said that the gnomes will create machinery!” “That’s true, but I can’t accept suddenly taking out an airship!” “There’s probably a hidden mission. Brothers, anyone wants to follow me on this journey?” “Brother, bring me along!” Huff— Huff— Standing at the bow of the airship, the fierce wind whistled in Lorne’s ears. Air currents passed through everywhere. Here, one could see the forest below. However, the forest in this region was too dense, so it was difficult to see the specific appearance of the mountain. When they neared the ruins of the war, the scene in Lorne’s eyes immediately changed. The green mountains and rivers, the white clouds and light, all vanished at this moment. In their place was a dark sky. The ruins of the war were like a huge ‘factory’. From the mountains, black fog was emitted. They gathered above the ruins of the war and blocked the sunlight. As for the ground below, it was also pitch-black and looked lifeless. “Adventurer, this area is very dangerous. There are terrifying flying creatures lurking nearby. Our airship can’t directly enter. It can only descend from the side and arrange for the storage base to be nearby. In the future, when the mining is completed, we can get the transport workers to pull the ores back here. We can use the airship to transport them every two days.” Tully was very wary of the ruins of the war. In order to avoid fighting the monsters head-on, he controlled the airship to fly along the edge of the Doomsday Forest and finally chose a place close enough to the destination as the coordinates of the base. Lorne also checked the map and found that this location was indeed good. It could effectively avoid conflict with the monsters, and it was the closest place to the mine. Soon, the airship temporarily landed. The mine workers quickly disembarked, and the construction team began to build temporary storage bases around them. Lorne bid farewell to Tully and ran in the direction of Cold Desolate Dragon City. … Soon, Lorne appeared in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This place was still in the same dilapidated state. It was barren everywhere. Fortunately, the construction materials were very good, and there was no problem with the rough building main body. The only thing that was difficult to deal with were the parts that collapsed and the parts that were wrapped in the mountain range. The collapsed area of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was very large, especially the city wall. To repair this huge city wall, it required countless funds and workers. Lorne was prepared to leave the work to players, but he had to wait until he completely occupied the city. Therefore, what he needed to deal with now was the construction of the city. The damaged building needed a high-level architect to repair. This mission could also be put aside. Now, it was best to first clean up the ruins in the entire Dragon City. With that in mind, Lorne took out the Gnome Robots from his bag. The functions of these intermediate robots were all the same. Some were good at mining, some were good at cleaning, and some were good at transporting. They were all specially bought by Lorne to clean up the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Then, he installed a magic crystal in each robot and activated all of them. “The ten of you will clean up the ruins of the building.” “The ten of you will clean up the moss on the ground and the buildings.” “The twenty of you are responsible for moving the collapsed rocks. Put all the large rocks in the nearby empty space. The small rocks will be gathered in the nearby square.” “Attention! Do not destroy any of the herbs and plants!” Lorne quickly gave the orders to the robots. In order to prevent the herbs in the city from being destroyed, he injected the robot with the knowledge to identify some of the herbs in the [Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia]. After dealing with this, Lorne looked at the remaining Gnome robots. Unlike the previous robots, these robots were all technicians. “You 20 mining robots are responsible for carving out the mountains that cover the city and restoring the building to its original appearance.” “You 30 construction robots are responsible for repairing the buildings in the city. You will first take priority from the refining and forging workshops.” “The remaining ten robots in charge of constructing magic circles are responsible for repairing the magic circles in the city. The teleportation circle is top priority!” Inside the robots created by the gnomes, there was a command magic circle that could input relevant information and allow them to complete certain actions. For example, the repair of the magic circle in the Cold Desolate Dragon City only required the corresponding building blueprint. ———— Construction name: [Teleportation Array] (Cold Desolate Dragon City) Architecture Quality: Legendary Level: 1 Effect: Radiates a radius of 4,000 kilometers with the magic circle as the center. It can connect with all the magic circles in the area and interact with them. (Requires the authorization of the other party’s teleportation magic circle.) Consumption: 10-100 Energy / Use (Transportation Range affects the amount used) Special Effect: Due to a special design, energy consumption is reduced by 50%. Introduction: A teleportation circle built with the magic technology of the Dragon Race. It has advanced spatial technology, causing the teleportation range to be farther and more stable. Moreover, the cost of teleportation is lower. ———— [Requirement for Repair]: Space Gem x100, Energy Crystal x300, Rainbow Ore x1000, Advanced Space Magic Formation x3, Advanced Location Magic Formation x1. [Repair Time]: 5,000 units. ———— This was the information regarding the teleportation array of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. It could be seen that the operation of the teleportation array also required energy. However, the teleportation circle in the Dragon City had the effect of halving the cost of teleportation, which meant that Lorne could obtain greater benefits from it. In addition, the final [Repair Time] referred to an average magic circle repair worker. They would need 5,000 hours to complete the work. Moreover, this worker had to have legendary construction technology! This was a harsh requirement. Unless Lorne worked with Iron Skull City, it was impossible to find so many workers with legendary construction technology. Fortunately, the Gnome’s robot had such strength. Because of his cooperation with the gnomes, Lorne did not buy a high-grade mining robot for the time being. Instead, he replaced it with a high-grade Rune Robot. These robots had Legendary magic circle construction technology. Although they were at the lowest threshold of Legendary, they had really met the requirement. As long as they had a good Legendary construction blueprint, they could complete the work very well. Lorne could directly find the relevant information on the blueprint from [Cold Desolate Dragon City Construction Blueprint] and input them into the robot’s content to let them work according to the blueprint. As for their efficiency? The efficiency of these robots was 10 units per hour, which meant that they only needed 50 hours to complete the mission. All in all, it would only take two days to complete everything. After all, these robots did not need to sleep. In addition, Lorne gave the robot some special construction missions. That was the [Resurrection Array] that did not exist in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. The resurrection array was a magic circle that only adventurers could use. As a huge dragon’s city, how could there be such a building in the Cold Desolate Dragon City? However, it did not matter. This Mythical blueprint designed by the first Dragon of Light gave Lorne a powerful construction ability. As long as he wanted it, he could immediately create the relevant blueprint. He opened the system interface that came with the blueprint, and in the building column, he chose the “Resurrection Array” and finally chose to create it. Ding! “Blueprint is being created. Please wait…” “1%…” “2%…” “3%…” “…” Ding! “Congratulations, your ‘resurrection array’ blueprint has been created!” Soon, the blueprint was completed. ———— Construction name: [Resurrection Array] (Cold Desolate Dragon City) Architecture Quality: Legendary Level: 1 Construction Effect: Radiates a radius of 1,000 kilometers with the magic circle as the center. All adventurers linked to the magic circle can be revived in this magic circle. Consumption: 100 Energy / Use. Maximum Users: 1,000 Special Effect: Due to a special design, energy consumption is reduced by 50%. Introduction: A resurrection array built with the magic technology of the Dragon Race. It has a smaller energy consumption and a larger radiation range. ———— [Requirement]: Revival Magic Formation x1, Energy Crystal x100, Matrix Runes x3. [Construction Time]: 20,000 units. ———— Building a magic circle was much harder than repairing a magic circle. However, this magic circle could resurrect 1,000 people at once. This number was quite large. He believed that as long as there was a resurrection array, it could basically ensure the needs of the main city’s players. If the number of players increased in the future, he could add a few more magic circles. As for the materials? Fortunately, he bought more from the gnomes. These resources could support the resource consumption for the next week. Then, Lorne went to the warehouse and placed the building materials in his bag. They looked like a lot, but they were nothing in the huge warehouse of the Dragon City. Looking at the spacious warehouse area, Lorne realized the pressure he was under. If he wanted to repair the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City, he would definitely need countless resources. The total amount of funds would exceed his imagination. Fortunately, with the dragon’s [Treasure Seeking] skill, he could rely on the surrounding mineral veins to survive. “Phew—” Lorne took a deep breath and crushed the return scroll in his hand. … Swish! With a flash of light, Lorne returned to Iron Skull City and found the frowning Barres in the Blacksmith Guild. “Mr. Tyrant, why are you back?” At first, Barres was happy to see Lorne, but soon his expression sank. He did want to see Lorne, but not now, because he had left Iron Skull City too soon. How could he bring back what he wanted in such a short time? Thinking of this, Barres felt as sad as if he had lost a hundred gold coins. At that moment, Lorne took out a letter. “A letter from the Gnome Mineral Company?” Barres frowned. Under normal circumstances, the result of bringing back the letter was that the gnome needed to add other conditions, and it was likely to be a rejection letter. In short, bringing back the letter was not a good result. “It’s not your fault. Gnomes are indeed hard to communicate with—” Before he could finish, his eyes nearly popped out, “Heavens! They actually agreed!” “Quick, follow me.” Barres quickly pulled Lorne to the finance department, “Quick, prepare 500,000 gold coins for me. I want it now!” The NPC in charge of the finances was stunned. Then, he quickly wrote a check for the gold coins. With the check, Barres immediately extracted 500,000 gold coins from the vault and handed them all to Lorne. “Mr. Tyrant, please make another trip. We want 100,000 units of ore. Please send the gnomes to Iron Skull City in an airship.” Eh? In fact, the ores were all on Lorne already. However, in order to act like it was convincing, he had to make another trip. Lorne walked into the teleportation circle and immediately crushed the return scroll in the wilderness. After returning to Iron Skull City, he found a concert hall and enjoyed the dance for half an hour. In the end, he returned to the Blacksmith Guild. “Adventurer, it’s been hard on you. Is the ore here yet?” Barres asked excitedly. “I’ve succeeded.” With a wave of his hand, 100,000 units of Star-Patterned Iron ores filled the entire hall. “It’s really the Star-Patterned Iron Ore. Great, this is great. With these ores, our forging can begin immediately!” “Mr. Tyrant, your help is too timely. In order to thank you for your help, I’m willing to help you merge your set into a stronger equipment for free!” Barres said seriously. Lorne’s eyes lit up. In the game, fusing equipment was not a difficult term to understand. However, in “Divine Realm”, there had never been a choice to fuse equipment. However, he did not expect it to be accidentally triggered at this moment. “Although there are many parts in the set, these parts have the same origin attributes. As long as we smelt them together and supplement them with the appropriate forging method, we can obtain a new equipment.” “The new equipment will inherit most of the attributes of the original equipment, and there might be a special mutation. The mutations are usually positive. Once such a situation occurs, you will definitely obtain an even stronger equipment!” “Of course, there is a certain success rate for fusing equipment, and the higher the level, the lower the success rate.” “However, to the current Mr. Tyrant, the level of your [Sage Set] is very low. If you fuse it, the success rate is at least 90%.” Barres explained. “Alright, it’s about time I changed into better equipment.” Without hesitation, Lorne agreed. This Level 10 Silver Set should have long since retired. He had been wearing this equipment until now only because his combat strength came from his pets, so he did not have too many requirements for his attributes. However, now that Lorne could almost reach Level 40, there was naturally no reason for him to continue wearing the “Beginner Set”. Lorne directly took off all his equipment. In fact, there was still a Platinum Set treasure chest in his bag, but because he was about to reach Level 40, he had not opened it. As for the equipment on him, he was naturally too lazy to change them. It just so happened that there was a chance to merge the equipment now. He had to see the situation first. Perhaps the quality would be better. After handing all seven equipment to Barres, Lorne casually found a pile of Silver and Gold equipment to wear. Unexpectedly, his attributes increased by 30%. This was ridiculous. “Don’t worry, Mr. Tyrant. I will fuse the best equipment for you.” Barres gave Lorne a wretched smile, “To be honest, if not for you helping me so much, I will definitely not help you fuse the equipment at this time. This is a violation of the Iron Skull City contract. If Iron Skull City finds out, my salary for this month will be gone.” “By the way, what kind of equipment do you want? This set of equipment can only be refined into one piece of equipment. Do you want a magic staff or a magic robe?” Just as he was about to enter the forging room, he suddenly turned around and asked. “A ring.” Lorne had two rings on him, but their quality was relatively low. They were no longer suitable for the current intensity of battles. Moreover, the ring was not within the range of the usual seven slots. In the future, it would not conflict with the equipment part of the Platinum Set. “No problem. Please wait a moment.” Barres nodded, then put the equipment into the forge. Lorne could not watch the forging process, so he could only sit in the hall and wait for the good news. Ten minutes later. Half an hour later. An hour later. The time it took to fuse the equipment was clearly much longer than he had imagined, but it was not good for him to leave during this period of time, so he could only open the forum and check the situation inside. “Shocking! A giant airship appears near the Doomsday Forest!” “A large army of gnomes has arrived in the ruins of the war!” “There is technology in this world! Engineers, quickly find the gnomes. Your wisdom will bring you opportunities!” “Explosive earnings! Tyrant’s shop’s daily income is close to 50 million alliance dollars!” “The Virtual Industry will be as lively as the sales of Dragon One!” “A terrifying Headless Horseman was discovered at the border of Iron Skull City!” “…” Due to the high-profile appearance of the airship, the topic of “Gnomes” was very popular on the forum. Many people began to go in groups to the warehouse base that the gnomes had built. They believed that there was a special hidden mission there. Many people also valued the “technology” of the gnomes, because everyone lived in the technology world in reality. There were many advanced ideas in their minds, especially the players working in the technology industry. They felt that their technology could be glorified in this world. Therefore, there was a trend of ‘technological recovery’. With regards to this, Lorne maintained a wait-and-see attitude. He did not know the game system’s attitude towards the “technology” element. If technology was really the future, these players might really be able to bring the world to the industrial age. As for the post after that, Lorne opened the topic of the Headless Horseman. “It really is him…” This so-called Headless Horseman was the one that Lorne had encountered at the Lake of Death. This guy was an Abyss Ruler. It had been running around the border of Iron Skull City, so it was most likely plotting something. At the mention of this guy, Lorne could not help but think of Domina, the Naga Queen. There had been no reaction from the mission she had asked Lorne to do. Should he check? The mission that Domina gave him was to find the coordinates of the Naga Race. It was not a difficult mission. “Forget it.” Lorne quickly shook his head. It was best not to worry about this mission. A mission issued by the abyssal demons was definitely not a good thing. There might be another scheme behind it. As a weak adventurer, it was best to stay away from it. As he thought this… Suddenly! A grand voice sounded in the sky. Ding! “Iron Skull City Announcement: Iron Skull City has officially issued a crusade mission to all adventurers—[Eliminate the Rebels]!” “Mission Description: In the western region of Iron Skull City, a large group of minions of the Dark Abyss have appeared. The orcs living in the region have been corroded by the darkness, and a large number of orcs have completely submitted to the darkness. Adventurers, please gather now and immediately set off to the designated war zone to kill them to stop the disaster brought by the Dark Abyss. You will obtain a large number of contribution points as a result!” “Ding!” “Ding!” The announcement sounded three times. All the players who belonged to Iron Skull City could accept this mission on their system interface. Then, the players in the main city became excited. This was clearly another large-scale crusade. Moreover, killing monsters gave points, which meant that there was a Points Exchange Shop. As long as the players killed enough monsters in the event, they could exchange for any reward they wanted in the shop! … “Is this the special mission that the Dragon of Light mentioned?” When Lorne had looked for the Dragon of Light to submit the mission, the other party had said that a special mission would appear recently, and the final reward of this mission was the City Creation Token that Lorne needed the most! Therefore, Lorne had been waiting for the so-called mission to appear. Now that there was finally movement, he quickly opened the activity panel in excitement. ———— Mission: [Eliminate the Rebels] Type: Time Limited Event Duration: 168 hours Difficulty: ??? Recommended Level: 30 Event Requirement: Kill all monsters who submit to the Dark. (Any demonized creature) Reward: Points. (This area will only drop points.) (Points Usage: Can be exchanged for EXP, Reputation, Equipment, Tools, Gems, Treasure Chests, Guild Establishment Token, City Creation Token (Only One), etc.) Introduction: … ———— “There’s really a City Creation Token!” Lorne’s eyes lit up. Although it was only a Level 30 event, the reward was beyond everyone’s expectations. In this event, there were almost all kinds of rewards, among which the players paid the most attention to the [Guild Establishment Token] and [City Creation Token]! “The Guild Establishment Token is the proof to establish an organization in the game. With this token, your guild will be approved by Iron Skull City and receive the corresponding guild benefits. This was a reward that all the guilds wanted. [City Creation Token] was the ultimate reward for everyone! Because there was only one City Creation Token, obtaining this token meant that one would have the first player territory in the world and enjoy the first wave of dividends brought about by the territory. It could be seen that ever since the information about this event appeared, almost all the players were in an uproar, especially a few large guilds. They even dared to declare that they would obtain the City Creation Token and become the first “Overlord” in the world! It had to be said that they had many thoughts. Unfortunately, they had forgotten who their opponent was. They wanted to snatch the City Creation Token from Lorne? “I’m afraid that tens of thousands of you will not be enough for Aisha to kill.” Boom! As Lorne was checking the event information, a loud rumble came from the forging room. The intense trembling felt like an earthquake. Lorne immediately recovered and frowned, “Did my equipment explode?” It felt possible. It was obvious that this guy with big eyes and a thick neck was not reliable. However, there was no need to worry. That guy was the leader of the Blacksmith Guild. If his equipment exploded, he could just choose another Platinum equipment from his guild to supplement himself. After all, as an adventurer, players were the disadvantaged party. As he thought this, Barres suddenly ran out of the forge. Not good. His clothes had exploded into pieces, and even his hair had become a real mushroom head that was still smoking black. Just as Lorne thought he was about to hear the bad news, Barres suddenly laughed. “Mr. Tyrant, you’re really lucky.” “In the forging just now, I had been repeatedly tempering, but I realized that it was always difficult to merge all the equipment together, so I forged several times. The last time, my forging hammer had just struck this ring when there was a violent explosion. I thought that the equipment was going to be destroyed, but who knew that the explosion just now actually made this ring even more perfect.” “Hahaha, this is really great. In all my years of forging equipment, this is the first time I’ve encountered such a situation. It’s really too interesting.” As he laughed, he opened his palm. There was a ring emitting blue light inside. Just by looking at the light outside, one could clearly sense that this equipment was definitely not simple. Lorne took the ring and checked its attributes. ———— [Vast Ocean Ring] Grade: Diamond Magic Attack: +1000 Magic Resistance: +500 Special Effect: +20% Long-Distance Attack Range. Special effect: +20% Movement Speed. Special Effect: [Vast Ocean]: Activates the Barrier of the Vast Ocean. Transfer all the damage taken to MP. During this period, physical and magic resistance will increase by 50%. Equipment Requirement: Level 30 Introduction: A Diamond-grade equipment forged by Legendary Blacksmith Barres. This equipment contains the essence of seven pieces of the ‘Sage Set’. It has a high penetrative effect and is extremely lethal to the target. ———— Damn!!! Lorne was stunned when he saw the attributes of the equipment. One had to know that more than an hour ago, it was only a Level 10 Silver Set. But now, it had become a Diamond-grade equipment! Moreover, the attributes of this equipment were too shocking. Just the Magic Attack on the interface had increased by 1,000 points! Just this attribute alone was several times stronger than the attributes of the [Sage Set]. But that was not all. Its second attribute was “Magic Resistance+500”, which provided a powerful defense attribute for Lorne and also allowed his magic resistance to break through the 1,000 mark. There were also three special effects. The first two were attack range and movement speed, which were also the attributes that Lorne needed the most. The last was an active skill. This active skill could raise Lorne’s resistances and transfer damage taken to MP. Wasn’t this equivalent to having two HP bars?! This was an unexpected surprise, one that exceeded Lorne’s expectations. Without saying anything, he quickly threw away the low-level ring and put on this powerful Vast Ocean Ring. “Huh?” Lorne checked the equipment ranking and found that the Diamond-grade ring was only fourth. This did not seem right. In Lorne’s eyes, the attributes of this equipment should be stronger than the [Ghost Shadow Necklace]. After all, this equipment increased attributes by 1,500 points, but the Shadow Necklace did not increase any attributes at all. “This necklace…” As Lorne studied his necklace, Barres’ gaze shifted over, “Mr. Tyrant, this necklace is a little unusual.” “Unusual?” Lorne frowned. Was this a hidden divine artifact? “If I’m not mistaken, this might be a damaged Mythical-grade necklace!” Pfft— Lorne almost spat in his face. This guy was not joking, right? Although he had not played the game for long, he knew very well what a Mythical equipment was. In a game, Mythical equipment was the highest-level equipment and was considered extremely rare. Now, you’re telling me that this is a divine artifact? No way, was this guy toying with him? Lorne looked at him in disbelief. To be honest, to be able to encounter a Mythical equipment and a Demigod equipment at this point of the game was already very heaven-defying. If he said that this was another Mythical equipment, Lorne would really find it hard to accept. After all, they were not like cabbages in the market, found everywhere. “Mr. Tyrant, please do not doubt my judgment. In the name of the Blacksmith Guild Leader, I guarantee that this ring is definitely the remains of a certain divine equipment.” Barres said seriously. “Since you’re so sure, let me see if you can repair it.” “Eh…” Barres touched his head awkwardly and said, “My ability is limited. Repairing Mythical equipment is already beyond my strength. Moreover, repairing a divine equipment requires special forging equipment. The forging equipment I have is far from reaching the requirements.” To put it bluntly, he was weak. If it was an existence like the Dragon of Light, it would probably recover with just a stare. Lorne sighed and asked, “Other than the Dragon God, who can repair this equipment?” “The Dragon God does not use a forging method, but the pure power of faith to restore the lost part. Other than the Dragon God, no one in the world can do this.” “If there’s anyone who can repair a divine equipment, it must be the gnomes closest to us. The gnomes have a specialized forging divine equipment that has a high chance of repairing a damaged one.” “Of course, if you want to use this divine equipment, you will definitely have to pay a high price. According to the rumors I’ve heard, this price is about 1 billion gold coins!” Barres said slowly. After hearing this, Lorne directly left the Blacksmith Guild. 1 billion? They might as well rob him. One gold coin could probably be sold for 300 alliance dollars. 1 billion gold coins was 10 trillion alliance dollars. Even if he had a mountain of gold at home, it would not be enough to squander like this. Of course, in a few months, the gold coins would not be worth so much money. At that time, there should still be hope for 1 billion gold coins. In addition, rare materials could also be traded to the gnomes, but now that Lorne needed money, he did not have such an idea. He could not be bothered to think too much. It was more important to rush to the event location now. This City Creation Token could not be snatched away by anyone! After leaving the Blacksmith Guild, Lorne stood in the square of Iron Skull City. It could be seen that there were very few people in Iron Skull City now. Most of the players had already left Iron Skull City and headed to the event area. Because there was no level restriction in this event, many players wanted to try it. Especially because there were a large number of gems and equipment in the prizes of this event, which were what the players wanted the most now, nothing could stop them. Lorne did not idle. He immediately opened the map and calculated the route. The location of this event was not in the direction of the ruins of the war but in the west. Unfortunately, it was far from the Gnome Mineral Company so he could not teleport there. He could only run now. From the map, the Titan Forest should be about a day’s journey away from Iron Skull City. He had to set off from the western city gate and move along the moonlight lawn. He could reach it after walking on the plain for a day. The monsters on the way were not powerful. Most of them were Level 20-40 monsters, not as terrifying as in the direction of the ruins of the war. Seeing this, there was no need for Lorne to hesitate. He planned to travel at full speed, trying to reach his destination within six hours. This was a harsh plan, but it was not difficult for him, who had high movement speed. As he prepared to leave… Suddenly! A message popped up. “Little Brother Tyrant, where are you now?” This was news from Twinkle Rose. “What, you want to pay with your body so soon?” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up into a meaningful smile. “Tsk, shameless. How can an elder sister compensate a younger brother with her own body?” Twinkle Rose: “Let me tell you something serious. The sisters of our Silver Snow Guild are almost at the event location. Little Brother, do you want me to tell you the route?” “So soon?!” Lorne was stunned. According to the distance he calculated from the map, it would take at least a day to reach the activity area. But the event had just begun not long ago, and the Silver Snow Guild members were already nearby? “That was fast.” On the other side, Twinkle Rose was extremely happy. She had been bullied by Tyrant for too long. Now that she had finally found an opportunity, she had to satisfy herself. “Hurry up and say it, or else you won’t get the share of the potion sales anymore.” How could Lorne let her subdue him? Impossible. Previously, he had given Twinkle Rose and Super Rich 300,000 antidotes each. After selling them, they would earn 120,000 per day. To Twinkle Rose, this was equivalent to someone giving her a limited edition bag every day. She did not want to let go of such a good thing. Therefore, the beauty directly withered and said, “At this coordinate in the main city, find Knight Leader Oren and tell him that you want to go to the abandoned sentry post in the Dark Marsh. He will give you a chance to teleport to the Dark Marsh.” Hearing this, Lorne cursed. No wonder the Silver Snow Guild had arrived so early. They had made use of the Dark Marsh. It was a small map, near the event area. From there, they could reach the nearest activity area in half an hour. “Big-busted Sister, not bad. You can even find such a place.” Lorne gave her three thumbs-up. “This was encountered by a young lady from my guild when she was doing a chain mission. It just so happened that the event area was nearby, which saved us a day of traveling.” Twinkle Rose said, “I’ll only tell this secret to you for the time being. Don’t tell others too early. Let the sisters of the Silver Snow Guild farm for a few hours first. Otherwise, we won’t be able to compete with them.” “Don’t worry, big-busted sister. In addition, I’ll give you an additional hour the next time we meet.” “I don’t believe you. Men like to brag.” Twinkle Rose, walking through the forest, giggled at Lorne’s words. Then, happily, she closed the chat and focused on the monster before her. … Iron Skull City. Lorne followed the method of Twinkle Rose and found Knight Leader Oren, informing him of his intention to go to the Dark Marsh. “There’s a group of detestable marsh crocodiles in the Dark Marsh. Bring back ten crocodile skins. I’ll give you a generous reward.” Knight Leader Oren gave Lorne a mission. This mission was extremely low-level. It did not matter what the reward was. What was important was that with this mission, he would obtain the opportunity to teleport to the Dark Marsh. With the mission in hand, Lorne stepped into the teleportation circle. He confirmed the location. Teleport! With a flash of light, when Lorne regained his vision, he found himself in a dark swamp. Standing there was an abandoned sentry post. “How close.” Lorne looked at the map and found that it was less than an hour’s journey. At his speed, it would only take ten minutes. Soon, he arrived at the target area. In order to avoid running into the members of the Twinkle Rose, Lorne made a detour to the side. Before long, he discovered a target. ———— [Demonized Beastman] Grade: Bronze Monster Level: 28 Attributes: … ———— A Level 28 Bronze monster was terrifyingly weak. However, monsters with this level and quality were really troublesome for ordinary players. Especially these orcs, who had a high attack power of 1,500 points. Coupled with their explosive damage, apart from the Knight players, not many people could withstand it. According to the current combat strength of the players, they could still farm monsters here as a team. However, their income would be very low. After all, their points gained would not include a team bonus. “Get out and go to work, little ones.” Lorne waved his short staff, and several magic circles glowed. Then, six different pets stood in the open space ahead. Small Artillery drew its bow and fired several arrows at the monster in front. In less than a second, the monster died. There was really nothing to say about this. The combat strength of the two was on a completely different level. Ding! “Congratulations on killing the demonized beastman. Points+84!” When the monster was killed, Lorne did not obtain experience but 84 points, as if these points were related to the monster’s level and quality. However, the specific numbers could only be known after killing a few more monsters. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Fang of a Demonized Beastman!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Bone of a Demonized Beastman!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Muscle of a Demonized Beastman!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Skin of a Demonized Beastman!” “…” When cleaning up the battlefield, Lorne did not obtain any loot. All he obtained were synthesis materials grabbed by the [Monster Merging Simulator]. This was uncomfortable. Lorne had not expected this game system to be so immoral. In an event mission, all the monsters did not gave experience. If that was all, it was easier to accept. After all, points could be exchanged for rewards. But why was there no loot from killing the monsters? Wasn’t this too much? This was equivalent to the players giving up the loot of bronze coins, equipment, and experience points for some event points. To be honest, this was a little ridiculous. Especially Lorne, he was definitely the most uncomfortable player. Because he had the highest luck points, the probability of him farming monsters and dropping equipment was very high, so he was the one who lost the most. Of course, it was too early to say that. Before knowing the cost of the Points Exchange, no one could say if using three types of loot to exchange for these points was worth it. If 1 point could exchange for 10 experience points, then it would be incredible. “Forget it. I’ll accumulate the points first.” Lorne did not dwell on these matters. He directly let his pets walk to different forests and explore them separately, so that the efficiency of killing monsters would be greatly increased. This way, it was equivalent to seven people fighting at the same time, the efficiency was astonishing. … Boom! Boom! Boom! Lorne waved the short staff in his hand, and white magic waves immediately struck the monster with sparkling tail flames. To be honest, this was definitely one of the few times that Lorne had fought on his own since entering the game. Usually, it was the pets who fought. But today, for the sake of the City Creation Token, Lorne made a move himself. He began to kill monsters with his pets. -1365 -1421 -1359 -1403 Damage numbers popped up on the monster’s head. Lorne was already Level 30 and was even stronger than these demonized beastmen, not to mention his attributes. Other than having less health than the other party, he was superior in other aspects. This was especially the case for his attack power. Due to the [Vast Ocean Ring], his Magic Attack had already exceeded 2,000 points. If not for the damage reduction effect on the demonized beastmen, these basic attacks would have been even more terrifying. Pfft— In less than four seconds, the demonized beastman could not reach Lorne easily, but its health was emptied and it fell to the ground with a look of indignation. It contributed 87 points to Lorne. As for the battle results of the pets, they had already been killed crazily. Ding! “Congratulations on killing the demonized beastman. Points+84!” “Congratulations on killing the demonized beastman. Points+87!” “Congratulations on killing the demonized beastman. Points+87!” “…” A combat notification quickly popped up on Lorne’s combat panel. He received points every second. After observing for a while, Lorne understood the method of calculating these points. In this event, the points produced by the monsters were directly related to their level and quality. For example, the Level 28 Bronze-Grade Demonized Beastman. Its points were 28 x 3 = 84 (Grade x Quality). Because “Bronze” was the third in terms of quality, such monsters were directly x3 in points. If it was a “Silver” monster, then it would be (x4), and so on. … About ten minutes later, Lorne suddenly stopped in front of a group of elks. “If I can turn these ordinary monsters into demonized monsters…” Lorne stood there thoughtfully. Not long after entering the Titan Forest, he discovered a problem. The distribution of demonized beastmen was very sparse. He and his pets searched for more than ten minutes, but they did not see another demonized beastman group. Even if he let the long tongue bat search the sky, he did not find any signs of a group activity. This might be because the system had scattered to prevent ordinary players from being wiped out by the monsters. But this was a huge obstacle for the powerful Lorne. To him, the gathering of these monsters was a good opportunity to farm points. Therefore, Lorne could not help but stare at the elks. He felt like he had missed something, but he could not recall. Half a minute later, his eyes suddenly widened. “How could I have forgotten about the Monster Merging Simulator!” Lorne was pleasantly surprised. He had thought of a way to quickly earn a large number of points. This method was—Merge Monster! If the demonized beastmen gradually became demonized because of the corrosion of the dark power, could he also create a batch of demonized monsters? Others might not be able to do it, but Lorne had a Monster Merging Simulator! As long as he combined the materials obtained from the demonized beastmen with the ordinary monsters in the forest, he would definitely be able to obtain a new demonized monster! Perhaps this demonized monster was not a demonized beastman, but the mission panel did not specify that one had to kill the demonized beastman to obtain points. In terms of mission requirement, one could obtain points by killing the demonized monster. “Damn, that seems possible!” Lorne’s eyes lit up. His idea could not be less bold. If this idea could be realized, then he could wantonly merge demonized monsters, and his points would definitely increase crazily. In addition, this method could avoid the lack of demonized monsters. In the Titan Forest, there were indeed many demonized beastmen. However, no matter how many monsters there were, it was not enough for tens of millions of players to share. Once other players arrived at this place, there would definitely be a phenomenon of them snatching monsters. Lorne, who could create demonized monsters, could completely avoid the fundamental problem of having limited resources. “Very good. It’s time to witness a miracle.” Lorne took a deep breath and calmed down. Then, he let Small Artillery reduce the health of an elk to less than 5%. Then, using his talent, Lorne placed the dying monster into the synthesis formula. Ding! “Monster ‘Elk’ has been confirmed as the prototype. Please choose a body part material.” “Muscle of a Demonized Beastman.” Lorne threw a piece of black flesh into the synthesis formula. Ding! “A monster prototype and material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Elk) + (Muscle of a Demonized Beastman) + (???)” “The cost of this synthesis is 50 silver coins. Would you like to merge?” The system notification sounded. The cost of this synthesis was 50 silver coins, which was very likely to be a Bronze-Grade monster. However, that was not the main point. The main point was whether this synthesized monster would be counted among the demonized monsters. This was what Lorne was most concerned about. “Merge.” Without thinking, Lorne confirmed the choice. The next moment, a huge magic circle blossomed. The muscles of the demonized beastman turned into black light that wrapped around the elk and finally distorted it until it became a new creature. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining a Bronze-Grade Monster: Demonized Deerman!” When the light completely dissipated, what appeared in front of Lorne was a beastman in black deer skin. It walked half upright, its eyes glowing scarlet, looking very terrifying. Lorne smiled when he saw it. <i>Cackle! Cackle!!</i>  He laughed like a mad witch. This was because the monster that appeared in front of him was a new demonized monster. The deerman was also a type of beastman. Other than its stronger attributes, it had a very similar appearance to other demonized beastmen. Lorne eagerly opened the monster’s attributes panel. ———— [Demonized Deerman] (Contract Possible) Grade: Bronze Monster Level: 1 Attributes: … Superiority: 65% Introduction: … ———— Because it had just been created, this monster was Level 1, but as long as it was released, its level would immediately rise to the level of the original monster. As for its attributes, there was no need to care. To Aisha, no matter what kind of monster it was, it could not escape the pursuit of the pair of daggers. “Then, let’s see the effect after killing it.” “My little deer, you must give me points!” With a few deep breaths, Lorne released the creature. In the next second, the monster’s level instantly increased to Level 25. Due to its 65% superiority and Bronze-grade quality, it had already become a small Boss. Perhaps because of its increase in strength, it grew arrogant and dared to screech at Lorne. Such a rude monster would not have a good ending. Lorne let Aisha do it. When attacking, Lorne buffed Aisha with his support skills. He wanted to see how powerful Aisha was now. [Cooperative Strike]! This skill could add Lorne’s Magic Attack to Aisha, making her next attack even more explosive. Aisha did not stop. She directly used Backstab and instantly moved behind the monster, then stabbed down with the shimmering dagger in her hand. Pfft— This slash tore through everything, ruthlessly tearing through the monster’s body and dealing huge damage. -70,000! (Critical) The terrifying number floated in the air, and Lorne was stunned. When he was at the Lake of Death, he had seen the battle between the One-Eyed Giant Snake and the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon. The minimum damage between the two sides was only about 80,000 points. Originally, Lorne had felt that the battle had been very shocking, but now that Aisha’s damage output had reached the limit, he immediately felt that he could do it too. Of course, Lorne knew that the two Bosses had high resistances. It was very difficult to deal hundreds of thousands of damage. Unlike the monster in front of him, its defense was basically zero against Aisha’s sharp blades. … Ding! “Congratulations to your pet [Aisha] for killing the Demonized Deerman. Points+150!” When the monster fell, Lorne immediately obtained 150 points. This income stunned him. One had to know that an ordinary level 28 demonized monster only provided 84 points. It could not be compared to this synthesized monster! “I’m rich, I’m rich! I’m really rich now!” Lorne rubbed his hands in surprise, then ran forward and obtained a few synthesis materials from the creature. [Demonized Deerman’s Horn] [Demonized Deerman’s Flesh] [Demonized Deerman’s Bone] [Demonized Deerman’s Hoof] […] Killing the creature gave Lorne eight synthesis materials. Unfortunately, such materials had no quality classification. He could not directly see the quality of this material. “Since it was dropped from a Bronze-Grade monster, it should be Bronze-Grade…” Lorne touched his chin. In his mind, there was an even greedier idea, “If I fuse this with another Bronze-Grade monster, can I obtain a Silver-Grade monster?” Under the effect of [Monster Merging Simulator], if monsters were to merge with high-level materials, he would definitely obtain higher-grade monsters. Under normal circumstances, higher-level monsters would drop higher-level materials. In that case, could he not repeat the cycle endlessly, making the monster’s own value higher each time?! Thinking of this, Lorne’s eyes lit up. He immediately turned his head and focused his gaze on a demonized beastman not far away. It was time to witness a miracle. If he could develop according to his thoughts, it would not be as simple as getting rich. If he did it well, he might be able to earn the money to afford dozens of Goblin Robots! … Swish! Swish! Swish! Small Artillery aimed at the demonized beastman not far away. It drew its bow and fired arrows in the air, hitting the monster accurately. With a series of damage, the demonized beastmen did not have time to counterattack before its health dropped to less than 5%. Lorne immediately stepped forward and threw the creature into the synthesis, then threw in the flesh of the demonized deerman he had just obtained. Ding! “A monster prototype and material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Demonized Beastman) + (Demonized Deerman’s Muscle) + (???)” “The cost of this synthesis is 1 gold coin. Would you like to merge?” There was hope! The cost of synthesis had increased, which meant that the monster created this time would be stronger! Lorne quickly confirmed, “Merge.” As soon as he finished speaking, a huge magic circle appeared in front of him, and the monster standing in the magic circle immediately turned into a ball of light that intertwined with the black light that the ball of flesh had turned into. A few seconds later, a pleasant system sounded. Ding! “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining…!” Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining a Bronze-Grade Monster: Demonized Beastman!” Eh? Lorne was speechless. Although the system notification said that it was successful, the monster that he obtained in the end did not change much. Other than some increase in attributes, the monster did not change much. This result directly shattered Lorne’s idea of “endless cycling”. It was as if the body parts of a monster that had been created by the simulator could not be synthesized with other monsters. “Wait…” “There might be hope if I change my method!” There was another thought in Lorne’s mind. The corners of his mouth curled up as he immediately found a new demonized beastman and continued doing the same thing. Soon, the synthesis formula appeared again. The last time Lorne had put in the materials for the demonized deerman, he had unfortunately failed. He could not use the same material this time. “Bone of a Demonized Beastman.” Lorne took out another material from his bag. This was a material dropped from the demonized beastman. It had not been synthesized, so it was believed to be useful. After the command to merge was given, a huge magic circle appeared in front of Lorne again. The monster and the materials turned into light and fused together, finally forming a new monster. Ding! “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining a Silver Monster: Bone Spur Demon!” ———— [Bone Spur Demon] (Contract Possible) Grade: Silver Level: 1 Attributes: … ———— “As expected…” At this moment, Lorne was very excited, but he did not cheer immediately. Although the monster he created had reached Silver, reaching his expectations, this was still not the final result he wanted. He had to merge them again! If he succeeded this time, his total income would double, or even multiply! Huff— Lorne took a deep breath. Then, he killed the monster in front of him and obtained a pile of new body parts from it. Then, according to what he had done, Lorne found a new demonized beastman and synthesized it with the materials he had just obtained. Under the familiar light, a huge monster covered in bone spikes gradually formed. A pleasant reminder sounded as planned. Ding! “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining a Silver Monster: Bone Spur Demon!” It was really a Silver monster! Lorne could not help but be overjoyed. His idea was confirmed. It was not that the monster material could not be used after the synthesis, but that the material could not allow the monster to break through its quality limit. For example, the quality of the synthesized [Bone Spur Demon] was Silver. Therefore, the materials obtained from it could at most allow a demonized beastman to evolve into a Silver monster. It could not break through this stage and become a Gold monster. Although the monster could not evolve each time, this rule could still make Lorne’s income change tremendously. This was because not only did he have the body parts of Bronze monsters, but he also had the [Dragon Bone Fragment] reward from the Dragon Souls! If he used this legendary material to merge the monster, the final monster would definitely become stronger. It was normal for it to evolve to the Gold-grade. This way, Lorne could use Gold monster materials to create more Gold monsters, and the points he would obtain would also be incomparably huge. “Very good, let’s begin!” Lorne immediately found the monster and began to merge with the dragon skeleton fragment. In the next second, he indeed obtained a Gold monster. When he commanded Aisha to kill the monster, his points doubled. “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: Points+280!” In this event, the monster’s points = (Grade x Quality), the total points of a Level 28 Gold monster were (28 x 5 = 140). After Lorne created a monster, the points given was twice that of ordinary monsters. Therefore, after the Gold monster was killed, it gave Lorne 280 points! Seeing this income, Lorne could wait no longer. He began to scatter his pets and pull all the surrounding monsters to his side. “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining Gold Monster: Elite Bone Spur Demon!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” Using the same method, Lorne evolved all the monsters into powerful Gold monsters. Of course, ordinary wild beasts could only reach Silver-grade because the quality of the prototype monster was too poor. However, no matter what, a Silver monster could also provide a large number of points, especially when there were so many wild beasts. After Lorne completed the merging, Aisha began to move. As the main attacker of the team, she was the protagonist in everything related to combat. Slam! Slam! Slam! Sharp daggers flew in Aisha’s hands. In an instant, the blades stabbed into the monster’s back at a speed invisible to the naked eye. -56,000 (Critical) -59,000 (Critical) -61,000! (Critical) -54,000 (Critical) As critical damage appeared one by one, the group of monsters that had just evolved fell to the ground, giving 224 points each. Unfortunately, equipment could not be dropped. Otherwise, in such a high frequency farming, many Gold equipment would definitely be dropped. In “Divine Realm”, all monsters with quality had a chance of dropping equipment of the same quality. Although the probability was astonishingly low, there was still hope with Lorne’s luck. In addition, Lorne noticed a problem. When his gold coins were spent to synthesize a large number of monsters, the number decreased very quickly. Almost every Silver monster required 1 gold coin, and a Gold monster needed 3 gold coins! Although Lorne had more than 50,000 gold coins on him, he would not be able to hold on if this continued. After all, this event would last a total of seven days! After some thought, Lorne opened the shop page. After this period of business, the shop had nearly 3,000 gold coins saved. Unfortunately, it was still too little, and these gold coins had to be used for the shop’s own operation. During this period of time, the manager, Rona, had expanded the equipment recycling business. This business required a large amount of gold coins as the operating capital. It was not suitable to withdraw these gold coins at this time. After some thought, he opened his friend list. “Since it’s your request, I’ll definitely help.” Elsewhere in the forest, Twinkle Rose immediately replied to Lorne’s private message. This was not the first time the two of them had worked together. As long as Lorne asked, she could not reject. After chatting with Lorne for a while, Twinkle Rose giggled at his “rude behavior.” Then, Twinkle Rose closed the chat and opened the Points Ranking happily. She wanted to see how her brother was doing. Because it took about a day to come to this area from Iron Skull City, there were no other players apart from them and Tyrant. The leaderboard was naturally filled with the names of the ladies of the Silver Snow Guild. However, when Twinkle Rose looked at the first place on the leaderboard, her mouth immediately widened in surprise. ———— First place: [Tyrant], Points: 61,200. ———— Twinkle Rose nearly spat out blood when she saw the data. Was the system data messed up? Why was Tyrant at 61,200 points?! Twinkle Rose was dumbfounded. The sisters beside her were as shocked as if they had seen an alien after seeing the leaderboard. The event had only begun less than an hour ago! However, Tyrant had over 60,000 points! How was this possible! No one dared to believe it. After all, the top players of their Silver Snow Guild only had 5040 points now, and it was achieved with the help of several elite players. “Something must have gone wrong…” Twinkle Rose was confused. At this moment, she felt as if she had entered the wrong game. … -55,000 (Critical) -57,000 (Critical) -60,000! (Critical) -55,000 (Critical) While preparing the gold coins, Lorne did not idle. He synthesized all the monsters brought back by his pets and let Aisha kill them. There was no danger in this matter, because Aisha had to kill them all with one strike. She did not give these monsters a chance to behave atrociously. Therefore, the following forest was completely flattened by the bulldozer-like ‘farmer’. Wherever Lorne went, there were no monsters left. “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: Points+280!” “Ding! Congratulations!” “Ding!” “Ding!” Countless monsters fell to the ground, giving Lorne a large number of points. The gold coins on Lorne were also consumed very quickly. In just five minutes, he had lost more than 80 gold coins. At this rate, he would need to spend at least 1,000 gold coins per hour, and at least 15,000 gold coins per day. In other words, in just three days, Lorne would spend all the gold coins on him. This was a headache. Ding! “Congratulations on reaching 10,000 points. Progress of Unlocking Points Shop: 1%!” The system suddenly notified. “Points Shop?” When he saw this information, Lorne’s eyes lit up. This shop had arrived at the right time! Right now, he was worried about insufficient gold coins, but if he could unlock the shop in advance, the situation would be different. All the players knew that in the Points Shop, there were various rewards that could be exchanged for. There were even the [Guild Establishment Token] and [City Creation Token]! Lorne could easily exchange it for some important items and start an auction! As for whether anyone would buy it? There was no need to worry. This was because from the increase in points in the Silver Snow Guild, it could be seen that the speed at which other players accumulated points was very slow. In addition, the points could not be transferred in this event. In other words, they had to accumulate points by themselves to be able to exchange for the important [Guild Establishment Token]! This would definitely take a long time. At the very least, it could not be done in the past few days. Therefore, these few days were Lorne’s best opportunity to hold an auction! As long as he could exchange for the [Guild Establishment Token], those large guilds that wanted to be ahead of others would definitely spend a lot of money to buy it. Wouldn’t that solve the problem of insufficient gold coins? Perfect! After thinking about it, Lorne was even more excited. His farming speed had clearly increased, and his overall efficiency had increased by at least 20%. “If only the monsters were more tightly packed.” Lorne was helpless. Although Aisha was powerful, the monsters here were too scattered to kill quickly. The current speed was about 600 monsters per hour. The Silver monsters made up most of them, because they were created with wild beasts as the prototype. Occasionally, such monsters would form small groups, so it was much easier to kill them. Fortunately, he could demonize wild beasts. Otherwise, the speed of killing monsters would have decreased by at least two-thirds. Boom! Under the detection of the Long Tongue Bat, a herd of elk was discovered and attracted. Hundreds of monsters charged in Lorne’s direction. “Come out, Demon Hounds from Hell!” Lorne activated his skill and summoned the Hellhound. 300 hellhounds blocked the monsters and used their combat strength to suppress their health. Lorne quickly synthesized the monsters, while Aisha followed beside him. She killed whoever she saw and flew up with high efficiency. “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: Points+224!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding! Congratulations on reaching 120,000 points. Progress of Unlocking Points Shop: 12%!!” “Ding! Congratulations on reaching 13%.” Five minutes later, the monsters were finally wiped out. The entire scene was filled with the corpses of monsters. It was pitch-black. Lorne nodded in satisfaction. This kind of battle was more comfortable. He could solve all problems in one place. Unfortunately, such large monsters were relatively rare. He had only encountered such a group after sweeping for more than an hour. Looking at his points, they directly increased by more than 10,000, and the progress also increased to 13%. Lorne’s eyes lit up. At this rate, he would be able to unlock the shop in about ten hours. If the Guild Establishment Token was not very expensive, he could definitely exchange for one first. In addition, he could see what the City Creation Token was like. This was the tool that he needed the most at the moment! Yes, very good. He had to continue working hard!!! In the Titan Forest, in an excited mood, Lorne spent more than three hours killing all the surrounding monsters. He should have left soon, but because he could turn wild beasts into demonized monsters, Lorne had been sweeping through the area. After clearing all the monsters, he left the area with his pets and continued to sweep through the forest. There were not many demonized beastmen in the forest, but the number of beasts was denser than on the hill. Not long after Lorne left, he found a group of forest bulls. -53,000 (Critical) -52,000 (Critical) -51,000 (Critical) -55,000 (Critical) Aisha easily dealt with these monsters. The damage was as high as 50,000. In this map, no one could withstand it. “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: Points+372!” “Ding! Congratulations!” “Ding!” “Ding!” When the score appeared, Lorne found that he had 20% more points this time. After some research, Lorne finally confirmed that when the monster’s level exceeded 30, the points it would generate would increase greatly, and every additional 5 levels would result in an additional 20% increase in the basic points. This was good news. After all, the duration of the event was limited. Such a point income system could allow Lorne to obtain more points to exchange for more rewards. “The Long Tongue Bat will continue to explore the deeper parts of the forest. Little Spider will use its egg production skill to command the spiders to lure and gather the surrounding monsters.” Lorne did not choose to rush into the depths of the Titan Forest. Instead, he led his pets into battle along the way. In the face of such a sparse battlefield, the combination of Long Tongue Bat and Little Spider was very useful. The Long Tongue Bat scouted the surrounding monsters in the air. Little Spider commanded the babies it summoned to attract the surrounding monsters. In this case, the efficiency of Lorne’s accumulation of points became faster, and the unlocking of the Points Shop was growing at a visible rate. While farming monsters, Lorne could not help but open the forum and pay attention to the movements of the other players. “The Best Way to Titan Forest!” “In the Windless Valley, I only need six hours to reach the target location!” “Event Points cannot be sold, the benefits of solo players cannot be guaranteed!” “Do you need teammates? No points needed, just 1,000 dollars per day!” It could be seen that the players arrived much earlier than Lorne had expected. This was because many people were leveling up in a nearby area. If they set off now, it would naturally save time. As for the other posts, there was nothing worth paying attention to. Just as Lorne was about to close it… Suddenly! A pinned post popped up. “30 million alliance dollars to purchase the first Guild Establishment Token in the entire server!” When he saw the contents of the post, Lorne’s eyes lit up. This was actually a request for purchase! The target of the purchase was surprisingly one of the hottest topics in this event, [Guild Establishment Token]! 30 million? This price was not too high. Lorne pondered and began to plan. According to his current expenditure of gold coins, 30 million alliance dollars could only allow him to kill 5,000 monsters and obtain a million points. “The situation is not good…” Lorne felt that this price was dangerous and might cause him to lose money. This was because from the rarity of the items, the Guild Establishment Token, which was ranked at the top of this event, might cost more than 500,000 points. The most likely possibility was a million points! After all, even the requirement to unlock the Merchant Shop was 1 million points. This kind of coincidence made people feel a little uncertain. If that was really the case, then there was no need for Lorne to spend so many gold coins to create monsters. There was no point in working so hard. Moreover, the large guilds on the forum who were willing to pay 30 million to buy the Guild Establishment Token all wanted the first one. Under normal circumstances, starting from the second Guild Establishment Token, the price of selling would begin to decrease until it became a common item and the rarity completely fell to rock bottom. “Let’s wait and see.” Lorne was already mentally prepared. No matter how high the price of the Guild Establishment Token on the market was, he had to accumulate a million points to unlock the Points Shop and exchange for the first token in the entire server. This was because the prerequisite to using the City Creation Token was to have one’s own guild. In this way, while thinking and fighting, Lorne spent a few hours cleaning up the monsters here. He did not stop and immediately headed deeper into the forest. … A minute later. At the edge of the Titan Forest, a large group of excited players appeared. “Points, I want points!” “I did not participate in the previous event. It’s finally my turn to perform.” “Joining Iron Skull City is awesome. Two consecutive large-scale activities have been triggered. It’s awesome.” “There are too many rewards in the Points Shop this time. It’s time to earn money!” “It’s said on the forum that a Guild Establishment Token is worth 30 million. If I can obtain this thing, I won’t have to worry about it for the rest of my life.” “I don’t dare to think about 30 million. I only hope to have a good life of eating instant noodles and luncheon meat!” “Brothers, cut the crap. Quickly charge!” These players who rushed over from the nearby map thought that they had snatched the first wave of monsters and were extremely excited. In their minds, they felt that even if they could not exchange for the Guild Establishment Token, they would have a chance to exchange for one or two good pieces of equipment. At that time, when their strength increased, they might even be able to apply to join a large guild and find a stable job. Just as a group of players was excitedly preparing to kill the monsters with hope, they were stunned on the spot. In the forest that was supposed to be filled with monsters, there were corpses everywhere. None of the corpses were intact. “What the heck is going on?!” “Gosh, where’s the monsters?” “What’s going on? Don’t stop us from earning points!” “This is f*cking stupid.” Several players were furious. While everyone was angry, a player opened the system interface and realized that when he entered the Titan Forest map, there was an additional point ranking list. Therefore, he opened it. In the next second, this group of players was completely stunned. They saw that on the leaderboard in front of them, the points behind a player had actually reached an astonishing six digits! After that, a post that attracted the attention of countless people appeared on the game forum. “Damn! The event has been going on for seven hours, and Tyrant’s points have already reached nearly a million!” When the players saw this post, they opened it and saw a special screenshot on the interface—[Points Ranking]! ———— First place: [Tyrant], Points: 992,735. Second place: [Twinkle Rose], Points: 62,040. Third place: [Burning Gaze], Points: 57,133. Fourth place: [Love Ice Cream], Points: 55,009. … ———— The top ten ranking actually made all the players who had seen it go crazy. At this moment, most players had not entered. Only a few people had just stepped into the Titan Forest when a player with a million points appeared on the leaderboard. “Damn, if this isn’t cheating, I’ll f*cking eat shit!” “It’s definitely an exploit. The event has only been going on for more than seven hours, but a group of people has already accumulated tens of thousands of points. As for that Tyrant with a million points, I want to jointly report him to the World Alliance. Damn it!” “Count me in. This guy is simply too lawless!” “Oh my god, I just walked out of the city gate and God Tyrant already has a million points.” “Those who face droughts will die, those who are flooded will also die.” “Looking at the level board, Tyrant is only Level 30. How can he do this?” In the game forum, the players posted crazily. Not only were the ordinary players stunned, but even the guild leaders of the large guilds were dumbfounded. They had just led the team to travel two-thirds of the journey, but now, they realized that others already had a million points. This was a world of difference! Fortunately, the Points Shop was not open. They still had a chance. Thinking of this, the members of the large guilds quickened their steps. However, at this moment, all the players in Iron Skull City heard a grand announcement. “Hello, everyone. I’m Tyrant. I have a Guild Establishment Token in my hand. Players who need it can auction it at 12 pm at the ‘Dragon One’ shop in Iron Skull City. This auction must be settled with gold coins. The base price is 10,000 gold coins. In addition, all participants must pay 1,000 gold coins as a deposit. Friends who are interested, please note the time when the auction begins.” “Hello, everyone…” “Hello, everyone…” This was an announcement across the entire Iron Skull City. Shouting required 300 gold coins each time. After shouting three times, it directly cost nearly 3 million alliance dollars. It could be said that the investment was huge. When the other players heard these shouts, all the forests around Iron Skull City began to explode. “Damn! Damn! Damn!” “Did I see wrongly? The event has just begun, but Tyrant has already obtained the Guild Establishment Token?” “The Guild Establishment Token in the entire server is worth tens of millions!” “Tyrant is going to be rich again.” “The base price is 10,000 gold coins. I reckon that after the auction, the price will still increase. It might be 20,000, or even 30,000 gold coins.” “I don’t think it’s difficult to exceed a hundred million. After all, the guilds in Iron Skull City are the most powerful guilds in the world. They don’t lack this amount of money.” “I’m crying. Others play games to earn money, but I spend money on games. Moreover, I can’t even see the dust left behind by others.” “God, I can swallow 18 centimeters. Please let me perform for you.” The players in the main city were already hysterical. … In the distance, in the ancient castle of Blood Shadow City. Nether River, the guild leader of the Netherworld Guild, was sitting on the White Bone Throne, holding the Platinum equipment he had just obtained. His blood-red eyes stared fixedly at the equipment ranking in Iron Skull City. Compared to that guy Tyrant, his Platinum equipment was nothing. “You’d better not let me find a chance, or else I’ll make sure you can never recover!” Nether River said coldly. At this moment, a lackey ran over, “Guild Leader, the first Guild Establishment Token has appeared in Iron Skull City!” “Guild Establishment Token?” Nether River quickly checked the relevant information. In the shop called “Dragon One”, the details of the Guild Establishment Token were announced. There was the complete information of the Guild Establishment Token. It could basically be confirmed to be genuine. “Very good. Immediately arrange for our players in Iron Skull City to purchase this Guild Establishment Token. In addition, ally with the other two Dark Guilds and let them send ten thousand Elite Assassins to the Titan Forest to disrupt the development of the Iron Skull City’s players. “Send 3,000 Elite Assassins from our main guild and 50,000 Assassins from the branch to help the guys hiding in Iron Skull City take down one or two Guild Establishment Tokens. Tell them that after completing the mission, I will give them all a reward!” “Yes.” … In the wilderness forest of Iron Skull City. “Great Greedy Wolf” of the [World Destruction Guild], who had the hope of replacing the Deputy Guild Leader “Cross Fire”, urgently needed a huge contribution to prove his strength. At this moment, he was listening to a report from his subordinates regarding Tyrant. There were a total of 300,000 players sent to the Titan Forest this time. If he could really find a chance to surround Tyrant, that guy would definitely not be able to escape! This was especially true when he had an opportunity now. This was because “Great Greedy Wolf” had recently recruited a hidden class player with a powerful illumination skill. As long as they could find an opportunity to surround him, Tyrant’s invisibility would be exposed, and his divine equipment would be theirs! At this moment, he saw the scene of the Titan Forest released by the players on the forum. The strange corpses immediately attracted the attention of the “Great Greedy Wolf”. Wasn’t this what would happen after the Tyrant killed the monsters?! As a player who had studied Tyrant for a long time, he was certain that Tyrant was definitely in that area! Therefore, he immediately gave an order to his players. “Everyone, move towards the coordinates and advance as quickly as possible. Inform the other two armies of 10,000 soldiers to hurry over. We’ll start killing monsters from this area!” At this moment, in the Titan Forest, Lorne was leading his pets deeper into the forest. So far, he had hunted here for nearly eight hours and finally accumulated a million points. The Points Shop was also opened early because the points had reached the requirement. ———— [Points Shop] 1 Experience = 10 points. 1 Reputation = 100 points. Enhancement Gem (Bronze) = 1,000 points Blessing Gem (Rare) = 3,000 points Enhancement Gem (Silver) = 10,000 points Enchantment Gem (Free Attributes) = 20,000 points. Unknown Item Treasure Chest (Upgrade Possible) = 20,000 points. Bronze Equipment Treasure Chest = 20,000 points. Silver Equipment Treasure Chest = 100,000 points. Rare Part Treasure Chest (Silver) = 300,000 points. Gold Equipment Treasure Chest = 500,000 points. Platinum Equipment Treasure Chest = 1 million points. Guild Establishment Token = 1 million points. City Creation Token = ??? (Not for sale) ———— These were all the goods in the Points Shop. From the choice of ‘experience’ and ‘reputation’ in the past, it could be seen that using points to exchange for these two rewards was the most disadvantageous. After all, killing a Level 30 Bronze monster would only give him 90 points. If he used it to exchange for experience points, it would only be 9 points. He believed that as long as there was no problem with his brain, no one would exchange for this product. As for the gems and equipment behind, they were not the treasures that Lorne wanted. The only thing that interested him was the [Unknown Item Treasure Chest]. This treasure chest could give him various items and allow him to level up. If he had enough points, he could try to buy a few more of such treasure chests. But not now, almost instantly, Lorne looked at the [Guild Establishment Token] at the back of the shop. Like he thought, the price for this tool was exactly one million points. As for the more valuable City Creation Token, the price was not indicated. Only after checking the relevant explanation did Lorne know that the City Creation Token was the final reward for this event. Only after the event ended would the player who obtained the highest score of this event obtain this final reward. Therefore, Lorne could only exchange for the Guild Establishment Token first. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining: Guild Establishment Token!” “Points -1 million!” After spending a million points, an exquisite silver token appeared in Lorne’s hand. Now, as long as he chose to confirm, he could create his own guild. But Lorne did not do so. Although he needed to create his own guild, he did not need to fight for first or second place. Therefore, he planned to auction this Guild Establishment Token in the Dragon One shop. Then, he shouted through the entire city. As he finished shouting throughout the city, his friend list suddenly lit up. It was a message from Twinkle Rose. The beautiful guild leader could not sit still anymore. “Brother Tyrant, you received the Guild Establishment Token?!” Twinkle Rose asked excitedly. “Yes, I just exchanged it.” Lorne casually replied. “My god, you’re too sick. Only seven hours have passed since the event began. Your accumulation of points is too ridiculous.” Twinkle Rose typed an ellipsis, her meaning obvious. She was speechless by Tyrant’s crazy actions. They had all started killing monsters together, so why were their points ten times lower than his? This made no sense! “What kind of pervert is this? My physique is more perverted!” “Tsk, tsk, tsk, you’re bragging again.” Twinkle Rose chatted with Lorne for a while, then changed the topic, “To be honest, Brother Tyrant, can you sell that Guild Establishment Token to me? I can give you a good price.” “How much?” “A lot..” Twinkle Rose said generously, “Isn’t your base price 10,000 gold coins? I can directly offer 20,000, or even 30,000 gold coins, as long as you can sell this Guild Establishment Token to our Silver Snow Guild. Moreover, we don’t have any requests. Our only request is that you can sell the second Guild Establishment Token within ten hours.” 30,000 gold coins was almost equivalent to 100 million alliance dollars. This was not a small number. In this world, 99% of people could not earn so much money in their entire lives. Therefore, Twinkle Rose did not think that her request was overboard. “No.” “This Guild Establishment Token, including all the Guild Establishment Tokens in the future, will be auctioned at ‘Dragon One’.” “If you really want it, you can go to the shop to bid. As long as you’re willing to spend money, this Guild Establishment Token can definitely be bought.” “Of course, as partners who have cooperated many times, let me remind you that it’s best if your Silver Snow Guild doesn’t compete for the first spot.” Lorne decisively rejected her, also dispelling her thoughts of competing for the first building block. As the first Guild Establishment Token in the entire server, its price had to be very high. If she wanted to obtain it, 30,000 gold coins would not be enough. Instead of that, it was better to compete for the subsequent Guild Establishment Token. “Unless you want to…” “Brother Tyrant, you’re really more immoral than I imagined.” Upon receiving the notification, Twinkle Rose immediately understood. Tyrant was really a bad guy. He actually wanted to sell more Guild Establishment Tokens immediately after the first piece was auctioned. In this case, the guild that spent a lot of money to snatch the Guild Establishment Token would lose all its advantages. The practical value of the Guild Establishment Token would also plummet by more than half. That was tens of millions of dollars… “Thank you for the compliment.” Lorne said, “Big-busted Sister, I don’t want the gold coins you collected. Take them to bid for the Guild Establishment Token.” “I…” Hearing this, Twinkle Rose wanted to hit someone. This guy was too detestable. They had clearly bought the gold coins for him and had even given him tens of millions of dollars, but now, he only used a game token to take away these gold coins. He was such a bully. <i>Boohoo, boohoo, boohoo…</i>  … At the same time, Super Rich sent a message. “Leader, can I reserve a Guild Establishment Token from you?” Super Rich asked. “You want to create a guild too?” Lorne was surprised. “It’s not me.” Super Rich said, “It’s my precious daughter. She’s preparing to develop a business in the game. Now, we need a Guild Establishment Token to quickly create a guild. Only then can we catch up to the footsteps of other large guilds.” “Of course, the price is negotiable. Leader, do you think 100,000 gold coins is enough?” Pfft— This guy was really rich to the point of being inhumane. In Lorne’s opinion, other than the first Guild Establishment Token that would cost more than 100 million, the rest should cost about tens of millions. However, Super Rich directly offered a sky-high price of 100,000 gold coins, which was equivalent to 300 million alliance dollars, three times the highest price that Lorne had expected. How could he refuse? “No problem. Leave it to me. I’ll give it to you tomorrow.” “Alright, leader. I’ll transfer you the money now.” In a dark cave in the Titan Forest, Lorne had Rimuru and Little Spider block the entrance. Then, he let the long-tongued bat enter the cave and attract the lizard monsters inside. These cave lizards were very powerful. Their levels were even Level 35. Coupled with their powerful resistance attributes, they were an extremely dangerous target in this map. Only Lorne could rely on the powerful strength of his pets to block the entrance of the cave alone. He used the Monster Merging Simulator to turn all the cave lizards into demonized creatures, which he then killed with a dagger. While fighting the monsters, he also paid attention to the situation of the guilds. In order to obtain this first Guild Establishment Token in the entire server, many large guilds actually offered crazily on the forum. There were even a few guilds that had always been at odds with each other who quarreled. “Come on, the fiercer the better!” Looking at them bidding, Lorne smiled in anticipation. It was to provoke the competitive spirit of these large guilds, because only in this way, those guilds who did not snatch the first Guild Establishment Token would be crazy about the subsequent tokens. Seeing that they were cursing so fiercely, the price of the second or even third Guild Establishment Token might exceed 100 million! … “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining Silver Monster: Demon Lizard!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” In the dark cave, Lorne fought for more than an hour before finally killing all the lizards in the cave. During this period of time, he had gained a lot. Because the Cave Lizard’s level had reached 35, its basic points had increased again, allowing it to obtain 392 points from a Silver monster. In this hour, he had killed more than 700 cave lizards, and the total points he had obtained exceeded 250,000 points! If he maintained this speed, he could earn 1.5 million points before midnight. One had to know that at this time, every million points might be worth 100 million. It was simply awesome. … Then, Lorne arrived in a valley. There were some demonized beastmen here, but there were fewer ordinary monsters. Lorne was not picky. He continued to sweep through the area like a road machine, clearing all the maps he passed. On the way, Lorne arranged for his pets to focus the monsters in the valley in a slightly sealed area, like a pocket. He led Aisha to guard the pocket’s exit. Just like that, his points increased crazily again. The players who saw this through the points rankings went crazy. An hourly income of 200,000 points was much more profitable than robbing a bank. … Five hours later, Lorne finally stopped his raid. Now, his points had reached a million points again. He could exchange for the second Guild Establishment Token. Without thinking, Lorne chose to exchange. When the million points disappeared, a new silver token appeared in front of Lorne. However, to use the Guild Establishment Token, he had to go to Iron Skull City. This was because building a guild required the recognition of Iron Skull City. After obtaining the recognition, their guild would be considered an armed organization affiliated with Iron Skull City. It just so happened that it was getting late. In about half an hour, the auction regarding the Guild Establishment Token would begin. “It’s time to check on the auction and create a guild.” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up as he crushed the return scroll in his hand. … Swish! With a flash of light, Lorne returned to Iron Skull City. It could be seen that at this moment, Iron Skull City became a little livelier. Countless players were fighting to discuss the topic of the first guild in the entire server. They believed that the Fire Beacon Guild was the most likely to create the first guild. This was because the leader of the Fire Beacon Guild was known as the God of Warriors. He was famous in previous online games and had always been in the top three of the level rankings in “Divine Realm”. There were also those who thought that the first to create a guild would be created by the expert “Thor” who was on the same level as Fire Beacon. After all, they were the two with the highest combat strength on the Internet rankings. As for Tyrant? As the player who auctioned the first Guild Establishment Token, he would definitely not seize this opportunity. After all, he could create it in a few hours, and there was no need to wait until now. Lorne ignored the discussions and returned to his Dragon One shop. No one knew that he had already exchanged the second Guild Establishment Token, so he was not in a hurry to create a guild. After the first establishment token was auctioned and the benefits were maximized, he would create the first guild in the entire server before those people. Although this was immoral, Lorne did not care. After all, those large corporations were the benefits of exploiting ordinary workers. As one of the former exploited workers, it was only right that he exploited the capitalists now. Soon, it was close to midnight. At this moment, the outside of Dragon One Shop was already packed with players. They all wanted to go in and see this world-shaking auction, but the 1,000 gold coins deposit blocked 99% of the players. At this moment, small teams entered the shop, but the surrounding players did not know them. “Who’s that?” “Someone from the Wind Cloud Guild.” “That guy with the ax seems to be the commander of the Domination Guild.” “I know that beauty. She’s the commander of the Appearance Association.” “Damn, have you guys noticed that the people who came aren’t the Guild Leaders or Deputy Guild Leaders? Do they not care about this matter?” “Impossible. Those important figures probably went to the Titan Forest to do an event. After all, this event is so important.” “Indeed.” The players discussed. As the players discussed outside, the atmosphere in the auction hall on the second floor of Dragon One became tense. There was only one item for auction this time, and that was the first Guild Establishment Token in the entire server. As long as one obtained this token, it was equivalent to obtaining the first official right to build a guild. When the time came, someone slowly walked up to the auction stage. She removed the cloth in front of her, and everyone immediately saw an exquisite silver token. “Now, the auction begins!”Chapter content is missing or does not exist! Please try again later!  “51,000!” The Fire Beacon Guild was still unwilling to give up and continued bidding. To them, although the military was powerful, they had to compete. Otherwise, it was not their style to give it up so easily. “52,000 gold coins!” In the last row, someone announced their first bid. “The Deputy Guild Leader of the Bloody Mercenaries, Steel Eagle, can’t hold it in anymore.” “They specialize in games, so it’s normal for them to fight for fame.” Some players whispered. “55,000!” Another unknown player spoke. Everyone looked but they had no impression of the person. The player did not show himself and hid in the corner after bidding. He was the lackey of the Dark Guild in Iron Skull City. Because they did not want to miss anything, he was arranged to develop his faction in Iron Skull City. This time, he came because he wanted to bring back the Guild Establishment Token for the Netherworld Guild. The current price had already reached 55,000 gold coins, far exceeding most people’s expectations. The competition was not over. The reputation of this “number one guild” was extraordinary to these large guilds. Its value in reputation far exceeded the value of the Guild Establishment Token itself. Therefore, someone quickly continued bidding. “56,000 gold coins!” “56,500 gold coins!” “57,000 gold coins!” “57,500 gold coins!” The offers came one after another, but the price did not increase much. The current price was close to 200 million alliance dollars. Even if these guilds had the support of a large financial group, it was difficult to directly buy an item for a few hundred million dollars. After all, creating a guild only raised one’s reputation and did not directly bring benefits. Therefore, the bidding had entered a stalemate. Sitting in the stall, Lorne was overjoyed. No matter where the final price fell, it was twice the expected price. Moreover, this also gave him high hopes for the subsequent Guild Establishment Tokens. As long as he could exchange for the most Guild Establishment Tokens in the shortest time, he believed that those large guilds that wanted to catch up to other opponents would definitely buy the Guild Establishment Tokens at a high price. At that time, the net profit that Lorne would obtain might exceed a billion! … “58,000 gold coins!” “58,300 gold coins!” “58,500 gold coins!” The price was still rising, but at this time, the price increase was only two to three hundred gold coins. At this rate, the final price might stop at 60,000 gold coins. Just as Lorne thought this, the player hiding in the corner suddenly shouted a shocking price. “70,000 gold coins!” As soon as this price was out, the entire scene was silent. The price that was originally barely close to 60,000 was suddenly pushed to 70,000. Immediately, no one dared to speak. 10,000 gold coins was equivalent to 30 million alliance dollars. Even the representatives of large guilds could not help but shiver. After all, the price had already reached 70,000 gold coins. This was a little too terrifying. Hearing this price, the Domination Guild player hesitated. It was not because they could not afford to pay more than 200 million dollars. To the corporation behind them, 200 million dollars was nothing. However, the problem was that not long ago, they had already spent a lot of money to rope in some top players. If they spent more than 200 million to buy the Guild Establishment Token now, the guild’s finances would definitely exceed the budget. Moreover, creating a guild seven days in advance might not necessarily bring back enough returns. Thinking of this, the Domination Guild’s commander, who had wanted to continue bidding, did not speak again. The remaining members of the Fire Beacon Guild and the Divine Mage Guild who were most competitive also fell silent. Clearly, this price had exceeded their highest expectations. “70,000 gold coins, going once!” On the stage, Rona knocked on the auction hammer. There was silence below the stage. No one spoke again. The Netherworld Guild player who shouted 70,000 gold coins clenched his heart. This was the price their guild was staking everything on. If someone else offered a higher price, they had to give up. But as a lackey, he did not want to lose this opportunity. He needed this Guild Establishment Token to raise his position in the headquarters. Right now, he was only the leader of a small guild, but he had his own ambitions. He wanted to obtain the recognition of the headquarters and raise the scale of the guild in Iron Skull City. Only then would he have a chance to be a decision-maker of the company. “70,000 gold coins, going twice!” Rona spoke again. She was even waiting, hoping to give the hesitant one a chance. Unfortunately, no one raised the price. “70,000 gold coins, sold!” With the third knock of the auction hammer, everything was finally over. This was the first time that a Guild Establishment Token had appeared in the entire server, and it was finally sold for 70,000 gold coins. The representative of the “Netherworld Guild” quickly paid the fees and left the shop with the Guild Establishment Token. However, when he received the Guild Establishment Token, someone had already left the shop before him. It was Lorne. Although it was indeed the first Guild Establishment Token that was sold, it did not mean that the Guild Establishment Token could help the other party create the first guild in the game. “I’m sorry, friend. I have to beat you to it.” Lorne pushed through the crowd to where the registrar was. It could be seen that because of the Guild Establishment Token, this place was already packed with players. They all wanted to know who was the first to create the guild. When they saw Lorne arrive, all the players’ eyes widened. “Gosh! Why is Tyrant here at this time?!” “Does he want to register a guild?” “That’s not right. Didn’t he auction his Guild Establishment Token?” “Perhaps he already has a second Guild Establishment Token.” “It’s possible. Someone discovered it a few hours ago. Tyrant hid his points on the leaderboard. It’s probably for now.” “Gosh, that’s too much. Those large guilds thought that it was the first Guild Establishment Token and would definitely bid crazily. In the end, while they were auctioning, this guy suddenly intercepted. Isn’t this a scam?” “So what if he scammed them? Those large guilds occupy the training areas every day. It’s time to teach them a lesson.” “That’s right, I support Tyrant on this!” The solo players discussed. As ordinary players, they all hated the rich. At this moment, when they saw a solo player “teaching” the large guilds a lesson, they naturally raised their hands in praise. However, this matter was too much for the players of large guilds. In a panic, they quickly opened their leader’s communication panel and reported the information they had obtained nervously, afraid that they would suffer a huge loss. “Isn’t this our Iron Skull City’s most heroic adventurer, Tyrant? I’ve already heard about the ruins of the war. I heard that you brought back the corpses of more than a dozen dragons. It’s unbelievable.” At this moment, the registrar pushed through the crowd and walked towards Lorne with a smile, “Honorable Mr. Tyrant, why have you come here personally?” Seeing this scene, the surrounding players were jealous. Was this the charm of the world’s number one player? Normally, when ordinary players like them walked in front of an NPC, the other party would not be willing to acknowledge them, but against Tyrant, they actually took the initiative to welcome him. The difference was too great! “I want to create a guild of my own.” Lorne went straight to the point and stated his intention. The surrounding guild players were dumbfounded. This was what they were most worried about, but it really happened. “This is a wise choice. A powerful and united team will provide you with greater help and allow you to effectively deal with all kinds of battles.” The registered official nodded and asked, “Then, what is the name of your guild?” “Above the Clouds.” Lorne gave it a charming name. “[Above the Clouds] is a bold and imaginative name.” The register praised him, then said, “To create a guild in Iron Skull City, you need to pay 1,000 gold coins. Due to your contribution to Iron Skull City, I will give you a 20% discount. You only need 800 gold coins to register.” … The NPCs in “Divine Realm” were also extremely capitalistic. They needed 1,000 gold coins just to create a guild. Even with a discount of 20%, it still required 800 gold coins, equivalent to 2.4 million alliance dollars. Of course, in terms of the exchange rate of the system, it was only 720,000 dollars, which was not too ridiculous. Lorne obediently took out 800 gold coins. The next moment, a grand voice echoed in the sky. Ding! “Full-server announcement: Congratulations to player ‘Tyrant’ for successfully creating the world’s first guild [Above the Clouds]. Reward: Luck+2, Guild Level+2, Reputation+20,000.” “Ding!” “Ding!” The system notification sounded three times and reached the ears of every player in the world. Then, the entire world was in an uproar. … Blood Shadow City. The moment they received the Guild Establishment Token, the players of the Netherworld Guild used a special teleportation array to return to Blood Shadow City. Nether River, the guild leader of the Netherworld Guild, immediately brought the Guild Establishment Token to the NPC who was in charge of the Blood Shadow City. “I want to create a guild!” “May I know your guild’s name?” “Netherworld!” Nether River said the name of his guild. It could be seen that at this moment, even he could not help but be excited. After all, this was the creation of the first guild in the entire server, and the announcement of their guild’s creation would spread their reputation throughout the world. With this global advertisement, their guild’s future business would definitely be better. As a guild of the Dark faction, they usually accepted assassination missions, especially killing the management of large guilds. This business was the most popular. After all, the guilds had a huge conflict of interest, and this was the source of their money. Therefore, the price of 70,000 gold coins was justifiable. The members of the Netherworld Guild waited excitedly for the global announcement. They were in no hurry to cheer. At this moment, a grand voice sounded. Ding! “Full-server announcement: Congratulations to player ‘Tyrant’ for successfully creating the world’s first guild, [Above the Clouds].” The voice sounded, and the people from the Netherworld Guild cheered. “We’re first! We’re first!” “The Netherworld Guild is invincible!” “We’re the strongest!!!” Everyone cheered. However, after properly hearing the information in the announcement, all of them were stunned. <i>Tyrant?</i>  <i>Above the Clouds?</i>  Damn! There was something wrong with the system’s announcement! “Can someone tell me what’s going on?!” A group of the guild higher-ups could not believe what they had just seen. They were the ones who had used the Guild Establishment Token, but it was Tyrant who had created the guild. This was ridiculous! Guild Leader Nether River was also stunned. However, he quickly recovered and checked the guild interface. Only then did he understand everything. Just now, they had succeeded in creating a guild. It was not that Tyrant had snatched away their guild creation opportunity, but that scoundrel Tyrant had also created a guild just a moment before! “Damn you, how dare you trick me!” Nether River was extremely angry. He swore that if there was a chance in the future, he would torture Tyrant to death and trample that scoundrel under his feet forever! … “Damn! The final price is 70,000 gold coins!” Outside the Dragon One shop, when the surrounding players heard the final price of the auction, they immediately went crazy. That was 70,000 gold coins! If it was in alliance dollars, it would be a total of 200 million! This was a terrifying figure that 99.9% of the people in the world could not imagine. What was even more puzzling was that this was the price of a game tool! “I’m f*cking dumbfounded. Are these people so rich that they have nowhere to spend it on?” “I don’t understand the world of the rich.” “This is crazy.” “They actually used 200 million to buy game items. I really don’t know what they’re thinking.” “One can become a billionaire just by playing games. This is ridiculous.” “I suspect that we’re not playing the same game as Tyrant.” The players discussed. At that moment… Suddenly! A grand global announcement sounded. Ding! “Full-server announcement: Congratulations to player ‘Tyrant’ for successfully creating the world’s first guild, [Above the Clouds].” “Ding!” “Ding!” After three announcements, the group of players was stunned. “Strange, why did Tyrant create a guild?” “What’s going on?” “What’s Tyrant doing? He sold the token to himself?” “Is there something wrong with this person?” “I understand now. Tyrant wanted to use the name of the auction to accumulate reputation for his shop, but this method is really not very brilliant.” Hearing these explanations, the other players were enlightened. “Damn it. After all this, it’s actually a f*cking publicity stunt.” “So that’s it. Even if you use your ass to think, who would use 200 million to buy a game tool? Is there a problem with their brains?” “That’s right. I suspected it long ago.” “This is such a disgusting publicity stunt.” After registering the guild, it was already late at night. Today’s battle in the game was too packed, so it put a lot of pressure on his mind. He needed to go offline and rest well, because he still had to farm points during the day. Now that the event had begun, every second was money. With the current rate of accumulation of points, one second was equivalent to 60 points. According to the price of the auction just now, one point was equivalent to 166 alliance dollars! Therefore, time was money. Without hesitation, Lorne went offline. After washing up, he went to rest. … The next morning, Lorne changed into a simple set of casual clothes and took a cab to the hospital where his sister was staying. Originally, Jessica had wanted him to go to the high-level Energy Zone in the next two days, but now that such an important event had occurred in the game, Lorne postponed the plan. In the car, Lorne saw that all the surrounding advertisement boards had been replaced with those of the “Divine Realm”. Even the car’s screen was playing a program regarding the Divine Realm. In this show, the host was listing related events that made players in the game rich, especially incidents involving Tyrant, which were emphasized. In addition, they added another piece of information, which was that the World Alliance was supporting this game with all its might and hoped that all the humans in the world could be raised to a higher level. The information made Lorne frown. Although “Divine Realm” contained infinite business opportunities, humans still needed to maintain life in reality. There were already ten billion humans in the game, and not many people remained in reality. Why did the World Alliance keep urging others to enter the game? Wasn’t this too suspicious? Did they already know the secret of “Divine Realm”? Lorne could not help but doubt this. Ever since he knew that the game could really be materialized, he had felt that there was an unspeakable secret behind the World Alliance. It was clearly a ‘virtual game’ invented by the World Alliance, but they did not take any precautions against ‘materialization’. If they did not know the ‘materialization’ function, why did they have to promote the game worldwide? They even wanted to let all humans enter the game. This was too abnormal. To be honest, to this day, Lorne felt that the Internet was more and more correct about the theory that “higher lifeforms created the Divine Realm”. Although it was also unreasonable, it could explain the World Alliance’s abnormal behavior. They called for the entire human race to enter the game and set up the ‘Bone Armor Defense Shield’ and the Energy Zones. He felt that this was all preparation to resist some sort of apocalypse. It was like the apocalyptic movies on the Internet. With many thoughts in mind, Lorne only realized it when he reached the hospital. Huff— He exhaled. In any case, the changes in the world had benefited him. Money and reputation were obtained already. Most importantly, it gave him hope to treat his sister. Thinking of this, Lorne felt much better. Soon, he arrived at the observation room. Although Lorne was ready to move out, Jessica had already employed the best doctors, the best equipment, and many nurses on 24 hours of close watch everyday. This made Lorne like her even more. “Roanna, you’re about to receive the best treatment in the world. Everything will be fine.” Lorne put on his protective suit and held his sister’s hand. During this period of time, he had been busy dealing with matters in the game. He had not come to see his sister for a few days. Today, he had taken the opportunity to sit here and talk to her more. At present, the greatest hope of treating his sister was the medical team that Jessica had arranged. She had a lot of connections and could contact the most outstanding doctor in this world. Moreover, the other party was waiting in the high-level Energy Zone. This was what Lorne had always wanted. But now that it was about to be realized, he could not help but be nervous. He was a little worried about the final result. After all, for the past three years, Roanna’s doctor-in-charge had said that this was a problem that the current world could not solve. “I hope everything can be resolved.” Lorne was ready. As long as the doctors were not confident, he would reject treatment. He did not want to determine his sister’s life through chance. As for what to do next? Lorne had a goal in mind. The medical technology in the real world was limited, but the game world was very magical. As long as he was powerful enough, he believed that he could definitely obtain a Mythical potion in the future capable of resolving all diseases in the world. … “Is that Mr. Lorne?” “Yes.” “He’s so gentle to his sister!” “Of course, in order to save his sister, Mr. Lorne is even willing to give up his life.” “My god, I also want to have a brother like him who pampers me every day.” “Unfortunately, his sister’s condition is not ideal. I heard it’s the most difficult disease to treat in this world.” “Didn’t they say that the sister is going to the high-level Energy Zone to receive treatment?” “It’s hard to say. In short, the situation is still not optimistic.” “How pitiful…” In the ICU, two nurses on duty were secretly chatting. … An hour later, Lorne left the hospital. To be honest, he was helpless in this situation. Although he had money now, he was still helpless. Fortunately, after knowing the materialization effect of “Divine Realm”, there was still hope. Next, he had to properly build up the Cold Desolate Dragon City and accumulate enough resources in the game. If the potion was in the hands of some forces, he could also have a bargaining chip to exchange for it. Soon, Lorne returned home. It was ten in the morning, but he could not wait anymore. He put on the game helmet and entered the game. He appeared in Iron Skull City. It could be seen that a large number of players appeared on the resurrection magic circle. They were all players who had died in the Titan Forest. However, this result did not affect their fighting spirit. The players still ran towards the Titan Forest excitedly. As for the lower-level players? At this moment, they had also found their own path to wealth. They bought a large amount of potions in Iron Skull City and transported them to the Titan Forest to build a temporary shop. Such behavior could earn them a lot of money. Lorne did not stop. He immediately found Knight Leader Oren and teleported back to the swamp. Half an hour later, Lorne arrived deep in the Titan Forest. He used the same strategy as before to kill crazily in the forest. “Ding! Congratulations on obtaining: Points+392!” “Ding! Congratulations!” “Ding!” “Ding!” In a large valley, Lorne dealt damage to the Stone Beetles. The Stone Beetles were not demonized monsters and would not generate points, so no one was willing to come to this area. This suited Lorne’s needs. He used the Monster Merging Simulator to sweep through the area. After synthesizing the Level 35 ordinary monster, it gave him 392 points. If other players were to be stuck like this, they would probably be so angry that they would curse non-stop. After farming monsters for the entire day, Lorne’s points had already exceeded 3 million points. This efficiency was slightly slower than yesterday. After all, it had taken longer. “Exchange for three Guild Establishment Tokens!” As he was about to go offline to rest, Lorne used all his points. Three million points could be exchanged for three Guild Establishment Tokens. Then, he placed them all in the shop for auction. The next second, shouts sounded throughout Iron Skull City. Ding! “Handsome gentlemen, beautiful ladies, I am Tyrant. I have a Guild Establishment Token in my hand. Players who need it can go to the Dragon One shop in Iron Skull City to auction in half an hour. All participants must pay a thousand gold coins as a deposit. Friends who have interest, please pay attention to the time when the auction begins.” “Handsome gentlemen, beautiful ladies…” “Handsome gentlemen, beautiful ladies…” Hearing these shouts, the players widened their eyes. “Damn, is Boss Tyrant starting a wholesale business?” “We can’t understand the world of a God-tier player.” “Another Guild Establishment Token. Tyrant will earn tens of millions again!” “The game is so profitable, why would anyone start a company in real life!” “I agree.” While most of the players were still discussing, the representatives of the large guilds gathered again. They wanted to set up a guild too much. To large guilds, setting up a guild as soon as possible could raise their guild level as soon as possible. Only when the guild level was high enough could enough players join the guild and form a powerful force. When the auction began, these people had bitter looks on their faces. “Damn, the initial bid is still 10,000 gold coins!” “Tyrant is too much!” “Such a black-hearted merchant.” “This guy has never been kind-hearted. He’s simply evil!” A group of guild representatives complained. However, Lorne could not be bothered with them. Those guilds that were willing to spend thousands of gold coins to buy the Guild Establishment Token did not care about spending gold coins, not to mention that these people were not ordinary rich folks. Indeed, this group of players was extremely angry, but they still obediently stated their bids. After dozens of increases, the final price stopped at 31,000 gold coins. … “Guild Leader, I think we came to this map with Tyrant at the same time. Why is it that his points seem to be growing endlessly? He already bought the second Guild Establishment Token, but we haven’t even unlocked the Points Shop?” In the Silver Snow Guild, a beautiful Priest player looked enviously at the information regarding the auction house. “We… are fairies. He’s a big pervert. Of course, it’s not the same…” Twinkle Rose clenched her fists and gritted her teeth. This was the difference between them. The strength of that freakish little brother was enough to crush all the ladies in her guild. The two of them had clearly entered the event map at the same time, but in the end, that guy had already bought the second Guild Establishment Token, and their points had only just exceeded 300,000. Last night, this guy had sold the token for 70,000 gold coins. Today, he sold another one for 30,000 gold coins. All in all, it was a total of 100,000 gold coins, equivalent to 300 million alliance dollars! Boohoo, this game was so unfair! … In another forest. When he saw that the third Guild Establishment Token had been sold, Lorne immediately added another one. In view of the price that had exceeded 30,000 gold coins, the bottom price was still set at 10,000 gold coins. Those guilds would definitely not let it go. At the “Dragon One” shop, everyone who had just walked down the second floor was stopped by the shop manager, Rona, again. She informed them that the next Guild Establishment Token auction was about to begin in their shop, so she asked them to stay. Hearing this, everyone was stunned. They even suspected that they were hallucinating. After all, this was the Guild Establishment Token, not some random cabbage. How could so many appear at once?! Everyone was confused, but they still returned to the auction house. Immediately after, a new Guild Establishment Token appeared, and the initial bid was 10,000 gold coins! Seeing this scene, cursing immediately sounded at the scene. Of course, although they cursed, their bodies were still very honest. All of them crazily stated their prices, wanting to take this Guild Establishment Token for themselves. In the end, the price of this Guild Establishment Token was fixed at 33,000 gold coins, which was even higher than the previous one. This was all because of the competition between the guilds. When an enemy guild obtained some advantages, in order to keep up with the other party, one would definitely require more effort and money to make up for the difference. Therefore, this time, Lorne made a killing. … “Guild Leader, are we still not going to make a move? The price of the Guild Establishment Token is still rising.” The beautiful Priest player could not take it anymore. The more guilds registered, the greater the disadvantage of the Silver Snow Guild. As ambitious beautiful ladies, they naturally did not want this to happen. “Wait a while longer.” Twinkle Rose was not in a hurry. She thought of Tyrant’s reminder. That guy had told her not to compete for the first Guild Establishment Token, which meant that a new one would appear in the future. According to the current situation, Tyrant would still sell the Guild Establishment Token in the next few days. In order to save money to buy branded bags, it was best to wait. Just as she was thinking this, Lorne put up a new Guild Establishment Token for 10,000 gold coins. This time, the players in the entire world went crazy. “Gosh! What’s going on? When I was drinking water, Tyrant took out another Guild Establishment Token?” “This is too much!” “I secretly suspect that this person is creating Guild Establishment Tokens through NPCs!” “Tyrant is too ridiculous!” “Damn, even if he’s selling drugs, he can’t earn so much!” “…” “35,000 gold coins!” The third Guild Establishment Token of the day was quickly sold. The final price was 35,000 gold coins, higher than the first two. However, no one knew that this was actually Lorne’s own bid. There were two reasons for this. First, it was to create a facade that the value of the Guild Establishment Token would gradually increase. Secondly, it was because he had promised Super Rich to give him a Guild Establishment Token. That rich and willful uncle directly used 100,000 gold coins to reserve this Guild Establishment Token, so naturally, it had to be prioritized. After trading the Guild Establishment Token to Super Rich, Lorne went offline to rest. … At 6 pm, Lorne went online again. The event was ongoing now. He had to farm monsters as soon as possible. After adjusting his state, Lorne immediately summoned his pets and led them deeper into the forest. Although the monsters here were very high-level, under Aisha’s sharp blades, they were all killed one by one. There was no difficulty at all. Just like that, Lorne’s points kept rising. With his killing speed, he could kill 5-10 monsters in about a minute. Coupled with the effect of doubling the points, his accumulation speed had always been very efficient. When he crossed the forest and arrived at a plain… Suddenly! His [Treasure Seeking] skill was triggered. Ding! “Congratulations on discovering an ordinary mine. The coordinates have been automatically recorded.” Although it was an ordinary mine, if he could effectively mine the resources, he would still receive a generous reward. Feeling that there should still be ore veins in this area, Lorne began to sweep through the monsters on the plains. The monsters here were a group of wild bulls. They were Level 29 and could merge into Silver-grade demonized monsters and drop 232 points. Compared to the previous monsters, the benefits of such a monster were relatively small. Fortunately, there were enough of them. The wild bulls liked to move in groups, which saved Lorne a lot of trouble. While hunting, Lorne’s other hidden income was also very good. Ding! “Congratulations on discovering an ordinary gem mine. The coordinates have been automatically recorded.” “Congratulations on discovering an ordinary steel mine. The coordinates have been automatically recorded.” “Ding!” “Ding!” As expected, there were indeed many small mineral veins here. They were scattered everywhere underground. If not for his [Treasure Seeking] skill, he would not have been able to discover their existence accurately. Lorne checked the quality of the mineral veins and found that most were ordinary and had limited reserves. The value of such a mine was not high. After all, mining required manpower. Fortunately, this place was relatively close to the Gnome Mineral Company. He could consider cooperating with them and obtain a net profit. “There’s already 235,000 gold coins now.” After two days of selling the Guild Establishment Tokens, Lorne had accumulated 235,000 gold coins, but he did not sell them. He planned to use this money to repair the Cold Desolate Dragon City. According to his calculations in the “Gnome Shop”, the funds were not enough. Gold coins were expensive among the players because the drop rate of gold coins was not high now. However, in the world of NPCs, gold coins were relatively cheap and were the lowest-level currency. Therefore, these 230,000 gold coins could not solve all the problems. Lorne knew that he had to accumulate more gold coins to prepare for the restoration of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Speaking of this, he could not help but think of the situation in the ruins of the war. He wondered how Manager Tully’s project was progressing. Lorne opened the forum to check on the situation. Many players had seen the Gnome Airship arrive at the ruins of the war. They would definitely go and check on the situation and reveal the information on the forum. Lorne opened the search window and entered the key phrase—Gnome Airship. The next moment, a pile of information appeared. Lorne looked at it briefly, then smiled. From the information on the forum, the gnome’s project was progressing very smoothly. Because the gnomes had hired players to help transport the ores, and they had a large number of people, it was obvious that the gnome’s project was in full swing. This was good news. After all, half of every ore belonged to him. While Lorne was rejoicing… Suddenly! A ball of burning black flames appeared in the forest ahead. Lorne looked closely and saw a huge humanoid creature in the flames. “Is it a Boss?!” Lorne’s eyes were abnormally bright. To ordinary players, discovering Boss-level monsters meant that they could obtain more points. To Lorne, discovering a Boss-level monster meant that he could obtain higher-level materials. If it was a material that could allow wild beasts to evolve into Bosses, he would make a killing! With that in mind, Lorne quickly walked over. When he was close enough, he finally saw the other party’s true identity. It was an extremely powerful demonized werewolf! Werewolves were one of the beastmen who could generate points. Moreover, this was a powerful Boss-level monster! ———— [Demonized Werewolf Leader] Grade: Silver Boss Level: 35 HP: 300,000 / 300,000 Physical Attack: 2100-3000 Physical Defense: 1150 Magic Defense: 780 Skills: [Bloodthirsty Fangs], [Frenzied Claw], [Wild Wolf Assault], [Blood Shadow Greedy Wolf], [Demonized Body] Introduction: A werewolf leader who has been completely corroded by the power of darkness. It has become even more savage after being demonized. It is the nightmare of all adventurers. ———— It was a Silver Boss! Lorne was more interested because this was the first Silver Boss he had encountered. As for ‘Walter’ who he had encountered previously and the other dragons, although they all had powerful attributes, they were not Silver Bosses but special Bosses in the event. Because of this, Lorne had finally encountered the first Silver Boss in his life. As for its attributes? It could not be said that it was not powerful. If ordinary players were here, it was hard to say if they could win. After all, the upper limit of this monster’s attack had reached an astonishing 3,000 points, and it was also a Level 35 Boss monster. If they really fought, it would probably take at least a hundred-man team of top players to have a chance. “Master, Aisha wants to kill it alone!” At this moment, Aisha stood up with a dagger in her hand. From the moment she became Lorne’s pet, this little girl had been very harsh on herself, because in her mind, she was determined to protect her master from any harm. Such a battle was the best opponent for her to sharpen her skills. “Go ahead.” Lorne let the other pets disperse. This Boss did not require everyone to fight together. With Aisha’s current strength, she could completely suppress her opponent. Her interface attack had already exceeded 10,000 points! Not to mention a Silver Boss, even a Gold Boss could not withstand such a terrifying damage output. Bam! After obtaining permission, Aisha immediately rushed towards her opponent. Silver energy circulated on her exquisite combat boots. The moment she stepped out, it was as if a missile had exploded, causing cracks to appear on the ground. Aisha herself approached the other party at a speed that was difficult to catch with the naked eye. At the same time, the dagger in her hand glowed silver. The moment the hexagram shone, Aisha used the Backstab skill to come behind the other party, and the cold dagger was stabbed into the back of the demonized werewolf leader. -33,000 (Critical) A five-digit critical damage appeared, directly reducing the Boss’s health by a large amount. Although Aisha was 12 levels behind the other party, she still dealt astonishing damage with her powerful attack. At this moment, the quick-witted Werewolf Boss quickly turned around and counterattacked. Clang! The sound of metal striking metal sounded. Aisha blocked the huge claw with the sharp blade of her left hand. Although the difference in size between the two sides was huge, in terms of strength, Aisha was far superior to the other party. Even in a head-on battle, she could directly suppress the other party. [Phantom Combo+]! Aisha did not give the other party any time to react. Almost at the same time, she seized the opportunity and directly used her combo skill. Two daggers danced in her hands, and silver bolts appeared in the sky. Like a blooming flower or a fishing net, a terrifying light covered the sky and enveloped the Werewolf Boss. -8,231 -8,231 -8,231 -8231 After nine consecutive slashes, the Boss lost nearly a quarter of its health points. “Roar!” The werewolf leader let out a roar in pain. Crimson light appeared on its sharp claws. It also used a skill to kill the enemy in one strike. But as it prepared to attack, Aisha vanished. She hid in the darkness. [Phantom Stealth] gave her high movement speed and allowed her to avoid the detection of any enemy. Even a Silver Boss was helpless against her. Whoosh— The werewolf leader could only attack the air crazily, and scarlet energy covered the surroundings. This was a furious counterattack from the Silver Boss. The sharp red claws seemed to split the air. If it hit a player, they would definitely die instantly. Unfortunately, this counterattack was useless against Aisha. At this moment, she was actually standing by the other party’s side, watching it attack crazily with her own eyes. However, the werewolf leader was unaware of this and continued venting crazily into the air. Soon, the Boss’ skill duration passed. At that moment, Aisha appeared behind him. Slash! The sharp dagger slashed across the Boss’ neck again, tearing out a pool of black blood. -34,500 (Critical) -7355 Aisha used the combination of “Skill+Attack” to take away 40,000 health points from the werewolf leader again. At this moment, the Boss only had less than 200,000 health points left, and its health had already fallen to less than 70%. However, less than 20 seconds had passed! 20 seconds! Only 20 seconds! Aisha had actually depleted one-third of the health of a Level 35 Silver Boss! If other players saw such a terrifying DPS, their eyes would probably pop out. “Damn elf, you’re courting death!” The Werewolf Boss was also stunned. It did not expect its health to decrease so quickly, but there was no time to think. It quickly jumped into the distance and kept its distance from the enemy. Then, it crouched on the ground. Its shoulder blades were raised and its fur stood on end. It looked extremely hideous. The scarlet eyes were fixed on Aisha. After pausing for a few seconds, its hind legs suddenly exerted strength. The muscles in its entire body tensed up, and it instantly burst with an extremely terrifying speed. The Werewolf Boss was like a scarlet lightning that instantly approached Aisha. Its hideous fangs tore at her neck. This was an attack that was difficult to dodge. Even Aisha could not avoid such a swift attack. However, being unable to dodge did not mean that she could not block it. Without fear, Aisha held the two daggers in front of her. Clang! The sharp blades and fangs collided, causing countless sparks to fly. The Werewolf Boss knew that its strength was no match for its opponent, so it directly threw its head to the side, wanting to use the force of the impact to destroy this elf’s defense. However, such an attack was blocked by Aisha with a turn of her body. Not only that, but she also took the initiative to fight the Boss in close combat. From this move, it could be seen that from the beginning to the end, Aisha did not treat it as an opponent. She was willing to fight the other party in close combat only because she wanted to hone her combat skills. -8247 -8259 -21,580! (Critical) -8233 Aisha entangled the other party at an extremely fast speed, her sharp blades slicing crazily at its body. Such a terrifying speed made it difficult for the werewolf leader to deal an effective blow to her. Even if there was an opportunity, it would be accurately blocked by Aisha. Seeing this, Lorne felt that he had to learn from Aisha. As a player, he knew the difficulty of blocking in the game. As everyone knew, among the classes in “Divine Realm”, the Swordsman class did not have defensive skills in the early stages. Therefore, the system had prepared a skill that could be used for defense. This skill was—Block! Block could be used by all classes, but because swordsmen were often in close combat, they used it the most frequently. Coupled with the fact that it was very difficult to use, the players called it the “Swordsman’s Divine Skill”. Under normal circumstances, if one wanted to block successfully, they had to enter the “defensive stance” when the other party’s attack landed. Most people held their swords above their heads to block the attacks. However, because the monster’s attack speed was extremely fast, in addition to the lack of pattern and the terrain problems, the success rate of blocking was very low. Even the top players did not dare to say that they could perfectly block all attacks. That was even more impossible for Lorne. His combat skills should only be considered average. Compared to those swordsmen who had been using their swords to fight, he was not skilled at all. However, how could a truly powerful player rely on pets alone? In Lorne’s mind, a powerful expert should have the best combat skills. Even as a Summoner, he could not waste his strength by doing nothing. Therefore, at this moment, he was very concerned about Aisha’s combat skills. Especially every time she blocked the Boss’s attack, Aisha used her dagger to defend almost at the same time as the other party attacked. It was also because of her sharp combat awareness that she had a 100% chance of blocking the incoming attacks! -34,500 (Critical) -33,790 (Critical) -8153 -8247 -8193 -8365 While Lorne was lost in thought, Aisha had already forced the Boss into a corner. She did not even have to wait for the skill to be refreshed. She only used her positioning and basic attack to reduce the health of this Level 35 Silver monster by 95%. Looking at the Boss who only had 5% health left, Lorne had no intention of subduing it. It was not because of anything else, but simply because the difficulty of leveling up was too high. The EXP needed to level up a Silver Boss was about 50 times that of Lorne himself, half of that of Aisha. Just raising these pets was already very time consuming. Lorne did not plan to increase the difficulty of leveling up. His current pet team already had the strength to defeat everything. There was no need to add such a pet. To Lorne, the next pet had to be a functional one, followed by one that dealt magic damage. In short, there was no need for this werewolf leader. Lorne did not fancy such an ordinary monster with ordinary strength and appearance. Of course, most importantly, Lorne needed the materials on the Boss now. With this, it would be much easier to accumulate points. “Aisha, kill it,” Lorne ordered. “Damn human and elf, I’m going to tear you apart!” “Roar!” The werewolf leader felt the threat of death, so it had to make up its mind to use its final hidden skill—[Blood Shadow Greedy Wolf]. This was a skill that drained one’s life in exchange for combat strength. After using this skill, this werewolf leader would definitely not be able to survive. However, it had no choice but to give up everything and choose to die with the enemy. Huge red energy emerged from its body, and even its body doubled in size. It was as if it had been injected with a balloon, and the muscles all over its body were swollen like a basketball. Ding! “The Demonized Werewolf Leader has activated its skill [Blood Shadow Greedy Wolf]. It has temporarily entered the Enhancement state!” [Enhancement: Health Points+10%, Attack+50%, Life Leech+100%, Movement Speed+100%, Duration: 30 seconds!] The moment it activated the skill, the werewolf leader’s strength was greatly increased. Even without the other two buffs, with only the effect of “Life Leech+100%” left, it could recover his health back to full in a few seconds. If ordinary players fought here, they would probably be instantly wiped out by this skill. Because the effect of Life Leech+100% was too useful in a group battle, it was enough to turn the entire situation around. Therefore, this was indeed a suicidal skill. Unfortunately, it was facing Aisha today. This level of increase in strength was not enough to change the situation. With its 50,000 health points, it could not even endure a wave of Aisha’s skills. Lorne did not care how much its attributes had increased. It was no match for Aisha. However, at this moment, his eyes still lit up. “Enhancement state?” This effect interested Lorne. He wondered if a stronger synthesis material would drop if he killed the Boss that had entered the Enhancement state. It seemed possible. If that was the case, the monsters he created in the future might be Bosses! The points gained from killing a Boss would definitely be dozens of times that of ordinary monsters! In this case, wouldn’t it be equivalent to dozens of times the income? As Lorne fantasized, Aisha had already ended the battle. Under her terrifying critical damage, the enhanced werewolf leader died under the dagger before it could display its strength. “Boom…” The Boss fell to the ground unwillingly. Unfortunately, these were monsters in the event. They would not drop the loot. Ding! “Congratulations on killing the Silver Boss [Demonized Werewolf Leader]. You have received+19,600 points!” 19,600? The number of points was beyond his expectations. If one compared the points produced by a Silver monster, the number of points produced by this Boss was 100 times that of the former! This was good news for Lorne. The more points the Boss-level monster gave, the more anticipation he had for the merging later. If he could create a Boss, he would really make a killing. Perhaps the monster he created would produce more points than this Boss. After all, after killing the synthesized monsters, the points would double. “Wait…” “Why isn’t there a Silver Boss first clear achievement?” Only then did Lorne remember that he had not triggered the first clear of a Silver Boss, nor had he received any relevant rewards. This was not normal. This was the first Silver Boss he had encountered. There was no reason for it not to be the first kill. Could it be that someone was faster? This was not impossible. Previously, Lorne had gone offline a few times. It might have been when he was resting that someone had obtained the first clear of the Silver Boss. He did not dwell on this matter. His priority now was to obtain the materials he needed. Lorne stepped forward and placed his hand on the corpse. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the material: [Demonized Werewolf Leader’s Bone]!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: [Demonized Werewolf Leader’s Tail]!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: [Demonized Werewolf Leader’s Fang]!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: [Demonized Werewolf Leader’s Sharp Claw]!” “Congratulations…” Soon, Lorne obtained a pile of materials. To him, these materials were a hundred times better than 20,000 points. With these materials, he could synthesize higher quality monsters and obtain more points. With that in mind, Lorne could not wait. “Long Tongue Bat, find a demonized beastman immediately!” “Yes, Master.” The Long Tongue Bat flew into the forest. Perhaps because the Boss was moving around, there were no monsters nearby. After waiting for three minutes, the Long Tongue Bat brought back the information that Lorne needed. Soon, he found the demonized beastman. “Next, it’s time to witness a miracle.” Lorne rubbed his hands. The synthesis this time involved the gains of tens of millions of points. He would be lying if he said he was not nervous. However, there was more anticipation in Lorne’s heart. He had already had experience with success two days ago, so he would definitely succeed this time. Huff— Lorne took a deep breath, adjusted his emotions, and activated his talent. He first threw the demonized beastman into the formula, then threw in the materials he had just obtained. The next moment, a complete synthesis formula appeared. Ding! “A monster prototype and material have been identified. The synthesis formula is: (Demonized Beastman) + (Demonized Werewolf Leader’s Muscle) + (???)…” “The cost of this synthesis is 10 gold coins. Would you like to merge?” There was hope! The cost this time was actually 10 gold coins, which meant that the final product would be very powerful. After all, when he created Rimuru, it only cost 5 gold coins. Without hesitation, Lorne made up his mind. Then, a familiar scene appeared. The huge and ancient magic circle completely illuminated the monster and the material, then fused them together to become an even stronger monster. Ding! “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining a Quasi-Boss Monster: [Wolf Head Demon].” As soon as the voice fell, a powerful monster appeared in front of Lorne. It was covered in black bone spikes and looked hideous. The muscles on its body seemed to be made of molten iron. Compared to the ordinary demonized beastmen, the monster was like a king with supreme power. Unfortunately, it could not compare to the werewolf leader. “Strange, why is it only a Quasi-Boss monster?” Lorne was confused. The result was unexpected. He had used the materials dropped by a Silver Boss, but the ordinary demonized beastman did not become a powerful Silver Boss. It had not even reached the quality of a true Boss. Was it because the quality of the prototype monster was too low? It seemed possible. In the past, when he created “Rimuru”, the prototype monster was already at the Boss level. After the synthesis, it evolved into a Bronze-Grade Boss. It was the same for “Little Spider”. Its prototype was a Bronze-Grade Boss. Moreover, it had used five types of synthesis materials at the time, including the “Dragon’s Reverse Scale”. However, the final effect had only increased the quality by one level. From this analysis, the quality of the monster prototype affected the final product greatly. From this perspective, directly evolving into a Quasi-Boss monster seemed to be a very unexpected thing. After all, there was a huge difference between ordinary monsters and Boss monsters. “How many points can this monster generate?” Without thinking, he let Aisha fight. From its interface, it could be seen that the strength of a Quasi-Boss monster was still very powerful, especially its health. It actually exceeded 100,000 points. Such attributes could defeat any player at this stage. Unfortunately, Aisha was not like them. Two daggers danced in her hands, and instantly, countless silver-white bolts enveloped the target monster. Pew! Pew! Pew! Although the monster had a lot of health, it could not withstand such terrifying damage. In less than ten seconds, the battle had ended. The powerful Quasi-Boss monster fell to the ground with a wail. Lorne walked up and placed his hand on the other party, then obtained a pile of synthesis materials. These materials could continue to create monsters of the same level. Of course, if the prototype monster was an ordinary beast, the final effect would be slightly weaker. After collecting the materials, Lorne opened the combat panel. ———— Combat Notification: Congratulations on killing the Quasi-Boss [Wolf Head Demon]. Points+4410! ———— There were actually 4410 points! Lorne’s eyes lit up. Although there was a huge difference between 4410 and 19,600, it was still a very generous income. After all, killing a Gold monster only gave 392 points. Now that it had increased by ten times, how could it not be exciting? “Ordinary beasts will produce fewer points. On average, a monster should be able to bring 3,000 points!” “According to the previous hunting efficiency, I will farm at least 1.5 million points per hour!” Lorne was ecstatic. A million points was equivalent to a Guild Establishment Token! A Guild Establishment Token was equivalent to 10,000 gold coins! 10,000 gold coins was equivalent to 30 million alliance dollars! Didn’t that mean that his current hourly salary had reached 30 million?! Damn, this was too shocking. Even the richest man in the world would not have such an hourly salary. Thinking of this, Lorne laughed excitedly. It took him a few minutes to recover. Then, he shook his head and smiled. In fact, he knew very well that this so-called 30 million hourly salary was impossible. Perhaps there was hope for the first few hours, but when the number of Guild Establishment Tokens exceeded two digits, such income would gradually dim. This was because the value of the Guild Establishment Token would quickly decrease. Although it would not drop to worthless, it would definitely not be bought with tens of thousands of gold coins. While he was thinking, Lorne had already brought his pets to quickly find a new monster. Then, he used his Monster Merging Simulator to repeat the scene. … “Ding! You have killed an Armored Demon Ox. Points+2940!” “Ding! You have killed a Wolf Head Demon. Points+4410! “Ding!” “Ding!” In the dark forest, Lorne fought for nearly an hour. He killed hundreds of monsters, and the contribution points earned him exactly one million points. Lorne immediately exchanged for a Guild Establishment Token and auctioned it in the shop. Because several guilds had already received the Guild Establishment Token, these few days, it was the most popular time. If he missed these few days, after the other players also unlocked the Points Shop, the value of the Guild Establishment Token would plummet. Lorne did not want to miss the opportunity to earn money. As he swept through the forest, he contacted Twinkle Rose. She was the leader of a large guild and the first to enter the Titan Forest. She should have long investigated the distribution of the monsters in the vicinity. After hearing Lorne’s request, the big-busted sister immediately sent him the map of the resource distribution. As for the price? It was a Guild Establishment Token. Of course, this Guild Establishment Token had to be bought with gold coins. After a friendly exchange between the two, the final price was 10,000 gold coins. This price was considered a normal price in the current period of time. Both sides did not lose out. “Then, I want to go next…” Lorne checked the markings on the map. Although the proportion of demonized beastmen was higher where he was, the overall number was not high. To other players, this was a good place. But to Lorne, this was not an ideal place. From the map, there was a valley near this forest. There were huge ordinary beasts there, and their levels were above Level 30. Wasn’t this what Lorne had dreamed of? With that in mind, Lorne immediately set off with his pets. In the Titan Forest, there was a huge river, but because of the lack of water recently, the riverbed was exposed. At this moment, a large group of ordinary monsters were wandering here. Without hesitation, Lorne led his pets and began sweeping through the area. “Ding! You have killed a Rhinoceros Demon. Points+2940!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” Monster after monster fell, giving him a high number of points. Although the monsters here did not give him many points, the important thing was that there were many monsters. Without the interference of other players, he could kill them with high efficiency. In the previous forest, the average number of kills per hour was 300. If there were many monsters in the area, he could reach 500. Of course, that was a rare situation. Like in the valley, Lorne could easily keep his kills at 500. This was because they were all ordinary monsters and were easier to kill. Previously, he had used the demonized beastmen to merge them. The final monster had 100,000 health points. It would take Aisha ten seconds to kill one. However, the attributes of the demonized monsters created by ordinary monsters were relatively poor. The average health was only about 60,000. With such health points, in the hands of Aisha, she only needed one combo attack to kill them. Therefore, Lorne could ensure that he had 1.5 million points per hour. His income had increased by 50%! Most importantly, he did not have to search for new areas. This valley penetrated the entire Titan Forest and covered a huge area. It was impossible for him to sweep through all of them in the event alone. … Ding! “The tool [Guild Establishment Token] that you’re selling has been sold for 28,500 gold coins!” “The tool [Guild Establishment Token] that you’re selling has been sold for 25,000 gold coins!” “The tool [Guild Establishment Token] that you’re selling has been sold for 21,800 gold coins!” “The tool [Guild Establishment Token] that you’re selling has been sold for 18,300 gold coins!” “…” Every hour thereafter, Lorne received such a transaction. Although it had been a while since the transaction time of the first Guild Establishment Token, in order to catch up to the progress of the other guilds, there were still people who were willing to spend a huge sum of money to buy it. As a result, Lorne made a killing. In just a few hours, he had earned more than a hundred thousand gold coins. And this number was still increasing crazily. By the time the day ended, he already had 415,000 gold coins on him. However, the final few Guild Establishment Tokens made Lorne very helpless. “The price of the founding gang really dropped quickly.” Lorne shook his head and sighed. Because there were too many Guild Establishment Tokens on the market, the subsequent transaction price was terrifyingly low. The price had fallen to about 10,000 since the seventh Guild Establishment Token. When it reached the tenth piece, the price dropped to 6,000 gold coins. It continued to drop. It stopped at the height of 5,000 gold coins. There were about ten Guild Establishment Tokens that were sold for 5,000 gold coins. It was all thanks to Lorne setting the initial bid of the auction was 5,000 gold coins. Otherwise, the price would have been even lower. “It should drop again tomorrow.” Lorne knew that this price would not last. According to his estimation, he would sell at most ten Guild Establishment Tokens tomorrow, and the price would drop to less than 4,000. 4,000 gold coins was equivalent to 12 million alliance dollars. This price was nearly 20 times lower than the first 200 million! It was a crazy speed. According to Lorne’s estimation yesterday, it would take at least 10,000 gold coins to barely avoid losses. The price of 4,000 gold coins could make him go bankrupt. Fortunately, the situation was different now. Even if it was 400 gold coins, Lorne still had money to earn. This was because he had created a monster now and could obtain 2940 points. Even if he accumulated a million points, he only needed 340 monsters. In total, it only cost 1,700 gold coins to create these monsters. Therefore, at his current position, he could still earn 3,300 gold coins on a Guild Establishment Token. This was a very generous amount of income. Of course, the premise was that the price could not drop anymore. Otherwise, his income in the next few days would definitely decrease. “There are a total of 22 Guild Establishment Tokens sold today. The total income is 225,000 gold coins. After deducting 45,000 gold coins, it’s a net profit of 180,000 gold coins!” “The target tomorrow is 20 Guild Establishment Tokens. The minimum price is 4,000.” “According to this base price, I can earn 40,000 gold coins in a day.” Lorne calculated. Although the difference between 180,000 and 40,000 was huge, as a solo player, it was still worth celebrating to earn 40,000 gold coins per day. After all, this was still worth more than 100 million alliance dollars. As for the next few days? The price of the Guild Establishment Token should still decrease. The lowest price Lorne would accept was 2000 gold coins. Although this price was very low, what could he do? In any case, Lorne had to earn this money. This was because after the event ended, he could obtain the [City Creation Token]. At that time, he would have to start building the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This was a true ‘Gold Devouring Behemoth’. Although there were hundreds of thousands of gold coins, when it was used, the speed of decrease was definitely faster than running water. Huff— Lorne exhaled. After looking at his gold coins savings, he went offline to rest. Such a high-intensity battle that lasted for more than ten hours consumed a lot of his mental energy. Lorne did not force himself. He washed up and fell asleep. … Seven hours later, Lorne woke up and logged into the game. He continued walking in the direction of the valley, using the same hunting method. After a day, Lorne gained a lot. However, the value of the Guild Establishment Token still decreased significantly. In the end, he barely guarded the target price of 4,000 gold coins. As for the total income? It was basically getting worse by the day. ———— [Day 3 of the Event]: 23 Guild Establishment Tokens sold. Sales total: 104,500 gold coins. The total income that day was 67,500 gold coins. [Day 4 of the Event]: 21 Guild Establishment Tokens sold. Sales total: 75,000 gold coins. The total income that day was 38,000 gold coins. [Day 5 of the Event]: 22 Guild Establishment Tokens sold. Sales total: 59,000 gold coins. The total income that day was 22,000 gold coins. [Day 6 of the Event]: 24 Guild Establishment Tokens sold. Sales total: 54,000 gold coins. The total income that day was 17,000 gold coins. ———— In the next few days, the prices decreased non-stop from 3,000 to 2,900 to 2,800 gold coins. Fortunately, the price lingered around 3,000 for a long time. Otherwise, the income for the next two days would have decreased. Lorne did not care much. He would earn as much as he could. Even if he could earn 300 gold coins in an hour, it was a very generous income. He maintained his hunting efficiency and worked hard. In the past few days, many things had happened in the Titan Forest. Several top players from large guilds had unlocked the Points Shop one after another. Because they had bought the Guild Establishment Token, their points were used to exchange for equipment. A million points was equivalent to a Platinum equipment! Therefore, their combined combat strength increased greatly, and their farming speed also increased significantly. But not long after, a new problem occurred. The number of demonized monsters was reaching its limit. Many players only barely killed one or two demonized beastmen in a few hours. This efficiency was at least ten times lower than before. “Brothers, does anyone know where the demonized monsters are?” “Requesting for the location of monsters!” “The demonized monsters of the Titan Forest have all been killed?” “I haven’t seen a demonized monster in three hours.” “Please give me a strong demonized beastman!” “I suspect that all the monsters have been killed by Tyrant!” On the forum, the players cursed crazily. Many people had not found their target monster for a long time. That was not surprising. After all, the Titan Forest was not very large. Not all monsters were demonized monsters. When faced with the joint effort of more than ten million players, there would definitely be a lack of resources. Moreover, too many guilds were active in the event. As everyone knew, large guilds had a very detestable behavior: “hoarding”. When these guilds discovered an area with good resources, they would choose to classify this area as their exclusive area. If other players intruded, they would be chased away or even killed. Therefore, the solo players did not have many areas to farm now. At this moment, they looked at a “glowing spot”. It was the Dragon One shop that belonged to Tyrant! Most of the players could no longer find the monsters, but in Tyrant’s shop, they were still selling the Guild Establishment Tokens crazily! One had to know that a Guild Establishment Token required a million points to exchange. As for the Guild Establishment Tokens auctioned by Tyrant, there were more than twenty pieces per day. It was equivalent to accumulating 20 million points per day! “This is too f*cking ridiculous!” “20 Guild Establishment Tokens a day? How did he do it?” “Tyrant must have killed all the monsters, leaving us no place to farm points!” “This evil Tyrant!” On the forum, the players cursed. Now, they all believed that it was Tyrant’s over-hunting that led to the event going dry after only reaching the sixth day. They had no place to farm points. After seeing these topics, Lorne could only shake his head. It really had nothing to do with him that these people could not kill the monsters. This was completely because there were too many players joining the event and due to the system restriction. This phenomenon also fully demonstrated the powerful use of the Monster Merging Simulator in this event. When no one could find the demonized monsters, Lorne could use his cheat to harvest points crazily. This was too awesome! … On the seventh day after the event began, Lorne continued farming in the valley. During this period of time, his points increased crazily. He earned 1.5 million points per hour. But at that moment, he encountered a special situation. The river valleys here were actually divided into two and extended in one direction. From where he stood, he could see that the riverbed had shrunk by half. The number of monsters gathered would probably be affected. Helpless, Lorne chose one of the directions. After traveling in this direction for a while, he realized that the number of monsters had decreased. At the end of the river ahead was a cliff. The river water would form a waterfall that fell dozens of meters below the mountain. Did any monsters exist at the bottom of the mountain? Lorne stepped forward to check the distribution of the monsters at the foot of the mountain. The next second, he was stunned. At the bottom of the mountain was a huge shallow swamp. There were countless “Giant Teeth Crocodiles” gathered inside. They were all lying in the swamp, revealing their long, stone-like heads. As for the quantity? It was impossible to count. Unfortunately, this was not a suitable place to farm monsters. Because below the mountain was a swamp, if players walked on it, they would definitely fall into the swamp. Moreover, these Giant Tooth Crocodiles were not easy to deal with. As Level 38 monsters, they were opponents that were very difficult to defeat for the current players. However, Lorne’s eyes lit up. He immediately came to a corner of the cliff and took out a pair of bracer from his bag. ———— [Spider Silk Bracer] Grade: Silver Attributes: None Special Effect: [Hanging]: Shoot out a spider thread and fix it at the target location. You can use the spider thread to hang in the air. Usage: 0 / 100. Level Requirement: 30 Introduction: … ———— This equipment had dropped a long time ago. Because of [Angel’s Wings], it had not been of use. Coupled with the fact that this equipment did not increase attributes, it naturally did not attract too much attention from Lorne. But now, it seemed that this equipment was simply made for this terrain. Lorne temporarily removed the Gold Bracer from his hand and activated the skill of the Spider Silk Bracer. Swish! A spider thread shot out from the wrist guard and struck the rock beneath him. Lorne tugged and found that it was very durable, so he jumped. With the help of the spider silk, he finally hung about ten meters in the air. The Giant Teeth Crocodiles in the swamp also noticed the intruders. They jumped up from the swamp and opened their bloody mouths, wanting to eat Lorne. Unfortunately, their mobility was limited, so they could not reach Lorne. “Little fellows, wait for me to merge you.” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up. He would not be in danger here, so he could modify the crocodiles with ease. However, before doing this, he still dealt with them using his pets. It was actually easy to kill these monsters. All he had to do was let Small Artillery stand on the cliff and deal damage remotely. However, this efficiency might be limited. After all, Small Artillery’s damage output was far inferior to Aisha. “Aisha, can you do anything here?” Lorne asked the lovely Elven Princess. “Yes.” Aisha nodded earnestly. With that answer, Lorne summoned her. Lorne had wanted to ask what the elf was going to do, but she shook off his hand and jumped down into the swamp. Aisha leaped gracefully in the air, her exquisite boots gently touching the head of the crocodile, like a dragonfly flying across a lake. It was a beautiful sight. The crazy crocodiles could not harm her at all. Instead, they were attacked by her when she landed. Fortunately, Aisha did not use her skill, or the crocodiles would not have had a chance to accept Lorne’s modification. <i>Slash— Slash— Slash—</i>  After Lorne finished merging the monsters, the dagger in Aisha’s hand fell, piercing through the monster’s head. -25,100 (Critical) -23,700 (Critical) -5445 -5445 -5445 Facing this group of Level 38 Giant Teeth Crocodiles, Aisha’s damage was between 60,000 and 100,000 per wave of attacks. These monsters only had 90,000 health points. If they were unlucky, they might even be killed by Aisha’s critical hits. These Giant Teeth Crocodiles were really unlucky. Before they could enjoy the feeling of being powerful, they lost their lives and sank into the swamp. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Ding! You have killed a Demonized Giant Teeth Crocodile. Points+4250!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” It could be seen that because of their high levels, the demonized Giant Teeth Crocodiles brought Lorne 4250 points. Although killing a monster would take longer, the increase in points alone gave Lorne a higher income. An hour later, all the Giant Teeth Crocodiles in this area were killed. Since coming here, Lorne had killed a total of 400 Giant Teeth Crocodiles and gained 1.85 million points. Coupled with the hundreds of thousands of points left on him, he could directly exchange for two Guild Establishment Tokens. However, this time, Lorne was not in a hurry to use these points. He opened the leaderboard. ———— First place: [Tyrant], Points: ??? Second place: [Thor], Points: 1,663,000. Third place: [Twinkle Rose], Points: 1,561,000. Fourth place: [Fire Beacon], Points: 1,559,000. … ———— The leaderboard was ranked based on the remaining points, so the representatives of the guilds did not spend their points. Because the big-busted sister had arrived early, she was now third. This was understandable. After all, she was a Warrior. In such an event, she was at a disadvantage. Moreover, [Thor] and [Fire Beacon] were high-level hidden classes. Their combat strength was extraordinary. With the big-busted sister’s current strength, it was indeed very rare for her to stabilize the top three. As for Lorne? He was in first place with a total of 2,160,000 points. However, he hid his points, so the other players could not see the accurate data. “Only the MVP player can obtain the City Creation Token. It should be related to this leaderboard, right?” Lorne did not know the system’s calculation method for the time being, so he decided to keep all his points for today and try to win the title of MVP as steadily as possible! While he was thinking, Lorne climbed up the cliff along the spider silk. After killing all the monsters here, he had to go to another area to repeat his actions and harvest the Giant Teeth Crocodiles in the swamp. … Ten hours later. In this cliff, Lorne had already killed thousands of monsters, and he had more than 20 million points. With that, the first place spot on the leaderboard was completely stabilized. Even if the players of the large guilds had any hidden methods in the end, they could not be higher than him. Therefore, Lorne decided to use the points he obtained to exchange for the Guild Establishment Tokens. Therefore, the auction began again. “Gosh! Why does Tyrant have more Guild Establishment Tokens?” “I’m f*cking dumbfounded!” “Isn’t this too strange?” “Who knows? He might really be exploiting a bug in the game.” “Everyone, I want Tyrant’s current coordinates in three minutes!” “I’ll give you a minute to come and taste my knuckle sandwich!” “...;” Seeing this scene, the group of players began to go crazy. Previously, Lorne’s continuous auction of the Guild Establishment Tokens had been questioned by them, but later, for some reason, there were no new goods in Dragon One for several hours, so they thought that Tyrant was also suffering from the pain of finding no monsters. Who knew that after ten hours of silence, the Dragon One shop actually took out a new Guild Establishment Token? This made people too jealous. … “Brother Tyrant, the sisters of the Silver Snow Guild are feeling so empty. Can you help us?” When she saw that the auction had begun again, Twinkle Rose immediately sent a message to Lorne. “I can help you, but my body only allows me to fight a hundred ladies alone.” Lorne sent a meaningful reply. “Tsk, you’re too arrogant!” Twinkle Rose smiled and continued, “To be honest, Brother Tyrant, have you found a new monster area?” “Um… what’s wrong?” “Can you give us a small area? The ladies of the Silver Snow Guild haven’t had any points for several hours.” Twinkle Rose was helpless. In fact, she did not want to make such a request. After all, map resources were extremely rare at this time. However, she wanted to maintain her points ranking. Now, Twinkle Rose was third, but her points had not changed for a long time. The fourth place Fire Beacon was slowly increasing. If she did not find a new monster, her third place would soon be replaced by the other party. This was a scene that she did not want to see. “It’s not that I don’t want to help you, but this place is not suitable for you. Even I have a hard time killing here. You’ll die if you fight these monsters.” Lorne tactfully rejected her request. After all, he was using the Monster Merging Simulator as an exploit, and no one could replicate it. “Alright, but I want to ask…” Twinkle Rose sighed and asked curiously, “What are your points on the leaderboard?” “Not much, just 20 million.” Hearing this, Twinkle Rose fell silent. Indeed, humans could not compare to others. Although that guy was alone, his total points were even more than her entire guild. It was simply beyond reality. ...;. Another ten hours passed. In the Titan Forest, an assassin player quickly found [Great Greedy Wolf], “Boss Greedy Wolf, our scouts have discovered Tyrant’s location!” They had been searching for Tyrant for the past few days, but for some reason, no matter how hard they searched the Titan Forest, there was no sign of him. Originally, Great Greedy Wolf was about to give up on this plan, but who knew that good news would come? “Where’s that kid?” Great Greedy Wolf asked excitedly. “In the dried river valley, our scouts saw that he had been lurking in that area. I don’t know what he was doing.” Hearing this, Great Greedy Wolf’s eyes widened. If Tyrant had been in that area, did that mean that was where he farmed points? Now, most players could not find the demonized monsters, and in order to compete for the ranking, the World Destruction Guild was searching for areas with demonized monsters. If he could obtain that place, wouldn’t it be a great achievement? “Has the scout player been exposed?” Great Greedy Wolf quickly asked. “I don’t think so.” The assassin player said, “He said that Tyrant’s bat pet is flying around the forest. He did not dare to get too close. During this period of time, he has only been staring at Tyrant’s location from afar.” “Yes, well done.” Great Greedy Wolf nodded, then excitedly pointed his sword in one direction, “Inform everyone to gather at the coordinates of the valley. I want to kill Tyrant today!” “Yes, Boss.” In the valley, on the cliff. After using the Spider Silk Bracer more than 20 times in this area, Lorne finally wiped out all the Giant Teeth Crocodiles at the bottom of the cliff. If he wanted to continue hunting monsters, he had to go to the center of the swamp. It was a forbidden zone that the players could not enter for the time being. He put away the Spider Silk Bracer and stood on the cliff to check his total harvest. He had gained a lot during this period of time. Although there were no other loot, he had obtained 1.8 million to 2 million points per hour. This was much more valuable than any other loot. After calculating everything, Lorne had hunted here for 20 hours. He had reserved all the points he had obtained in the first ten hours. The gains for the next ten hours were all used to buy the Guild Establishment Tokens. A total of 19 were sold. Because of the market problem, these Guild Establishment Tokens were all sold for 2,000 gold coins. After spending 1,700 gold coins, the net income was 5,700 gold coins, it was great. At this moment, the Long Tongue Bat suddenly flew back. “There are a large number of enemies?” Lorne frowned. He was not surprised, for the Long Tongue Bat had discovered other players around a long time ago. However, to his surprise, these guys dared to come and find trouble. Perhaps the number of people gave them confidence. After all, these guys had a total of 20,000 players. “These mosquitoes buzz around me every day. I should find time to teach them a lesson.” Lorne opened the map. There were dense red dots on it, completely covering the forest on both sides of the valley. These guys wanted to ambush him at the exit. After all, the bottom of the cliff was a swamp. In order to prevent him from jumping down and courting death, and to let the good equipment fall into the swamp, they did not rush to the edge of the cliff but chose to adventure in the forest on both sides of the valley. After all, that was the only way out and was more suitable for attacking the enemy. However, Lorne did not plan to attack this time. Killing these people was meaningless, and it was still within the event time. There were still four hours until the end of the event. With his hunting efficiency, it was very easy to accumulate another 4 million points. With that in mind, Lorne leaped into the swamp. … “Damn, why isn’t Tyrant out yet?” “He discovered us?” “It’s possible. He might have gone offline.” “I don’t think so. He’s been farming monsters nearby. He’s probably still farming.” “Then we can’t just wait here.” “Don’t worry. Someone checked on the mountain nearby. Tyrant has basically wiped out all the monsters.” In the forest, a group of well-equipped players was chatting. They were all members of a main army of the [World Destruction Guild]. There were a total of 20,000 of them, and there were hundreds of first-rate experts inside. With them leading the way, they were confident in killing even the number one player in the world, Lorne. Moreover, as long as the battle began, after Tyrant’s red name appeared, killing him would result in a Mythical equipment drop! Just thinking about it was exciting. “Boss, why don’t we call the other legions?” A higher-up of the army asked beside Great Greedy Wolf. “There’s no need. I’ve already contacted a few top experts. Coupled with the 20,000 troops of our army, when the time comes, even if Tyrant has wings, he can forget about flying out of our encirclement!” The Great Greedy Wolf smiled confidently. In his plan, Tyrant would be surrounded by 20,000 players. Thousands of Mages would attack from all directions, and more than a hundred first-rate experts would attack accurately. Even if Tyrant was invisible, he would be detected by the illumination bullets in the sky. With such powerful firepower, there was no need to ask the others to help. As long as he took down Tyrant this time, he could use this contribution to obtain the good impression of Young Master Speck. At that time, he would be promoted to a higher-up in the company in reality and become a Deputy Guild Leader below only one person in the game and above 100,000 subordinates! Thinking of this, Greedy Wolf beamed. However, just as he was feeling happy, an assassin player suddenly ran over to report. “Boss, bad news. That Tyrant seems to have discovered our ambush and flew away!” Pfft— Great Greedy Wolf nearly spat out blood. He had just said that even if Tyrant grew wings, he could not escape from his encirclement. In the end, this kid really grew wings! Unable to restrain his anger, he waved his hand, and tens of thousands of people rushed to the edge of the cliff. But it was too late. Above the forest outside the swamp in the distance, a guy with white wings fell into the forest. “Damn, this kid escaped!” Great Greedy Wolf clearly did not realize the seriousness of the problem. He thought that the other party had fled because he was afraid of the strength of his army. “Boss, don’t worry.” A player beside him said, “Although we did not capture Tyrant, we snatched his training ground. In the past ten hours, that kid sold 19 Guild Establishment Tokens. He probably farmed them here!” “Here?” Great Greedy Wolf glanced around and said, “These are all ordinary monsters. They won’t produce points.” “It’s because they won’t produce points, that’s why it’s important!” The player said, “Boss, think about it. The monsters here are all ordinary monsters, and the terrain is so dangerous. How could Tyrant obtain so many points here?” “Thinking about the strange things involving Tyrant, I have every reason to suspect that this is where Tyrant is exploiting a bug!” Hearing this explanation, Great Greedy Wolf nodded. This analysis was possible. If he could really find a way to recreate Tyrant’s exploit, he might be able to help the top players of the guild obtain second place on the leaderboard! “Very good. Immediately arrange for someone to explore according to Tyrant’s method. Explore all the areas on the cliff. We cannot let go of any area!” “Yes, Boss!” Under the command of Great Greedy Wolf, countless players used ropes to climb the cliff, hoping to find the bug and obtain a generous reward from the guild. Unfortunately, there was no such thing as a bug or exploit here. On the contrary, the surviving Giant Teeth Crocodiles attacked the players of the World Destruction Guild crazily. Therefore, everyone could see a group of players playing rock climbing at the edge of the cliff. Then, they were eaten by the crocodiles below. The scene was abnormally cruel and bloody. Half an hour later, Great Greedy Wolf left this nightmarish place with the remaining 15,000 members. Four hours later, Lorne stopped. The event was about to end. There was no need to find new monsters. He stood on the spot and checked the gold coins on him, finding that they had reached 5,652,000. This was a huge sum of money. If he sold it, he could earn at least 1.5 billion alliance dollars! Earning 1.5 billion in seven days meant earning more than 200 million per day. This should be on the same level as a world-class corporation. But that was not all that Lorne wanted. Wealth in reality was no longer his goal, what he wanted now was wealth in the game. Lorne had made up his mind. From today onwards, he would build a truly powerful city that belonged to him alone. This way, no matter what happened in the future, he could successfully deal with it! As he was thinking… Suddenly! A loud voice sounded in the sky! Ding! “Iron Skull City Announcement: Congratulations! After the relentless efforts of the adventurers, the monsters in the Titan Forest have been cleared. This event has officially ended!” Ding! “Congratulations to players [Tyrant], [Thor], [Fire Beacon], [Twinkle Rose], and others for successfully reaching the top ten of the leaderboard. They have received +1 Luck and the corresponding rewards!” Ding! “Congratulations to player [Tyrant] for becoming the top MVP player with 135,000,000 points. Additional rewards: Luck+4, Points+67.5 million, [Energy Shield] (Orange Skill Book) x1, [City Creation Token] (Legendary Item) x1!” Ding! “In order to thank the adventurers for their help, Iron Skull City has specially reduced the price of all conventional potions in the main city by 20% for 24 hours!” “Ding!” “Ding!” A series of notifications echoed for several minutes. All the players who belonged to Iron Skull City saw this announcement. When they saw the total points that Lorne had obtained, they were first stunned. “Strange, are my eyes playing tricks on me?” “This number seems weird.” “Have I gone blind from masturbating too many times? Why are there so many zeros?” “Let me count seriously. Ten, hundred, thousand, ten thousand, hundred thousand, million, ten million, hundred million!” The group of players thought that they were seeing things. However, after they counted it a few times, their eyes widened. “Damn, damn, damn!!” “135 million points, is this something a player can possibly obtain?” “The second player only has 1.8 million points but the number one player, Tyrant, actually has 135 million. There’s a difference of 75 times. This result is f*cking illogical!” “Look at my own data. 1,350 points. There’s a difference of 100,000 times between Tyrant and me.” “I’m dumbfounded.” “God Tyrant is awesome!!” … When the system notification finished, another shout immediately sounded in Iron Skull City. “Tyrant, congratulations on obtaining the glory of the MVP player and a large amount of rewards. However, as a solo player, you definitely don’t have such a huge need for the City Creation Token. Therefore, my ‘Blue-White Porcelain Guild’ is willing to pay 500 million alliance dollars to buy your City Creation Token.” It was from the guild leader of the Blue-White Porcelain Guild, [Blue-White Porcelain]. With that, the chat channel of Iron Skull City became lively. Previously, using 200 million to buy the Guild Establishment Token was already very ridiculous, but now, they actually used an even higher price to buy the City Creation Token! That was 500 million alliance dollars. It was real money. Even if ordinary people were given 100 lives, he would not be able to earn so much money! Of course, this was no longer tempting to Tyrant. After all, he had sold more than a hundred Guild Establishment Tokens in seven days. … Just as everyone was discussing, another shout sounded in the sky. “Tyrant, if you want to sell the City Creation Token, our Fire Beacon Guild is willing to pay 800 million alliance dollars to buy it directly and can satisfy some of your conditions in reality. Please consider it.” It was from the Guild Leader of the Fire Beacon Guild, [Fire Beacon]. This player who was known as the number one God of War in the game also had a financial group with a huge background behind him. This was a top financial group in the world. If Tyrant needed to do something in reality, they would definitely be able to provide huge help. Seeing the price instantly rise to 800 million, the other onlookers also looked at it enviously. This time, not only was the game forum bombarded, but even the major news platforms in reality were crazily reporting this matter. Not long after, the World Alliance’s official channel also temporarily broadcasted this event. To the World Alliance, today’s matter was definitely the best publicity. No one could ignore such a crazy deal. … Immediately after, another shout sounded throughout the city. “Tyrant, our ‘Divine Mage Guild’ is willing to pay 1 billion alliance dollars to buy it directly, and we can satisfy all your requests in reality!” It was from the Guild Leader of the Divine Mage Guild, [Thor]. As soon as he said this, the players watching the live stream all over the world became excited. In just a few seconds, the price had increased to 1 billion! This was ridiculous. … However, before the voice could stop, new shouts echoed in the air. “Tyrant, you had some conflict with our ‘Domination Guild’ previously, but you also snatched a big boss from us, which can be considered as canceling out the grudge. However, in view of our guild’s impoliteness towards you, I’m deeply sorry. In order to build our previous friendship, I can give you some gifts to apologize. If there’s anything you want, you can ask. I, Unparalleled Domination, will definitely not refuse!” “Finally, Brother Tyrant, if you want to sell the City Creation Token, I’m willing to pay 1.1 billion. As long as it’s within my ability, I can agree to any other request in reality.” “Brother, if you think about it carefully, please contact me. I can’t add you as a friend.” It was from the Guild Leader of the Domination Guild, [Unparalleled Domination]. Boom!!! This time, the players were excited again. Who did not know the grudge between Unparalleled Domination and Tyrant? At this time, the entire Earth knew about it. However, today, Unparalleled Domination actually took the initiative to apologize for the sake of the City Creation Token. He even spoke humbly and asked for the other party’s forgiveness. To be honest, this subverted the players’ world view, because in their eyes, Unparalleled Domination was a world-renowned “Bandit”. As long as one conflicted with his guild, they would suffer extremely fatal revenge. Moreover, this guy’s “encirclement” behavior was the most severe. He basically did whatever he want. He was a complete scoundrel! How could such a person apologize? “They want to buy the City Creation Token with a billion? What a joke.” Lorne was speechless at their offers. To be honest, to the current Lorne, not to mention a billion, even ten billion would not be able to tempt him to sell this City Creation Token. As he thought this, his friend list lit up. “Leader, you can’t sell this City Creation Token. It’s different from the Guild Establishment Token. The Guild Establishment Token can’t bring too substantial benefits. Unlike the City Creation Token, which is a tool used to build a territory, and the territory is a real property. As long as you build the territory in advance, you can definitely rely on this territory to earn countless funds in the future.” “Of course, building a territory requires a lot of money. Leader, you might not be able to support it alone, but it’s okay. I can help you. I can fully support you in the construction aspect. In the future, if the territory is built, you can just give me some business.” This was information from Super Rich. “Don’t worry, I, your leader, am not so shallow. Even if I want to sell it, I will definitely sell it to you. Not to mention a billion, even if it’s 10 billion, you will definitely not refuse, right?” Lorne asked with a meaningful smile. Super Rich smiled and nodded. As a businessman, he naturally understood the value of the City Creation Token. This City Creation Token was like the land title deed. As long as he obtained this, the returns in the future would be very terrifying. Especially in the new virtual world of “Divine Realm”, the value of this City Creation Token was extraordinary. Not to mention a billion, he was even willing to buy it for 10 billion or even 20 billion. However, the leader was not willing to sell it. Super Rich had long thought of this, so he was willing to invest in the construction. This way, he would indirectly become an investor and enjoy the dividends after success. Unfortunately, not only did the leader see through his thoughts, but he also rejected his request. “Although these hundreds of thousands of gold coins are indeed not enough, the early construction problems have basically been resolved. You no longer have a chance to invest in the territory.” “However, because the range of the main city is too large, internal construction still requires a large amount of funds. If you really want to join, I can hand a portion of the main city business to you to manage. What do you think?” Lorne suggested. With regards to the ownership of the main city, he would not let anyone interfere. However, the business in the city was different. As a huge main city, he needed to absorb enough merchants and let them work together to make the main city prosperous. “Alright, thank you, Leader. I will do my best.” Super Rich agreed excitedly. Although he did not become a shareholder of the territory, if the territory developed quickly enough, he could still obtain enough benefits as the largest partner. Most importantly, his relationship with the leader would increase even further. In the future, if he followed behind the leader, he would definitely be able to reach the top of the entire Divine Realm! … After chatting with Super Rich, the big-busted sister sent a private message. This beautiful guild leader also wanted to obtain the first City Creation Token in the world, but she had also guessed that Lorne would not sell it, so she only sent him a congratulatory message. Lorne chatted with her for a while, then took out the return scroll. The event in the Titan Forest had ended, so there was no point in staying here. He returned to Iron Skull City. Then, Lorne opened the bag. During the event earlier, he had obtained a lot of rewards. Now, he wanted to organize them. First was the greatest MVP reward in the announcement! This reward surprised Lorne, because not only was the most important [City Creation Token] rewarded, but there were also 67.5 million points. This was ridiculous. After all, the second player spent seven days but did not exceed 2 million points. In comparison, 67.5 million points was a dreamlike number. Lorne checked the relevant explanation and found that the points reward of the honorable players were calculated according to the total points of the players in the event. The value was 50% of the total points. According to the normal points of other players on the leaderboard, the system reward was only close to 1 million points. However, Lorne received an additional reward of 67.5 million points. This was indeed crazy. The system probably did not expect that someone would farm such a high score. If it were sentient, it would be like other ordinary players, stunned. … In addition to the points, the MVP player also got a skill book and +4 Luck as rewards. These two rewards were also extraordinary. Especially that skill book! As a skill with the ‘Orange’ characteristic, its quality was at least S-grade, and the skill effect was much assured. Most importantly, this skill was called ‘Energy Shield’. It seemed to be a magic skill! Lorne quickly checked the effect of the skill, but the next second, his pupils dilated. ———— [Energy Shield] (Orange) Effect: Use magic energy to create a shield that covers the entire body to block all incoming attacks. This shield can transfer all damage to MP. At the same time, the damage will be reduced by 30% when transferred. There is also a 20% chance of reflecting all damage taken. Duration: ??? Cooldown: None ———— This skill was powerful! Lorne was immediately excited. Although such a skill that treated MP as HP was very common for mages, the effect of this skill was simply too powerful. First of all, when this skill transferred damage, it would reduce the damage by 30%. This meant that the total durability of the shield had increased by 30%. In current defense-type skills, this was the limit of the damage reduction effect. Secondly, when transferring damage, this skill could reflect damage! This effect was a little rare. Especially the effect of countering all damage, it was considered top-notch among similar skills. Moreover, the probability of triggering it was astonishing 20%! In this game, if passive skills could have a trigger rate of 20%, it would definitely be considered ‘extremely rare’! “Use it.” There was nothing to say. He had to learn the skill first. Lorne immediately used the skill book. A skill icon immediately appeared in his skill list. He used it directly! Buzz— After activating it, a blue energy shield immediately appeared on Lorne’s body, like a bubble. This skill had no cooldown time or durability. How long it could last depended on how much MP he had left. In other words, he could keep using this skill indefinitely. As for the conspicuous skill effect? It would hide automatically. When he was not attacked, the shield would be invisible. But when attacked in any form, it would automatically appear and block the damage. This was awesome. In addition to the rewards for the MVP player, Lorne also obtained other rewards because he was “first on the leaderboard”. This included: Points+300,000, Reputation+10,000, one Platinum Equipment Treasure Chest. These rewards were very good, they were all real resources. Unfortunately, there were no experience points inside. Otherwise, Lorne could raise Aisha’s level to 30. This way, he could directly level up to 40. At present, Aisha was Level 23. If she wanted to reach Level 30, she needed at least 10 million experience points. If he used points to exchange for it, he needed 100 million points to complete the leveling up. As long as there was no problem with his brain, he would not do such a thing. Lorne did not use his points recklessly. Instead, he checked the Platinum Equipment Treasure Chest. To his surprise, the treasure chest did not specify the level. In other words, it would produce the corresponding equipment according to Lorne’s level. It just so happened that Lorne was only one step away from reaching Level 40. This Platinum equipment treasure chest could be opened with other treasure chests when he reached Level 40. Lorne put the treasure chest away. Then, he looked at the Points Shop. Now, he had 88.5 million points to exchange for all the items in the shop. “It’s not worth it to exchange for the Guild Establishment Token now, right?” Lorne pondered. As of now, he had sold more than a hundred Guild Establishment Tokens. All the large guilds and some medium-sized guilds in Iron Skull City had already registered their guilds. The remaining forces no longer valued the Guild Establishment Token. To these small guilds, there was no need to register a guild in advance, because they were still working hard for their levels. This was also the greatest reason why the price of the Guild Establishment Token had fallen too quickly recently. If Lorne exchanged for the Guild Establishment Token, its price would continue to decrease, and it might even drop by a thousand gold coins. 1,000 gold coins = 3 million alliance dollars. This price was too low. When the Dragon One shop was first established, that Gold equipment was auctioned for 340 gold coins. Although nearly half a month had passed and the price of the Gold-grade equipment had decreased greatly, this did not mean that the price of the Platinum-grade equipment would be affected. Now that the players were all close to Level 30, the equipment on them began to change to Silver-grade. Most of the top players changed into Gold-grade equipment. This was because there was a chance for a Silver Boss to drop a Gold-grade equipment. Coupled with the fact that the guilds were crazily looting the map, they relied on the huge number of players to kill many Silver Bosses and naturally obtained a lot of Gold-grade equipment. However, Platinum equipment was still at the top price. Unlike Gold equipment, Platinum equipment was only dropped from Bosses above Gold or by completing difficult missions. Therefore, at this stage, Platinum equipment was very expensive. As long as one was sold, it would definitely cause a huge commotion. In fact, according to the normal game progress, it was very difficult to obtain such high-level equipment at this time. Even for this event, its intention was not to let the players have Platinum equipment. This was an accident. Originally, the game system’s plan was to release a batch of Guild Establishment Tokens and gradually open the guild system. Due to Lorne, the Guild Establishment Tokens appeared in hundreds, disrupting the purpose of the event. It made the guild leaders who originally wanted to exchange for the Guild Establishment Token exchange for Platinum Equipment Treasure Chests, indirectly causing the game to progress faster. However, Lorne did not think that was bad news. The faster the progress of the game, the faster the players could come into contact with ‘virtual reality’. If the conspiracy theories about ‘Divine Realm’ on the Internet were true, ‘virtual reality’ was likely the only survival method for humans. Therefore, he did not care too much and directly exchanged for 50 Platinum Equipment Treasure Chests. Then, he exchanged for 20 Guild Establishment Tokens. These Guild Establishment Tokens were all auctioned in Dragon One. They could still be sold for about 1,500 gold coins. As for the Platinum Equipment Treasure Chests? It had other uses for Lorne. He would keep it for now. “There’s still 18.5 million points left!” Lorne looked at the other items in the Points Shop. Only the gems seemed to be worth something. If he wanted to be the strongest, he needed the Enchantment Gems and Blessing Gems. However, he had obtained a lot of these two types of gems when he killed the Boss-level monsters. After changing into the Level 40 Platinum equipment, he would slowly enhance them. Therefore, he did not have much need for these gems. Moreover, using points to exchange was not a good decision. After all, points could be exchanged for other rare items. For example, this treasure chest. At this moment, Lorne’s gaze stopped on a commodity. [Unknown Item Treasure Chest (Upgrade Possible) = 10,000 points] An item treasure chest that could be upgraded seemed interesting. Without thinking, Lorne exchanged for one. ———— [Unknown Item Treasure Chest] Quality: Normal Effect: You can obtain a special tool after using it. Status: Upgrade (100,000 points can raise the quality to ‘Elite’) Introduction: A mysterious item treasure chest. No one knows what’s hidden inside. ———— As everyone knew, in “Divine Realm”, the quality of items was divided into: Ordinary, Elite, Rare, Epic, Legendary, and Mythical. The quality of each tool could not be changed unless it was raised with special materials. The treasure chest in front of him could be upgraded with points. That made things much simpler. Without thinking, Lorne chose to upgrade it. Ding! “Congratulations on using 100,000 points to raise the quality of [Unknown Item Treasure Chest] to ‘Elite’!” The system notification sounded. At the same time, the treasure chest in front of Lorne changed greatly. The originally simple treasure chest became much more exquisite at this moment. There was even a faint light circulating on the surface. “100,000 for an upgrade? So cheap?” Lorne was surprised. However, when he checked this treasure chest again, the system notified him that he needed to spend a million points to upgrade. <i>Eh?</i>  Lorne was speechless. A million points was not a small amount. The top players on the leaderboard only had a total of a million points. If they chose to upgrade this treasure chest, they would spend everything at once. “A Rare item is not worth a million, right?” Lorne rubbed his chin. A million points was not a lot to him. However, he felt that it was too risky. This was because he did not know what the item in the treasure chest was. If it was a fragment material, then these points would be wasted. As for the cost? Rare-grade items were valued between Gold and Platinum equipment. The Platinum equipment here was worth a million points, so it was not a loss. Lorne thought he could try it. After all, he had already exchanged enough Platinum equipment and Guild Establishment Tokens. Even if he used these 18.5 million points to exchange for these things, it would not be of any use. It was better to try using these points. If he was lucky and obtained a special tool, he might even be able to accept an epic mission. With that in mind, Lorne finally made up his mind. He had to continue upgrading it. Ding! “Congratulations on using 1 million points to raise the quality of [Unknown Item Treasure Chest] to ‘Rare’!” With a flash of light, the quality of the treasure chest increased again. Lorne did not stop. Almost in the next second, he chose to continue. Ding! “Congratulations on using 10 million points to raise the quality of the [Unknown Item Treasure Chest] to ‘Epic’!” After confirming that it had evolved, the treasure chest in front of Lorne immediately changed. The tool chest turned from blue to purple and circulated with an exquisite and noble light. He opened it directly. A purple-gold light flashed, and a silver-white token appeared in the treasure chest. “Damn, could it be the Guild Establishment Token?” Lorne’s heart skipped a beat. But when he checked the tool information, he was pleasantly surprised. ———— [Ancient Lightning Token] Quality: Epic Effect: When you are close enough to the mysterious place with this item in your inventory, it will lead you to go in. Introduction: Entry token for the Land of Lightning. ———— This was a token to enter a special dungeon! Although he did not know what kind of dungeon it was, this token was an epic tool after all. He believed that the quality of that dungeon was definitely not low. In addition, the token gave Lorne a subtle hint of the location. It gave a direction by pointing north. In other words, as long as Lorne explored the north, he might be able to find the mysterious Land of Lightning. However, Lorne did not have the time. His priority now was to turn the Cold Desolate Dragon City into his territory and repair the main city. After doing this, he still had to go to the elves. He had two missions in the elves. One was about Aisha, and the other was the second phase of the Divine Radiance mission. These two missions were very rare. He had to complete them before he had time to do other things. With that in mind, Lorne quickly dealt with the remaining points. Then, he walked towards the City Lord area. … “Commander Rhett, I want to build a guild base in Iron Skull City.” At the edge of the City Lord area, Lorne found a special NPC. “Young adventurer, if you want to build a guild base, you need to obtain the City Creation Token given by the City Lord. Come and find me when you obtain the City Creation Token.” Hearing this, Lorne took out his City Creation Token. “It’s really the City Creation Token!” Commander Rhett looked at the City Creation Token in surprise, then looked at Lorne and laughed, “It seems that you are the adventurer who responded to the call of Iron Skull City and obtained excellent results in the crusade in the Titan Forest.” “Very good, adventurer. With this City Creation Token, you will have the right to build a main city in Iron Skull City.” With that, Commander Rhett showed Lorne a map of the region of Iron Skull City. This was the entire Iron Skull City. The entire range was very large. After all, this was a Grade 2 Main City’s management area. Lorne glanced at it and found that at the edge of the map, there was also a small area of the Elven Kingdom and the Gnome Kingdom. It was just outside the western border, where he would complete his mission later. “Adventurer, since you want to build your own guild base, you need to pay a certain amount of tax and land fees to Iron Skull City. Look at which area you like.” Commander Rhett activated a Recording Crystal and a panel appeared in front of Lorne. ———— [Iron Skull City’s Land for Rental] Barren Region: 100 gold coins per hectare. Mountainous Region: 1,000 gold coins per hectare. Plains Region: 10,000 gold coins per hectare. Danger Region: 100,000 gold coins per hectare. Resource Region: 1 million gold coins per hectare. Abundance Region: 10 million gold coins per hectare. ———— It could be seen that the prices were very expensive. Especially the Abundance Region at the end, the price was as high as 10 million gold coins per hectare. Moreover, this price needed to be paid once a year. In “Divine Realm”, although the land was rented, as long as one paid the rental fees on time, even Iron Skull City could not forcefully take back this land. Therefore, there was a huge advantage over real land. However, this price made even the tycoons want to cry. Now, one gold coin was about 2,500-3,000 alliance dollars. 10,000 gold coins was 30 million alliance dollars, and this could only rent a hectare of land in the plains. This was much more expensive than the land cost in the high-level Energy Zone. If he calculated using the range of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the entire area of the inner city was about 40,000 hectares. Because the region was close to the extreme north, it should be considered barren or mountainous. If calculated like this, the land fees that Lorne needed to pay should be between 4-40 million gold coins per year! If the outer city was calculated according to the scale on the blueprint, the total area would be 800 million hectares. Then, the cost would be 80 billion gold coins! Wasn’t this a joke? “Wait, why is the area so huge?” Lorne froze. Only then did he realize that the blueprint range of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was actually so huge. If he followed the entire blueprint, the entire outer city wall would probably envelop the entire Iron Skull City, and the total area would even reach a third of the Empire. This was clearly different from the range he had seen. Although the city he had seen in the Cold Desolate Dragon City was indeed very grand, it was still far from the data indicated on the blueprint. After all, no matter what, it was impossible to reach such a wide area. Lorne checked the map and quickly realized something. The city wall and the city itself were in the wrong place. In the design of the first Dragon of Light, Cold Desolate Dragon City was located at the northern border. It was both a fortress and an internal city. It was equivalent to guarding the border between the Empire and the Abyss. The range of this fortress city was up to 30 kilometers in length, and up to 28 kilometers in width. The total area was 40,000 hectares, and the total length of the surrounding city wall was 160 kilometers. The city that Lorne had seen in the Lake of Death was also this size. Of the 160-kilometer city wall, 60 kilometers had collapsed. But at the time, Lorne had thought it was 16,000 kilometers! This number was actually the total length of the outer city wall. When the first Dragon of Light designed this blueprint, it was not only planned to build [Cold Desolate Dragon City], but it was also planned to build [Dragon’s Kingdom]. This “Dragon’s Kingdom” had an even larger city and an extremely long large city wall. It was prepared to envelop the entire territory controlled by the dragons. Therefore, the total length of this city wall was 16,000 kilometers, and the total area was an astonishing 800 million hectares. “No wonder I kept finding it strange…” At that time, Lorne had a feeling that something was wrong. If the collapsed part was 6,000 kilometers long, he would definitely not be able to repair it. At the very least, he could not do it with the funds he had accumulated. But if it was 60 kilometers, there was still hope. With the materials in the city, it was enough to repair the collapsed area of 60 kilometers. However, what was worth mentioning was that the wall was not actually the inner city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. The huge city wall in the Cold Desolate Dragon City was actually a part of the outer city wall. Back then, because of the geological change, the outer city wall had pushed down the inner city wall. The pile of rocks that he saw back then were actually building materials left behind from the collapse of the inner city wall. “The outer city wall is 70 meters thick, 50 meters high, and 55 meters wide.” “The inner city wall is 60 meters thick, 40 meters high, and 48 meters wide.” “Now that the northern city wall has been replaced by the outer city wall, why don’t we also expand the other city walls to 70 meters thick?” Lorne thought. At this moment, Rhett said, “Adventurer? Have you chosen?” “Just now, I checked all the surrounding areas that could be chosen. Why is this area so strange?” Regaining his senses, Lorne pointed at a black area on the map. Previously, he had always been curious. There were corresponding prices in the available areas of other places, but only this area was pitch-black and the price was also ‘zero’! “Adventurer, the ruins of the war is a cursed land, especially the region you’re referring to. Its location is too close to the Lake of Death. As an adventurer, you might not know this, but the Lake of Death is a neutral faction. Although it’s in the territory of Iron Skull City, it’s independent and is in a balanced position with Iron Skull City. In order to avoid conflict, the people of Iron Skull City basically won’t go to that area, much less build a camp there.” “Therefore, young adventurer, I advise you not to waste your precious opportunity. Although that area does not need any gold coins, the main city built there will also be cursed and turn into a cursed city. Moreover, it is very likely to be mercilessly destroyed by the monsters. The abandoned expeditionary army camp is a lesson!” Commander Rhett explained earnestly. “I’m not afraid of curses. I’m afraid of being poor.” Lorne pointed at the edge of the Lake of Death and said, “Commander Rhett, I want to build a guild base here.” “Are you sure?” “Yes.” Lorne nodded. “Alright.” Commander Rhett sighed and said solemnly, “Since you have already decided, I won’t say anything. However, seeing that you have made such a contribution to Iron Skull City, let me give you a piece of advice. If you want to build your own territory in the ruins of the war, I think you need a Purification Crystal that can cleanse the target area. This way, you can eliminate the curse and move freely in that area.” “Purification Crystal? Are we going to the Blacksmith Guild?” The curse that Rhett had mentioned should be the undead aura in the ruins of the war. This negative buff could only be removed by the Purification Crystal or the antidote. “No.” Commander Rhett shook his head and said, “The Purification Crystal made by the Blacksmith Guild is too limited. If you want a Purification Crystal that can purify the entire area, you have to go to the Gnome Mineral Company and let them specially forge a Giant Purification Crystal for you.” “If you can do this, the expeditionary army of Iron Skull City will have a place to rest and save the time needed to go to the ruins of the war from Iron Skull City. In this way, the army of Iron Skull City can sweep through the ruins of the war on a large scale and completely cleanse the forest occupied by the undead!” “I think so too. After all, that’s the area closest to the border in the north. As long as we don’t wipe it out, it will bring great trouble in the future when there’s a war.” Lorne quickly said righteously. “That’s right!” Commander Rhett looked at Lorne in relief, “Sweeping through the ruins of the war has always been the goal of Iron Skull City, but due to the many battles at the border, the various legions are unable to leave. After so many years, we have not been able to completely clear out that area. This has always worried me.” “I did not expect you to have such ambition to develop your strength in that dangerous place. This is courage that even the generals of Iron Skull City do not have.” “In that case, as the commander of Iron Skull City, I will support your every move. As long as you can cleanse the area and build the teleportation circle as soon as possible, I will send the army of Iron Skull City to help you quickly expand the city!” Ding! “Game Announcement: Commander of the Iron Skull City Army, Rhett, hereby assigns you a special mission: [Construction of the Guild Base]!” “Mission details: Iron Skull City has the intention to sweep through the ruins of the war, but due to the long journey and the tense situation of the war, it has been unable to attack with all its might. Therefore, Commander-in-chief of the Iron Skull City Army, Rhett, hopes that you can build a city in the ruins of the war and complete the construction of the teleportation circle as soon as possible. After completing this mission, Rhett will use the army in Iron Skull City and provide some help in the construction materials to help you quickly expand the city.” “Attention! Because your territory is in the ruins of the war, the city you build does not have to pay the land fees to Iron Skull City, regardless of its size!” This mission was too suitable for Lorne. Currently, the Cold Desolate Dragon City was in a state of ruins. It required a large amount of manpower and resources to rebuild this city that had been silent for tens of thousands of years. Lorne immediately accepted the mission and brought the activated City Creation Token to the teleportation array. Teleport! Gnome Mountain Range! With a flash of light, Lorne reached the familiar place. Right now, the Cold Desolate Dragon City was in his grasp, but before it was converted into his territory, he had to cleanse the region near the city. It was time to shine light upon the map that was polluted by the aura of the undead. In addition, he had other things to find Tully for. The progress of mining in the ruins of the war needed to be explained by Tully. Also, in the Blacksmith Guild, Barres had said that the necklace on him was a former divine equipment, which made him very curious. … At this moment, in the high-level conference room of the Gnome Mineral Company. “Grandpa, did you really agree to that human adventurer?” The Gnome NPC, Turado, looked at his grandfather Tully in shock. He did not expect that as the regional manager of the Iron Skull City branch of the Gnome Mineral Company, his own grandfather would choose to give up his position in the company and follow a human adventurer. It was unbelievable. “Don’t be surprised, Turado. I’ve thought about it carefully.” Tully smiled. “But I don’t understand your decision. I don’t think the family will understand either.” “It’s normal that you don’t understand. This is also because you haven’t come into contact with that man.” Tully said seriously, “Originally, I also wanted to reject his suggestion. Even in the days after I agreed to it, I was still struggling. But now, it’s different. I completely believe that if we follow that gentleman, we will have a better future.” “I still don’t understand. Although the blueprint of [Dragon’s Kingdom] is rare, our gnomes also have a portion of it. We have also seen the blueprint mastered by other races and used it as a foundation to obtain our current construction and design technology.” “These technologies have been refined for thousands of years and have long become knowledge that is suitable for us gnomes. Even if that adventurer has the complete blueprint of the Dragon Kingdom, I still don’t think it’s worth it for you to give up everything, let alone all the businesses of the family.” Turado still shook his head. Although the blueprint of the Dragon Kingdom was a priceless treasure, the gnomes had already obtained enough wisdom from it. Now that these ‘wisdoms’ had not completely developed, there was no need to blindly pursue a higher level. That would only affect their current progress and they would lose the family business that they had accumulated for a thousand years. It was not worth it. “My dear Turado, your concerns are unnecessary, I don’t plan to change the direction of the family’s development. You and your father, Tumeng, will continue to develop the company along with the family.” “I’m already old. The family does not lack my power, so in the final light of my life, I want to explore another path. The map of the Dragon Kingdom is just one of the factors.” With that, Tully looked at his grandson, Turado, and asked, “Did you read the book that you gave me just now?” “Yes.” Turado nodded and picked up the book on the table. His palm touched the name on it—”Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs”. “This is a book filled with wisdom. It records the characteristics of all herbs in detail, and even the hidden effects of the herbs are recorded in detail. I never thought that I would be lucky enough to read this book. It gave me endless knowledge and also made me more familiar with the world of herbs.” “Grandpa, perhaps you don’t know, but it was because I accidentally obtained this book from a human businessman that I suppressed my opponent in the company’s bidding and successfully seized the opportunity to obtain the recognition of the manager.” Turado looked at the book in his hand and became more and more excited. At this moment, Tully asked, “Do you know the origin of this book?” “Yes, it was edited by two alchemy masters from the Human Empire.” “Moreover, I also know that an alchemist master named Doge is in Iron Skull City. In fact, this is also the main reason why I came here. I want to go to Iron Skull City to meet this Master Doge and ask about Mr. Tyrant who is only willing to reveal his pen name. Most of the contents of this book were contributed by him. He must be an extraordinary expert.” Turado said fervently. “He’s indeed extraordinary!” Tully laughed. “My dear Turado, you’re right. But there’s something I need to correct you about. That’s the name of this Mr. Tyrant. Tyrant is not his pen name, but his real name.” “Grandpa, do you know this master?!” Turado was pleasantly surprised. In order to meet Mr. Tyrant, he had specially come to the northern border from the Gnome Kingdom. He only hoped to see this extraordinary master with his own eyes. It was best if he could obtain some wisdom from a conversation with him. “Of course.” Tully nodded and smiled, “Not only do I know this Master Tyrant, but I also work closely with him. Remember the order I took half a month ago?” “Yes, Grandpa. Although you are old, your business ability is much better than other regional managers. Half a month ago, you obtained a cooperation project for 100 mineral veins and obtained 50% of the profits, directly breaking the highest record in recent years.” “That’s right, that’s true.” Tully said, “However, this is not because I am good at making deals, but because Mr. Tyrant found me and offered to cooperate, giving us 50% of the profits.” 100 mineral veins was not a small number, which was equivalent to the quarterly business of a regional company. Moreover, these mineral veins could be mined at the same time and obtain the greatest benefits in the shortest time. It was also because of this that Tully’s performance was outstanding. “I see.” Turado nodded repeatedly and said, “Looks like this Mr. Tyrant is really our family’s benefactor. It’s because of his help that Grandfather can obtain the best performance. I also obtained a new project and even obtained the recognition of the manager.” “Grandpa, can you help me introduce Mr. Tyrant? I want to express my gratitude to him.” “Don’t worry, Turado. Wait for me to explain the details of Mr. Tyrant.” “Is there anything else about Mr. Tyrant?” “Of course.” “If I tell you that Mr. Tyrant is the one who wants to take me in, would you believe me?” “What?!!!” Turado jumped up from his seat, his expression one of shock. This news was like a bolt from the blue, blasting his brain open. Mr. Tyrant! He was actually the one who wanted to recruit Grandpa? Turado felt like he was dreaming, because to his knowledge, Master Tyrant was the most knowledgeable person in the world. However, according to his grandfather, this adventurer was only a young human who had not even reached the Earth Realm! How could he have such astonishing knowledge! This was unbelievable. “Grandpa, is what you said true?” Turado quickly asked. This news was so shocking that he still could not believe what he had heard. “Of course.” Tully said, “At first, I was also suspicious of Mr. Tyrant, but later, his actions completely convinced me.” “While traveling with him on the airship, Mr. Tyrant said that what he wanted to do was to make the Kingdom of the Dragon truly appear in this world and make it an absolute free country. In this city, he could make the lives of all races exist together. There would be no struggle or discrimination. There would only be the light of peace that enveloped everyone in the city.” “Moreover, he once said that he wanted to have his own territory within a month. At that time, I will fulfill my promise and lead my team to join his territory.” “However, a month’s time is too short. I think even Mr. Tyrant can only build a small village at most. But it doesn’t matter. I like this process of creating with my own hands, just like how I’ve developed my family to reach this stage.” Tully said. Originally, he had many requests for Tyrant. However, ever since he saw the “Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs” that Turado had brought, he became more and more determined to follow in the footsteps of that adventurer, no matter the environment. ….. At this moment, Lorne arrived at the Gnome Mineral Company. After revealing his identity, the gnome who recorded his identity immediately became extremely respectful. Under his lead, Lorne quickly saw Tully. There was a young gnome beside him who was looking at him with extreme reverence. “Mr. Tyrant, we meet again.” Tully greeted him and introduced the young gnome beside him, “This is my grandson, Turado. He respects you very much. He came here to visit you.” “Yes, Mr. Tyrant. Your actions have benefited me greatly, so I came here specially to thank you in person. This is a small token of my appreciation. I hope you don’t mind.” The young gnome, Turado, took out a special crystal card and said, “This is a crystal card that belongs to our gnomes alone. Only those who we think are the most important will be given it. As a high-level crystal card of the gnomes, you can use this crystal card to go to any Gnome Mineral Company in the future and receive a 10% discount. You also have the right to buy Level 1 confidential equipment.” Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the Gnome NPC, Turado’s gift: Crystal Card!” This crystal card represented status. Only when one was highly approved by a high-level gnome could they have such a crystal card. Lorne did not stand on ceremony and accepted it happily. Then, he looked at Tully and said, “Manager Tully, I want a Purification Crystal with a large radius and will need it soon. Can you help me make it?” “Sure, but how large must the Purification Crystal be, Mr. Tyrant?” “The radiation range must exceed 100,000 hectares!” “100,000 hectares?!” Tully was stunned, as if he did not expect Lorne’s request to be so demanding. 100,000 hectares was a large area, as large as a Level 3 main city. Beside him, Turado was also stunned. This was the first time he had heard that someone needed a Purification Crystal with a radius of more than 100,000 hectares. This was unbelievable. Next to him, Turado recovered first and explained seriously, “Mr. Tyrant, with the level of gnome production, we can create such a Purification Crystal. However, because the radiation range is too huge, ordinary energy crystals cannot support such consumption. We have to use a complete Dragon Crystal as the core energy source.” Although he thought highly of Mr. Tyrant, the Dragon’s Gem was too rare. It was probably very difficult for him to have such a treasure. “Is this enough?” Lorne took out a Water Dragon Crystal the size of a basketball from his bag. It was pure and glowing. “Heavens! It’s really a complete Dragon Crystal!” Turado was so shocked that his eyes were round. He carefully observed the gem and confirmed again and again that it was indeed a complete Dragon Crystal of high quality. Tully was only slightly surprised, but he quickly calmed down. After all, he had obtained a Dragon Crystal from Lorne previously, so he was not that surprised. “The Dragon Crystal is the core of the energy source. With this, the other parts are simple. However, to refine such a high quality Purification Crystal, we need to use our gnome’s divine equipment. However, with your current status, Mr. Tyrant, you can’t make the Gnome Mineral Company do this.” No way, they were saying this now? Lorne did not expect the gnomes to need a divine tool to create an Energy Crystal! This was beyond his expectations. What surprised him even more was that with his current identity, he was not qualified to let the Gnome Company use this divine equipment. Was the cooperation of the 100 mines fake? “However, Mr. Tyrant, there’s no need to be anxious. Although you are not qualified to do this, my family can use our authority to make an exception and act as your guarantor.” Tully helped Lorne solve his urgent problem at a critical moment, and he even emphasized that this was through the help of his family. The meaning was obvious: to build a good relationship between the family and Lorne. That did not matter to Lorne. It was beneficial to maintain a good relationship with the gnomes. This was because his main city needed to undergo a very long process of construction. There would be many transactions with the gnomes during this period, especially in terms of technology. In addition, there was also the technology aspect. Lorne was very interested in their gnome technology. If there was a chance in the future, he might choose to develop technology with them. “Thank you very much for your help. It just so happens that I still have something that I need to use your divine equipment for. I’ll settle this once and for all.” “What is it?” Tully wondered. “I have a relatively special equipment. It seems to be a divine equipment that has lost its energy. Perhaps you can help awaken its power.” With that, Lorne took out the [Ghost Shadow Necklace] from his bag. This equipment was dropped by the Dark Faction player called ‘Bloodthirsty’. The quality of this equipment was Diamond-grade, but it did not have any attributes. Clearly, it was not normal. Coupled with the fact that Barres had said so confidently, Lorne did have high hopes for it, because this equipment was materialized and could be brought to reality. If the skill effect could be improved, it would be even more valuable. “This equipment…” Tully looked at the necklace in front of him and frowned, as if he could not determine its quality. It was not until more than ten seconds later that he nodded firmly and said, “Mr. Tyrant, if my appraisal is correct, this is indeed a Mythical equipment. However, the internal divinity has been greatly damaged, so it’s very difficult to repair. If we use our [Earth Hammer], there’s a chance to recover some of its attributes.” “Of course, repairing a divine equipment requires energy. You will have to bear the cost yourself, Mr. Tyrant.” The gnome’s divine equipment did not belong to Tully alone, so he could not let the divine equipment transfer energy to the Ghost Shadow Necklace for free. Of course, Lorne understood that. However, how much energy did it take to repair the divine equipment? Was it another astronomical figure? Heart racing, Lorne looked at Tully and asked, “How many resources do you need?” “Oh, about five million Gnome Reputation Points, or a complete Dragon Crystal.” 5 million?! When he heard this price, Lorne wanted to blow up. The reputation of the gnomes was the most precious currency in their race, and five million reputation points was a terrifying figure. He remembered that the first time he came to the Gnome Mineral Company, 6,000 pearls at the bottom of the lake had only exchanged for 3 million gnome reputation points. Coupled with the Fire Crystal, it was only 3.5 million. Moreover, these materials were already sold. If he wanted to exchange for it now, he could only use the Dragon Race’s Night Pearl in his bag. As for the Dragon Crystal? Lorne still had a Dragon Crystal that was missing a fragment. If he used this to trade with the other party, he believed that he could move the other party. However, he did not want to waste this Dragon Crystal. After all, the Dragon Crystal was so special. What if he had to use it elsewhere? After some thought, Lorne chose the Dragon Race’s Night Pearl. This was a luxury item exclusive to the dragons, and its price should be higher than the pearl at the bottom of the lake. … “Mr. Tully, look at these two items. How much reputation can they deduct?” As he thought, Lorne took out a Dragon Race Night Pearl and placed it on the table. “This… this is?!” When they saw such a treasure, Tully and Turado’s eyes immediately lit up. Tully said excitedly, “Mr. Tyrant, I didn’t expect you to have such a rare luxury item. It’s too unexpected.” Beside him, Turado added, “This is a Night Pearl unique to the dragons. It’s simply a perfect work of art. If we can collect a pile of such gems, I believe we can exchange them for sufficiently rare items from the hands of the dragons.” Clearly, the value of the Dragon Race’s Night Pearl was extraordinary. As for how much it was worth? Tully explained, “Mr. Tyrant, if you want to exchange such a rare luxury item, we can give you 1,500 reputation points per pearl!” Damn! It was so valuable! Lorne was surprised. The price of the pearl at the bottom of the lake was only 500 reputation points, but the Dragon Race’s Night Pearl was worth 1,500 reputation points! It seemed that he had good foresight to have Walter give him the Night Pearls. “Then help me repair this equipment.” Lorne directly took out 10,000 Dragon Race’s Night Pearls and exchanged for 15 million gnome reputation points. First of all, using the divine equipment twice required 5 million Gnome Reputation points each. The total cost was 10 million! In order to maintain the relationship between the two, Tully gave Lorne another 8% discount, the largest discount possible in the Gnome Mineral Company. After that, the price was 8 million reputation points. Lorne directly paid 8 million reputation points. “It is a pleasure working with you, Mr. Tyrant.” Tully smiled. Although he would be leaving soon, he was still happy to obtain such a result before he left. “Your generosity is beyond my expectations.” The young Gnome, Turado, looked at everything in shock. This was 10 million reputation points! The total value of this single unit was equivalent to the monthly sales of a Gnome Mineral Company in the periphery. Moreover, he was so generous when he paid. It was unbelievable. Lorne asked, “Manager Tully, how long will it take to refine the Purification Crystal and repair the equipment?” “It might take a day to refine the Purification Crystal, and it will take about an hour to repair the equipment. I plan to repair the equipment first and arrange for people to focus on refining the Purification Crystal. What do you think?” “Let’s go according to your plan.” “Alright, please follow me.” With that, Tully led Lorne to a strange workshop. Unlike the Blacksmith Guild in Iron Skull City, the gnomes’ workshops were filled with mechanical gears and pipes, filled with steampunk style. “Mr. Tyrant, please rest here. The repair will be completed soon.” “Turado, accompany Mr. Tyrant.” With that, Tully led the way into the unique workshop. … Seeing that Lorne was worried, Turado explained, “Mr. Tyrant, there will be no problems when we use our Earth Hammer to repair the equipment. Moreover, as a forging divine equipment, the Earth Hammer has incredible power. It can completely give this equipment new life.” “I hope so.” Although he said that, Lorne’s heart still skipped a beat. This time, he was not forging a Silver Set. The Ghost Shadow Necklace was a former divine equipment, and this equipment had already been materialized in real life. If it was destroyed, the result would be even more painful than digging out Lorne’s flesh. Gnome Workshop. Tully stood in the room filled with surging heat waves, filled with gears and furnaces. He threw the [Ghost Shadow Necklace] into the furnace and let it burn in the surging flames. The surrounding fiery red magic circles were glowing. Hot fire elemental energy was poured into the furnace and began to smelt the equipment inside. Ten minutes later, the Ghost Shadow Necklace was burning red, but it did not change at all, as if it had only turned red. Tully did not pick up the huge hammer like the other blacksmiths did. Instead, he threw the necklace onto a platform. From below, he could see an incomparably huge mechanical equipment, like an old pressure machine. However, these machines were all engraved with special runes. They looked rough and were filled with a mysterious aura. Tully put the necklace away and took out a pile of special energy crystals. He placed them in the notch beside him and went far away. He pressed the button on the operating table. The next moment, the machine roared. All the runes gradually lit up. The machine was like a sleeping beast that was waking up and letting out a low roar. Boom! The huge machinery began to rumble. Then, red steam spewed out from the pipe like flames. Even the ground began to tremble. But to the gnomes, this was as familiar as eating and drinking. Only Lorne walked alone in the waiting room, feeling uneasy. Ten minutes later! Half an hour later! An hour later! When an hour passed, a red light suddenly rushed out of the forging room. This light beam shot into the sky, as if telling someone its location. At this moment, the phantom of a huge forging hammer suddenly appeared in the sky. It was like the World Destruction Divine Hammer, and its size was so huge that it covered the entire gnome building. Fortunately, it did not smash down. Instead, it descended from the sky and followed the red light into the building. Boom!!! A shocking sound sounded. With a deafening sound, the ground trembled. The people in the building could clearly sense that this place seemed to have suffered a powerful earthquake. Lorne became even more nervous. In his ears, this sound was more like the sound of equipment exploding. Next to him, Turado quickly explained, “Mr. Tyrant, don’t worry. This is the power of the Earth Hammer. I believe it will end soon.” Just as he finished speaking, the forging room exploded again. It could be seen that as the giant hammer phantom poured into the equipment, the entire equipment became very different. The hammer was like a cannonball that instantly hit the equipment and crystals. In the next second, the equipment turned into an iron embryo, and the crystals turned into powder. At the same time, the crystal powder was absorbed by the ‘Earth Hammer’ and poured into the equipment under the second hit of the forging hammer. Surprisingly, the equipment that had turned into an iron embryo had returned to its original appearance. Moreover, under the infusion of the crystal’s energy, the light it emitted became increasingly brilliant. At the same time, a pleasant reminder sounded in Lorne’s ear. Ding! “Congratulations to your equipment [Ghost Shadow Necklace] (Diamond). After being tempered by the Earth Hammer, it has successfully awakened its divinity and evolved into the [Ghost Deity Necklace] (Mythical)!” Success!!! Lorne looked at the forging room in surprise. Although he had not seen the attributes of the equipment, the system notification had clearly told him that his equipment had been repaired. Moreover, the quality of the equipment was the highest level, “Mythical”, not “Demigod”. “Congratulations, Mr. Tyrant.” Turado also congratulated him happily, “The forging is successful. I believe the final product will definitely satisfy you.” “Yes.” Lorne nodded. As he spoke, the door of the forging room opened. Tully rushed out excitedly. Unlike when he had entered, this old gnome’s face was covered in dust. Most of his clothes had been burned, as if he had escaped from a fire. In his hand, there was a golden-red light. “Mr. Tyrant, it’s successful. The equipment has been repaired!” Tully did not care about his embarrassment. Instead, he looked at the necklace in his hand with fervent eyes and smiled excitedly, “Mr. Tyrant, this equipment is indeed a former divine equipment. The energy transmitted by the Hammer of the Earth has restored its divinity. Although it has not been completely repaired, it has regained powerful strength.” With that, he reluctantly handed the equipment to Lorne. Buzz— As soon as he took the equipment, Lorne felt himself sublimate. Just like when he had obtained [Angel’s Wings], the energy of the Mythical equipment swept through his entire body. Black and red energy spread from Lorne’s body. From afar, he could see a ghost deity hidden in the darkness staring at the world with murderous red eyes, as if it was the God of Slaughter of this world. Lorne looked at his body. He could also sense a desire to kill. But now was not the time to care about that. Lorne calmed himself down and immediately opened the panel of this equipment. ———— Equipment: [Ghost Deity Necklace] Grade: Mythical (Fragment) Constitution: 2 x Level Intelligence: 2 x Level Strength: 2 x Level Spirit: 2 x Level Agility: 2 x Level Special Effect: Destruction Strike: When exiting stealth, deal 50% additional damage to the target. Special Effect: Natural Assassin: Enters stealth mode and receives a 30% movement speed bonus. Special Effect: Enhanced Stealth: Increase stealth duration by three times. Special Effect: Shadow Stealth: Enters the Shadow Stealth state. Negative Perception Points will be increased by 100%. You can attack in the invisible stealth state. During this period of time, the invisibility effect will not be removed. Under this state, 50 MP will be consumed per second. When the MP is completely depleted, the invisibility state will be removed. (When the level difference is too great or when one is injured severely, the invisibility state will be broken.) Special Effect: Additional Mythical Active Skill [Ghost Deity’s Descent]. Type: Necklace Level: None Introduction: … ———— Active Skill: [Ghost Deity’s Descent] Status Description: After activating this effect, you will transform into a ghost deity and wander in absolute darkness. You will obtain absolute invisibility and will not be discovered. Under certain special conditions, you can even deceive the eyes of gods. Note: To maintain this effect, consume 1 point of Divine Power every second. Effect 1: Under this effect, you will obtain absolute invisibility and will not be detected by any target. Effect 2: Under this effect, your attack damage will be increased by 100%. Effect 3: Under this effect, your movement speed will be increased by 300%. Effect 4: Under this effect, your critical strike effect will be increased by 300%. Effect 5: Under this effect, you will obtain a 50% dodging chance and will be directly immune to all ordinary negative magic effects (skills below and at Grade B). You will be highly resistant to high-level negative magic effects (skills above Grade B). Effect 6: Under this effect, your hunt will be ‘anonymous’. The target will not know the name of the attacker and you can chat anonymously. ———— Seeing this effect, Lorne was stunned. Originally, the Ghost Shadow Necklace would not have additional attributes, but after evolving into the [Ghost Deity Necklace], it gave him additional attributes of (2 x Level). The value of this was obvious to all players. Then, there were the special effects. The first few special effects of this equipment were identical to the Ghost Shadow Necklace. However, it had a new special effect. It was a skill with the same nature as [Angel’s Descent], [Ghost Deity’s Descent]! After activating this effect, Lorne would directly obtain the ‘Absolute Invisibility’ effect. During this effect, he would not be detected by anyone and would not be exposed by any invisibility removal skill. Moreover, in this state, his movement speed would increase by 300%, the damage would increase by 100%, and the critical strike effect would increase by 300%! This effect was very similar to the Angel state. However, the subsequent immunity damage was different. In the Angel state, Lorne was immune to 50% of the damage, but in the Ghost Deity state, he had a chance of dodging instead. Immunity to damage required one to withstand a portion of the damage, and dodging would prevent him from taking damage completely. Of course, considering the probability, the difference between the two was not huge. The remaining immunities were the same. However, [Angel’s Descent] only had five effects, while [Ghost Deity’s Descent] had six. The final special effect was very interesting. It was actually anonymity! In “Divine Realm”, when players were killed, the attacker’s ID would appear on the combat panel. However, with this equipment, he could truly kill people without a trace. Moreover, this equipment also provided the effect of “Anonymous Chat”. This was relatively special in “Divine Realm”. At the very least, until now, no one had such an ability. … “How is it? Are you satisfied with this equipment?” Tully looked at Lorne, hoping that his work would be approved. When he saw Lorne nod, he laughed. “It’s good that you’re satisfied.” Tully said, “Mr. Tyrant, I need to arrange for people to prepare the Purification Crystal. If there are any other matters that you need to deal with, you can directly communicate with Turado.” “Wait a moment, Manager Tully. Please let the gnomes prepare to move.” “Move?” Tully was confused at first, then his eyes widened in surprise. “Have you already built your territory?” “Yes, it’s almost done. After you complete the Purification Crystal, you can go with me.” “I see…” Tully smiled and sighed, “I didn’t expect this day to come so quickly. Mr. Tyrant’s ability is beyond my imagination. However, because I only made a personal agreement with Mr. Tyrant last time, I can’t guarantee that all the gnomes here can follow in my footsteps, so I hope you can understand.” “Of course, I will not force other gnomes. In fact, as long as Manager Tully can join, it will be within my expectations.” Although the Cold Desolate Dragon City needed a population, with Lorne’s current resources, he could not support everyone for the time being. All he needed now was a manager who could manage the Cold Desolate Dragon City and slowly repair it. Other matters needed to be slowly handled in the future. “Thank you for your recognition, Mr. Tyrant.” Satisfied, Tully asked, “Forgive me, but I would like to know the progress of Mr. Tyrant’s territory construction.” Hearing this question, the nearby Turado pricked up his ears. He had previously heard from his grandfather that the agreement with Mr. Tyrant was made half a month ago. In other words, the other party’s territory should have only developed recently. Even if he had a territory early on, he was still a Level 30 adventurer after all. It was almost impossible for him to create a territory of such a scale. Perhaps it was really just a village. Otherwise, he would not have given up on so many people in the Gnome Company. In fact, that was what Tully thought. He asked this question because he wanted to know how large the other party’s territory was and consider whether to persuade some gnomes to join them. In his mind, he wanted to bring more than half of the gnomes away this time, but he was afraid that the territory was too small. At that time, he would be letting down the gnomes. As for a larger city? Tully felt that hope was slim. After all, Mr. Tyrant was so young, it was impossible for him to build a city of his own at this time. But in the next second… “It’s going well. In any case, it’s larger than your branch.” Of course, Lorne would not directly mention the range of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. After all, there was an outsider like Turado here. However, when they heard this comparison, they were shocked. It was bigger than this branch? Did he really have a Level 3 main city? Otherwise, why would he choose to create a Purification Crystal that could radiate 100,000 hectares? Thinking of this, Tully stood up and said excitedly, “I’ll inform the other gnomes now and prepare the airship we need. After the Purification Crystal is created, we’ll follow Mr. Tyrant to the new territory.” With that, Tully hurried away to arrange something else. … “Mr. Tyrant, your achievements are too shocking.” “What I did not expect was the ‘Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs’ that you wrote. The herbs recorded in it surpass all the records of our Gnome Race. It’s unbelievable.” NPC Turado followed Lorne. He was responsible for accompanying Lorne and dealing with all cooperation with the gnome company. “Is that book very popular with the gnomes?” “Not yet, but I believe in its meaning to the gnomes.” Tulado said seriously, “This book has not been sold in large quantities. Most of the gnomes do not know of its existence. It is because of this that I can use the knowledge in this book to obtain enough benefits.” “How much would you pay for such a book?” Lorne was still more interested in money since he was short on gold coins. “If this book is not sold widely, I’m willing to buy it for 100,000 gold coins!” 100,000?! Lorne’s eyes lit up. It was as if the book was more expensive than he had imagined. One had to know that the knowledge inside only recorded conventional herbs. For example, there were even more ancient herbs that had not been recorded on it. In that case, could he add more content and increase the sales? Moreover, he could use this relationship to rope in Doge from the Alchemist Association to the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This way, the problem of the alchemy workshop could be resolved. That made sense. It made a lot of sense. A plan formed in Lorne’s mind. “Turado, my territory is still in the construction phase. I need a large amount of materials and workers. I hope to purchase a batch of goods from the Gnome Mineral Company.” “No problem. Mr. Tyrant, please follow me. In order to express my gratitude, I will give you the greatest discount this time.” Soon, following him, Lorne arrived near the Gnome warehouse and opened its shop. Although Tully had already confirmed that he wanted to join the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the gnomes were not construction workers. Compared to buildings, they were more valuable in design. Therefore, Lorne needed to buy some construction robots. These robots were high-level goods. Owning them would cost a lot. Lorne chose 1,000 intermediate robots, each worth 10,000 Gnome Reputation Points. Then, he bought 5,000 basic robots, each worth 2,000 Gnome Reputation Points. These robots will do the basic work of transporting materials and building. As for supplies? There were enough ancient rocks in the Cold Desolate Dragon City that could satisfy most of the construction. However, Lorne still needed to buy a batch of rocks. This was because the previous Cold Desolate Dragon City was the city of the dragons. Other than buildings made of huge rocks, there were only some ancient totems that he could not understand. Clearly, such an environment was not suitable for humans to live in. Lorne had to build a batch of human-style buildings on the foundation of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Those large dragon buildings could be used as stylistic buildings in the city. The rest had to be redesigned. Therefore, he had to buy a large amount of conventional rocks and wood. ———— Category: Material [Ordinary Wood]: Price: 1 silver coin per unit. [Ordinary Rock]: Price: 1 silver coin per unit. [Ordinary Steel]: Price: 5 silver coins per unit. [Ordinary Crystal]: Price: 10 silver coins per unit. […] ———— Ordinary wood and stone materials were considered cheap supplies. They only cost 1 silver coin. However, there were many materials needed for construction, especially for a large city like the Cold Desolate Dragon City. The materials needed would be even more terrifying. Lorne did not think that his money could buy all the resources. He could only buy them according to the cost of materials in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. According to the planned construction speed, 10 million units of wood and 10 million units of stone, plus 2 million units of steel, should be able to support it for a period of time. At the very least, they could complete a small area of buildings. In addition, he needed to buy a batch of glowing crystals. The lighting project in the city was also a resource-consuming place. Lorne bought 400,000 glowing crystals. They would be installed in various places in the city to bring light to Cold Desolate Dragon City. In addition, he needed a large number of magic crystals. These magic crystals were an important resource for the operation of magic circles and robots. He also needed to buy a large amount. Then, with the addition of other miscellaneous resources, the total value had already exceeded the horizon. “Mr. Tyrant, the supplies you bought cost a total of 24.5 million Gnome Reputation Points and 700,000 gold coins.” Turado calculated. Hearing this total price, Lorne felt a headache. Although he made a lot of money, he also spent a lot of money. 700,000 gold coins was earned by him after a week of hard work in the event, but in the end, he spent all of it. That was not all. The most important thing was the 24.5 million reputation points. This was the truly expensive expenditure. Fortunately, he had accumulated enough resources. Otherwise, he could not afford to spend so much. While Lorne was sighing, the nearby Turado continued, “Because of this book you published, I can obtain an important project in the company. Therefore, I want to give you enough in return for this deal. How about this, Mr. Tyrant? I’ll use the privilege of the higher-ups of the guild to give you a 50% discount. You only need to pay half the price for all the goods.” 50% off? Lorne was overjoyed. The funds on him could only buy these resources. However, if Turado gave him a 50% discount, wouldn’t he be able to double the resources? “Alright, please double all the items I have just chosen. Additionally, I want another 10,000 magic crystals!” At this moment, there was no need to be polite. Lorne did not care much and took out all his savings. He paid 18,500 Dragon Race’s Night Pearls and 700,000 gold coins. These Night Pearls were obtained from the Dragon Tomb of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, and they were all used to pay for the purchase. 700,000 gold coins had also been spent at this moment. Other than a huge amount of resources on him, there was no money left. “It’s such a pleasure working with you.” Gnome Turado smiled happily. Although the price of this transaction was relatively low, most importantly, he had obtained a large number of Dragon Race’s Night Pearls. This was a resource that the Gnome Mineral Company urgently needed. Lorne happily put all the goods into the Dragon’s Treasure Vault. With these more than 20,000 robots, the basic maintenance work in the Cold Desolate Dragon City should be completed. After the construction was completed, they could also turn into patrolling guards to protect the city. It was killing two birds with one stone. “Alright, I’ll be leaving for a while. I’ll return when the Purification Crystal is completed.” “Alright, Mr. Tyrant. Please take care. At the same time, I hope that you can cooperate with the Gnome Mineral Company for a long time.” After greeting Tully, Lorne took out the return scroll. There was still a day to create the Purification Crystal. During this period of time, he planned to find the Alchemist Association’s Guild Leader, Doge, and try to rope him in to join the Cold Desolate Dragon City. At the same time, he would check on the business situation of the shop, ‘Dragon One’. “Brothers who want to go to the ruins of the war to make a fortune, let’s form a team. It’s safe and reliable!” “Heading to the ruins of the war. Join the party for 10 silver coins. We will definitely arrive safely!” “Let’s go. Those who didn’t get in, don’t worry. There’s still a spot!” “Brothers, let’s go to the ruins of the war to make a fortune. We’ll earn 10,000 dollars a month. Just use our right hands!” “It only costs 5 silver coins to be escorted by an expert to the expeditionary army camp!” After returning to Iron Skull City, he heard the shouts of the players everywhere. In fact, the map of the ruins of the war had always been very popular among the players. However, the activities of the Titan Forest were too popular, causing the popularity of this map to be much lower. However, as the players neared Level 30, and with the end of the Titan Forest event, there was another wave of excitement in the ruins of the war. As long as a player had some strength, they would basically choose to fight in the ruins of the war. After all, the drop rate of monsters there was higher and they could earn reputation points. Therefore, more players saw the benefits. For example, leading a team to the ruins of the war gave many ‘guides’ opportunities to earn a lot of money. They could also lead the team to kill monsters in the ruins of the war and obtain a good income. However, the most popular thing now was to transport resources. Because there was no place to replenish in the ruins of the war, the players had to transport their supplies to the ruins themselves. In addition, there were no merchant NPCs like equipment and materials recycling in that area. Coupled with the fact that the map was far away, some merchant players could receive many things at low prices here. Even some low-level players obtained additional income because of the market. They ran back and forth to collect the transportation fees. Lorne shook his head and smiled. The operations of these merchants would soon suffer a huge blow. This was because his Cold Desolate Dragon City would soon be established. At that time, with the advantage of the teleportation array, he would completely monopolize all the markets in the ruins of the war! Here, some might think that the Lake of Death was too far away from the expeditionary army camp. The players would not be willing to go to his city. That notion was wrong. This was because the teleportation circle of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was similar to the teleportation circle of the Gnome Mineral Company. It could directly teleport the target to the region of the teleportation circle. After choosing to teleport, one could appear in the wilderness forest or in the main city. Unlike the teleportation circle in Iron Skull City, when one crushed the teleportation scroll, they would immediately return to the city and not anywhere outside the city. Although it was not a direct teleportation to the Doomsday Forest, through the teleportation of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the players could save two-thirds of the map journey. Moreover, the area near the Lake of Death was a Level 40 Monster Zone. In another week, after the players reached Level 30, that place would become the core of the players’ development. … As he pondered, his friend list lit up. It was a message from Twinkle Rose. “Brother Tyrant, sob sob, I’ve urgent needs. Can you lend me 200,000 gold coins?” Twinkle Rose asked pitifully. 200,000? Seeing this number, Lorne could not help but be stunned. This was not a small number. In terms of alliance dollars, it was worth 600 million. “Why do you want so much money?” Lorne could not help but ask. “To stockpile, of course.” Twinkle Rose said matter-of-factly, “Most of the players are now above Level 25. The ruins of the war with Level 30 monsters is the hottest map now. It just so happens that the sisters in the Titan Forest have returned to the main city. I plan to hoard a large amount of goods for them to bring over. I just paid for the antidote today, and the gold coins can’t be transferred immediately, so I want to ask you to help me.” “To be honest, it’s up to you to make a killing this time. I know that you made a lot of gold coins in the Titan Forest. I’ll borrow 200,000 and return it to you within two days.” “I beg you, good brother. The people of the Domination Guild have already accumulated more than 1 million gold coins worth of goods and are about to set off. I have to reach before them, or else I won’t even be able to drink soup.” In order to obtain the loan, Twinkle Rose sent a series of messages and even began to act cute. She thought that as long as she brought the goods to the expeditionary army camp, she would receive a huge reward. But clearly, she had miscalculated this time. “Big-busted Sister, I’d advise you not to stock up. There’s a chance you won’t be able to sell anything.” Lorne reminded her out of kindness. “Why?” “Brother Tyrant, make yourself clear. I’ve been confused by you. Why will the goods be unsold? The supplies in the ruins of the war are simply lacking. There’s no need to worry about sales.” “Moreover, all the resources there are 3-4 times the price of Iron Skull City. If we join them now, we will clearly make a killing.” Twinkle Rose did not understand his reminder. After all, her transport team had already made a lot of money. Coupled with the fact that the situation in the ruins of the war was very stable, it was impossible for them to lose money. “You want to know? If you want to know, send me a few sexy photos.” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up as he hinted crazily. “If you want to see me, go online and check. The most beautiful woman there is me.” Twinkle Rose smiled and raised her head proudly. She was not lying. After all, in reality, her appearance was definitely shocking. When others entered the game “Divine Realm”, they would choose to elevate their appearance, but she had lowered it instead. But even so, she was still one of the top beauties in “Divine Realm”. Unfortunately, Lorne did not know any of this. “I don’t want stuff that people have seen. Why don’t you post something private and I’ll tell you a secret that can shock the entire world?” “Tsk, Little Brother, you want my private photos? Aren’t you afraid of overindulgence?” “I’m strong and can withstand it!” “Forget it. If you really die, my heart will ache.” “…” The two chatted. In the end, Lorne gave her a small piece of information, the word “Guild Establishment Token”. Upon hearing this notification, Twinkle Rose was horrified. This was because as long as Tyrant’s guild territory was built, they would be able to connect to the main city. With the help of the teleportation circle, those transporting herbs would completely lose the market. At that time, at least half of the purchase fees of hundreds of thousands of gold coins and the high transportation fees would be lost. This was too terrifying. After ending the conversation with Twinkle Rose, Lorne first arrived at the Dragon One shop. As soon as he entered the shop, the manager, Rona, greeted him. “Master, long time no see.” “Yes, long time no see, Rona.” Lorne nodded, “How’s the situation at the shop recently?” “Originally, development was relatively slow, but with the Guild Establishment Token provided by Master, the sales of the shop obtained an earth-shattering increase. In addition, the antidote treaty signed with the Alchemist Association also brought huge benefits to the shop.” Rona took out the shop’s bill and said, “Master, look. This is the income of the shop in the past few days. The Guild Establishment Token has brought a terrifying increase in sales for the shop, and the antidote has brought a high popularity to the shop.” “Because there are no antidotes for sale in the surrounding shops, most of the adventurers who revived and left nearby will choose to come to our shops to buy potions.” “Because of this, the income of the other businesses in the shop is also very impressive.” Listening to Rona’s report, Lorne also carefully checked the shop’s accounts and found that the recent income had indeed increased greatly. A week ago, the income of Dragon One Shop was about 700 gold coins. A week later, the income of Dragon One Shop soared to 2,100 gold coins. This income was the income after excluding the “Guild Establishment Token”. It was the benefits of the shop itself. The profit per day was three times that of before. “Is there a problem?” Lorne asked. “Yes.” Rona nodded, “Seven days ago, the shop auctioned the first Guild Establishment Token, which led to the increase in customer flow and even a phenomenon of multiplying. This is the most important value performance for a shop. However, four days ago, the customer flow of Dragon One stopped increasing, and its performance stagnated at the current stage.” “The main reason for this problem is that the scope of the shop is limited. The sales space of Dragon One Shop is only more than a hundred square meters. Even if the adventurers don’t stay for long, we can’t support such a huge customer flow.” Lorne nodded. He also knew that the benefits that a shop could earn were limited. Moreover, the area of Dragon One was so small. To be able to earn 2,100 gold coins was already the limit. “What do you think?” “Master, I think there are two ways to make the shop earn more.” Rona extended two fingers and said, “Firstly, we need to increase the quality of the goods. We will no longer provide low-profit goods like the HP potion. We will save all the counters on the first floor and specially sell higher-priced equipment and other special items.” “At the same time, it can also increase sales. We will use the limited space of the shop to obtain the greatest benefits.” “Secondly, we can expand the area of our shops. larger shops can have more counters, deal with more transactions, and accommodate more customers.” It had to be said that a high-level NPC like Rona had a very strong business mind. She could consider many things and even make many judgments. Lorne agreed with her. However, it might be difficult to expand the shop. All the businesses in Iron Skull City belonged to Iron Skull City itself. Even these shops owned by the Alchemist Association were indicators distributed by Iron Skull City. It might not be too difficult to obtain the management rights of a shop, but to have two shops at the same time and even want to merge them, this was too testing the player’s background. If he did not contribute enough to Iron Skull City, it would be an extremely difficult goal. Lorne thought for a moment, then looked at Rona, “Which do you think is more suitable for us?” “The second plan is more suitable for future development, but to realize it, we need to pay a greater price. Moreover, this price might be something that Master cannot afford for the time being.” “Compared to the second plan, I’m more confident in the first plan. I’m confident in increasing the quality of the goods and creating the Dragon One brand. It might be more suitable for the current situation. After all, we fully manage Dragon One. I believe that as long as we operate this well, we can bring in enough profits.” Rona said. Her consideration was not unreasonable. The current adventurers could not come into contact with the highest levels of Iron Skull City. Even Lorne had not seen the City Lord of Iron Skull City, let alone others. Therefore, it was very difficult to create private benefits under the strict rules of Iron Skull City. Lorne did not plan to develop in Iron Skull City. Now that he had the Cold Desolate Dragon City, as long as he could properly build it, he could reach the same level of status as the City Lord of Iron Skull City in the future. “Let’s do as you think. Even if we can buy more shops, we have to go on the high-end route. Only then can we stabilize our business position.” “In addition, go and manage your relationship with other trading companies. In the future, we will have our own territory. At that time, they will become a bridge between us and Iron Skull City,” Lorne said. “Yes, I’ll arrange it immediately.” Hearing Lorne’s plan, Rona was very excited. After discussing with him, she immediately took action. Lorne was also about to leave the shop to find President Doge. However, just as he walked out of the shop and arrived at the street, he suddenly saw a group of players in luxurious equipment walking out of the city in a hurry. Wasn’t this Cross Fire? Strange, why was the Deputy Guild Leader of the World Destruction Guild following a Level 20 player? Could it be a powerful figure from the World Destruction Guild? Looking at the other party’s position, that guy called [World Destruction Lightning] should be a very important character. Behind him, there was a player called “Great Greedy Wolf”. He seemed to be the one who led the army to surround the valley. “Very good. Since I’ve encountered you, I’ll use you to test my strength!” Back in the River Valley, Lorne had wanted to teach these guys a lesson. It just so happened that he had obtained the [Ghost Deity Necklace]. This divine equipment was said to not be detectable by anyone. If that was the case, killing a few people in Iron Skull City should not be a problem. With that in mind, the corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up, and he vanished on the spot. The [Ghost Deity’s Descent] skill allowed Lorne to walk in the darkness and gave him powerful damage output and movement speed. Even if he was a Summoner and could not rely on pets, in this state, he could use his attributes to directly kill these players. “How’s the preparation of the potions going?” After more than a month, the World Destruction Guild finally got on track and formed a good guild model. The guild leader, Speck, had only logged into the game recently and directly took over the management of the World Destruction Guild. Because of his merchant bloodline, he placed all his attention on the ruins of the war. To him, the ruins of the war was a huge market with a good future. Therefore, he gathered a large amount of funds and planned to monopolize the potion market in the ruins of the war by controlling the price. “Don’t worry, Boss. We’ve already prepared more than 1 million gold coins. In addition, we’ve also borrowed more than 300,000 gold coins from the NPCs. This money is all used to buy the HP and MP Potions. We’re already organizing people to come back and carry it.” On the way, Cross Fire reported the latest situation to Speck. Speck nodded, “Speed up the transportation time. We have to input the potions into the ruins of the war before the other guilds. Even if we have to lower the price, we have to seize enough market share!” “Yes, Boss.” A group of people followed behind Speck, preparing to go to the warehouse where the potions were stored. But as they hurried along, a short staff hidden in the darkness struck Speck in the face. Almost in the next second, he died. Cross Fire, who was behind him, saw everything. He saw Speck suddenly collapse backward, his body turning into white fragments. “Damn, what’s going on?!” The players from the World Destruction Guild looked at the scene in shock, not understanding what had happened. At the resurrection point dozens of meters away, Speck revived. He was stunned and did not know what had happened to him. He felt something smash into his face, then he lost consciousness and died. What was even more surprising was that there was no information regarding the battle on his combat panel, which meant that he had suddenly died. This was ridiculous. “Boss, why did you suddenly die? Who killed you?” At this moment, Cross Fire and the others ran over. They had not seen the assassin just now, so they asked Speck in surprise. However, Speck was also stunned and had no idea what was happening. Before he could explain, he felt dizzy again. His head was hit by an unknown object, causing his soul to almost ascend to heaven. “Damn, what the heck is this?” Because he was standing on the resurrection array, Speck, who had just fallen, stood up again. He cursed angrily. “There’s a damage number in the air!” “Damn, why is it more than 50,000? Boss, did you kill yourself?” The surrounding players cried out. In the Divine Realm, players could commit suicide. This was a very special mechanism that was designed to prevent players from being trapped in a special map and unable to escape. Typically, only this action would cause the player to suddenly suffer huge damage without any combat notification. “F*ck you…” Speck, who was misunderstood by his lackeys, was furious, but before he could finish, his head really exploded. Another extremely savage unknown attack struck his head, and a scarlet and hideous number floated in the air. -50,450 (Critical) Although it was a critical hit, the damage value of 50,000 points was still too ridiculous, so the players all agreed that this was the result of Speck’s suicide. “Boss, don’t kill yourself!” “Even if you’re unhappy, you don’t have to torture yourself like this!” “That’s right. Boss, stop.” “Sigh, I didn’t expect Sister-in-law’s matter to deal such a huge blow to Boss. However, there’s no need for that. Boss has so many women. It’s normal for one or two to be indecent.” “What’s normal about that? If it were you, you would also break down. You didn’t know about this, but that woman knew that she couldn’t be Boss’s wife, so she went to be the Boss’s stepmother…” Several guild players beside him spoke, but someone accidentally revealed a shocking secret, causing the surrounding players to stare with their eyes wide open. Although it was only one sentence, the storyline was too exciting. ‘If I can’t be your wife, I’ll be your mother?’ This train of thought was too intense. Even movies would not have such a storyline. … “You have to let go of everything, Boss. Really, I beg of you, don’t kill yourself again.” Seeing Speck’s tragic actions, Cross Fire was extremely heartbroken. In just a few seconds, his boss, Speck, had actually committed suicide five times. He had already leveled up nearly a month later than others. If he died five more times, he would fall below Level 10. At that time, he would not be able to enter even the main city, and the guild would also be greatly affected… “Cross Fire, listen to me, damn, I didn’t kill myself!” Speck, who had revived, cursed, but as soon as he finished speaking, he was struck to death again. The lackeys beside him were at a loss, but at this moment, a critical hit number appeared above Cross Fire’s head. The terrifying 50,000 damage directly shattered his soul. -50,450 (Critical) -50,000 (Critical) -8575! -8499! -50,670 (Critical) The players beside were not surprised. They all suffered an inexplicable blow. High damage values popped up on their heads one after another, and then they turned into souls that were poured into the resurrection array. When they stood up again, they would suffer the same treatment. It seemed that there was a strange bug that kept affecting them. As long as they revived, they would definitely die… … “Damn, what’s wrong with them?” “Are the higher-ups of the World Destruction Guild performing mass suicide?” “If my girl were to become my stepmother, I would not be able to withstand such a blow. I completely understand his actions.” “My god, look at the number in the sky. It’s more than 50,000. It’s ridiculous!” “Indeed, the system is the true god!” “If I have such an ability, I will definitely treat these tyrannical fellows well!” “Why do I feel like they’ve encountered a bug?” The surrounding players were attracted by the scene before them. They gathered and began to discuss. Many people even recorded this scene and posted it on the forum, asking other players to analyze it. The entire video only lasted for 15 seconds. This was because after 15 seconds, Cross Fire, Great Greedy Wolf, and the others could not hold on anymore and went offline. As for their guild leader, World Destruction Lightning, because his level had decreased to below 10, he was sent back to the Beginner Village. Only then did this strange phenomenon stop. However, this matter stirred up a storm on the forum and attracted the attention of all the players in the world. In reality, at the headquarters of the World Destruction Guild. Speck and a few higher-ups of the guild gathered together because of what had happened in the game. “In just a few seconds, I dropped seven levels!” “I dropped five levels. I was originally in the top 10,000, but now, I’ve completely fallen behind.” “I also dropped six levels. In the end, we still don’t know the specific situation.” “Is this really a bug?” “I think there might be a problem in the game!” “That’s right. Otherwise, there would be no combat information!” The group of people from the World Destruction Guild discussed. Although they had many guesses, they could not confirm the true reason. This was because there was only one message on their game interface. “You have received 50,770 damage. Your character has died!” “You have received 50,450 damage. Your character has died!” “You have received…” “You have received…” “…” Other than the damage numbers, they could not find any useful information. Moreover, because the situation was too special when they were killed and the process was too short, they could not understand what they had suffered. Speck also sat on the sofa with a dark expression. He clearly felt that he had received special treatment. Someone had definitely attacked him just now, because his face felt the pain of being attacked, and ‘suicide’ did not have any pain, so the two were definitely very different. At this moment, someone suddenly shouted, “I know who attacked us!” “Boss, quickly open the equipment ranking!” Hearing this, the others checked. ———— Equipment Leaderboard [First Place]: Angel’s Wings (Mythical), Owner: Tyrant. [Second place]: Ghost Deity Necklace (Mythical), Owner: ??? [Third place]: Death Angel’s War Boots (Demigod) … ———— After Lorne obtained the new equipment, the equipment ranking also changed. In fact, there were already relevant topics on the forum, but everyone in the World Destruction Guild was busy purchasing potions, so they did not pay attention to this matter. When they saw this list, their eyes immediately turned red. Although they did not know the other party’s identity, they were certain that it was this guy with the Ghost Deity Necklace who had attacked them. Other than that, there was no other possibility! “It must be that scoundrel Tyrant again!” “Damn, this kid has already obtained a second Mythical equipment!” They were furious. But then Cross Fire said, “I think he might not be Tyrant.” Not Tyrant? Hearing this, everyone looked over. Cross Fire explained, “Look at Tyrant’s previous behavior. He has never hidden. I have not seen him hide the Angel’s Wings equipment, so I think he might not be Tyrant.” “Makes sense…” Everyone nodded. According to their understanding of Tyrant, they realized that he did not like to hide. Even if it was a Mythical equipment, it would definitely not make him change his behavior. It was probably because a player who had been bullied by the World Destruction Guild had suddenly obtained a special opportunity, causing his strength to increase greatly, so he chose to turn invisible to take revenge. “Boss, I think this might be a good opportunity for us!” Cross Fire said. “Chance? What chance?” “A chance to resist Tyrant!” Cross Fire said, “If we can recruit this player with a divine equipment into the guild, together with the large army of more than a hundred thousand players, we can turn the possibility of hunting Tyrant into reality!” “Impossible. That guy killed several of our higher-ups. If we don’t skin him alive, how can our World Destruction Guild survive in the Divine Realm in the future?” “That’s right. Since this player attacked us, he must be prepared to be our enemy. How can he join us?” “This player’s output exceeds 50,000. With his powerful invisibility, even if Tyrant fought him, he would die. Such a powerful player will basically not accept anyone’s invitation.” A group of executives objected. They, the higher-ups of the financial group, were used to being high and mighty. Every time they were provoked, they had to take revenge. Even if they had to pay the price, they could not let the other party iff, especially this time. The other party’s actions had completely enraged them. If not for the fact that they could not find the other party’s location, they would have definitely killed that detestable guy with their own hands in real life. But even so, Cross Fire persisted in his thoughts. “Not everyone is like Tyrant who is not tempted by money. Solo players like him are mostly ordinary working-class people. This kind of person has a bottom line. If he doesn’t agree, it only means that we didn’t offer him enough money.” “I think that with the current influence of the Divine Realm, if we want to seize the market share, we have to rope in powerful players like him. Even if we have to pay a billion, or even two billion dollars, it’s completely worth it. After all, even a map like the ruins of the war has a market of more than ten billion dollars. If it were the entire Iron Skull City or even the Empire Alliance, it would be a huge market of tens of billions. If we can rely on their strength to snatch 1% of the market share, the final benefits will far exceed the current cost.” Cross Fire analyzed seriously. Ever since Tyrant’s incident had affected the company’s benefits, Cross Fire had begun to work harder and even reflected on many things. Today, he explained what he had learned. After he finished, no one objected. The higher-ups of the guilds were also secretly communicating, believing that his analysis was reasonable. Speck was also hesitating. But at that moment, on the holographic screen in the conference room, a shout sounded throughout the city. “[Anonymous Player]: Listen up, fellows from the World Destruction Guild. You’d better control yourselves in the future, or else I’ll kill you ten times!” Seeing this message, Speck exploded. Damn it! If the tiger did not show its might, this fellow would really think that it was a weak cat! Investigate! No matter if it was in reality or in the game, as long as they found traces of this guy, they would surround him with all their might. ‘I want to see him die!!!’ “Gosh! Who is this godly player?” “No wonder the people from the World Destruction Guild died one after another. Someone attacked them.” “Could it be Tyrant?” “I don’t think so. God Tyrant never hides his name when killing people. He’s probably a new God-tier player.” “My attack damage is only 1,000. This Ghost Deity can actually deal 50,000 damage. How ridiculous.” “Who do you think is stronger between Ghost Deity and Tyrant?” “I think Ghost Deity is stronger in a solo battle. In a group battle, God Tyrant is stronger. After all, all of his pets are apocalyptic existences.” “Ghost Deity is awesome. He killed without leaving a trace!” When they heard the shout, the entire world entered a combat discussion. Everyone wondered if Tyrant or the new Ghost Deity was stronger. … At the same time, in the underground base of the Netherworld Guild, the guild leader, Nether River, was doing a power analysis with the high-level players of the guild. Almost all the famous experts in the world were discussed by them. Especially players like Tyrant who had powerful personal strength. However, as everyone was discussing, new information suddenly came. According to his lackey, a player called Ghost Deity had killed all the higher-ups of the World Destruction Guild several times and publicly warned them. They quickly opened the forum to check the relevant information. The next moment, rows of video posts appeared. “King of Assassins! Ghost Deity!” “Anonymous player with the title Ghost Deity, slays enemies without them noticing!” “Ghost Deity strikes. The higher-ups of the World Destruction Guild are wiped out!” “Crazy damage. The single damage of Ghost Deity is as high as 51,780 points!” “Absolute Invisibility + Super Damage = Unbeatable Legend!” “New strongest player, Ghost Deity!” “…” At this moment, almost all the posts were about Ghost Deity. “King of Assassins?” A hint of disdain flashed in Nether River’s eyes. Using the advantage of equipment to hunt, this kind of person could also be considered the strongest assassin? “If this equipment does not give you the effect of ‘invincibility’, then when you encounter me, I will definitely let you die under my sharp blade!” “The title of King of Assassins only belongs to me!” The corners of Nether River’s mouth curled up. In this world, no one knew hunting better than him, and no one knew assassins better than him. As for the advantage brought about by equipment, it would eventually be outdated. Only people who truly mastered super skills were qualified to reach the top of the world! In “Divine Realm”, the growth of the players could not be stopped. When the time came, the equipment would not give the players the strength to win. At that time, skill would become the only proof to measure the players’ strength! While he was thinking, Nether River opened a live video to see what level the other party was at. When the video was opened, he realized that the entire video only lasted for 15 seconds. However, in these short 15 seconds, the players of the World Destruction Guild died one after another. Moreover, the players here were all the higher-ups of the World Destruction Guild. Their equipment and strength were extraordinary. However, in such an environment, the World Destruction Lightning, Cross Fire, Great Greedy Wolf, Unparalleled World Destruction, and the others were killed five to seven times in 15 seconds. The World Destruction Lightning was even killed ten times and sent back to the Beginner Village. As for damage? A scarlet 50,000 critical hits value floated on the screen! Not only that, but in the entire battle, no one saw the shadow of this Ghost Deity. He was ethereal like the rules of the system. He did not have a body, but he had the ability to judge all the players. “15 seconds, 59 kills!” “Damage exceeds 50,000!” “Absolute invisibility!” “Is this a player? Is he a f*cking cheater?” Nether River almost spat out blood. He had been so confident just now, but at this moment, he was completely crushed. How could he deal with such a player who did not appear when attacking?! … In the square of Iron Skull City, Lorne did not know how much his actions had affected the entire world. His gaze was almost focused on the Ghost Deity Necklace. The effect of this equipment was indeed powerful. When he entered the “Ghost Deity’s Descent” state, his overall strength had received a terrifying increase, especially the critical damage. It directly increased by 300%. Coupled with the 100% increase in the [Angel’s Wings] and the 100% increase in the title of [Dragon Slayer], Lorne’s critical damage reached a terrifying 700%, which was seven times the damage! In addition, the Ghost Deity state also provided a 100% increase in damage. This effect and critical strike could be used at the same time, so the final damage would be 14 times! Finally, there was the level suppression effect. When dealing with Level 20 players like the World Destruction Lightning, it would deal an additional 40% damage. The combined effect finally made Lorne deal more than 50,000 points of damage! To be honest, when he saw this damage value, Lorne was also very shocked. After all, he had always relied on his pets to fight in the past, and he had not used the skill “Angel’s Descent” to deal damage, so he did not have a clear understanding of his damage output. Only today did he realize that he was already so powerful. Even without Aisha, with his own strength, Lorne was confident in killing a Silver Boss of the same level. “There doesn’t seem to be anything wrong with Iron Skull City.” Lorne stood in the square for a while and finally confirmed that the effect of the Ghost Deity Necklace could avoid detection in Iron Skull City. Even if he killed someone in Iron Skull City, he would not be punished. In this case, the Iron Skull City that was said to be absolutely safe had become nothing but a decoration in front of him. In the future, if there were any enemies that he wanted to teach a lesson to, he could kill them until they died! Just the thought of it was awesome. Then, Lorne left the square. He rushed all the way to the Alchemist Association and saw President Doge here. “Mr. Tyrant, you’re finally here.” Seeing that Lorne had arrived, Doge was very happy. He handed the book “Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs” on the bookshelf to Lorne and said, “Take a look and see if this editing is in line with your idea.” “Yes, I think it’s good.” Lorne casually checked and asked, “How do you plan to distribute this book?” “I have already promoted a few books to the outside world. The goal is to attract all the alchemist organizations in the world and make them contact us. Only then can we ensure that the copyright of the books is protected.” “Up until now, we have already received a letter from 157 alchemist organizations and have said that they will send people to Iron Skull City to discuss the sale of this ‘Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs’ in detail.” “So many?” Hearing Doge’s report, Lorne was also surprised. He checked the list that Doge handed over, and it surprisingly stated all the alchemist organizations that wanted to reach an agreement with them. A total of 157 forces, including humans, gnomes, elves, orcs, and various other races, sent sincere invitation letters. Most importantly, there were many authoritative organizations in these alchemist organizations. Their recognition would allow Lorne’s books to have a higher reputation in the world. In addition, it could also lead to the implementation of the Tyrant Award. “Mr. Tyrant, these are only a portion.” Doge said, “According to my estimation, the total number of alchemist organizations in the various cities of the Human Empire Alliance, the Elven Kingdom, and the Gnome Kingdom should exceed 300.” “There are only 157 of them now, because I have sent out the incomplete version of the Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs. I included about 70% of the herbs. These are already more complete than the best pharmacopoeia in the Empire. In addition, I have kept 30% of the rare herbs and edited a portion of their characteristics. The remaining characteristics of the herbs will be continuously updated in the future versions.” “This way, we can maintain the popularity of the Pharmacopoeia and maintain a cooperative relationship with all the alchemist organizations in the world.” Doge explained his plan, which impressed Lorne. His thoughts were consistent with Lorne’s, even more thorough in fact. This was because Lorne had only recently thought of this problem, and Doge had considered all aspects when he published the book. It had to be said that this Alchemist Association’s President indeed had a powerful business mind. “Yes.” Lorne nodded, then asked, “How do you plan to cooperate with them?” “Originally, I wanted to place the books in their various libraries and let them rent them for a price to read. This way, all the alchemists who read this book have to pay a certain amount of reading fees. Although the reading fees will not be very high, under such a huge number, it can still bring us high benefits.” “However, after careful consideration, I discovered another problem. If we release it like this, it’s very likely that someone will secretly record the contents of the pharmacopoeia and issue a pirated copy, damaging our benefits.” “Therefore, I’ve recently been considering selling it by directly buying it off. Although this will also be harmful by the pirated version, this method can maximize our benefits.” With that, Doge looked at Lorne again and asked, “Mr. Tyrant, what do you think we should do with this?” How should he deal with it? Lorne thought for a moment and said, “I think we can use an online reading method. The Recording Crystal seems to have this function.” “The Recording Crystal does have this ability, but it doesn’t seem to be able to solve the problem of piracy.” Doge frowned. He had long prepared the crystal version of the book, but that would not stop the piracy. In fact, the function of the crystal would make the piracy even more rampant. “Don’t worry, Doge.” Lorne said, “I saw a special device created based on Recording Crystal in the Gnome Mineral Company’s shop. It can store information and provide a special account. Only those who log in can check the information inside.” “This device can solve the drawback of duplicating the records and provide an account so that we can tabulate everyone’s reading records and earnings from them.” “Regarding the piracy, my idea is to reduce the reading fees. To the alchemists, a low cost for reading the book will not deter them. In addition, we can all cooperate with the Gnome Mineral Company to let them record all the buyers of this reading equipment. As long as a pirated version appears, we can directly lock onto the equipment and deal with it.” “As for paper books, I don’t think the piracy of this method will have much of an effect on us, because we can directly update the content on the mainframe of the equipment. This does not require much investment, but paper piracy needs to be printed and produced. The cost is very high, and it cannot bring much benefits. It might even cause a loss because no customer is willing to spend too much money to buy it.” Hearing this, Doge was enlightened. With his business sense, how could he not understand the meaning? This method of transferring content through energy would definitely replace the method of transmitting information through matter. Moreover, because the equipment could only be produced by the Gnome Mineral Company, it could completely prevent piracy at the source. As a result, the problem of piracy was resolved. In addition, the accounting problem was also resolved. There would not be any cooperation partners secretly deducting the funds. “Although Mr. Tyrant is young, you have extraordinary wisdom and knowledge. As the Alchemist Association’s Guild Leader, I can only blush with shame.” Doge shook his head and smiled, feeling very ashamed of his thoughts during this period of time. “Since you think so highly of me, do you want to consider working for me?” Lorne smiled and made an offer. The sudden invitation stunned Doge, and then he smiled and said, “Don’t I work for Mr. Tyrant already? Look at these documents. I’ve been dealing with them for days.” “What I mean is, genuine cooperation.” Lorne walked to his desk, picked up a book, and faced Doge. This time, Doge was stunned. This was because the emblem of Iron Skull City was printed on the book. What he meant was to leave Iron Skull City and join his faction. Leave Iron Skull City? Doge hesitated. He was now the Alchemist Association’s Guild Leader in Iron Skull City. Although he did not sign any ridiculous agreement with the main city, he had also spent decades of effort to reach this position step by step from an apprentice. It was still somewhat too difficult for him to directly give up all of this. However, the person who invited him was not ordinary. To have such knowledge at such a young age, his identity and potential could not be guessed with age. Thinking of this, Doge was even more conflicted. He did not want to refuse the invitation, because he had obtained wisdom from the other party’s knowledge. He even vaguely felt that the other party might be the one who could change his fate again! Thinking of this, Doge finally nodded. He had chosen to follow Lorne, but this was actually inevitable, because just the profits and future brought by the “Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs” alone far exceeded his position as the nominal Alchemist Association’s Guild Leader. Furthermore, he still had the drive and passion to work hard for greater success. The rest of the day passed in the forest near Iron Skull City. He was still short of 10 million experience points to level up Aisha. Unfortunately, the monsters around were relatively low in level, and he did not find enough monster maps, causing him to only obtain 2 million experience points per day. The next day, Lorne put away his short staff and used the magic circle of Iron Skull City to return to the Gnome Mineral Company. “Mr. Tyrant, the Purification Crystal you need has been refined.” Tully led Lorne to a warehouse. There was an altar built with special ores. On the rocks were countless runes that formed a special magic circle. All the energy was gathered in the center. Above the center point, a huge Dragon Crystal floated. It emitted a dazzling light, like a high-powered light bulb. “This is the Purification Crystal you want.” Tully explained, “This huge energy magic circle will transmit the purification power to the gem at the top. Then, the gem will radiate light and cleanse the surroundings. An ordinary Purification magic circle can be refined with only an ordinary crystal. However, the range you want to cover is too large, so you have to use the dragon crystal as the main body to withstand the energy. Only then can you purify the huge range of 100,000 hectares.” “So big…” Lorne did not expect that the so-called Purification Crystal was not only a crystal, but the magic circle at the bottom. Only by combining the two could the effect of regional purification be displayed. “Mr. Tyrant, you can install this Purification Crystal in the center of the city. When you drive it with all your might, the Dragon Crystal will fly into the sky like a round moon, illuminating the surrounding darkness. Its light is very gentle and beautiful. It might be a large landmark in the city.” Tully smiled and introduced it to Lorne. It could be seen that he was also proud of his results. After all, in the history of the Gnome Mineral Company, there had been few cases of using the Dragon Crystal to refine the Purification Crystal. This was an extremely great honor for him. “Yes, that’s my plan.” Lorne stepped forward and used the Dragon’s Treasure Vault to collect the huge Purification Crystals. Then, he looked at Tully and said, “We’re about to leave. Are you ready?” “Everything’s ready.” Tully said, “There are a total of 1,000 technicians, 5,000 construction workers, and 4,000 manufacturing workers who followed me this time. There are exactly 10,000 people. I wonder if we can arrange for so many people to stay in Mr. Tyrant’s territory?” “Of course, it’s not a problem. The gnomes who have joined the territory will receive the best treatment and will give you the most dreamlike research area and projects. I promise you in the name of the City Lord.” Lorne gave the other party a confident answer. In his eyes, the technology of the gnomes could benefit the people. Even if it could not extend into their lives, they could still move towards the armed main city. Therefore, Lorne would give them the best treatment. This was definitely not empty talk. Tully was grateful for this answer, and he led Lorne to the landing site. The gnome airship was ready. Due to the large number of people, many airships were chosen to transport it this time. However, because the airship was specially transported this time, its armed strength was relatively poor, so there were still a few offensive airships escorting it. Lorne was interested in the weapons on the offensive airships. On those offensive airships, there were several cannons and a large crystal tower. What was their specific use? “That’s a crystal cannon.” “Under normal circumstances, such large crystal cannons are installed on the city wall. Because the magic circle engraved is very large, it’s difficult to move around. However, in order to let the airship equip a cannon, our gnomes have specially studied the miniature crystal cannon. This magic cannon can be installed in the small space of the airship and use the high mobility of the airship to suddenly attack the target!” “But of course, while undergoing special optimization, some performance will naturally be sacrificed, such as power and energy conversion efficiency.” “Under normal circumstances, the crystal cannons of the city defense need 100 units of magic energy each time, but the cannons on these airships need 200 units. Their energy conversion is relatively poor, so each attack will consume twice the energy and unleash 40% less power.” “Fortunately, mobility is their greatest value, making them our most important defense weapon.” Noticing that Lorne was interested in the magic cannons, Tully explained in detail. Then, he pointed at the tower and said, “That is a crystal energy protective device. It was specially created to protect the airship from the attacks of long-range artillery. Because it occupies a huge space, only the offensive airships are equipped with a protective device. Ordinary transport airships do not have such defense methods.” These were all good stuff… Lorne looked at the equipment on the offensive airships and could not help but sigh. In this magic world that worshiped personal strength, the gnomes had actually created a “fighter jet”. Cold Desolate Dragon City had to have such advanced technology! “Tully, how many gold coins do you need to build a crystal cannon for the city defense?” Lorne could not help but ask. “Er, if we only use gold coins, we can’t build any crystal cannon.” “To build a conventional crystal cannon, you need 47 materials, 25 of which can’t be bought with gold coins. For example, the most basic Star Patterned Iron can only be bought by going to a main city with rich minerals. Moreover, you need to obtain the other party’s permit. You can also buy it in the Gnome Mineral Company, but unless the two sides are close enough or if there’s a chance, under normal circumstances, they will not be sold.” Tully did not want to discourage him, but it was inevitable. However, Lorne did not think much of it. Instead, he asked, “Do you have anyone who can create such weapons?” “Yes. To be honest, I started my career by building crystal cannons. Later, for some reason, I transferred to building design. If you only want the crystal cannons and have enough materials, I can quickly let you develop your own city defense weapon.” Tully was also very excited. After all, building cannons had always been his dream. “Let’s wait first. During this period of time, you guys have to first reconstruct the main city, and I’ll think of a way to gather the materials to build the cannons.” “Yes, Mr. Tyrant, let’s go now.” “Yes, let’s go!” Under Tully’s command, five airships left the Gnome Mineral Company. Three offensive airships provided protection around them, and two transport airships each carried 5,000 people as they flew towards the ruins of the war. On the way, Tully asked, “Mr. Tyrant, is our territory in the ruins of the war?” “Yes.” Lorne nodded, “Our territory is near the Lake of Death. This is also the main reason why I asked you to refine the Purification Crystal.” “I see. It seems that you are very familiar with the ruins of the war. Otherwise, you would not know so many mineral veins.” “Unfortunately, we can’t bring any equipment out. The construction equipment, the blueprints, and other items are all assets of the company. The only thing that really belongs to us is ourselves.” Tully looked at Lorne apologetically, but he did not care. “To me, all of you are the greatest wealth. As for the equipment, I believe we will definitely have it with our combined efforts.” In his previous purchase plan, he had bought conventional equipment, which included more mining equipment. After the gnomes were settled, the miners could begin mining the surrounding mineral veins. With this money, Lorne could purchase more sophisticated equipment and the materials needed to build the cannon. Very good, everything went according to plan. … Time passed quickly. After a day of flying, the airship team finally arrived at the ruins of the war. When the players saw the scene in the sky, it immediately caused a commotion. “Gosh! The gnome’s air force is here!” “This is larger than the last time. Are they here to sweep through the ruins of the war?” “Damn, the gnomes are rich!” “Did they discover a huge treasure and are going to attack with all their might?” “Brothers, don’t hesitate. Hurry up and catch up. We will definitely earn money!!!” “Wait for me, I’ll go too!” “Charge! Let’s give it a try!” The players in the ruins of the war went crazy. A large group of players ran towards the airship. … At the headquarters of the World Destruction Guild. Speck sat on the sofa with a dark expression. A day ago, he had been killed ten times by that player called Ghost Deity. His level had fallen to below Level 10, and he was currently a rookie in the Beginner Village. Such a depressing experience made him not log into the game for the entire day. The others from the World Destruction Guild were leveling up crazily in the game, but at this moment, Cross Fire suddenly went offline. “Boss, there seems to be a new situation in the ruins of the war.” Cross Fire opened the holographic screen and opened a recording. It was the scene of five gnome airships passing through the Doomsday Forest. “It’s just the gnome airships.” Speck said expressionlessly, “The five gnome airships should have discovered a new mine. Get our miners to prepare. After the airship lands, go nearby and find the people from the Gnome Mineral Company. You can obtain mining experience from the gnomes, and your subclass skills will increase quickly.” “Increase the reward for Tyrant and Ghost Deity on the black market. I want to kill them!” “Yes, Boss.” Cross Fire nodded. “By the way.” Speck looked at him and said, “Has our trade caravan set off? This time, the gnomes have made a huge move. They will definitely attract more players to the ruins of the war. We have to seize this opportunity to snatch the market first and crush all the small players before earning a huge sum!” “Don’t worry, Boss. The caravan set off a day ago and moved along the fastest route. They have already arrived at the edge of the ruins of the war. They will probably reach the expeditionary army camp in another two to three hours.” “This time, we used 10,000 players to transport the goods. The total amount is as high as 1.5 million gold coins. According to our budget, we only need two days to eliminate all the solo players. The remaining large guilds will also be affected. At that time, we can directly occupy 40% of the market share. During this period, the goods worth about 1 million gold coins will not earn money. However, after stabilizing, the remaining 500,000 gold coins worth of goods can bring us a profit of at least 1 million gold coins!” Cross Fire smiled. This was the ‘war’ that he needed to make a comeback. As long as he did it well, he could still ensure his position in the corporation and would still be the follower that Boss valued the most. “Yes.” Speck nodded, looked at Cross Fire, and said seriously, “We have invested as much as 3 billion dollars in this operation. It is the largest project the corporation has in the game. You have to be responsible and nothing can go wrong!” “I understand, Boss. I’ll supervise the caravans during this period of time.” … [Lake of Death] This time, there were offensive airships escorting them, so the team flew directly into the map of the Lake of Death. Standing at a height of a thousand meters, Lorne could see the dark lake in the distance. It was larger than he had expected. It was a boundless lake, like a vast sea. It was no wonder that it could become a neutral force in Iron Skull City. With its huge coverage and the depth of the lake more than ten thousand meters, who knew how many water dwellers there were. If they really fought, it was unlikely that Iron Skull City would win. However, what interested Lorne the most was the appearance of the lake. The Lake of Death was black. Such a color was terrifying even on the ground. Behind the sky, the Lake of Death was like a boundless black hole. It seemed like a huge mouth that could devour the sky. Just looking at it made one’s hair stand on end. The gnomes were also very nervous. They pointed at the area and discussed. Tully looked nervously at Lorne as he asked, “Mr. Tyrant, you won’t tell me that our territory is in the Lake of Death, right?” “Of course not.” Lorne smiled, “Don’t worry, Tully. Our territory is only at the edge of the Lake of Death. You don’t have to worry that the Lake of Death will attack us, because we are now affiliated with Iron Skull City. If they attack us, it will be equivalent to declaring war on Iron Skull City. Just based on this, we will definitely be safe. Even this powerful and mysterious Lake of Death will become a natural barrier for us. Those forces that want to attack us have to consider the attitude of the Lake of Death. This is a very advantageous situation for us.” Although there were offensive airships nearby, Tully still did not dare fly above the Lake of Death. He could only slowly move forward at the edge. In the end, after flying northwest for an hour, the airship finally arrived at its destination. On the mountain range below, there was a huge city. Lorne could clearly identify the location of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, but Tully did not know that there was a city that was fused with the mountain. “Mr. Tyrant, are we landing here?” Tully looked down and realized that the mountain range below was strange, but he could not really discover what was happening while standing on the airship. “Wait, I’ll go down and turn this area into a guild base!” With that, a pair of transparent wings appeared on Lorne’s back. Under everyone’s gaze, he jumped down and glided with the ability of the wings. Soon, he landed on the ground and in the city of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Lorne took out the [City Creation Token] from his bag and triggered it. Ding! “Would you like to use the [City Creation Token] in this region?” “Prompt: As the ruins of the war had been cursed by the undead, it is a special area. Establishing a guild base here might affect the development of the guild and might even cause you to be attacked by monsters. Please be careful!” “Prompt: Due to the fact that the ruins of the war are a special area, there is no need to pay any fees to build a territory in this area. Moreover, you can directly take the surrounding land after purification as your territory!” A series of notifications appeared. These notifications were identical to the one given by Commander Rhett. It was no wonder that he had reminded Lorne to obtain a regional Purification Crystal first. It turned out that the size of this territory was directly related to the size of the purification area. “Use it.” Without hesitation, Lorne confirmed the choice. The next second, a new notification panel appeared in front of him. Ding! “Prompt: The area you are in is a city ruins. You can directly set this city as your territory. Do you want to do this?” “Prompt: The City Creation Token can directly cleanse the buildings in the city and use the coverage of this building as the center of the territory. Would you like to use it on this city?” There was such a thing? Lorne had thought that the City Creation Token could only cleanse a small building, but he had not expected it to cleanse an entire city. Of course, this was also likely a loophole in the rules of the game. After all, who would have thought that when this player was not even Level 30, he could find such a huge city! Lorne immediately chose to use it. In the next second, a light entered Cold Desolate Dragon City. It spread along the city wall and covered the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City hidden in the mountain, completely dispelling the undead power. Ding! “Game Announcement: Successful use. Congratulations on obtaining a city as a guild base. Now, please name your city!” Lorne blurted out, “Cold Desolate Dragon City!” Although the name was given by the dragon, Lorne was very satisfied with it. In any case, it was only a name. He would let this city that had been lost for tens of thousands of years appear in the world in the most primitive manner again. Ding! “City named successful!” Ding! “Congratulations on becoming the first player in the entire server to have a guild territory. You have triggered the entire server announcement. Would you like to announce it now and reveal your name?” The successful name panel appeared in front of Lorne. As long as he chose to reveal it, all the players in the world would know that he had built a territory. But Lorne was not in a hurry. He did not choose to announce the news as he wanted to announce it later. The interior of the Cold Desolate Dragon City had not been repaired yet, so there was no need to inform the other players in advance. In any case, the system had already determined that he was the first player to build a main city. Even if other players obtained the City Creation Token during this period of time, they would not be able to obtain the achievement reward. “Looks like the gnome robots have been working efficiently these few days.” Lorne arrived at the high tower of the Cold Desolate Dragon City and checked the outside of the Dragon City below. He realized that the weeds and rocks in the workshop area had been cleaned up. This was the place that Lorne needed to use now. As long as he cleaned up this place, it would reach his expectations. Then, Lorne flew back into the airship. “Tully, it’s my territory down there.” Lorne smiled. “Unbelievable. There’s actually such an ancient city in this dangerous region.” Tully took a deep breath. Because most of the body of the Cold Desolate Dragon City had fused with the mountain range, its entire appearance could not be seen in the air, so he did not realize that the city below was the ruins of the Cold Desolate Dragon City that he had dreamed of. “Tully, we have the territory and the city now, but because the city is ancient, we need people to build it now. It might be tough for you and the others in the coming days.” “It’s okay, my lord. Since we have chosen to join your territory, this will be our home. We’ll use our hands to build our own home. No matter how tired we are, it’s worth being happy about.” Tully said seriously. It could be seen that he had begun to address Lorne as “Lord” instead of “Mr. Tyrant”. This meant that he had completely changed his identity consciously and had included himself as part of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. “Then, children of the gnomes…” Tully shouted through the airship speaker, “Now that we have left the Gnome Mineral Company and joined a new city, we will welcome a new life here and completely display our talents. Now, everyone, please follow in the footsteps of our Lord to build a new home for us!” Under Tully’s command, the gnome airship began to descend. … “Look, the gnomes’ airship has landed!”  “Why did they land there?” “That’s the map range of the Lake of Death. It’s an area with no level restriction. There might even be Level 100 Bosses there. I really don’t dare to go.” “Strange, why do I feel like they landed in a city?” “Me too…” “Report, report, the gnomes have discovered the ruins of the city. There seems to be a hidden mission!” When the players saw the landing location of the gnome airship on the distant mountain ridge, they saw the outline of the city of Cold Desolate Dragon City. When this news spread on the forum, it immediately attracted the attention of countless people. The players agreed that this was the most core city fortress in the ruins of the war. Discovering this city meant that they had triggered the greatest event mission in the ruins of the war! Therefore, countless players approached the location of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. “What? They found the ruins of a city?!” “Looks like another special mission is about to begin!” “The first City Creation Token has just appeared recently, which means that the game is about to start the era of guild territories. Now that we have discovered the first ruins of a city, I suspect that a territory competition will appear soon!” “Immediately inform all online users to approach the Lake of Death. Once anything happens, we will immediately set off to snatch it!” “Quick! Send people to the target location!” “Everyone, move immediately!” At this moment, all the large guilds were moving nervously. To them, the ruins of such a damaged city were an important resource that had to be fought for. This was because once they obtained the City Creation Token, they could use this city ruins to quickly develop their own large territory. At that time, they would be ahead of any guild in the world and completely control the greatest share of benefits in the game! … In the ruins of the war, in the Doomsday Forest. The beautiful members of the Silver Snow Guild were all working hard to level up in this map, but many of the sisters were not very happy, because their guild leader was thinking about something. She actually did not let them do the potions sales in the ruins of the war, which made many of the sisters’ plan to buy bags be put on hold. “Guild Leader, why don’t you let us bring the goods?” A Priest player could not help but complain. “I can’t explain it either. Anyway, you can’t be wrong to listen to me.” Twinkle Rose frowned. It was difficult to explain to her sisters. She could not say that it was Tyrant who had said something and then she would not compete for the hundreds of billions of dollars in the ruins of the war, right? If she really said that, wouldn’t it make her seem like a useless woman? As the guild leader, why should she listen to that little brother? She would lose all her prestige if they found out. Yes, it was best to deny it no matter what! As she was thinking this, a sister sent news that the gnomes had discovered the ruins of an ancient city near the Lake of Death. It seemed to be the core fortress of the ruins of the war, which was also the center of the entire battlefield. Hearing this, the eyes of the other sisters lit up. They all wanted to leave immediately. Only Twinkle Rose was stunned, then her eyes widened. Tyrant had once reminded her not to stock up, or else there would be a risk of not being able to sell anything. Moreover, he had finally pointed out the ‘City Creation Token’. At the beginning, she had only vaguely felt that it was dangerous, but now, it seemed that this was not only dangerous, but also a tragic outcome! If the ruins of the city that appeared were the guild base in Tyrant’s plan, the Doomsday Forest and even the entire potion market in the ruins of the war would become his alone! “Sisters, let’s not care about the ruins of that city. Hurry up and farm monsters. We’ll reach Level 30 by the end of tomorrow!” Twinkle Rose made the opposite choice again and sent the information to the guild management group. Immediately, all the sisters of the Silver Snow Guild were confused. “Guild Leader, what’s wrong with you recently?” “Your thoughts are so abnormal. I don’t understand.” “I’ll warm your bed tonight. Can you tell me your thoughts?” “Sister Twinkle, I’ll give you a bath. Please clear my doubts.” “Sister, I’m completely stunned!” … [Cold Desolate Dragon City] Five huge airships landed on the square of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Before it descended, Tully felt that the gnome team he had brought would definitely be able to repair the city quickly. Only after it really descended did he realize how ridiculous his idea was. In front of him was an extremely huge square. Even if there were a thousand-meter-long Gnome Airship or five landing ships, they only occupied a small portion of the square. In the distance, huge buildings made of rocks were hundreds of meters tall. They looked very majestic, causing the gnomes to gasp. Even the ground could make all the gnomes open their mouths. This was unbelievable. It was beyond their imagination. Perhaps the people of other races would not be so shocked when they saw this scene. However, as a race that specialized in building, the gnomes knew how great this building was. Even in the entire world, there was no other building as magnificent as this. Although this building was not as large as Iron Skull City, the materials and overall design used in it were unprecedented. Take the bricks under his feet for example. This city used ancient rocks, and every piece was cut as a whole, nearly ten meters long. On the other hand, the ground of Iron Skull City was only a one-meter square Green Patterned Rock. Although the total area was larger, in terms of the construction difficulty and the defense effect, it was much lower than this city. “Every piece is an ancient rock. Each piece is ten meters long and the ground is huge. Don’t tell me…” “Lord, please tell me. Is this that legendary city?!” Tully looked at Lorne almost crazily, wanting to know the true identity of the city. “Eh, take a deep breath first.” Lorne was afraid that the gnome elder would not be able to catch his breath and die on the spot. He quickly let him rest for a while, then nodded and said, “Yes, this is the legendary city.” “Kingdom of the Dragon, this is the Kingdom of the Dragon!!” Tully knelt on the ground excitedly and touched the texture of the rocks on the ground. He could not help but tremble. What? This was the Kingdom of the Dragon?! When the other gnomes heard this term, they were first stunned, then excited. Perhaps the descendants of many other races did not know the meaning of the Kingdom of the Dragon, but the gnomes were different. The gnomes’ ancestors had participated in the construction of the Kingdom of the Dragon, so they had obtained a portion of the construction plan. Coupled with thousands of years of research, they finally obtained wisdom from it. As for the Kingdom of the Dragon, they regarded it as the most important treasure in this world. They did not expect that after they gritted their teeth and left the Gnome Mineral Company, they would come to this legendary city and really become a citizen of it. Standing on the platform, Lorne announced, “Now, I, the City Lord of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, will grant you the status of a citizen. I hope that you can firmly protect our common home and resist any intruders!” From this moment on, all the gnomes in front of him became citizens of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This was a great honor. The gnomes were also abnormally excited. They knelt and thanked Lorne with the greatest respect. Then, Lorne found Tully again and said, “The Cold Desolate Dragon City has been desolate for too long. After the ancient era, the quality of the land changed drastically. The entire Cold Desolate Dragon City has also fused with the mountain range. If we want to repair it, we will have to work extremely hard.” “Don’t worry, City Lord. I will lead them to repair the city.” Tully was confident. Such confidence was what Lorne needed. The current Cold Desolate Dragon City lacked nothing, so it needed to be filled with passion. Then, Lorne opened the territory map and began distributing the living and work areas to the gnomes. The total area of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was 40,000 hectares, and the area of the workshop was 2,000 hectares. Now that the basic cleaning had been completed, they could move in early. Considering that the gnomes were good at building and mechanical construction, Lorne planned to first arrange for them to stay and work in the Construction Guild. In addition, he would give them a large research base beside it. As for what they needed to do the most? What he needed the most now was naturally to repair the collapsed parts of the city. Because the building materials used in the Cold Desolate Dragon City were very hard and the rocks were very huge, there was not much damage again. The damaged areas could be repaired, but the completely collapsed buildings were harder to deal with. This matter could be postponed for a while. The priority now was to repair it, and most importantly, to restore the working ability of the workshop area. Alchemy, forging, building, carving, and other workshops were the most important sources of development for a city. “My lord, do you want to use the Purification Crystal now?” Tully asked. “There’s no hurry. Don’t purify it first.” Now that the City Creation Token had purified the Cold Desolate Dragon City, everyone in the city would not be affected by the undead power, so Lorne was naturally not in a hurry to cleanse the external environment. “Tully, assign the designers a mission. Design a building that can satisfy the needs of the various races as soon as possible. We want to add more lively elements to the original foundation of the Cold Desolate Dragon City.” “You want to build a free city?” Tully immediately understood Lorne’s intention. In this Dragon City, he would build additional buildings that were suitable for the various races. It was obvious that he wanted to build a free city without racial restrictions. This was definitely a bold idea. A free city could do business with all races, but it would also face a huge institutional challenge. After all, all races more or less had animosity. When they were close enough to each other, it was easy to cause friction and conflict. However, Tully thought that was a wise decision. This was because the Cold Desolate Dragon City itself had the title of ‘Legend’. In the future, it would attract the attention of all races. Such a dazzling identity would naturally bring huge benefits, and the free city was the best way to draw in benefits. “Yes, I’ll give you a portion of the area first. Design this area as the main body. After you’re done, let me check.” Lorne looked at the map. Other than the workshop area, the dragon nest, and the underground tomb, there were no other areas on it. This did not suit his thoughts. Since he wanted to build a free city, he had to hide the core building in the city and not let anyone enter casually. Therefore, Lorne first differentiated the City Lord’s Zone from the Commoner’s Zone. His initial plan was to plan for the 5,000 hectares to be the City Lord’s Zone, which included the location of the dragon nest and the dragon tomb. Coupled with the fact that this was the highest castle in the entire city, it could be a symbol of the City Lord’s supremacy. After distinguishing this, the commoner area was easier to distribute. The design area that Lorne had marked out for Tully was 2,000 hectares. He would start with a corner of the city and decide whether to expand it after checking their design. “In addition, inform the mining team to rest today and set off tomorrow to mine the high-level mineral veins in the nearby area.” Lorne took out the coordinates of a few high-level mines and handed them to Tully. These high-grade mineral veins were near the Cold Desolate Dragon City, because this was the core of the geological activity. The mineral veins in the ground were very rich, and a large number of high-grade minerals poured out of the ground as the land changed. Moreover, these spots were very close to Cold Desolate Dragon City. They would not encounter too much danger. “Heavens, there are actually so many rare minerals nearby…” Tully felt numb already. Ever since he came to the Cold Desolate Dragon City, his shock had not stopped. To be honest, he had always thought that building a city would be limited by resources and slow down, but now, it seemed that everything was not a problem. As long as he relied on the output of these high-grade mineral veins and the project he worked with the Gnome Mineral Company, the final benefits could definitely resolve the initial need to repair the Cold Desolate Dragon City. … “Tully, can I retrieve my share of the profits in advance?” Now that the Dragon City was about to be repaired, it would require a large amount of resources. It was impossible to repair the entire city with enough resources, not to mention building buildings in the city. It would cost a lot of money, and Lorne could only rely on the ore veins that were being mined to provide funds. “No. The ores mined in the early stages have to first offset the equipment consumption and labor costs during the mining. Only after doing so can we obtain the profits. Otherwise, without being able to truly see the mine, the Gnome Mineral Company will not be able to determine how much they can earn, so naturally, they will not be able to divide the profits in advance.” “However, you don’t have to worry, my lord. With the complete exploration of the mineral vein, you can use the mineral vein as a guarantee to purchase the resources needed in advance by the Gnome Mineral Company. Of course, the guarantee will be lower than the final dividend by half. This is to share the risk of cooperation.” Tully explained. “In that case, I want to advance another portion of the mining equipment first.” Lorne touched his chin, then said to Tully, “The restoration work in the Cold Desolate Dragon City will be managed by you for the time being. If there are any major problems, report it to me with the communication crystal. By the way, remember to first consolidate the gnome robots and assign them another mission. In addition, check the situation of the teleportation circle. I’ll apply for the right to connect now.” After instructing Tully, Lorne took out the return scroll and crushed it. After returning to Iron Skull City, Lorne went to find Commander Rhett. “Commander Rhett, in response to your call, I have already built a base in the ruins of the war, Cold Desolate Dragon City!” Lorne took out the City Creation Token. At this moment, there was a dragon pattern on it, the emblem of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. “So soon?!” Commander Rhett looked at the emblem on the token in surprise and said in surprise, “Young adventurer, I did not expect you to really build your own territory in the ruins of the war. This is unbelievable. This is the support of Iron Skull City. I hope you can develop your territory as soon as possible.” Ding! “Congratulations on completing the mission [Guild Base Construction]!” “Congratulations on obtaining the mission reward: Stone x1 million, Wood x1 million, Steel x1 million, Sulfur x5 million, Crystal x2 million, Mercury x1 million, Magic Crystal x1 million…” As soon as he finished speaking, countless golden lights flashed on Lorne. A large pile of building materials appeared in his bag. This was the most important help for a territory that had just begun. Especially the magic crystal, it was what Lorne needed the most. “So, when can you complete the teleportation circle?” Commander Rhett was still most concerned about this. In the agreement between him and Lorne, as long as Lorne’s guild base could complete the teleportation circle as soon as possible, he would send the army of Iron Skull City to the ruins of the war to help him quickly build the city. To him, possessing a territory was different from possessing a city. A simple guild base could only be used as a temporary camp. It could not provide any logistics support for the army. However, a city could actually help the army and provide enough help. However, it was definitely not easy to build a magic circle that could cross such a long distance. At the very least, it was extremely difficult for the current adventurers. Even this adventurer in front of him would need some time. He might need another five days or longer. “I’ve already built the magic circle. I came here to connect to the teleportation circle of Iron Skull City.” Lorne calmly took out a scroll. This was the contract magic circle pattern of the teleportation circle in Cold Desolate Dragon City. It needed to be connected to the magic circle pattern of Iron Skull City to teleport. “What?” “You’re done already?!” Commander Rhett was stunned. It had only been a day since the adventurer agreed to meet him, but he had already built the teleportation circle? Hearing this news, he quickly took the scroll and checked it carefully. Then, his eyes immediately erupted with excitement. “Heavens! You actually did it! How is this possible?” Commander Rhett revealed an extremely exaggerated expression, no longer as calm as before. “Quick! Come with me!” After the surprise, he immediately grabbed Lorne’s hand and pulled him in a hurry. When other players saw this scene, there was another piece of hot news. “An unknown relationship between Tyrant and a male NPC!” “Tyrant and an NPC displayed their affection in the city. How romantic!” “Look! This is love that transcends boundaries!” “Why is Tyrant so powerful? That’s because he created a new way to play!” The forum fell into chaos. … Ding! “You have entered the special map—[City Lord’s Zone]!” Following behind Commander Rhett, Lorne entered the City Lord area that no player could enter. After asking Commander Rhett, Lorne learned that the other party wanted to bring him to see the City Lord. Because the expedition to the ruins of the war required the permission of the City Lord, he had to see the City Lord. It was also a good opportunity for the City Lord to see this adventurer with infinite potential. Soon, the two of them entered the largest castle in the City Lord area. In the conference hall, a group of commanders and deputy generals who had returned from the battlefield were discussing something with the City Lord. “City Lord, the land of calamity in the north has deliberately started a war in the Titan Forest. It seems that it wants to disturb our peace, but in fact, it wants to target the Night Elves living in the forest. These Night Elves are natural assassins. Once they are assimilated by the darkness, they will be a huge threat to Iron Skull City.” The commander of the Silver Lion Army said. The City Lord sitting above sighed and said, “But we don’t have time to care about this now. The minions of the dark forces that have infiltrated the borders are all moving in various areas. Our people can’t manage so many places at the same time. The Night Elves can only rely on themselves. What we can do is only stop the invasion of a large-scale Dark Legion. Otherwise, Iron Skull City will have to send troops to every area. The soldiers will be exhausted, and the border battlefield will be affected.” “By the way, how’s the situation at the border?” The City Lord was asking, but Rhett did not bring Lorne in at this moment. The two of them stood outside the door and waited. Lorne was also enjoying it, for he could obtain a lot of game information from their conversation. A commander answered, “The war has been tense recently. The monsters on the northern border have become more orderly. They always attack our fortress orderly, as if they are testing our defense.” “That’s right. The demons in the icy plains of calamity in the north have become orderly like an army, which worries me.” The leader of the Black Rhinoceros Army said, “I keep feeling that they’re planning something, but we don’t know anything about it now. In addition, the Death War Song, Lin Han, broke through the border a while ago and entered the ruins of the war. Who knows what that cruel guy did!” The commander of the Flame Dragon Army asked, “I heard that it’s related to the abnormality in the Lake of Death. Have you investigated this matter, City Lord?” “There’s some progress.” The City Lord of Iron Skull City said in a low voice, “It seems that because of the Naga Queen who was born in the ancient era, she revived in the Lake of Death. Lin Han went to receive her. The abnormality that has occurred at the border recently is very likely because of the addition of the Naga Queen, the icy plain of calamity is unwilling to remain silent and is beginning to stir.” “What? Naga Queen?!”Chapter content is missing or does not exist! Please try again later!  “So you’re the adventurer who made the greatest contribution in the Titan Forest. I know you. I heard that you once obtained 130 million points in the Titan Forest. This is indeed an impressive achievement. After all, you haven’t even reached the Earth Realm yet.” The City Lord of Iron Skull City said. Lorne also observed the other party seriously at this moment. It was an old man with white hair. Although he was old, he was still wearing heavy armor and a black battle axe beside him. From the looks of it, this city lord had also been a powerful warrior. From his current mental state and burly muscles, it could be seen that age did not affect his combat strength. Even his turbid old eyes made this old city lord look a little deep. At the same time, a green name appeared above his head. [Iron Skull City’s City Lord, Ansare] (???) His level and other attributes could not be seen. According to Lorne’s estimation, this old City Lord should be above Level 100 and of very high quality. After all, even the One-Eyed Giant Snake was Level 100. The energy waves emitted by that guy were far inferior to this old city lord. “Cold Desolate Dragon City? What an ancient name. Although you don’t have the spirit of a dragon yet, you have the courage to surpass everything. You actually chose this name.” City Lord Ansare approved of Lorne’s territory, then opened the scroll and said, “Benno, this is indeed a structural scroll for a large magic circle. You should apologize to this young adventurer.” Benno was the name of the leader of the Black Rhinoceros Army. Hearing that the City Lord had confirmed the authenticity of the tool, he chuckled and said, “I’m sorry, adventurer. I was too rash.” “It’s fine.” Lorne did not care. City Lord Ansare asked curiously, “Young adventurer, I would like to know if you built the guild base in the ruins of the war to avoid taxes or for other reasons?” Ding! “Game Announcement: Your answer will determine the City Lord’s opinion of you. Please consider carefully before answering.” The system notification suddenly came. It was unknown what these important figures were thinking. They actually liked to undergo such a strange test. Fortunately, Lorne was experienced. Without any hesitation, he looked into the other party’s eyes and said in a tone that was neither servile nor overbearing, “The lack of taxes is indeed a factor, but it’s not enough to influence my choice.” “I built the guild base in the ruins of the war because of other considerations.” “Firstly, the ruins of the war have the most abundant resources in Iron Skull City. Adventurers spend most of their time in battle. This place is exactly the favorite area of adventurers, and it’s beneficial for the future development of the territory.” “Secondly, the Lake of Death and Iron Skull City balance each other. I built my territory near it so I can use this balance to obtain the greatest sense of security.” “Thirdly, the range of the ruins of the war is too large, and the location is very sensitive. It is under the fortress at the northern border. In the future, if a war occurs, the ruins of the war might cooperate with the dark monsters outside and make the city guards suffer from enemies from both sides. At that time, the war will be extremely dangerous. Therefore, in order to counter this issue, I choose to resist this dark power head-on!” Lorne first spoke of the adventurer’s private thoughts, then added a noble goal that he understood. As a result, his image was immediately elevated. “Young adventurer, although you have your own selfish motives, you also have the courage to take on a huge responsibility. This is a thought that many soldiers of Iron Skull City do not have. I believe you can definitely develop your camp and turn it into a true city.” City Lord Ansare gave him a very high evaluation. Ding! “Congratulations! The City Lord of Iron Skull City, Ansare, appreciates your attitude. You have received +5 affinity with the City Lord of Iron Skull City and +10,000 reputation points in the Empire!” Was that all? Seeing the reward, Lorne frowned. Just now, this City Lord had said it so nicely, but the reward was only this little. It was too stingy. He was just a young adventurer who had just built his territory! ‘If you admire me, you should at least reward me with a warehouse of resources, right?’ Lorne was unhappy at that moment and took the initiative to say, “The war at the border is so intense now, and the unstable factor of the ruins of the war will bring about greater danger. I definitely can’t wait until the war completely erupts before facing this enemy. At that time, I will definitely not be their match.” “The only way to obtain the final victory is to act immediately and use the strength of the adventurers to gradually devour the map that they control. This is the only way!” “In order to organize an effective raid on the adventurers, we need a safe base to support and encourage each team.” “However, I alone am not enough to build the entire city. Therefore, I hope that Iron Skull City can give me some help in terms of resources. Not to mention helping me build a city, but it must help me through the most difficult initial construction!” Facing the gazes of the higher-ups of Iron Skull City, Lorne spoke with a righteous tone, his actions making everyone respect him. City Lord Ansare also nodded repeatedly, “Don’t worry, young adventurer. Everything you do will help Iron Skull City. As the City Lord, I naturally have the duty to help you. Considering your identity as an adventurer, you definitely don’t have enough manpower and resources to build. In that case, I’ll give you two items to support you in completely building the city.” Ding! “You have received special tools from the City Lord of Iron Skull City: Labor Utilization Token, Resource Mobilization Token. [Labor Utilization Token] Category: Special Item Effect: You can recruit workers from the labor conscription office of Iron Skull City to help you complete the construction mission. Effect: Conscription Cost -50%. Distributor: Iron Skull City Lord Ansare [Resource Mobilization Token] Effect: You can go to the resource management office of Iron Skull City to receive the conventional resources needed for the building. (The resource management office will send personnel to your territory and distribute the resources according to the rules after the field evaluation.) Distributor: Iron Skull City Lord Ansare ———— Was this true? Looking at the two tokens he had obtained, Lorne suspected that he had seen wrongly. This [Labor Utilization Token] could allow him to obtain the authority to recruit workers in Iron Skull City. Moreover, these workers were all technical workers who directly belonged to Iron Skull City. The efficiency that each of them could bring was at least three times that of ordinary workers! Moreover, such high-tech workers could be competent in the construction of precise blueprints. They were rare human resources. At the same time, this token gave Lorne the authority to recruit them at half the price. It was very favorable. As for the [Resource Mobilization Token]? This was the building resource that Iron Skull City directly provided to Cold Desolate Dragon City, and it was given for free. Of course, this token only provided conventional resources, such as rocks, wood, steel, and so on. Moreover, it required an official to go to the Cold Desolate Dragon City to do a field survey. Then, the data would be checked and evaluated properly to prevent any phenomenon of malicious hoarding. But that was not the point. What excited Lorne the most was that the two tokens did not limit the number or number of people. In other words, as long as his territory needed it, he could use these two tokens to obtain endless manpower and resources! … “Iron Skull City will support you in completely completing the framework of the territory. At that time, we will use Cold Desolate Dragon City as a transfer station for the city guards to launch a large-scale raid on the ruins of the war.” “However, there are too many monsters in the ruins of the war. The city guards can’t gradually clean up that area. Most of the low-level monsters still have to rely on the strength of the adventurers. This matter might require the cooperation of the adventurer. We’ll open the territory and allow other adventurers to enter. Only then can we truly clean up the ruins of the war.” City Lord Ansare knew very well that the conflict between the adventurers was very intense, especially regarding the territory. Most adventurers would not let other adventurers enter their territory, which was not good for the subsequent war plan. “I understand that everything is for eternal peace and stability. This is a responsibility that every citizen of Iron Skull City should shoulder, but…” “It’s still very difficult to mobilize adventurers like this, so I would like to ask for the City Creation Token to be given to me again. This way, I can use the City Creation Token as a bargaining chip to stimulate the fighting spirit of the adventurers and let them actively participate in this important war. At the same time, in response to the call of Iron Skull City, I will also provide 40 Platinum equipment to promote the development of the plan!” Lorne’s expression was serious. Seeing this scene, all the commanders present were deeply moved. Although 40 Platinum equipment was not an important resource, it was a huge burden for a young adventurer who was only Level 30, not to mention that his territory had just been built. At this critical moment, it was extremely touching that he was still willing to provide resources to support the military operation of Iron Skull City. The most touching adventurer of the year was definitely him! “Thank you for your effort, young adventurer. Your sense of responsibility makes the senior soldiers of Iron Skull City blush with shame.” City Lord Ansare nodded seriously, then bestowed a silver City Creation Token, “Originally, I should not have given you the City Creation Token at this time, but your willingness to contribute to peace has infected me. This City Creation Token will be used as support for your subsequent actions. I hope you can use it appropriately.” “Thank you, City Lord. I will not let Iron Skull City down.” Lorne was pleased to receive the City Creation Token, but he still had to act righteous on the surface. As for Ansare’s reminder? It did not conflict with Lorne’s plan. After building a city, he would open the city and allow all the people from the Order faction in the world to enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City. “Rhett, since there’s a new foothold in the ruins of the war in the north, arrange the following war immediately.” Then, City Lord Ansare looked at Rhett and said, “Some time ago, the Dragon God had once investigated that the Dragon of Darkness was carrying out the resurrection plan of the bone dragon army in the ruins of the war. This matter must be destroyed as soon as possible, so we cannot afford to wait to sweep through the ruins of the war. Go to the Cold Desolate Dragon City with Tyrant now and give him some necessary help and suggestions regarding construction.” “Yes.” … Soon, the two of them left the City Lord’s area. “Should we hire the workers first?” Rhett asked. “Not for the time being. I don’t have any extra money to recruit workers. Commander Rhett, you said that you could send warriors to help me build a city. Look…” Lorne reminded him shamelessly. “Of course, adventurer. I will fulfill my promise and let the warriors of Iron Skull City build your city. Moreover, the City Lord has also said that he wants me to go to the territory to help you build. Therefore, I will personally lead the army to help you this time.” Commander Rhett nodded. Then, he led Lorne to the resource manager to activate the [Resource Mobilization Token]. Then, Rhett arrived at the camp and began mobilizing his troops. Currently, there were eight large armies in Iron Skull City, and each army had between 100,000 to 200,000 soldiers. As a second-grade city, it was definitely unique for it to have a million soldiers. However, even so, the eight large armies were still too busy to care about the territory. Therefore, all Rhett could mobilize was the city guards protecting Iron Skull City. This was the most elite and powerful army in Iron Skull City, the only army that protected it! Originally, this army was rarely mobilized, but now that the situation was urgent, in order to achieve the military goal, Ansare allowed the plan to mobilize the city guards. “Soldiers of the city guards!” “After the war a thousand years ago, we finally obtained a teleportation circle in the map of the ruins of the war. This hard-earned teleportation circle will support our rapid march and logistical supplies. Therefore, now is the best time to suppress the ruins of the war!” “However, before we take action, we have to turn this stronghold into a city to ensure that we can travel between Iron Skull City and the ruins of the war safely at any time.” “Please follow me. Our target is Cold Desolate Dragon City!” With a wave of his sword, the 10,000 city guards in the city camp immediately moved. They followed the main path of Iron Skull City and headed towards the northern city gate. This operation was a cooperation between Iron Skull City and Cold Desolate Dragon City. As the City Lord of Cold Desolate Dragon City, Lorne naturally had to go with the highest-ranking military officer, Rhett. Therefore… The players in the city became hysterical. “What are these NPCs doing?” “What a grand scene. Are they going to sweep through the northern icy plains?” “They’re walking so orderly, it’s like a military parade!” “Look, who’s leading the way!” “Gosh! Gosh! Gosh!!” “Tyrant is too awesome. He can actually lead an NPC army of 10,000 people!” “I’m stunned. Is this really ‘Divine Realm’?” “Where are they going?” Under the gaze of the players, Lorne and Commander Rhett led the 10,000-man army into the teleportation circle and disappeared. Lorne glanced at the location where the teleportation array led and found that there was a choice for the Cold Desolate Dragon City inside. Without hesitation, he hid it first. The repair work in the city had not been organized yet. If he let those players enter, it would only affect the construction progress of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. … Swish! Swish! Swish! In a huge open space, light flashed, and then more than 10,000 people appeared on the spot. Commander Rhett looked around and found nothing but the mountains. It seemed that this adventurer had spent all his energy building the teleportation circle. With that in mind, Rhett said to Lorne seriously, “Don’t worry, adventurer. The warriors of Iron Skull City have higher execution and efficiency. This 10,000-man team can definitely help you quickly build the city.” “That’s great, Sir Rhett. Please follow me.” Lorne led him in one direction. There was also a building near the teleportation circle, but this building had been destroyed, causing it to be a huge mountain range. To see the square clearly, he had to bypass this building. Soon, everyone circled out, but the moment they came out, they were stunned on the spot, their faces filled with shock. Commander Rhett was also stunned. An incomparably huge square appeared in front of him! In the distance of the square, there were many huge buildings. Each was as grand as the profession temple in Iron Skull City! Only then did he realize that the ground under his feet was not a natural ground, but a ground embedded with huge rocks! Each floor was ten meters long! Every building was more than a hundred meters tall! Every region was engraved with ancient runes! Heavens! Was this really the guild headquarters of an adventurer? “The overall structure of the Cold Desolate Dragon City is basically perfect. Now, it’s only the flaw of repairing the city. There’s also the collapsed city wall. Compared to building a new city, the mission is much smaller.” “Commander-in-chief, although you promised me that you would complete the entire construction of the city, and City Lord Ansare has also promised to help us complete all the frameworks of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, I don’t dare to trouble you too much. As long as you can help me repair the parts of the city that collapsed, I can complete the other buildings in the city on my own.” Lorne said gratefully. Pfft— Commander Rhett nearly spat out a mouthful of blood. Did this adventurer misunderstand the word ‘trouble’? For the city in front of him, even if it was only the part that had collapsed, the total workload was far greater than building a new city. It was a huge city wall 70 meters tall and 60 meters wide! Although it was shorter than the city wall of Iron Skull City, the thickness of this city wall was twice that of Iron Skull City’s city wall. Moreover, the length of the collapse made people feel despair. Looking down from above, they could not see the end of the city wall! Who knew how long it would take to repair such a huge city wall! Therefore, this was not just some ‘trouble’, but a construction nightmare that could shock the world! “Adventurer, this city located in the ruins of the war is very important. It is the key to the war, but it will take too long to completely repair this city. The war cannot be delayed forever, so I have decided to mobilize another 90,000 city guards to help you repair the city.” “However, time is limited. It can’t be more than five days. What do you think?” Rhett’s expression twisted. Only now did he realize how ignorant he had been about his promise. If he really wanted to achieve the level he had promised, he would probably have to ask the entire city’s guards to come and work for a long time. Moreover, he had to invest endless resources. The City Lord was too careless. How could he give this adventurer a [Resource Mobilization Token]? This was a huge project that would dry up the warehouse of Iron Skull City! However, at this moment, Rhett had no choice but to discuss with Tyrant and use the work of mobilizing 100,000 troops for five days in exchange. This condition had really reached the limit that he could endure. As for the supplies? He would talk to the City Lord in five days. After all, he had promised to help Tyrant build the city. He could not change his mind now. Lorne nodded happily, “No problem. The army is busy, so I can understand.” To be honest, this result had exceeded his expectations. Originally, asking Iron Skull City to help build a city was not a reliable thing. After all, Cold Desolate Dragon City was too large. Once it was built, it would definitely be an overlord of the region, so Lorne did not have such a plan. Commander Rhett sighed in relief. Then, Lorne arranged work for the city guards. Because they were very high-level NPCs with very powerful physical fitness, the job Lorne arranged for them was to repair the city wall. The collapsed internal city wall was a total of 60 kilometers. It needed to be repaired. Moreover, those huge rocks were in the warehouse area of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. They needed to be transported manually, so this was not too difficult for the strong city guards. As a result, the problem of repairing the city wall was basically resolved. … On the other side, the field investigation NPC responsible for distributing the resources felt his scalp tingle. The city in front of him was larger than he imagined. From the topographic map provided by the Adventurer City Lord, it could be seen that this city covered 40,000 hectares and was larger than any of the eight fortresses in Iron Skull City. If he wanted to build this city, the resources spent would be an astronomical figure. Even Iron Skull City would almost go bankrupt. However, he did not dare to doubt anything. After all, the other party did indeed have the [Resource Mobilization Token] and there was Commander Rhett beside him. Clearly, he had really obtained the City Lord’s permission. Thinking of this, the NPC sighed and continued to calculate the materials needed. A few hours later, he found Lorne. “City Lord, how many workers are there in your city now?” asked the inspection NPC. “There’s only 110,000 now, but I’ll immediately go to Iron Skull City to recruit 2 million workers to help me build the city.” “What? Two million?!” The inspection NPC widened his eyes, thinking that he had misheard. Two million was not just a huge amount. Hiring such workers required a salary payment! According to the recruitment fees of the workers in the city, a worker needed to be paid 1 gold coin per day. In other words, this adventurer would pay 2 million gold coins per day for the labor salary! At the same time, the more labor the other party recruited, the more construction work would be done, and the more materials would be needed. In this way, the inventory of Iron Skull City would definitely shrink crazily. “The speed at which the Cold Desolate Dragon City is being built will directly affect the plan of Iron Skull City to suppress the ruins of the war. I hope that you can complete the allocation of resources as soon as possible and not cause a misunderstanding!” “Perhaps you don’t know the urgency, but I think that the personal actions of Commander Rhett here should allow you to clearly understand that what I said was not false!” Lorne looked at him and said in a low voice. As a player, he could not let go of such a profitable opportunity! In any case, Iron Skull City was huge and rich. Even if they built Cold Desolate Dragon City from beginning to end, it was only a matter of time and would not affect its economic stability. “This…” The inspection NPC glanced at Rhett and realized that he had personally led the 100,000 city guards to build the city wall. As the commander of the Iron Skull City’s army, he had actually personally gone up. This alone was enough to see how much Iron Skull City valued Cold Desolate Dragon City. Thinking of this, the inspection NPC nodded seriously, “Please don’t worry, City Lord. We will do our best to cooperate with you in the construction of the city. Iron Skull City will be responsible for all the needs of conventional materials. Now that I have calculated the first wave of resource requirement data, I will transfer them from the warehouse of Iron Skull City.” “Mr. City Lord, please follow me to the warehouse.” “Yes.” … Soon, the two of them arrived at the warehouse management office. The list of supplies had to be signed by both sides at the same time, which was the rule of Iron Skull City. However, this process was not complicated. In just ten minutes, everything was settled. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the unconditional gift of Iron Skull City. Stone x1 million, Wood x1 million, Steel x1 million, Crystal x1 million, Sulfur x1 million, Water x1 million…” A series of notifications appeared on Lorne’s interface. There were a lot of resources obtained this time, but not all of them. It was the first time the resources were mobilized. According to the normal construction speed, it should be able to last for about 5-7 days. “City Lord, this way please.” After completing the form, the warehouse manager led Lorne to the outer warehouse of Iron Skull City. The warehouse manager pointed at a pile of wood and said, “Mr. City Lord, the supplies you need are all here. However, because the supplies can’t be sent directly through the teleportation circle, we need to send people to transport them manually. If we march at full speed, we might need about three days to reach your city.” In “Divine Realm”, all teleportation arrays could only teleport living beings and could not directly transport resources. If he wanted to transport resources through the teleportation circle, he had to use items with the ability to store space to collect them and be carried by people through the teleportation circle. To put it simply, it was the player’s bag system. NPCs also had military bags and other similar items. However, this could not bear the responsibility of transporting them, because the construction materials were very large. Ordinary military bags were not enough to do this job, so usually, the construction materials would be carried out through carriages and other tools. “City Lord, don’t worry. I have already planned the best route. I can guarantee that the supplies will be sent to Cold Desolate Dragon City in two days. It will definitely not affect your construction plans.” The inspection NPC followed behind and said. “Thank you for the support…” With that, Lorne walked to the lumberyard ahead and touched a huge pile of trees. The next second, light flashed and the entire pile disappeared. In Lorne’s [Dragon’s Treasure Vault], there was a pile of wood. Then, there was the second pile, the third pile, and the fourth pile. The trees disappeared very quickly. In less than ten minutes, the wood that was piled into a mountain had disappeared. Not only that, but the remaining rocks and other resources also disappeared like this. “Is this the Dragon’s Treasure Vault? He even has such a magical tool!!!” Seeing the magical scene before him, the warehouse manager’s eyes widened. He could no longer imagine how large Lorne’s bag was. Was the legend about the Dragon’s Treasure Vault devouring the entire world true? The investigator was also stunned. This young adventurer had completely subverted his understanding. At a young age, he had a huge city and a legendary tool like the ‘Dragon’s Treasure Vault’. It was unbelievable. … “Mr. City Lord, the supplies this time are for the first stage. If you still need them, please inform us in advance.” The warehouse manager said. “Yes, please prepare another batch of conventional resources. Cold Desolate Dragon City might need to be replenished soon.” “Don’t worry, Mr. City Lord. Our storage resources are definitely enough for your needs.” The warehouse manager nodded seriously. Ever since he had heard that the construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was the most important element in the strategic war plans, the warehouse manager had immediately been very enthusiastic, wishing that he could immediately help Lorne complete the construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. In the future, when City Lord Ansare discovered this abnormality, he became dumbfounded. He could never have imagined that his seemingly ‘generous’ decision would make him so ‘poor’! … Next, Lorne left the warehouse management office and entered the Alchemist Association. Cold Desolate Dragon City needed to start construction immediately, repair most of the areas, and build a large number of shops and restaurants. After completing these, the players could replace the labor work and shoulder the heavy burden of building the city. However, now that Lorne did not have enough money to recruit labor, he could only find Doge and see how much the “Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs” had earned. He had to first take out a portion of the earnings to deal with the emergency. “I didn’t expect Mr. Tyrant to start building your territory so soon. It’s really unexpected, but the books are still in the promotion phase and haven’t been sold for much.” “Is there any way to help me raise a sum of money?” “Sure.” Doge nodded and said, “I’ll help you deal with this. How much do you need?” “5 million gold coins!” “No problem. Please wait for me.” Soon, with Doge’s help, Lorne successfully obtained 5 million gold coins. As for whether he should let Doge go to the Cold Desolate Dragon City first? Lorne felt that the sooner the better, because the repair of the alchemy workshop had basically been completed. As for whether to build additional features, it still required Doge’s own opinion, so it was best for him to go as soon as possible. However, the problem was that the current Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs had just been announced. It was currently in the midst of a meeting to discuss, and Doge could not leave for the time being. In addition, as the Guild Leader of the Alchemy Association, if he wanted to leave, he had to first complete the matter at hand. Right now, Iron Skull City was busy producing potions. As the Guild Leader, he had to complete the handover of his work before leaving. … After leaving the Alchemist Association, Lorne finally brought the [Labor Utilization Token] to the labor recruitment area. With this token, Lorne had the right to recruit laborers. However, recruiting laborers required payment, and they also needed to be given food and accommodation. There was no need to worry about their residence. The environment of the Cold Desolate Dragon City after the purification was very good. There was no problem resting in the square. The only thing that needed to be dealt with was food. Lorne had already prepared the funds. This time, he directly recruited 2 million workers, and they were professional workers with skills. The price of the professional workers was twice that of ordinary workers, but the efficiency was more than twice that of ordinary workers. Fortunately, there was also a half-price recruitment effect on the labor requisition order given by Ansare. Therefore, Lorne only spent 2 million gold coins to recruit 2 million technical workers. As for food? The daily consumption of each worker was 1 unit. One gold coin could buy 10 units of food. Lorne directly bought 1 million gold coins of food, enough to solve the problem of food for the people in the city for a week. “Very good. This time, the Cold Desolate Dragon City is going to change!” Looking at the workers who gradually appeared, Lorne’s heart pounded. Although he had spent so much effort and money now, as long as the Cold Desolate Dragon City could be built, everything was worth it. After all, the potential income of a city was much more than what he had paid now. When the players in the main city saw the million laborers, their eyes dropped to the ground. “Gosh! Gosh! Gosh!!” “Are you kidding me? Where did so many workers come from?” “Look, they followed Tyrant into the teleportation circle!” “Did they go to build his territory?” “That’s possible. The City Creation Token in the hands of Tyrant has not been used yet.” “I reckon that earth-shattering news will appear soon.” ….. Then, Lorne began arranging the workers’ work. Because the city was huge, the workers had to be scattered in many areas. After some consideration, Lorne finally chose to let the gnomes who were good at building lead the workers in construction. First of all, the city wall was the most important! Although the city guards were working, in order to complete everything in five days, Lorne decided to assign 500,000 workers to help the city guards build. Then, another 500,000 workers were sent to expand the city wall. Cold Desolate Dragon City was not the Kingdom of the Dragon. It did not need a super-long city wall of 16,000 kilometers, but Lorne hoped that it could have the city defense power of the Kingdom of the Dragon. Therefore, he chose to expand the surrounding 160 kilometers of city wall to the same thickness as the outer city wall of the Kingdom of the Dragon. This was a difficult project with more than 70 million hours worth of work. If an ordinary worker were to undergo construction, he would need 70 million hours to complete all of this. After all, a person’s lifespan was only 30,000 hours. Even if he did not eat or drink, he would have to work for 2333 years to complete it. Just looking at this number made one feel despair. Fortunately, there were enough workers under Lorne this time. If he used 1.1 million people to build it, it would only take two to three days. Finally, Lorne had a million workers left. These workers needed a portion of them to build the wall of the City Lord’s Zone, just like the situation in Iron Skull City. However, this city wall did not need to have powerful defenses. It was only to block the adventurers and creatures of other races who entered the Cold Desolate Dragon City, preventing the core secret of the Cold Desolate Dragon City from being discovered by others. According to Lorne’s calculations, the wall of the City Lord’s area only needed to be built for 20 meters, and because the length of the construction was limited, it only needed five million work hours. Considering this, Lorne directly assigned 100,000 workers to build it, which could end in two days. Then, it was not easy to repair the completely damaged buildings in the city. After calculating it all, with 50 million hours of work, the remaining people could complete the work in about two days. Lorne took a deep breath and began to crazily print the construction blueprint, scattering it into the hands of the construction workers in the various areas. After completing these matters, Lorne arrived at the highest castle in the city alone. This was the unique throne of the city lord. At this height of several hundred meters, he could almost see the appearance of the entire city. “This is just barely enough to restore the Cold Desolate Dragon City.” Looking down from the window, Lorne could not help but sigh. Restoring the Cold Desolate Dragon City was not his goal. The cities of the dragons were too ‘simple’. Because the dragons were too huge, the buildings were also astonishingly huge. Although this scene was shocking, it was too monotonous, especially not suitable for the development of the city. A prosperous city had to have countless buildings. Such a huge building that did not use much space could not bring about economic benefits. Lorne did not want this city to become a tourist destination, as that did not suit his identity as a player. Therefore, after restoring all the buildings in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he still had to build a new city area and turn the Cold Desolate Dragon City into a free city that could allow all races to enter and trade. To fulfill this dream, he needed to spend more money. Thinking of this, Lorne could not help but target the players. There were nearly a hundred million players in Iron Skull City. If he could attract them, the income of Cold Desolate Dragon City would exceed the horizon! Not to mention anything else, just the teleportation circle from Iron Skull City to the ruins of the war was enough to bring him a huge amount of income. “Let’s begin, lest the solo players hoard the potions.” Lorne opened the city announcement and typed an important announcement. He sent it out and went offline to rest. The next moment, all the players in Iron Skull City and even the entire world went crazy. At the expeditionary army camp in the Doomsday Forest, due to the fact that the players were close to Level 30 and that the monsters in the ruins of the war had additional experience, this place became the favorite place for the high-level players. Ever since the last event ended, the players of Iron Skull City had been pouring in endlessly, causing the total number of players in this area to rise. The total number of players in the Doomsday Forest had reached two million. This was a huge player base and also a huge trading market. Because the players’ backpacks were limited, and they had to leave space to contain the loot, all the players in this area could not carry too many potions. In addition, there were no NPC merchants here, so in the end, countless merchant players were born. Many merchants with such intentions would organize hundreds of low-level players to specially transport resources for them. This way, they could earn profits. Under such circumstances, organized and disciplined guilds were more efficient in transporting goods. It was also because of this that they made a killing. However, they had also begun to worry recently. This was because the large team of the World Destruction Guild had just arrived at the expeditionary army camp. They directly transported 1.5 million gold coins worth of goods to take down the huge market like the Doomsday Forest. … “Damn, we’re finally here!” Cross Fire heaved a sigh of relief. This time, the company had invested 3 billion dollars to specifically target this plan. As the representative of this operation, he was under immense pressure. Fortunately, everything went smoothly. All the goods arrived at the expeditionary army camp. “Big Brother Cross Fire, we’re going to be rich this time!” “The goods are 1.5 million gold coins. The market of the Doomsday Forest is ours now!” “I heard that the price of the potions outside has reached 3-4 times. As long as we sell them twice, they will be eliminated by the market!” “That makes sense. If it’s only twice the price, those retail investors won’t earn much at all. They’ll probably all get lost within two days.” “Whether our army can become the main force will depend on this time.” “Needless to say, under the leadership of Boss Cross Fire, we will definitely be the most powerful main army in the guild!” The players of the World Destruction Guild congratulated. “Brothers, when this batch of goods is sold, I’ll give everyone benefits!” Cross Fire also laughed. According to the plan, this batch of goods could earn at least 3 billion, and he had also obtained the market share of the ruins of the war. With such a huge achievement, the company would definitely reward him. He could definitely sit firmly as the Deputy Guild Leader. He might even be able to participate in the company’s higher-ups’ meeting. If that was true, then he had truly reached the peak of his life and had fundamentally changed his fate. “Alright, brothers, let’s start selling the goods now. Use the lowest price in the market to completely destroy those solo merchants!” “Yes!!!” … “Brothers and sisters, the World Destruction Guild is handing out benefits generously. The HP potion is sold for 2 silver coins!” “Selling at a low price, 2 silver coins per bottle. It’s cheap and affordable!” “Come quickly, we’re giving you benefits at a loss!” “2 silver coins per bottle. A sincere business, honest with all customers!” Then, shouts from the World Destruction Guild sounded in every corner of the expeditionary army camp. Hearing this price, almost all the players rushed to the stall of the World Destruction Guild and began to trade crazily. In the Doomsday Forest, the simplest HP potion was basically about 3 silver coins. Only this price could allow merchants to earn profits. Because the cost of these potions was 1 silver coin, the transportation cost for more than 24 hours was 50-100 bronze coins. In total, the cost of a bottle of potion was close to 1.5-2 silver coins. Therefore, a shop like the World Destruction Guild that directly lowered the price to 2 silver coins was completely ruining the market. … “Damn, are the people from the World Destruction Guild crazy?!” “They’re selling it at such a low price. It’s a losing deal. What’s the point?” “This is what I don’t understand. They’re preparing to monopolize the market.” “That’s right. First, sell it at a low price to expel the small players and occupy the market. Then, raise the price and sell it. You’ll make a killing.” “Impossible. If we sell it like this, how many days can we last?” “Are you stupid? They’re transporting goods worth 1.5 million gold coins and have hundreds of millions of bottles of potions. Can you defeat them?” “That’s right. In just three days, us small merchants won’t be able to hold on.” “Quickly sell the goods in your hands at a low price. We can’t earn money in the ruins of the war.” “Evil capitalists, I hate them!!” The merchants in the surrounding stalls were stunned by the World Destruction Guild’s punch. Facing such a violent attack, small merchants like them could not fight back at all. In the end, they chose to sell at a low price and left this area. On the other side, Cross Fire was already smiling. It had only been an hour or two since the sale began, but the small merchants could not hold on anymore and directly left the scene. Only a few large guilds were holding on bitterly. At this speed, those large guilds would probably decrease by a few in two days. In this case, their World Destruction Guild would directly occupy the largest market. “Boss, look at our transaction amount. It’s much greater than that brat Tyrant.” A lackey handed over the transaction data. Cross Fire looked and laughed, “Tyrant is nothing. That kid is alone. How can he compare to more than a hundred thousand of us? His income is nothing compared to us.” At this moment, Cross Fire was extremely arrogant, because in the past two hours, his army had already sold 2 million potions and obtained 40,000 gold coins. Although the profits this time were not much, most importantly, they snatched the market. In the ruins of the war, there were two million players. They needed to consume 20 to 40 bottles of potions per day. If they could take down this market, there would be an endless amount of income in the future. This was something that Tyrant could never do alone. As Cross Fire was fantasizing about appearing on the world’s news tomorrow, a sudden voice sounded in his ear. Ding! “Global Announcement: Congratulations to player ‘Tyrant’ for successfully building the [Cold Desolate Dragon City] and for obtaining the achievement of the first player city in the entire server. You have done a great deed and are now in the annals of history!” “Reward: Wood x1 million, Stone x1 million, Iron Block x1 million, Crystal x1 million, Mercury x1 million, Sulfur x1 million, Gold Coin x2,000!” “Reward: Construction Relocation Card x10, Magic Crystal x1000, Firmness (City Buff) x1.” Ding! “Global Announcement: Congratulations to [Above the Clouds] Guild for officially obtaining the first guild base in the world!” “Reward: Guild Experience +1 million, Guild Member Limit +10,000.” “Reward: Healing (Guild Buff) x1, Protection (Guild Buff), Determination (Guild Buff), Conservation (Guild Buff), Assault (Guild Buff) x1…” “Ding!” “Ding!” The entire server announcement echoed for two minutes. At this moment, all the players in the world went crazy. “Damn, there are so many rewards for creating a territory!” “Just these resources are worth tens of thousands of gold coins!” “What’s this magic crystal?” “Seeing these resources, I feel that I can already see the scene of crazily snatching resources in the future.” “Awakening 11 guild buffs at once. Even a pig can defeat a Boss now!” “Although it’s not that exaggerated, it can indeed increase the strength of ordinary players.” “God Tyrant, please let me join your guild. I will definitely do my best to contribute to the guild!” “Daddy, I’m your long lost son!!” The player forum exploded, and countless players left comments. However, everyone was not surprised by the matter of creating a territory, because they had already known that he had obtained the City Creation Token. What was truly shocking was the reward he had obtained. Just the system alone took three minutes to report all these rewards. It was simply enviable. … Cross Fire was also stunned. This Tyrant really did not know what was good for him. Why did he have to create a territory at this time when it was not good to do so? Didn’t this cover his limelight on the news? Damn, he had to find time to kill that scoundrel! Otherwise, nothing would go smoothly! Cross Fire gritted his teeth. At that moment, a new voice sounded in his ear. Ding! “City Announcement (Tyrant): The first player city in the world, [Cold Desolate Dragon City], is about to be completed in the ruins of the war. It will be opened to the players in two days. You are welcomed to come to the Cold Desolate Dragon City to fight monsters and level up to increase your strength. For the details, you can check the special post that I have released. There is some information about the Cold Desolate Dragon City inside.” In the ruins of the war? When Cross Fire saw this information, he immediately noticed something amiss. For some reason, he had a bad feeling. Thinking of this, Cross Fire quickly opened the forum and checked Tyrant’s post. As soon as he opened it, he saw the coordinates of Tyrant’s territory. It was near the Lake of Death! This coordinate made countless players’ eyes pop out. This was because not long ago, they had discovered that the gnome’s airship had landed in an ancient ruin near the Lake of Death, and the coordinates provided by Tyrant overlapped with the ancient city! In other words, Tyrant’s [Cold Desolate Dragon City] was actually that incomparably huge ancient city ruins!!! This was crazy. To be honest, this result was beyond all the players’ expectations. They did not expect Tyrant to build his territory in the ruins of the war. It had to be known that this was a cursed place. The air was filled with undead power, and the monsters were also abnormally fierce. Once the player city appeared, the surrounding monsters would definitely attack crazily. At that time, the defense of the city would become extremely difficult. If one was not careful, this territory would be destroyed under the feet of the monsters. In addition, that city was too huge. How could Tyrant manage such a huge city alone? Wasn’t he courting death? “Is he building a city or a grave for himself? This Tyrant is crazy!” Cross Fire smiled disdainfully. The Lake of Death was one of the most dangerous maps in the ruins of the war. It was located far away and the surrounding monsters were powerful. Building a city there was completely digging a hole for himself. Not to mention how much money was needed to build a city, just the location was too remote. It was not attractive to other players. After all, the current players did not have the strength to fight monsters. Unless one was a large guild with more than a hundred thousand guild members, there was no hope of developing this border city. With this in mind, it was obvious that Tyrant would definitely suffer a huge loss this time. The money he had earned previously would definitely be spent on building the city and then turn into ruins under the attacks of the monsters. Even if the monsters did not attack, after the other guilds obtained the City Creation Token, they would definitely start a territory war against this city. At that time, how could Tyrant alone defend such a huge city? … “In order to make it easier for my friends in Iron Skull City, I will build a teleportation circle between myself and Iron Skull City. It will save all the players in Iron Skull City a few days of running.” Cross Fire continued to watch as he laughed. “Idiot!” He did not know what this Tyrant was thinking. The monsters in the Lake of Death were so powerful that only a fool would teleport to that damned place. Every player knew that the Doomsday Forest was the most important map in the past month. That brat did not want this good place and actually ran to that remote place to build a city. He was simply foolish to the extreme. While Cross Fire was laughing happily, the next sentence made his pupils dilate in shock. “Here, I have a piece of good news for everyone. That is, the teleportation array in the Cold Desolate Dragon City can teleport to the wilderness and cover the location of the Doomsday Forest. The nearest area is only a short half an hour’s journey from the expeditionary army camp.” “Therefore, I hope that everyone will not be robbed by unscrupulous merchants again. After waiting for two days, you will be able to teleport freely in Iron Skull City and the ruins of the war!” Pfft— Seeing this message, Cross Fire spat out blood. “Impossible! This is definitely impossible! How can Tyrant have a teleportation circle that can teleport in the wilderness! That’s a special teleportation magic circle that even Iron Skull City does not have. How can a low-level player like him have such a thing!” Cross Fire really spat out blood. This was not an outcome he could accept. In order to plan this time, the company had specially drawn out 3 billion alliance dollars to specially compete in the market of the ruins of the war. Boss Speck decided to stake it all. He wanted to use the greatest resources in his hands to forcefully suppress all his opponents and try to control the market at once to obtain the greatest benefits. He, Cross Fire, was the person Speck had sent to follow up on the entire project. If he succeeded in all of this, as Speck’s lackey, he, Cross Fire, would also be valued by his boss and might even make a name for himself in the company. However, if he failed, then all the responsibility would be on him, because Speck was the young master of the corporation and could not bear any responsibility for this failure. In other words, the success or failure of this mission concerned his future, or even his life! “Oh no, my life is completely over…” Cross Fire looked at the information in dejection. If Tyrant was telling the truth, the 1.5 million gold coins worth of potions that they had worked so hard to transport would all be left to rot in his hands. “Two silver coins is too expensive. I don’t want this potion.” “I don’t want it either.” “We can use potions sparingly these two days. We can definitely last for two days. At that time, with teleportation available, who would spend such a waste of money?” “That’s right, I’m not buying it. They might lower the price later.” “They dare not lower it? At that time, they will make a huge loss!” “Hahaha, this is bad.” “The 1.5 million gold coins worth of goods from World Destruction will cost them at least 1 billion in losses!” “This is their retribution for trying to kick us out!” “God Tyrant is the lifelong enemy of the World Destruction Guild!” After seeing Lorne’s post, the players who were still fighting over it scattered. No one was willing to buy it even if it was 2 silver coins. After all, the potions in the main city were only 1 silver coin. No matter how cheap the potions here were, they were still double the price! Unless there was someone with a screw loose, no one would suffer such a loss. Moreover, in Lorne’s post, there were many pictures of Cold Desolate Dragon City, especially the pictures of the teleportation circle. They were very exquisite, so the players could not find any reason to doubt all of this. After all, not long ago, everyone had seen with their own eyes that Tyrant had once led tens of thousands of city guards and then brought millions of NPC workers from Iron Skull City to an unknown place. From the current situation, those people should be working in “Cold Desolate Dragon City”. … “Brother Cross Fire, we can’t sell our potions. What should we do?” The members of the World Destruction Guild were all dumbfounded. They had gathered more than 10,000 people and spent more than a day transporting the herbs from Iron Skull City to the expeditionary army camp. But now, they had only sold a little, but such a huge change had happened. The extremely popular market had actually been compressed to the limit at this moment. Even a bottle of potion could not be sold. Didn’t they say that the supply could not meet the demand? Didn’t they say that they wanted to earn three billion? What was going on? Why did they fail to sell anything after an hour! “Damn you, Tyrant, you’re not human!!!” Cross Fire burst into tears. It was just a game, how could he fool the players like this? Things had already reached the final step. In just two to three days, even if the market of the ruins of the war changed, as long as the potions were sold, he would not lose anything. However, now that the teleportation array of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was out, these goods were meaningless. Even if he sold the goods bought with 3 billion dollars for 1.5 silver coins, there would be no profit. According to the current situation in the market, the price might be maintained at most around 1-1.3 silver coins. It was equivalent to the loss of 20-50 bronze coins for each potion! In that case, the project alone would lose a billion dollars! If Cold Desolate Dragon City was more convenient, they would lose even more, or even reach 2 billion, because they had also loaned 500,000 gold coins worth of goods from Iron Skull City. In short, the guild had suffered a huge loss this time, and his life was completely over. It was all that damned Tyrant’s fault! … Ding! “Message reminder: Your account ending with 1244 has been transferred 500,000 alliance dollars today. (World Alliance Bank)” “Message reminder: Your account ending with 1244 has been transferred 500,000 alliance dollars today. (World Alliance Bank)” Ding! “Message reminder: Respected customer, because your account has automatically reached the Black Gold level of our bank, it has now automatically leveled up for you. You can choose to reveal and hide your information on your own and directly enjoy the top banking manager services of our bank. You can enjoy various preferential services such as investment, property, and borrowing. Please log into the World Alliance account to check for details.” As soon as he went offline, he received several messages from the bank. However, the income was a little strange. Recently, Lorne had not sold any game items, nor had he extracted the profits from the Dragon One shop, so he had no income for the next few days. This message was from the World Alliance Bank. If it was a game, it should be the term ‘Divine Realm Virtual Bank’. Puzzled, Lorne checked and found himself pulled into a chat group. There were only three people inside: Jessica, Nina, and himself. Nina: “Mr. Lorne, my sister and I sent you a red packet just now. Mr. Lorne was super awesome that night. Nina enjoyed it. This is a token of our appreciation.” Jessica: “This is our love for Mr. Lorne, because this is our first time in a relationship. I don’t know how to express it, so I’ll express it in a more direct way. Please forgive me.” Nina: “Sister, there’s no need to explain. Mr. Lorne understands.” Jessica: “It’s okay to explain. In addition, when is Mr. Lorne planning to move here?” Nina: “That’s right, that’s right. I’ve already prepared a house for you and even reserved a villa near us. We’re in Mansion 1 and Mr. Lorne will be in Mansion 2. It’s very close.” Jessica: “Last time, Mr. Lorne said that he would arrive a few days later, but we have already waited for more than ten days.” Nina: “It’s exactly ten days since we left. Sister, I really miss Mr. Lorne.” Jessica: “I miss him too, but he always says he’s busy.” Nina: “It’s been so long since you came. Mr. Lorne, did you sleep with someone else?” Jessica: “I don’t think so. Although we’re not very skilled, we’re all very beautiful and have taken the initiative to learn a lot of skills. Mr. Lorne should not be interested in others.” Nina: “I guess so. Then, please take good care of your body. When we come, we can test out our new skills and guarantee that we can take down that fierce guy!” Jessica: “@Lorne, don’t work too hard. I’ll do my best to deal with your sister’s issue. Also, the two of us will give you a million dollars each month. We don’t want to interfere with the rest. We just want you to not have any emotional or physical contact with other women for the next few months.” Nina: “Yes, yes. Please focus on dating us.” “…” Looking at the series of messages in the chat group, Lorne did not know what to say. The women of the richest family were indeed different. Even their pocket money was calculated by the million. If such a good thing happened before the game began, to be honest, Lorne would not have chosen to play it. Unfortunately, the current Lorne would prioritize his progress in the game. He had to make decisions based on the game’s situation. After all, Lorne already knew the authenticity of “virtual reality materialization”, so nothing could affect his determination to succeed. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios When would he go find them? Lorne felt that he had to wait a little longer. Now that the construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City had reached a critical juncture, he did not have any thoughts of dealing with other matters. In any case, his sister had already received the best medical care. There was no need to worry about anything else. Lorne planned to find time to go to the high-level Energy Zone after the construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was complete. The next morning, Lorne woke up in his small villa. As soon as he logged into the Divine Realm account, a pile of friend notifications popped up. “Leader, you’re completely famous now!” “In the entire game, everyone is discussing your Dragon City.” “Leader, I should be done with my matters in reality these two days. Can you let me enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City?” “Leader, are you asleep?” “Leader…” Super Rich sent a pile of messages. This super-rich tycoon seemed to be busy with the business in reality recently. He only entered the game occasionally during this period of time. He did not even have the time to loot such a huge market like the ruins of the war. Lorne was not about to reply, but thinking of the business development in the city, he agreed. In two days, the restoration of the Cold Desolate Dragon City would be completed. At that time, it would be completely open to all the players. Before doing this, it was also good to let Super Rich come and see the situation. In terms of business, he was a true big shot. After replying, Lorne checked the message. “Brother Tyrant, thank you for your reminder. I avoided the risk of selling overpriced potions.” “However, Brother Tyrant, you have really made the World Destruction Guild anxious. Those guys are looking for you all over the world.” “Look at the forum. The World Destruction Guild has gone crazy and is crazily flooding the forum.” “Brother Tyrant, no matter what you do, remember not to expose your identity in reality. Those fellows from the World Destruction Guild are not good people.” “Little Brother Tyrant, did you see the message?” “No way. You went offline so early. Did you go masturbate?” “Quickly reply to me…” All the following information came from Twinkle Rose. “It’s none of your business whether I masturbate or not. However, since I’ve given you such a huge help, shouldn’t you express your gratitude? For example, use your feet to help me?” Lorne teased the beautiful guild leader playfully and immediately felt much better. Then, he opened the webpage and prepared to enter the game’s official forum. But the next moment, a pile of headlines appeared. “Divine Realm player ‘Tyrant’ has successfully obtained the first player city. According to the initial evaluation of the experts, this city is worth 100 billion!” — Financial Daily. “The path to wealth brought about by the game records the unbelievable experience of the Divine Realm player Tyrant!” — Global Daily. “The financial experts point out that playing a Divine Realm game is the simplest way for young people to create wealth and value!” — Global Financial Network. “The World Alliance’s official publicity department has issued instructions to promote players like Tyrant. They are to encourage citizens to enter the Divine Realm and explore the spiritual world. They are to provide important help to the country in its research on ‘Virtual Reality’!” — Trending News. Lorne froze. Ever since he became famous in the game, these media companies treated him as a wealth engine. As long as something happened, they would report it globally. Especially today, regarding the matter of him building a city, it had actually been reported for half an hour in a specific news broadcast time of the World Alliance. This was a ‘honor’ that had never been obtained by any event in the past. “By the way, shouldn’t these guys pay for the advertisement?” Lorne shook his head and smiled. Then, he opened the game forum. The same thing happened again. A series of trending posts appeared on the forum. “Shocking! The first player territory in the world appears!” “Super Shocking! Player Tyrant leaves Iron Skull City with a million NPCs!” “Where did the 10,000 City Guards go with Tyrant?” “The market of the ruins of the war will be completely ruled by Tyrant!” “The first player main city—Cold Desolate Dragon City! Scene Exposed!” “The strongest player in the Divine Realm, Tyrant, has publicly announced that the first city of the players will be opened in two days!” “…” In the forum, all the players went crazy. The value of a player city was unimaginable to ordinary people. In the eyes of the business big shots, the value of a mature city with a certain scale was no less than that of a large corporation. According to the analysis of the professionals on the Internet, the initial value of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was at least 100 billion! This was a conservative estimate considering many factors. Some bold scholars online directly estimated the value of 1 trillion. Although they had not specifically checked the true size of the Cold Desolate Dragon City and did not have any detailed internal information, as long as they saw the use of the Cold Desolate Dragon City in the ruins of the war, it was enough to make them believe that this was not only a player city, but a huge gold mine that would continuously generate wealth! However, Lorne felt that these guesses were too conservative. Cold Desolate Dragon City was a huge city with 40,000 hectares. Coupled with the unique geographical location, it occupied the key map resources that the former players needed. At the same time, because the environment of the ruins of the war was very special, the players’ consumption was higher. In Lorne’s eyes, this city was priceless. After all, with the virtual reality materialization effect, if this city or the army in the city could be conjured in the future, the effect would exceed all the benefits that Lorne would obtain. Therefore, the offers on the Internet were meaningless. Those capitalists who wanted to invest in the Cold Desolate Dragon City would not be able to do so. … “World Destruction Guild?” Lorne continued to search and found that the non-pinned posts were all occupied by the members of the World Destruction Guild. Several posts were made in succession, not giving anyone a chance to send a message. “Tyrant, please reply if you see anything. I’m the Deputy Guild Leader of the World Destruction Guild, Cross Fire. I have something to discuss with you.” Again? Lorne frowned. Lorne did not want to open it. However, it was different this time. He was a little curious about what the other party would say, because Lorne knew that their intentions were most likely regarding the Doomsday Forest. After all, these guys had transported goods worth 1.5 million gold coins. Now, because of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the market had directly collapsed. Hundreds of millions of potions were left in their hands.. It would be strange if they did not take the initiative to find them. “Tyrant, there was a misunderstanding between us previously, but we have already apologized. I hope you don’t take this to heart. After all, this is a game. Peace between the players is the most important.” “If you really hold a grudge, we are willing to compensate you. We will even leave the position of Deputy Guild Leader empty for you. As long as you say a word, we will agree to any condition.” “In addition, we have a cooperation project that we can invite you to join. As everyone knows, our World Destruction Guild has already transported the goods of 1.5 million gold coins to the Doomsday Forest and will be able to sell them all immediately. In order to ensure the greatest benefits, we hope that you can delay the opening time of the city. Of course, for this, we will also give you generous benefits. After the potions are sold, we can directly give you 500 million alliance dollars!” “I believe this is not a small income for you. Now, as long as you delay the opening of the city for a few days, you can easily earn 500 million dollars!” “This time, our World Destruction Guild has displayed the greatest sincerity. We also hope that you can give us face and consider it carefully. If you have considered it, please call me. The contract and deposit are ready at any time.” World Destruction: Cross Fire. After checking the information, Lorne smiled. He did not know if the fellows from the World Destruction Guild really had good taste or if they were helpless and wanted to rope him in. Moreover, they were really sincere this time. After all, the message was so long. This was unique. But were they mistaken about something? ‘As the City Lord of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, I directly control the market in the ruins of the war. You actually want to share some of the profits with me?’ Was his brain rotten? Couldn’t Lorne monopolize all the income? Did he have to give them a share? Moreover, the World Destruction Guild could not change their ways. They had clearly encountered a crisis, but what was written in the document seemed like it was their act of kindness. With that in mind, Lorne decisively left a message. “You want me to give you face?” “Are you worthy?” “If you really want it, I can give you a tight slap on your face!” In the game’s internal forum, all IDs were tied. The moment Lorne’s reply appeared, the post immediately exploded… “Oh mighty Tyrant!!” “The World Destruction Guild still wants God Tyrant to give them face? What are they thinking?” “I’m dying of laughter. Cross Fire has a brain tumor for sure!” “Do you still want face? Do you want a slap instead?” “Hahahaha!!” “As expected of Tyrant, he doesn’t care about the World Destruction Guild.” “I heard that the Cross Fire project is going to lose a billion dollars. He’s begging Tyrant, but he’s not familiar with this method. If you kneel and cry, perhaps Tyrant will pity you and agree.” “Haha, that’s too much, brother.” … He closed the post. Lorne continued to check the forum and found that other than the posts of the World Destruction Guild, there was only talk about Cold Desolate Dragon City. Almost all the players were discussing how much money Tyrant would earn after he had a city. In addition, a large number of live streamers were asking for the route to the Cold Desolate Dragon City, hoping to go there before the opening. Lorne did not care about them. There was a very terrifying monster group outside the Cold Desolate Dragon City. 99% of the players could not directly cross it. At most, they could see some outlines on the distant cliff. After checking and failing to find any useful information, Lorne closed the forum. Then, he put on the game helmet. “Log in!” Lorne entered the game again and appeared in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Ding! “Construction [External City Wall] repaired by 0.1%. Current Progress: 69.47%.” “Construction [Dragon’s Clock Tower] repaired by 0.1%. Current Progress: 77.93%.” “Construction [Alchemy Workshop] repaired by 0.1%. Current Progress: 91.55%.” “Construction [Giant Fountain] repaired by 0.1%. Current Progress: 92.39%.” “Construction [Dragon Statue] repaired by 0.1%. Progress: 99.01%.” “Construction [Internal City Wall] built by 0.1%. Current Progress: 10.43%.” “…” Immediately, Lorne received a series of information notifications. It could be seen that under the cooperation of two million workers, the various buildings were repaired. Most of the current work was to repair the buildings. The outer city wall was the greatest problem. A total of 1.1 million people worked at various stages of the city wall, but the progress was still slow. According to the current entry, the expansion mission of the city wall should be completed in two days, but a portion of the collapsed work should still be left behind. In this aspect, the construction team who built the city wall of the City Lord’s area could help. The city wall construction of the City Lord’s area was relatively simple. It could be completed in about a day and a half. The remaining time was just enough to help the outer city wall complete its construction. However, there was another important problem, which was the destroyed buildings in the city. Those severely damaged buildings were already difficult to repair. They could only be rebuilt, but the difficulty of rebuilding was very high. After all, the building materials in the Cold Desolate Dragon City were very huge, and the construction difficulty was also very high. It would be very difficult to rely on these workers alone. With that in mind, Lorne arrived at the Construction Guild. The elites of the gnomes worked here, as did Tully, who was in charge. Especially after obtaining a portion of the construction blueprint, he was completely obsessed. He had been staying in the research room for a long time without eating or drinking. He did not even notice Lorne’s arrival. Only until Lorne was beside him and called out that Tully looked at him in surprise. “My lord, you’re here at the right time!” “Look, this is the construction blueprint for the Cold Desolate Dragon City that you gave me. To be honest, the layout here is simply unbelievable. Its building looks very conventional, but the details of the construction are extraordinary. Even the location of the building is not casually arranged. Behind the seemingly messy structure is a huge plan!” “The cracks that were deliberately left, the floor inlaid with crystals, and the engraved totems are actually filled with meaning. When these things are all combined into one, they will form a complicated and huge magic circle. This magic circle is extremely ancient, incomparably huge, and its effect is also extremely mysterious!” Tully excitedly displayed his discovery. Lorne had already seen this from the original blueprint of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This magic circle was the final result of the first Ancestral Dragon comprehending the power of the Divine Dragon of Order. Its name was—Ancestral Dragon City Barrier Formation. If this protective magic circle was activated, the patterns in the entire city would have the effect of condensing the surrounding earth veins and the energy in the sky, finally forming a powerful dragon made of energy. If it was the Kingdom of the Dragon, this energy dragon would be able to erupt with power comparable to that of a god. In terms of defense alone, the Kingdom of the Dragon was a first-level main city that could surpass Iron Skull City and even the Empire Alliance. Unfortunately, the Cold Desolate Dragon City was a much weaker city. Without the outer city wall of 16,000 kilometers, it was not a complete city, so the final force decreased rapidly. In the ideal state, this magic circle could also unleash the power of a Demigod, which was on the same level as the protective magic circle in Iron Skull City. But if it was just like now, with the buildings everywhere damaged, the power would decrease rapidly. As for how powerful the energy could be released now? In fact, Lorne could not explain it himself. He could only say that the higher the recovery rate of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the greater the energy gathered by the magic circle. … What Lorne handed to Tully this time was only the blueprint for the workshop area and some living areas, but he could discover this very hidden magic circle from it, which showed that Tully was indeed a rare talent in building knowledge. But now was not the time to study it in peace. “Tully, I’ll study it later. Now, let’s do something else.” “No problem, my lord. I have to find time to digest the knowledge I just obtained. I can’t figure out its specific use in the short term.” Tully nodded seriously and asked, “Then, what new mission are you giving me?” “Many buildings in the Cold Desolate Dragon City have been destroyed. I wonder if you have the ability to complete the construction?” Lorne asked. “I was about to ask you the same question.” Tully said, “It’s difficult to rebuild the destroyed buildings in the city, but it’s not impossible. The Gnome Mineral Company has a specialized construction team. If we can find them, there’s hope of completing the buildings in a short time.” “In addition, considering the many patterns on the buildings, we need professional sculptors. This can be handled by high-level gnome robots, but there are too few robots in the city. To support such an efficient project, 200 high-level gnome robots have to work at the same time.” 200? Lorne wanted to roll his eyes. High-grade gnome robots were not for sale. If he wanted to buy them, he had to use the complete Dragon Crystal. How could it be so easy to obtain this thing? Moreover, one Dragon Crystal could only purchase 10 high-level robots. In other words, he had to have 20 Dragon Crystals to achieve his expectations. Wasn’t this a joke? At this moment, Tully said, “Lord, don’t worry. My grandson, Turado, admires you very much. You can build a cooperative relationship with him and let him lead the construction team to build the city. I believe he will be willing to enter this legendary city and will definitely give you the best discount.” “How about this? I’ll leave the cooperation with the Gnome Mineral Company to you. Hand the financial report and proposal to me and you can arrange for them to work as soon as possible. We have to restore the city as soon as possible.” “By the way, Tully, there don’t seem to be any city defense weapons in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. It’s difficult to build the Crystal Cannon for the time being. We need to build some defense buildings to pass the time without the city defense cannons.” Lorne spoke again about his next construction plan. Previously, it had been said that the Cold Desolate Dragon City was the city of the dragons. With the powerful strength of the dragons, there was no need to build any weapons in the city. But now that it was Lorne’s territory, it could not remain the same. Lorne planned to build crystal towers, arrow towers, and other defense buildings in the city to increase the city’s defense. After all, this was a ruin of the war and was at the border of the Doomsday Forest and the Lake of Death. There were countless monsters around. If he attracted the hostility of powerful monsters, it would be difficult to resist. “Please rest assured, my lord. When I was studying the blueprint, I had already discovered this problem. A few hours ago, I had already informed the design department to quickly design a reasonable set of city defense buildings with the city as the foundation.” “In addition, I think you can use high-level materials to cooperate with the Gnome Mineral Company.” “Because our gnomes like to study machinery, there is a huge need for high-grade mineral materials. Moreover, recently, the laboratory has been undergoing a special experiment that requires a large amount of ‘Mithril Essence’. Today, our surveyors brought back news that there is a sulfur mine that contains a large amount of ‘Mithril Essence’. I think this might help us create the Crystal Cannon as soon as possible.” Tully said his thoughts seriously. “Yes, that’s a good suggestion.” Lorne nodded, “But the Crystal Cannon needs a lot of materials. Can the Gnome Mineral Company provide them all?” “No, only the Human Empire has the Olympiad Runes and the Amorphous Matrix Runes. These are the core elements. Without these two sets of magic circle patterns, there’s no way to complete the Crystal Cannon.” “However, the Gnome Mineral Company can provide all the remaining materials. In this way, we can create it first. As the final step, the magic circle runes can be fused after it is obtained.” “This might not allow us to immediately have crystal cannons, but it can allow us to obtain the Crystal Cannon as soon as possible in the future to prevent any unexpected situations. Otherwise, it will take too much time to develop it again.” Tully said. This made Lorne’s eyes light up. It was naturally a good thing to be able to build it in advance. Once he obtained the two sets of array patterns in the future, he would immediately be able to obtain the Crystal Cannon. Lorne immediately nodded, “Let’s do as you think. During this period of time, we have to immediately implement our plans for the city defense buildings and the city defense weapons. With the constant war in Iron Skull City, we can only survive in this chaotic era with a reliable defense of our own.” “Yes, I’ll arrange it now!” Ding! “Construction [External City Wall] repaired by 0.1%. Progress: 98.47%.” “Construction [Dragon’s Clock Tower] has been repaired.” “Construction [Alchemy Workshop] has been repaired.” “Construction [Giant Fountain] has been repaired.” “Construction [Dragon Statue] has been repaired.” “Construction [Internal City Wall] has been completed.” “…” Soon, the second night arrived. After two days of construction, the restoration of the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City was almost completed. Most of the buildings in the city were revived. As long as the damage was not more than 30%, there was a possibility of repair. The buildings that were more than 50% damaged were all cleaned up. Even the remaining buildings were removed. As a result, in this huge city that occupied more than 40,000 hectares, apart from the sparse huge buildings, most areas were very empty. The entire building also gave off a grand feeling. The construction of the city wall was not completed yet. Lorne had no choice. The funds needed to pay two million workers were too high. In just these two days, he had already spent a total of five million gold coins. If he converted it to alliance dollars, the total price would exceed 10 billion! Lorne could not help but sigh. Outsiders only saw how much he could earn, but no one knew that such a powerful player with a net worth of more than a billion had already become a billionaire in debt. Fortunately, the towering city in front of him filled Lorne with confidence. After losing ten billion today, in the near future, he would definitely be able to rely on today’s investment to obtain a return of ten, a hundred, or even a thousand times! With that in mind, Lorne finally felt better. He opened the city map. It could be seen that the blueprint for the Cold Desolate Dragon City had changed. There were many additional facilities on the original Cold Desolate Dragon City. The largest and most obvious was the division of the City Lord’s area. It had completely divided the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City into two parts. First was the [City Lord’s Zone]. This was called the “inner city” by Lorne! The total area of the inner city was 5,000 hectares. There were temporary dragon nests, dragon tombs, Dragon King’s Castle (600 meters) x1, tall buildings (300 meters) x2, ordinary tall buildings (100 meters) x7. The construction of the dragons was made very large, but unfortunately, most of the buildings were empty. In the future, he had to build them again to increase the efficiency of the buildings. Next was the [Commoner’s Zone]. This was called the outer city by Lorne! The outer city had a total area of 35,000 hectares, including all types of living areas, workshops, warehouses, and so on. Other than the general regional distribution, there was also the resurrection array x3, teleportation array x3, ordinary tall building x20, ordinary building x45. From these numbers, it could be seen that the buildings in Cold Desolate Dragon City were relatively empty. Most of the areas had huge empty spaces, unlike Iron Skull City which was filled with shops and restaurants. Lorne was also prepared to transform a portion of Cold Desolate Dragon City into a city that was suitable for humans like Iron Skull City. However, this project was a little huge. He had to hand it to the players and let them take the initiative to build the city. “Then this highest building will be the core Administrative Hall.” Lorne designated the 600-meter-tall building as the core Administrative Hall. Under normal circumstances, after a battle between the two cities, when the warriors of one territory broke through the core Administrative Hall of this city, it meant that the entire city would fall. This was also one of the reasons why Lorne wanted to differentiate the inner and outer cities. “Dragon King’s Castle?” “That’s a strange name.” “I should change the name to Cloud Top Hall.” Above the Clouds was the name of the guild, and as the guild base, it was natural for Cold Desolate Dragon City to name this most important building ‘Cloud Top’. After he finished modifying it, his friend list suddenly lit up. It was Super Rich. “Leader, is it convenient for me to go take a look at the Cold Desolate Dragon City now?” “Sure.” Lorne agreed. Now that the basic construction of the Dragon City was about to be completed, and it was very close to the ‘two days’ time that he announced back then, he estimated that in a few hours, the teleportation array of the Cold Desolate Dragon City would be completely opened. Therefore, letting Super Rich enter the city would not affect anything at all. … Swish! A light suddenly appeared on the teleportation magic circle of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. It was Super Rich, who he had not seen for a while. “My god, Leader, you’re too awesome!” Super Rich looked around and realized that there were towering buildings nearby. There were buildings more than a hundred meters tall everywhere. The highest building at the back was as high as the clouds and were connected together. It was shocking. In the distant square, a large number of gnomes were busy in the city. The tens of thousands of city guards were responsible for transporting them. It was a spectacular scene. Just from this alone, Super could clearly understand that his choice back then was not wrong. This young man really had the ability to change the entire virtual world. This city would also be an important beginning for him to build his empire. He believed that in the future, this young man would truly control the wealth of this world and become the richest man in the world comparable to him. “Leader, previously, you said that you would hand over the business of the Cold Desolate Dragon City to me. Is that true?” Super Rich looked at Lorne expectantly. As a real businessman, Super Rich knew the value of this city. If they could obtain a business share, it would be very profitable, even more so than having a large corporation. “Don’t worry. I’ll leave part of the business to you. After all, the city is so huge. I can’t manage it alone. “Thank you, leader!” After receiving an affirmative answer, Super Rich was a little excited. In the past, when he was doing business in the real world, he had never failed. This time, the battlefield was actually in the virtual world. This made his heart, which had been still for a long time, surge again. Looking at the surroundings of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Super Rich said seriously, “As the only place where there is a teleportation circle in the ruins of the war, for a long time in the future, Cold Desolate Dragon City will become the central gathering place where the players go. With its geographical location, this place will become a true super commercial center. With the special geography of the ruins of the war, the future transactions of equipment, potions, and items will be very common, and this also means that the market is incomparably huge.” “In the potion business, Cold Desolate Dragon City can basically monopolize the market. In order to prevent other merchants from competing for the market, we can limit the price to less than 1-1.5 silver coins.” “The recycling business of equipment is basically monopolized. We can recycle at a maximum of 20%!” “The repair business is also a considerable income, but compared to other businesses, it’s slightly insufficient. We can reduce the cost and form the style of the main city, while also winning people over.” “Revival can also be charged. 1-10 silver coins. I believe the players can accept it.” “There’s also the auction house. Like other main cities, we can charge 5% fees.” Super Rich analyzed all the businesses in detail, his opinion basically in line with Lorne’s. Originally, Lorne was not confident in his plan, but when he heard that this real businessman thought so, he became even more convinced. He also believed that the potion business was the most profitable business in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Although the profits were relatively small, when the quantity was huge, it could also bring huge benefits. Recycling was also an important business. The money earned by second-hand merchants was very high, not to mention that he did not have to invest. He only needed to collect them all and sell them to Iron Skull City. The repair business had low profits, and there was no profit to be made! This was not what Lorne had expected. He felt that Super Rich’s plan was worth referencing. As a player’s main city, he indeed needed some special benefits to attract solo players. To a city, the flow of people was the symbol of wealth. The small benefits given by the Cold Desolate Dragon City could allow the total number of players in the ruins of the war to increase greatly. There might even be a chance to exceed 10 million people. It was equivalent to the entire market expanding by five times! … “When other merchants bring potions to the ruins of the war, the cost is 1.5 silver coins. I’ll set the price at 1.5 silver coins and completely stop others from snatching the market.” “Other than the main businesses, other businesses can be opened up. This way, we can keep the core members of other factions and also increase the passion of the merchants in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. As long as I draw taxes, I can earn money without doing anything.” “The tax in Iron Skull City is 12%, so I’ll make it 20%!” “The resurrection cost is 50 silver coins per attempt!” Lorne gritted his teeth. As the saying went, ‘If one was not ruthless, they would not earn enough’! Since he wanted to earn big money, he had to be bold. Who cared about reputation, he had to maximize the earnings first. “Leader, you’re really ruthless.” Super Rich gave him a thumbs up. 50 silver coins was equivalent to about 1,300 alliance dollars. Most players could not afford to die at such a price. However, the problem was the benefits of the ruins of the war. The monsters here had a higher drop rate. If they could kill monsters here steadily, the daily income would be very impressive. Therefore, for the sake of their own benefits, if the players accidentally died, they should still endure the pain of resurrection. After all, even if they returned to Iron Skull City to revive, they had to pay the cost of teleportation anyway. “Thank you.” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up as he said, “This is only the foundation. Most importantly, the cost of teleportation from Iron Skull City to Cold Desolate Dragon City is 10 gold coins per teleportation!” “10 gold coins?” Even Super Rich was stunned. 10 gold coins was equivalent to more than 20,000 alliance dollars. How could a player afford such an expensive toll? Although the high teleportation fee was necessary to prevent players from deliberately returning to Iron Skull City and spending in Iron Skull City before using the teleportation circle of the Cold Desolate Dragon City to descend into the ruins of the war, this teleportation price was still too high. Even the players of large guilds could not accept the high cost. “10 gold coins!” Lorne nodded and continued, “However, we have another rule. All players have one use of the teleportation circle at 99.9% discount every week from Iron Skull City to the Cold Desolate Dragon City. If they used the teleportation circle of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, they would only need to pay 10 silver coins to go to the surrounding map of the ruins of the war!” “Brilliant, Leader!” Super Rich nodded repeatedly, “This way, the players who enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City will not leave the city casually. The business income in the city will also remain stable.” “It’s not brilliant. It’s just a small trick.” Lorne smiled happily. “By the way, Leader, shouldn’t you rebuild this place?” Super Rich looked at the large empty space in front of him and felt that it was a waste. After all, this was the main road in the city. There should be enough shops here. Otherwise, it would be difficult to support the patronage of so many players. “It’s already planned. The construction will begin soon.” Lorne looked at the repair progress of the city wall and found that it was about to be completed. He led Super Rich towards the city wall. … Now that his business plan had basically taken shape, Lorne did not have to worry too much. Other than the main business in the city, the other related businesses were all handed over to Super Rich to manage. This guy was not just shrewd but also had strong professional knowledge. With him managing it, Lorne believed that he could definitely bring enough benefits to the Cold Desolate Dragon City. As for now? It was time for Lorne to prepare to open up the Cold Desolate Dragon City. First of all, he needed some city guards to maintain the security in the city. Lorne had a plan for this a long time ago. He quickly found Commander Rhett. “City Lord Tyrant, the city wall project is almost completed. What do you want us to help you do next?” Rhett was very professional. He had promised to do it for five days, so he would definitely fulfill his promise. Of course, they had nothing to do after finishing this. With the combined efforts of two million workers, the construction of the city was basically completed. No matter how many construction missions there were, they would not need the city guards of Iron Skull City. After all, they only had 100,000 people, and without professional construction skills, they were not too useful for the subsequent projects. Therefore… “Commander Rhett, after you complete the city wall building, the mission will end. However…” Lorne said, “Cold Desolate Dragon City is a relatively large city and is in a new state. With my personal strength, it’s not enough to take care of everything, so I hope that you can be the city guards of Cold Desolate Dragon City.” City guards? Commander Rhett was stunned. He did not know how to answer. After all, they were the city guards of Iron Skull City. How could they be the city guards in other cities? Wasn’t this asking them to defect from Iron Skull City? “I’m sorry, City Lord Tyrant. As the city guards of Iron Skull City, we cannot join any city, much less become the city guards of any city.” Without hesitation, he rejected it. As a loyal subordinate of City Lord Ansare, he would definitely not betray Iron Skull City. It was also because of his excellent quality that Ansare let him be the commander-in-chief of the army. “I think you’re mistaken, Commander Rhett.” Lorne said, “I don’t want you to join the Cold Desolate Dragon City, but I want you to temporarily maintain the security of the city as a garrison.” “I believe that you know very well that the current Cold Desolate Dragon City is still in its initial stages. Although it has already completed the basic repair work, it has also made me, an adventurer, use all my wealth. If I want to continue building a city, I have to attract other adventurers. Otherwise, the Cold Desolate Dragon City will forever stagnate.” “However, after completely opening up the Cold Desolate Dragon City, I will encounter another problem. That is, the order of the city needs to be maintained. Without enough powerful city guards, the city will completely fall into chaos. At that time, not to mention obtaining benefits, even the city will be destroyed.” “Therefore, I have to let Cold Desolate Dragon City have an army that can maintain order. It just so happens that Commander Rhett is going to lead the army to suppress the monsters in the ruins of the war. There will be a large number of troops stationed here in the future. Even if you carry out a crusade mission, I think you will also leave a portion of the army behind to coordinate and go on rescue missions. This group is basically going to idle in the city. Therefore, I hope that the ones that stay behind can help me share the pressure of a portion of the city guards.” “I believe that Iron Skull City wants Cold Desolate Dragon City to expand. After all, our location is close to the three border fortresses. If we can be the center of the army’s coordination, we might be able to use the fewest armies to provide the greatest support on the battlefield!” Lorne analyzed. The city guards were the targets he had to fight for. Otherwise, the strength of the city guards alone in such a huge city would be very troublesome. Furthermore, he wanted more than five million people to flow into the city. With so many people gathered together, the probability of friction would be very high, so he had to have powerful city guards. The city guards led by Rhett happened to be of this class, and their subsequent mission required them to reserve a portion of their people in the Cold Desolate Dragon City for a long time, giving Lorne a chance. As long as they could accept the job of city guard first, after this period of time, Lorne would definitely develop his own army in the future. When the time came, he could completely take over this job. Hearing these explanations, Rhett fell into deep thought. It could not be denied that Lorne’s suggestion was very valuable. Cold Desolate Dragon City was located at the edge of the Lake of Death and the Doomsday Forest. In the northernmost Dragon Ridge, there was a fortress in Iron Skull City. In the northwest of the Lake of Death and northeast of the Doomsday Forest, there was also a border fortress. Every fortress had a teleportation array that could teleport the armies. However, the problem was that when the Dark Abyss attacked, it often interfered with the teleportation circle and restrained the help between the fortresses. In addition, the ruins of the war had always been at the back of the fortress. To Iron Skull City, it was like a fish bone stuck in its throat. It cut off the connection between the three fortresses and Iron Skull City, causing each fortress to have to fight their own battles after each battle. As for building a city there? Every time Iron Skull City wanted to carry out this plan, the Dark Abyss would definitely put pressure on the border and the border to prevent the plan from progressing. But now, a city that covered an area of 40,000 hectares suddenly appeared in the ruins of the war. Moreover, the location was very ideal. It relied on the Lake of Death to cut off the possibility of the Dark Abyss attacking at full force. At the same time, it was in the middle of the three fortresses. If it was used as the center, it could really let an army support the three fortresses back and forth, with the fewest people, it could be of the greatest use! Thinking of this, Rhett wavered. In fact, he could not refuse, because everything that Lorne said was the plan of Iron Skull City. Now that it had finally been realized, there was indeed no reason to refuse. “Alright, I accept your invitation on behalf of Iron Skull City.” “In the following period of time, because our city guards need to be stationed in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, it will cause a lot of trouble for the city. Therefore, we will contribute to the city guards’ work and actively cooperate to respond to the beneficial actions of the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City.” This was a meeting between the two cities, so the conversation in Iron Skull City that he represented was quite official. But in any case, this matter had indeed obtained the most perfect result. It was good news that Commander Rhett was willing to accept the job of the city guards of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. It had basically resolved the security problem in the outer city. Then, it was time to deal with the inner city. The inner city’s defense was even more serious! Lorne was not worried that the monsters would destroy the inner city, but to prevent some players from secretly entering and investigating the layout of the inner city. “An ant’s nest can collapse the ground a thousand miles away!” He could not allow this Dragon City of 40,000 hectares to be broken through from the inside. In order to ensure the safety of the city to the greatest extent, apart from the people who received permission, no one was allowed to enter the inner city! Therefore, Lorne needed a group of guards that he could completely trust. With that in mind, Lorne let Super Rich visit on his own. At this moment, he took out the return scroll from Iron Skull City and crushed it! … Swish! With a flash of light, Lorne returned to Iron Skull City. After the players obtained the guild base, they would activate the NPC rental system. They could use their identity as the City Lord to rent suitable NPCs from various large forces. The use of these NPCs was relatively obvious. Most of them were responsible for guarding the city and security. Some NPCs had the ability to patrol outside the city, but these NPCs were relatively expensive. Of course, if one’s reputation was high enough, they could also recruit individual NPCs. This kind of NPC belonged to the private army of the players. They would obey all the orders of the players. Not only could they protect the city, but they could also carry out an expedition. Moreover, high-level NPCs would appear in such armies. These NPCs had their own wisdom and could help the City Lord complete many things. For example, Tully was a high-level NPC. His intelligence was very high. Among the NPCs, he was definitely considered a wise one. However, his relationship with Lorne was still developing. It was not to the extent that he could truly command as he pleased. Under normal circumstances, the affinity between the two sides had to reach the level of [Close Friend] to completely trust this NPC. At that time, even if one asked him to die, he would not hesitate. The relationship between Lorne and Tully was still one step away. The relationship between the two sides was more about the City Lord and the citizen. They were not completely trusting of each other. It was also because of this that Lorne had not handed the core blueprint of Cold Desolate Dragon City to the other party to study. Lorne opened the information regarding the rental of NPCs and fell into deep thought. There were many choices in front of him. Every faction had different NPCs for the players to rent, and the cost was also very different. ———— [Iron Skull City Barracks] could rent out Warriors, Archers, Knights, and other combat NPCs. [Blacksmith’s Association] could rent out functional NPCs such as Blacksmith, Smelter, and Builder. [Alchemist Association] could rent functional NPCs like Alchemists, Gatherers, and Herbalists. […] ———— As the main city of the players, Iron Skull City had almost all the NPCs that one wanted to rent. However, Lorne was not satisfied. These rented NPCs all belonged to Iron Skull City, and Cold Desolate Dragon City would definitely become a competitor of Iron Skull City in the future. After all, the location of Cold Desolate Dragon City was more suitable for adventurers, so Lorne did not think that renting people from Iron Skull City was a good choice. Compared to Iron Skull City, Lorne was more inclined to the Church of Light. In the Church of Light, one could rent: Church Devotee, Church Priest, Church Knight, Light Knight, Holy Knight, Great Holy Knight, Light Priest… It could be seen that there were two types of distinct NPCs in the Church of Light, Priests and Knights! Both had the special power of the Church of Light. The holy light gave the priests stronger healing abilities and the knights stronger combat strength. If he rented the Light Knight, the guards in the inner city would no longer have to worry. This was because the NPCs of the Church of Light had a very powerful talent, which was—[Holy Light Eye]! This talent could allow the Light Knight to clearly sense the approach of the surrounding creatures. Even if they were invisible, they would be detected immediately. Most importantly, the Church of Light did not belong to any faction. It only followed the Order faction. In other words, it was definitely neutral. Even if Lorne’s Cold Desolate Dragon City clashed with any force, as long as Lorne did not betray the Order faction, the Church of Light would not give any instructions to the Light Knights. This was the advantage that Lorne valued the most. However, the cost of renting a Light Knight in the Church of Light was also extremely high. At the very least, it was not something that the current players could afford. Lorne glanced at his church reputation panel. Church of Light Reputation Points: (5715 / 5715) This reputation was nothing compared to the reputation of hundreds of thousands of empires. However, the reputation of the Light Faction was very rare. Those who could exceed 1,000 points were the top players in the world. To rent a Church Knight, he needed 1,000 reputation points from the Church of Light. In other words, Lorne could only rent five Church Knights. This was too little. Lorne found the Priestess of the Church of Light, hoping to increase his rental limit. The result was very successful. First of all, because of his high Dragon Race reputation, Lorne obtained 50,000 Church reputation points. Then, with his affinity with the Dragon of Light, he obtained another 50,000 church reputation points. Then, Lorne activated his Angel’s Wings. In this world, possessing the Angels’ Wings meant that he belonged to the angel faction of the Church of Light and was the highest-level combat soldier in the entire church. Therefore, with the Angel’s Wings, Lorne obtained another 100,000 reputation points. All in all, this beautiful priestess of the Church of Light had given Lorne a temporary quota of 200,000 reputation points, which could be used to rent everything here within this quota. Therefore, Lorne opened the Reputation Exchange panel of the Church of Light. ———— [Church Knight] Level: 30 (Same as the City Lord) Attributes: … Skill: Charge, Frenzied Will, Cross Flame, Armor Proficiency, Holy Light Eye. Recruitment Requirement: 1,000 Reputation Points (Reserved, Not Expended) Recruitment Cost: 20 gold coins per day. Introduction: The assault force of the Church of Light is a firm believer of light. The thick armor they wear provides them with powerful defense, and the power of light provides them with powerful attack power. ———— [Light Knight] Level: 30 (Same as the City Lord) Attributes: … Skill: Holy Light Charge, Spear of Judgment, Knight’s Spirit, Punishment Spear, Holy Light Eye. Recruitment Requirement: 5,000 Reputation Points (Reserved, Not Expended) Recruitment Cost: 0 gold coins per day (Serving an angel is the supreme glory of a Light Knight) Introduction: Only a one in a million knight can be qualified to receive the baptism of the power of light and become a Light Knight. In fact, the burning faith allows the Light Knight to obtain powerful strength and can easily defeat all opponents. ———— These were the recruitment requirements for two types of soldiers. It could be seen that recruiting soldiers in the Church of Light would occupy the reputation of the Church of Light, but it would not consume reputation. However, the City Lord still had to pay the recruitment fees for these warriors. Church Knights needed 20 gold coins per day! This was not a small number. In other words, the monthly salary of a Church Knight was 600 gold coins, and a huge city like Cold Desolate Dragon City required a large number of NPCs! According to Lorne’s initial estimation, the city guards of Cold Desolate Dragon City should be around 20,000. Only this number of city guards could maintain the security of the entire city. If all the city guards were replaced by Church Knights, then Lorne would have to spend at least 12 million gold coins per day! “As expected, it costs money!” Lorne sighed. Fortunately, the security of the outer city had been handed over to Rhett and his army, and the cost of their city guards was provided by Iron Skull City, so the pressure on Lorne was not that great for the time being. Currently, he only needed to recruit some knights and protect the inner city. With that in mind, Lorne decided to recruit two types of soldiers. First of all, the number of Church Knights was 100, which consumed 100,000 reputation points. Then, the number of Light Knights was 20, and the reputation consumption was 100,000 points. These 120 knights were enough to protect the inner city from being invaded. After all, they had the super practical skill, Holy Light Eye, on them. At the same time, their combat strength was very high, and they could easily kill any player other than Lorne! “Everyone, patrol according to the planned route. Any adventurer and others who want to forcefully enter the inner city can be stopped by force or even killed directly!” After returning to the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Lorne immediately dispatched the 100 Church Knights. In fact, the inner city wall did not need to be guarded everywhere. After all, the height of the city wall here was also 20 meters. Ordinary players would definitely not be able to easily cross such a high city wall, so these knights could patrol back and forth on the city wall, ensuring that there were no loopholes in any corner. The remaining 20 Light Knights were like team leaders. Each of them led a small team and were responsible for the safety of a portion of the city wall. This way, the inner city was basically safe. “It’s time to open up the Cold Desolate Dragon City. If I don’t earn some money, I won’t even be able to afford the salary of a Church Knight.” Lorne muttered. Then, he placed all the magic crystals on the teleportation circle. A large portion of these magic crystals were borrowed from Doge. Lorne had no choice. He was really too poor now. He could not even take out a gold coin. He hoped that these magic crystals would allow him to survive this most difficult period. Huff— Taking a deep breath, Lorne opened the system interface again. At this moment, Lorne also realized that as the City Lord of a large city, he actually had the authority to make announcements in the entire city. Although he only did it five times a day, it really saved him a lot of money. Then, he wrote a message and chose to send it. … Doomsday Forest. Countless players ended their killing of monsters and began to chat on the forum and chat. Because it was almost time for Tyrant to open the city, most of them wanted to enter the huge city and see what the first mysterious city that belonged to the players looked like. But at that moment, a grand system notification sounded in the sky. Ding! “Iron Skull City Announcement (Cold Desolate Dragon City): City Lord of Cold Desolate Dragon City, Tyrant, has issued an event mission—[Construction of Cold Desolate Dragon City]!” “Mission Description: Any adventurer can enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City and help complete its construction. All adventurers who participate in the event and obtain enough contribution points will receive a high-grade equipment reward. At the same time, you can exchange points for a large number of high-grade rewards. Please participate eagerly. (For event details, please click here to check.)” “Ding!” “Ding!” The announcement in Iron Skull City repeated three times. Moreover, the information that the players heard this time was not from a player, but an event mission issued by the system! Therefore, the entire Iron Skull City was in an uproar. The players checked the details of the event, but in the next second, their eyes widened. ———— Event Mission: [Construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City] Participation Requirement: Player of the Order Faction. Event Content: … Event Reward: Points (You can exchange for a reward in the event shop. The highest reward is the City Creation Token!) Event Time: Not confirmed. Event Introduction: City Lord of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Tyrant, wants to complete the construction of the city as soon as possible in order to provide enough help to the border defense line of Iron Skull City. Therefore, he has recruited you to help him complete the construction of the city. After accepting the mission, you will obtain the corresponding points from any contribution you make and can exchange them for any reward! ———— When they saw the details of the mission, the entire Iron Skull City exploded. “Damn, damn, damn!!” “Did I see wrongly? Why is there a City Creation Token as a reward?!” “Was this event mission really initiated by a player?” “I’m dumbfounded. He actually took out the City Creation Token as a reward!” “A City Creation Token is worth billions. With this thing, I can support 18 generations of my descendants!” “Tyrant is too crazy!” The players were hysterical. Originally, they thought that this time, it was just a simple opening of a city, but who knew that Tyrant would throw such a huge surprise? Not only did he activate a large event mission, but he even placed the City Creation Token in the reward panel. He was simply too rich! … “Guild Leader, has Brother Tyrant become an NPC big shot? He can actually activate an event mission!” In a training ground in the ruins of the war, a Priest player saw the announcement and smiled at Twinkle Rose. “Who knows? That guy is always so mysterious.” Twinkle Rose shook her head. Ever since the game began, Tyrant had been very mysterious. Although she had many connections with that guy, she did not know much about his strength. However, the only thing that made Twinkle Rose conclude was that Tyrant had an extraordinary identity among the NPCs. This might be a positive cycle due to his powerful strength. When one came into contact with the first high-level NPC, they would be able to obtain a high-level mission and obtain a high-level reward. Then, with their high strength, they would encounter higher-level NPCs again and use this cycle to obtain their current achievements. “Wow, Sister Guild Leader, look. There’s a City Creation Token in the event reward!” The moment the Priest player opened the mission panel, she immediately cried out. When everyone created a guild, the City Creation Token was the item that all large guilds wanted the most. “That’s true.” Twinkle Rose’s eyes also lit up, “Inform all the sisters in the branch to choose 50,000 people to help Tyrant build the city.” “What?! Sister, isn’t 50,000 people a little too many?” “Guild Leader, did you not sleep well? Is your head not clear?” “Our guild only has 60,000 people!” “This rotten love…” The beautiful women in the guild spoke. “Sisters, you have to believe me this time!” Twinkle Rose smiled, “In the past, Tyrant had helped us a lot. He was the one who told me about hoarding the antidotes. Later, he gave us a share of 300,000 antidotes and sold us all kinds of high-level equipment. To be honest, our Silver Snow Guild has received too much help from him.” “Therefore, today, we have to give back to Tyrant. After helping him build the main city this time, we will send a few sisters to entertain him. I believe that when we build the main city in the future, he will definitely provide us with huge help!” Hearing these words, the beautiful women of the Silver Snow Guild giggled. “I want to pay with my body! Brother Tyrant is handsome, rich, and has a good character. He’s simply the Prince Charming of my dreams!” “There are too many people in the guild who like Tyrant, but I’m afraid that Tyrant’s body can’t take it.” “That’s right, that’s right.” “Sluts, move aside. Brother Tyrant is mine!” “…” At the World Destruction Guild base, Speck was grimly listening to the sales report from Cross Fire. During this period of time, because of the Tyrant’s territory, many players no longer bought potions. Even if they saw a potion worth 1.7 silver coins, they were indifferent. In order to recover as much as possible, Cross Fire had no choice but to reduce the price of the potion to 1.5 silver coins, or even 1.4 silver coins. This price could basically only be maintained at the cost without any profit. But even so, the sales were limited. Seeing that the time for Tyrant to open the city was getting closer and closer, in order to recover, Cross Fire reduced the price again to 1.2 silver coins, or even 1 silver coin. This price made many players feel moved. After all, even the potions in Iron Skull City required 1 silver coin to buy. This price was completely within their acceptable range. In the end, the World Destruction Guild sold all the potions today. “Boss, we lost 1.125 billion in the potion market project.” After reporting the data, Cross Fire was extremely nervous. However, Speck was expressionless. He did not directly pursue the matter of Cross Fire, but instead calmed the hatred in his heart. If not for that scoundrel Tyrant, their project would have earned at least 3 billion and could have taken 50% of the market. In total, the profit would have been at least 10 billion! However, it was this bastard who made the entire market of the ruins of the war disappear, and he even lost more than a billion! This was unforgivable!! As Speck was furious, a huge scarlet banner appeared on the holographic screen, and a grand voice sounded. Ding! “Iron Skull City Announcement (Cold Desolate Dragon City): City Lord of Cold Desolate Dragon City, Tyrant, has issued a recruitment mission—[Construction of Cold Desolate Dragon City]!” “Mission Description: Any adventurer can enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City and help complete its construction. All adventurers who participate in the event and obtain enough contribution points will receive a high-grade equipment reward. At the same time, you can exchange points for a large number of high-grade rewards. Please participate eagerly. (For event details, please click here to check.)” “Ding!” “Ding!” The huge announcement sounded three times. Speck was first stunned, then he sneered, “Very good, Tyrant. Since you dare to open the city to us, I’ll let you know the consequences of doing so!” “Cross Fire, organize 50,000 players without guild IDs and head to Cold Desolate Dragon City to investigate the details of the layout. If there’s a chance, wait for the opportunity to kill the important NPCs in the main city!!!” “Yes, Boss.” … Blood Shadow City, Netherworld Guild. Guild Leader Nether River was discussing with the higher-ups of the guild how to deal with Tyrant! That guy was too detestable! In the beginning, the epic mission [Lost Cold Desolate Dragon City] that the Netherworld Guild was tackling had failed. At the beginning, they could not be sure if Tyrant had discovered Cold Desolate Dragon City first. Later, when the news of the city being built spread, they finally confirmed that it was Tyrant who beat them to it. Previously, when he was buying the Guild Establishment Token, the Netherworld Guild had also been played by Tyrant. That guy had deliberately said that it was the first Guild Establishment Token and made them spend a lot of money to buy it. In the end, when they were building the guild, this guy had beat them to it. As one of the strongest Dark Guilds, the Netherworld Guild had never been played like this! If he did not kill Tyrant, it would be difficult to vent the hatred in his heart! “Bull Demon, bring a group of elite assassins to Cold Desolate Dragon City immediately and investigate the details of the city.” “In addition, send our people in Iron Skull City to enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City and organize the planning map of the city. We have to find an opportunity to destroy his administrative hall and destroy the city that Tyrant has worked so hard to build!” “I believe that as long as we destroy the city, we can directly obtain the treasures in the city’s warehouse. That City Creation Token must be inside!” Nether River ordered his subordinates coldly. Perhaps in a head-on battle, they were no match for Tyrant. However, the Cold Desolate Dragon City was so huge. Tyrant could not defend the entire city alone. As long as there was a loophole, there was a chance to sneak into the other party’s administrative hall and destroy the entire city. At that time, Tyrant’s efforts would be ruined! … Soon, at the Domination Guild headquarters, Unparalleled Domination looked at the information he had just obtained from the Cold Desolate Dragon City. When he saw that the area of the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City had reached tens of thousands of hectares, Unparalleled Domination was so jealous that his face distorted. It was too infuriating. This Tyrant was clearly a solo player, but he actually controlled such a huge territory. It was simply a waste of a god’s gift! A city needed people to guard it, and a city with tens of thousands of hectares needed at least 200,000 troops to guard all the city walls. Such a size could allow a large guild with more than a hundred thousand people to develop their own forces. If he was given this city, he was definitely confident that he could expand the guild into a huge territory with millions of people in a short time and directly become the strongest in the world! However, Tyrant was the owner. Moreover, this guy let a group of NPCs help guard the city, it was simply a waste of resources. It was such a good place, but the NPCs actually benefited from it. He was really the shame of all players. “Fate is f*cking ridiculous!” Unparalleled Domination sighed helplessly, then looked at the other higher-ups and said, “Now, let all the branches gather the building resources. In the other branches, players without the prefix ‘Domination’ in their names will go to Cold Desolate Dragon City to accept missions. We can’t miss this City Creation Token!” Because of the previous conflict, Tyrant would definitely not let their guild members enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Now, he could only use the members of the branches to let them compete with the other guilds for the City Creation Token. Fortunately, the Domination Guild had enough members. Even if a portion of them were excluded, they were completely capable of competing with the people of other guilds for points! However, this order confused some higher-ups. One of the players called “Domination Frenzied Sword” could not help but ask, “Boss, hasn’t our strategy all along been to accumulate resources to build our camp in the future?” “Damn, are you stupid?!” Unparalleled Domination slammed the table and stood up. He pointed at the player and cursed, “Look at the situation now, we’re still accumulating resources? The second City Creation Token is already out, and there are still dozens of Platinum-grade equipment. If we can’t snatch the Platinum-grade equipment this time, how can we compete with other guilds? How can we snatch a territory?” “You think you’re qualified to be a commander? If not for the fact that you’re my cousin, I would have killed you with a single slash. What a stupid fool!” “Order all the spies we have arranged in Iron Skull City to set off. We must investigate the internal situation of the Cold Desolate Dragon City!” “Inform all the agents stationed in Iron Skull City to enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City and investigate the information of the city. If there’s a chance, we must destroy this city!” “Inform everyone in Iron Skull City to participate in the Cold Desolate Dragon City event. We must obtain this City Creation Token!” “Now, I’ll give you 10 billion dollars to buy construction materials with all your might. You must suppress the other guilds and obtain this City Creation Token!” “Get the City Creation Token at all costs and build the second player city in the entire server. After completing the mission, all members of your guild will be rewarded with 10,000 alliance dollars each. All the higher-ups will receive 3 billion dollars!” At this moment, all the places in the world issued secret orders. Especially when they saw the appearance of the second City Creation Token in the entire server, almost no one could remain calm. They all arranged for guild members to participate in this event. Even the World Alliance’s own military was secretly operating to contact Tyrant. … At the same time, the world’s largest live stream platform began to take action. As the greatest topic in the world today, these live-stream platforms naturally invested all their energy. Especially after receiving the news that Cold Desolate Dragon City was about to be opened, the streaming platform, World Direct TV, immediately organized this special event. They mobilized a large number of official streamers and gathered near the teleportation circle of Iron Skull City, preparing to teleport to Cold Desolate Dragon City as soon as possible to provide the entire world’s audience the first opportunity to watch the entire city. “Dear friends, I am your most adorable Little Orange from Direct TV. Today, Little Orange will lead everyone to see the mystery of the Cold Desolate Dragon City!” At this moment, the most popular streamer in the world, Little Orange, was already standing on the teleportation circle of Iron Skull City. The moment Cold Desolate Dragon City was opened, she immediately chose to teleport. At this moment, the popularity of the entire live-stream instantly soared to a terrifying 30 million viewers online! Ding! “Please choose the city you are about to teleport to!” As soon as the beautiful streamer Little Orange activated the teleportation circle, she immediately received the relevant notification. On the interface in front of her, several choices appeared. Little Orange immediately focused on the Cold Desolate Dragon City. “Teleport to the Cold Desolate Dragon City!” Little Orange said. Ding! “Teleporting to the Cold Desolate Dragon City requires 10.1 gold coins!” “The teleportation to Cold Desolate Dragon City requires 10 gold coins. Iron Skull City needs 0.1 gold coins!” “…” The system notification appeared and Little Orange froze on the spot. To be honest, she really thought that she had seen wrongly. Just teleporting once required 10 gold coins? Was he crazy about earning money? After all, 10 gold coins was equivalent to more than 20,000 alliance dollars. No player could accept such a high cost. Seeing this scene, the audience in the live-stream was hysterical. “This Tyrant is crazy. The teleportation fee is 10 gold coins!” “Go to hell, you scoundrel. One teleportation costs me four months of salary. F*ck you!” “Black-hearted Tyrant!” “More than 20,000 alliance dollars is enough for me to fly anywhere in the world!” “I’m sorry, my salary can’t even support me in playing games. I’m crying…” Crazy comments filled the entire live-stream. … At the same time, the surrounding players also saw this notification, and their minds immediately exploded. As solo players, all of them could only pool together one gold coin. In the end, this teleportation circle actually required 10 gold coins to teleport. It was simply ridiculous! Even the rich players were stunned on the spot after seeing this teleportation price. But as they were about to protest, a new notification appeared. Ding! “As this is your first teleportation this week, you have received a 99.9% discount!” “This teleportation costs 10 silver coins. Would you like to teleport?” When they saw this notification, the players were not so angry. Many players chose to confirm it. Compared to the time it took to run the map in one or two days, using 10 silver coins to teleport to the war and middle would definitely earn him a lot. Especially for the solo players. Most of them had not been to the ruins of the war, but they had always heard that someone had made a lot of money in that area, so they often yearned to go to the ruins of the war. Coupled with the fact that there was an event in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, they were even more impatient. They all chose to teleport immediately. Little Orange was no exception. “It seems that Mr. Tyrant has considered this very thoroughly. 10 silver coins is a normal teleportation fee. Then, let’s not waste any more time. Let’s go to the Cold Desolate Dragon City and explore the mysteries!” With that, Little Orange chose to teleport. A blue light flashed, and she vanished. At this moment, the audience stared nervously at the live stream. They all wanted to see what the first player city that was built by millions of workers looked like. … In the Cold Desolate Dragon City. After the light flashed, Little Orange arrived at a new place. She used her large eyes to check her surroundings, but she was lost. In front of her was a tall city wall made of huge rocks. It was 70 meters tall. Looking up, a grand and huge pressure immediately came. “Little Orange, why are you still in Iron Skull City?” “Did something go wrong with the teleportation circle?” “Only the main city can have such a tall city wall.” “She probably chose the wrong teleportation location.” “Hahaha, my Little Orange is indeed very careless. She even chose the wrong teleportation target.” “Little Orange, don’t be in a hurry to leave. Quickly look around. Perhaps it’s a new main city.” In the live-stream, the players spoke. Their words made Little Orange doubt herself. Was there a problem with the teleportation array? ‘I accidentally came to another main city?’ Little Orange was confused. She clearly remembered that she had chosen the right target. Looking at the information on the comments, Little Orange was about to check the situation of this city to see if it had accidentally discovered a new city. However, the moment she turned around, Little Orange’s eyes widened. In front of her was a huge square. In the center, there was a hundred-meter-tall dragon. It bared its fangs and brandished its wings, “tearing” at Little Orange. “Little Orange, run!” “It’s over, it’s over. My little cutie is going to be eaten.” “What a powerful dragon!” “What is this place? Why would an adult dragon appear?” “Strange, that dragon doesn’t seem to be moving…” The audience in the live-stream quietened down and sized up the terrifying dragon. Little Orange also recovered from the shock. After careful inspection, it realized that it was only a lifelike statue. At this moment, she was basically certain that this was definitely not Iron Skull City! “Wait…” Dragon? Cold Desolate Dragon City? Could it be that… Little Orange suddenly realized something. She quickly opened her map panel. In the next second, an incomparably huge regional map appeared in front of her. The name displayed on it was—[Cold Desolate Dragon City]! Pfft— The audience in the live-stream spat out blood. The place they thought was a new main city was actually Tyrant’s Cold Desolate Dragon City! “Am I seeing things?” “Impossible. How can this be Cold Desolate Dragon City? I don’t believe it.” “Such a huge main city cannot be the territory of the players!” “The players’ guild headquarters should be developed from a small house. At this time, they can at most create a small village.” “I’m now certain that Tyrant has cheated. Who dares to argue otherwise?!” The netizens were completely crazy. No one could accept what they were seeing. Little Orange froze on the spot for a long time. She really did not expect that in a player city that had just been built, there would be a 100-meter tall dragon statue with wingspan of more than 200 meters and such a towering city wall! It was unbelievable! Fortunately, her professionalism forced her to calm down. Then, Little Orange continued to check the appearance of the city. In this city, there were buildings with a grand aura. They were all different in shape and were filled with the style of the other world. With their grand physiques, they gave people the feeling of standing in a dragon’s nest. Moreover, every building had a unique style. There were ancient murals and patterns inside. Walking in, it was like a museum of ancient buildings. Every wall was curious. However, Little Orange was a top-notch streamer and had a very unique taste. She knew what the players wanted to know the most. Therefore, she followed the main path towards the highest city. On the way, Little Orange saw many large buildings. Some could be visited, and others were sealed. But she did not explore them one by one. Instead, she teleported through the small teleportation array in the city. Soon, she arrived near the City Lord’s area. Before she could get close, she received a notification. Ding! “The City Lord’s area is not to be approached without permission!” A patrolling guard on the city wall looked over. In the Cold Desolate Dragon City, as long as one reached this region, they were not allowed to approach. This place was not within 100 meters of the inner city wall. Little Orange was helpless, but she did not force her way through the defense line. This was because there were Church Knights in heavy armor on the city wall staring at her, as if as long as they realized that she had crossed the line, they would use thunderous methods to kill the beautiful and weak offender. With that in mind, Little Orange quickly changed her direction. She arrived at the clock tower. Here, she could roughly see the layout of the workshop area. As Little Orange gradually explored and analyzed, the basic structure of the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City gradually became clear. First of all, this was a huge city that covered more than 30,000 hectares. The entire city was very long, at least 30 kilometers long. It could be seen that the current city was still very empty. Most of the areas had nothing. The buildings were also scattered in various large areas. There was almost no situation of buildings appearing clustered together. Interestingly, there were a lot of gnomes and even many robots walking around in this city. It seemed that the technology in the entire city was more advanced than in Iron Skull City. Unfortunately, the city was still in the construction phase. It did not look prosperous for the time being. Then, Little Orange arrived near the city wall. A portion of the city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City could be climbed. Little Orange immediately climbed up the wall. When she saw the scene outside the city, she was stunned again. Standing here, she could see the mountain range outside. The forest near the edge of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was dark green in color. It looked very fresh and beautiful. There were also various strange herbs growing on the ground. From their appearance, it could be seen that these herbs were very high-grade. Not only that, but there was also a group of monsters wandering in the forest. She could even see the figure of the Boss. To the players who needed to level up, this was simply a dreamlike map area. Because the Cold Desolate Dragon City was the center of the battlefield, even if the geographical location changed, the surrounding mountains were still the same land. Therefore, there were many treasures in these forests. For example, the glowing object on the hill ahead seemed to be an ancient war sword. Even after so many years, it was still glowing. There were also traces of ruins on the hill over there. Perhaps it was a part of the Cold Desolate Dragon City that had been separated. Even if there were no treasures inside, those ancient rocks were still valuable! However, Little Orange’s vision was limited. When her gaze reached a spot a few kilometers away from the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the environment there immediately darkened. Even the entire forest was gray and looked very sinister. When Little Orange looked to the side, she could not help but swallow. In that area, there was a dark “sea”, like a black hole that wanted to devour everything in the world. However, what made the players very excited was that at the edge of the Lake of Death, there was a large group of creatures at the bottom of the lake slowly wandering on the lake shore. There were even many impressive Bosses running around. The players’ eyes were red from watching. They wished they could run to that area right now and take on all the Bosses that they did not know. … “This place is simply a leveling holy land!” “An undeveloped region is too dreamlike.” “Those herbs are as common as weeds. If I pick herbs at a high level, I can definitely make a killing here!” “It’s too tempting to see the Boss’ map directly!” “Gosh! Is that a level 4 medicinal herb, Wolf Fang Grass? There’s an entire field of it!” “I can’t hold back anymore. I’ll go to the Cold Desolate Dragon City now and earn more reputation. There will definitely be benefits in the future!” “The guys from Iron Skull City are too lucky. Our main city has only just obtained a few Guild Establishment Tokens, but they already have two City Creation Tokens!” “With Cold Desolate Dragon City, the top players of Iron Skull City will definitely level up faster!” When the netizens saw this scene, they immediately went crazy. Those solo players who were still nonchalant were also attracted by this scene and entered Cold Desolate Dragon City. Ding! “System Notification: Revenue from [Teleportation Array] of the Cold Desolate Dragon City: 10 silver coins!” “System Notification: …” “System Notification: …” “System Notification: …” At the highest point of the Cloud Top Hall, Lorne was sitting on his throne and looking at the teleportation circle flickering below. They were players, or in his eyes, walking bags of money! When he opened the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he adjusted the cost of the teleportation array to an astonishing 10 gold coins. If it was this price, then Lorne would immediately have a few million gold coins. Unfortunately, this price was too expensive. Coupled with the fact that today was the first day of opening the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Lorne reduced the cost of the teleportation array to 10 silver coins. This was a price that could not earn him any profits. Fortunately, the teleportation array of the Cold Desolate Dragon City had a special effect. Its cost was half that of other teleportation arrays. In other words, Lorne still had 50% of the profits! Every player who entered the Cold Desolate Dragon City would earn him 5 silver coins. The number of players who entered today had already reached an astonishing height. 100,000! 200,000! 300,000! 400,000! 500,000! In less than ten minutes, the number of players in the Cold Desolate Dragon City had exceeded 600,000. According to the income of 5 silver coins per person, Lorne had already earned 30,000 gold coins. It was almost equivalent to 100 million alliance dollars! Wasn’t this efficiency of earning money faster than printing cash? Moreover, the most shocking thing about this city was not only that. As time passed, the number of players in the Cold Desolate Dragon City continued to increase crazily. In the blink of an eye, there were already more than a million people! “At this rate, it’s entirely possible to break through ten million people.” Lorne smiled happily. Cold Desolate Dragon City was located near the Lake of Death. This was an area that not even Iron Skull City had come to, so the monster resources here were much richer than elsewhere. Coupled with the additional amplification effect of dropping in the ruins of the war, it would attract more and more players to come here. In addition, the mysterious map of the Lake of Death would also be very attractive to players. In the future, when the players’ levels increased, this high-level large-scale map would definitely become the area that the players respected the most. This guaranteed the future popularity of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. A city that could attract players meant that it could consistently absorb wealth. Currently, the Cold Desolate Dragon City was still in the construction phase. There were some things that could not be set up yet. However, as long as the construction was completed, there would definitely be unimaginable ways to earn money in the future. “Leader, your 10 gold coins teleportation fee has basically cut off the players’ path of retreat. If they want to leave Cold Desolate Dragon City now, they probably have to think carefully.” After obtaining Lorne’s permission, Super Rich arrived at the highest point of the Cloud Top Hall. He looked at the lively scene below and could not help but sigh. “Even if they leave, it will not exceed half. Therefore, the remaining millions will bring us enough benefits.” “However, there are still many problems in the city now. The workshop area does not have enough production capacity, especially the potions. Right now, the potions of Cold Desolate Dragon City basically have to rely on the output of Iron Skull City.” Lorne frowned. “Leader, I own a guild that specializes in alchemy. They have more than 10,000 alchemists, and there are more than 100 Level 3 alchemists among them. If we produce them at full strength, we can provide 100,000 Level 3 Potions per day.” Super Rich immediately pulled out a panel. On it was the basic information of a guild. “Holy Scripture Guild?” Lorne checked and found that this was indeed a powerful guild. Perhaps many players did not know the value of a Level 3 Alchemist, but in fact, in the “Divine Realm”, the effort he needed to level up to a Level 3 Alchemist was definitely not less than that of players who had reached Level 30. In other words, this guild was equivalent to having 100 ‘Level 30′ players! This was an incredible number. One had to know that at this time, no guild could have 50 Level 30 players. “Ask them if they are willing to stay in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. We will directly give them the shop and venue, but the city will take 60% of the profits from the potions they refine and sell.” Lorne directly asked for a ridiculously high percentage. Under normal circumstances, the main city would not draw more than 20% of the profits. However, it was different in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This was because there was no lack of them here. Even without them staying, just transporting potions from Iron Skull City was enough to support the current consumption of potions. After all, Lorne had the Dragon’s Treasure Vault, so transporting resources was very convenient. “They will definitely agree, because this share is very reasonable. Leader, you have waived their factory rental and provided such a large sales figure. I believe they have no reason to refuse.” Super Rich smiled as he said. Previously, Lorne had thought that letting this rich tycoon help manage the business in the city was a good choice. Now, it seemed that this choice was indeed excellent. For example, the matter of the Holy Scripture Guild had brought great benefits to Cold Desolate Dragon City. The cost of refining a bottle of Level 3 Potion was 30 bronze coins. Under normal circumstances, the sales price was 50 bronze coins, and one potion could earn about 20 bronze coins. In the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the price of each potion would be 75 bronze coins. Because of the geographical location, other than buying them, the players had no other choice. In this case, each potion could obtain 45 bronze coins. Lorne would draw 60%, which was 27 bronze coins. 100,000 potions could bring him 270 gold coins per day, which was equivalent to 80,000 alliance dollars. Moreover, with the passage of time, their alchemists’ numbers would also gradually increase. The profits brought in the future would definitely still increase greatly. Most importantly, they alleviated some of the Cold Desolate Dragon City’s reliance on Iron Skull City. Lorne had already set the target of Cold Desolate Dragon City’s competitor as Iron Skull City. Therefore, he had to rid himself of all dependence on Iron Skull City as soon as possible. He believed that when that day came, Cold Desolate Dragon City would completely become a large main city like Iron Skull City! As for the profits of the Holy Scripture Guild? Their profit share in Iron Skull City was 80%, so their single potion income was 16 bronze coins. In Cold Desolate Dragon City, the profit was 40%, and their single income was 18 bronze coins! It was obvious where the profits were greater. Moreover, Lorne did not want their factory rental payment this time, which reduced a large amount of expenses. It was because of his comprehensive calculations that Super Rich thought that the people of the Holy Scripture Guild would definitely not refuse the invitation. “Damn! Brothers of Iron Skull City, before you come to Cold Desolate Dragon City, you must remember to buy more potions. The potions here are as black-hearted as the pharmacists in the Doomsday Forest. Moreover, I don’t dare to go back to Iron Skull City, because the travel fees are 10 gold coins! I’ll stop talking. Let me cry for a while.” When the players finished visiting the Cold Desolate Dragon City and prepared to replenish their supplies and go out to kill monsters, they realized how cunning capitalists were. ———— [Level 4 HP Potion] Price: 1.5 silver coins. [Level 4 MP Potion] Price: 1.5 silver coins. [Level 3 HP Potion] Price: 75 bronze coins. [Level 3 MP Potion] Price: 75 bronze coins. […] [Antidote Potion] Price: 1 silver coin. ———— It could be seen that in this city, all the potions were 50% more expensive than the potions in Iron Skull City! “Gosh! This Tyrant is as black-hearted as ever!” “Tyrant is such a profiteer!” “Damn, I thought that after we had a city in the ruins of the war, we solo players would be better, but in the end, we still did not escape the fate of being exploited.” “Tyrant, this scoundrel. He’s clearly snatching money!” “Doesn’t this guy’s conscience hurt?” “Who would have thought that the World Destruction Guild, which has always had the worst reputation, is actually the most conscientious seller!” The players were hysterical. They had thought that they could avoid the potion exploitation, but who would have thought that they would still fall under Tyrant’s scheme? Especially the players from the World Destruction Guild, they gritted their teeth. Not long ago, they had transported 1.5 million potions to the Doomsday Forest. In the end, because they were worried that the Cold Desolate Dragon City would fight a price war with them, in order to prevent losses, they sold all the potions at a super low price of about 1.2. But now, Tyrant was offering 1.5 silver coins. Wasn’t this a blatant slap to the face of their World Destruction Guild? Damn it! Cross Fire was about to go crazy. If he had known that the final price was 1.5 silver coins, he would have sold it now. If he could sell all the potions at the price of 1.5 silver coins, the company would not lose money and he could stabilize his position. But now, there was nothing left! It was all this damned Tyrant’s fault!!! … At the same time, some merchant players saw a business opportunity. Although the teleportation cost of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was very high and it was definitely not worth it to transport resources back and forth, there was a loophole that all the players enjoyed a 0.1% discount every week! This was a business opportunity. This was because not all players were qualified to level up in the ruins of the war. For example, those players who had entered the game late and were only Level 20 now did not have the strength to kill monsters in the ruins of the war, so their teleportation qualification would be wasted. As merchants, they could completely use money to drive these players to bring the potions to the Cold Desolate Dragon City. In this case, the transportation cost was only 10 silver coins, which was completely acceptable! Thinking of this, many merchants were ready to attack. But at this moment, a huge announcement suddenly sounded in the sky above the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City. Ding! “Cold Desolate Dragon City Announcement!” “The City Lord of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Tyrant, has officially issued the ‘Fundamental Law of the Cold Desolate Dragon City’. This law is immediately in effect. Anyone who violates this law will receive an extremely severe punishment!” “1. Potions, forging, equipment maintenance, teleportation scrolls, and other businesses cannot be privately run without permission. Any merchants or individuals who cross the line will be permanently banned by the Cold Desolate Dragon City!” “2. Players can freely trade items like items and equipment, but they need to be appraised through the Cold Desolate Dragon City identification system. Any free transaction will cost 10% of the transaction amount!” “3. The players can set up their stalls or rent shops to do business, but they need to pay 20% tax!” “4. Cold Desolate Dragon City will open an official auction house. It can help players make a city-wide announcement about the high-grade items for sale. After the auction is completed, the auction house will receive 20% tax!” “5. The chat channel is open. Each time you speak, you have to pay 1 gold coin. You can use it to make pinned posts, but you cannot shout throughout the city!” “6. Any form of PK is prohibited in the city. Those who violate it…” “7. Any player with the prefix IDs of Domination and World Destruction are forbidden from entering Cold Desolate Dragon City!” “8. The City Lord’s Zone…” “…” At this moment, the Cold Desolate Dragon City announced dozens of rules. They were all rules that hit the nail on the head. When they saw the rules of the first few business practices, all the merchant players spat out a mouthful of blood. This Tyrant was too much! Before they could exploit the loophole, this guy blocked all the tunnels. With this rule, these player merchants had no way to become rich. They could only obediently accept the high taxes in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This made the solo players who were setting up their stalls shed sad tears. “In the end, I can’t escape Tyrant’s harvest!” “Even free trading is taxed by 10%. This Tyrant is really pervasive!” “Set up a stall and pay 20% tax. These things were originally a small business to earn some hard-earned money, but now, they’re all working for Tyrant.” “This world is no longer worth living in. There are capitalists everywhere. It’s too difficult for us small merchants.” “I feel terrible, I want to cry…” … At this moment, the merchant players were already in tears. Ordinary players could accept it. Although the potions here were very expensive, they were much cheaper than the price of 3-4 silver coins in the Doomsday Forest. As for the higher taxes? In fact, it did not affect ordinary players much. This was because the equipment and items they dropped did not have to be sold to players who did recycling. In the Cold Desolate Dragon City, directly selling the equipment and items to the designated NPCs did not require any tax. Moreover, the forging shop of the Cold Desolate Dragon City actually provided free equipment repair. This was simply a huge benefit to ordinary players. After all, the frequency of battles in the ruins of the war was so high, and the speed at which equipment was damaged was also a headache. Now that it could be repaired for free, naturally, it could save a lot of bronze coins. Ding! “Game Announcement: Congratulations on reaching 1 million people per day in your main city. Reward received: Wood+500,000, Stone+500,000, Steel+50,000, Crystal+10,000…” “Game Announcement: Congratulations on reaching 2 million people per day in your main city. Reward received: Wood+1 million, Stone+1 million, Steel+100,000, Crystal+20,000…” “Game Announcement: Congratulations on reaching 3 million people per day in your main city. Reward received: Wood+1.5 million, Stone+1.5 million, Steel+150,000, Crystal+30,000…” “Game Announcement: Congratulations on reaching 4 million people per day in your main city. Achievement reward: Wood+2 million, Stone+2 million, Steel+200,000, Crystal+40,000…” “…” As time passed, the population in the city increased crazily. Every time the flow of people exceeded 1 million, Lorne would obtain a large amount of construction resources. This was an extremely important pillar of support for the construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Lorne opened the territory management panel and checked. ———— Territory: [Cold Desolate Dragon City] City Lord: Tyrant Deputy City Lord: Tully Grain Production: 5,000 per day Wood Production: 5,000 per day Stone Materials Production: 5,000 per day Steel Production: 500 per day Resident Population: 10,532 Human Flow: 4,743,200 City Army: 120 (Hired 120) City Commoners: 10,412 City Construction: Cloud Top Hall, Ancestral Dragon Temple, Dragon’s Clock Tower, Dragon Lookout… Defense Weapon: Ancestral Dragon City Barrier Formation (Damaged) … ———— This was the current data panel of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. From this, it could be clearly seen that the territory would automatically produce a portion of the building resources every day. It could allow an ordinary territory to develop smoothly. However, to the Cold Desolate Dragon City, it was a little powerless. Most of the building resources had to be found by Lorne himself. This was a huge challenge for the current Cold Desolate Dragon City. In addition, the permanent population of the city was only 10,000. This number would only record the population of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. For example, the gnomes that had sworn to be loyal to the Cold Desolate Dragon City. As for the other players? From the moment they entered the main city, they had sworn loyalty to Iron Skull City. Therefore, they were all travelers in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Even the city guards led by Rhett did not belong to the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Only the Church Knights recruited by the Church of Light by Lorne spent a lot of money were considered part of the city army. This made the data on the entire interface look a little better. At the very least, there was no sign of ‘0’. There was also the [City Defense Weapon] classification. There was only the city defense magic circle hidden in the city. Other than that, there were no other city defense weapons. This was also a huge problem for Lorne. Finally, Lorne looked at the last number of gold coins in the territory. [Gold Coin: 257,161] 257,000 gold coins was the income of charging 4.74 million players for Lorne. This value would continue to increase, but it would not be as explosive as the previous few hours. The subsequent income still depended on the benefits of the potion. After all, potions were a necessity for consumption. Every player had to use at least 20 bottles of potions to maintain the basic hunting battle. If the players went all out and used the potions without regard for consumption, they would have to spend at least 100 bottles of potions per day. To the Cold Desolate Dragon City, this was an incomparably huge market. “Should I refine some special potions?” Lorne pondered. He had the [Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia] on him. This pharmacopoeia gave him powerful alchemy abilities, and there were many high-level potion refinement methods inside. Even if he used the methods in the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia to refine ordinary level 4 potions, the effect would double. He believed that such a potion would be liked by the players and allow the Cold Desolate Dragon City to have its own unique characteristics! However, this matter required the help of Doge. He was relatively familiar with the alchemy business. Moreover, he had recently contacted countless alchemy organizations. If he officially brought the Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs to the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he would definitely be able to bring enough alchemists to the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This matter had to wait for Doge to finish dealing with the matter at hand. It could not be done immediately for the time being. Lorne recorded the plan, then opened another panel. This panel was the contribution ranking for the event. ———— [Cold Desolate Dragon City Contribution Board] First place: Blood Shadow Blade, Contribution Points: 4.17 million. Second place: Fearless Long Sky, Contribution Points: 4.11 million. Third place: Fire of the Red Lotus, Contribution Points: 4.02 million. Fourth place: Emerald Grass, Contribution Points: 3.99 million. Fifth place: Eye of the Evil Dragon, Contribution Points: 3.87 million. Sixth place: Silent Night, Contribution Points: 3.85 million. Seventh place: Blue Sky White Cloud, Contribution Points: 3.79 million. Eighth place: Unparalleled Beauty, Contribution Points: 3.71 million. Ninth place: Tiny Drizzle, Contribution Points: 3.6 million. Tenth place: Blood Shield, Contribution Points: 3.59 million. ———— Although only a few hours had passed, the battle on the leaderboard was abnormally intense. The players in the top ten now all had at least 3.5 million points. Three of them had even exceeded 4 million points! Perhaps many people did not know the difficulty of obtaining these contribution points, but as long as they saw the rules, they would be shocked by these data. This was because a unit of wood could be exchanged for 1 contribution point. In other words, the contribution they made was equivalent to bringing ‘4 million units of wood’ to Cold Desolate Dragon City! This number was definitely shocking. To ordinary players, 4 million units of wood was an unimaginable amount. Even Lorne did not dare to say that 4 million units of resources was a small amount. After all, the resources that Cold Desolate Dragon City was using were all provided by Iron Skull City, and Lorne’s own wealth had only bought 40 million units of resources in the Gnome Shop. This was only because Turado had given him a huge discount at the time. Otherwise, Lorne could only buy 20 million units of resources. Therefore, 4 million units of resources was definitely not a small amount. If he had to convert it into money, in the Gnome Shop, a unit of wood was 1 silver coin. 4 million units of resources was 40,000 gold coins, equivalent to more than 100 million alliance dollars. In addition, there was a strange phenomenon, which was that there was no ‘important figure’ that looked familiar. This was because many large guilds were watching. They were not in a hurry to invest resources, because they were afraid of failure. After all, this was a competition between the large forces in Iron Skull City. No one dared to say that they had the confidence to win. Therefore, most of them decided to participate in this crazy City Creation Token battle when the event was about to end or when they were confident of winning. Seeing this list, Lorne could not help but sigh. The large guilds in these dark areas were really too crazy. After all, this event had only been open for a few hours, but they had already invested more than a hundred million dollars! However, that was not the greatest investment. What truly made the large guilds spend a lot was the investment of tens of thousands of players to help build the Cold Desolate Dragon City. These players were almost unable to raise their levels during this period of time. This was the greatest investment for a large guild. But in order to obtain the City Creation Token, they were forced. From the income obtained after the opening of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, they had already seen the value of a territory. A City Creation Token that they had obtained in advance was the seed of wealth. As long as they could obtain this seed, after a period of time, this seed would bring unimaginable wealth to the guild. As a large guild, all of them had huge ambitions. Even if they knew that they were doing this to work for Tyrant, they had to fight for it without regard for their own safety. Only by staking everything could they break through the encirclement of the strong army and become the strongest in the world! In fact, even if they failed, they would not lose out. Other than the first place who could obtain the Guild Establishment Token, the others on the ranking could also obtain a Platinum equipment as a reward. This was an extremely rare reward for the current players. After all, Platinum equipment was not yet popularized. In addition, the contribution points could also be used to exchange. In the contribution point shop that Lorne had set up, there were dozens of Platinum items, hundreds of Gold items, and more than a thousand Silver items. These items were high-grade resources that had to be fought for in a guild with a large population. These thousand items were enough for these players to spend contribution points. Even solo players who could not afford high-grade equipment could use their contribution points to exchange for useful Bronze equipment or VIP-level to unlock titles. These VIP titles could allow them to obtain a lot of benefits in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. For example, a number of free teleportation uses, discounted purchases, and so on. In short, they could earn whatever they exchanged. Moreover, Lorne had set a very important rule. That was the contribution point exchange system! Last time, because of the system’s customized points system, points could not be exchanged in the event. Other than Lorne, the other players only had less than 2 million points. This time, Lorne opened the contribution point exchange system! In this way, the contribution points in the hands of all the players could be sold on the market like gold coins. This was also the main reason why those large guilds sent tens of thousands of people to Cold Desolate Dragon City to do an event. Competition was the key to Lorne’s wealth. In the current Cold Desolate Dragon City, other than a few million people, there were at least 500,000 players helping with construction work. The previous two million workers had completed the repair of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. The rest were the living areas that Lorne had planned. The construction requirements for these buildings were not that high, but the workload was huge. Originally, there were not many buildings in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, most of them were empty spaces. However, to plan these empty spaces into commercial areas, the construction work here was huge. Even if there were hundreds of thousands of players participating in the construction, it would take a long time to complete all of this. “I have to go to the Gnome Mineral Company to purchase a batch of ordinary building materials.” Lorne looked at the resource consumption in the territory. It would consume about 10-20 million resources per day. Although Iron Skull City was still providing them, it would not last long. Previously, when Ansare had given him the [Resource Mobilization Token], he had said that Iron Skull City would help Cold Desolate Dragon City complete the basic infrastructure. These words could be used as an excuse to repair the Cold Desolate Dragon City and end the resource support operation. Now that Ansare had not made a move, it should be that he did not know about the current expenditure of the warehouse. If he knew that the warehouse in Iron Skull City was losing tens of millions of supplies every day, he would probably immediately investigate the entire situation. At that time, Iron Skull City would definitely stop providing supplies. Then, Lorne would have to rely on himself. Only he could store enough resources to truly build the city. ———— [Territory Resource Warehouse Store] Food: 120.91 million units. Wood: 137.1 million units. Stone Materials: 135.65 million units. Steel: 147.1 million units. Crystal: 1.43 million units. Sulfur: 1.39 million units. Mercury: 1.27 million units. … ———— This was the current savings in the territory. Compared to Iron Skull City, the difference was like heaven and earth. As a main city with a long history, the internal resources of Iron Skull City had already accumulated to a terrifying level. Even 100 million wood was not a problem. However, this was a huge problem for the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Most of these resources were contributed by the players. The top ten players on the leaderboard contributed at least half of the resources. All of this was thanks to the City Creation Token he had obtained in Iron Skull City. To be honest, if not for this token, the players would not be so crazy. Fortunately, he was far-sighted. Everything in the city was progressing well. The only thing he needed now was time. Cold Desolate Dragon City was located in the ruins of the war. It was estimated that it would soon be attacked by the Dark faction, which was a problem that Lorne was more worried about. As he was thinking… Suddenly! Several red dots appeared on Lorne’s main city map. Ding! “Game Announcement: Your Light Knight has discovered four players from the Dark faction outside the city!” A system notification suddenly appeared in front of Lorne. This made him curious. This was because the Light Knight was guarding the city wall of the inner city. However, the players from the Dark faction were not in the city. “So it’s at this location…” The location of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was very special. There was a cliff near the Cloud Top Hall. If one counted the height of the Cloud Top Hall, the entire height would exceed a thousand meters. Moreover, the cliff was almost vertical. No one could climb up here. However, because the city’s range was huge, there was a small loophole in this place. In the corner of the city wall behind, there was a small area. The outer wall was very close to the inner wall. Just now, the Light Knight had walked to the edge and happened to detect that someone was lurking here. It had to be said that these guys were really smart. They really found a place that could be as close to the inner city as possible outside the city. Seeing this, Lorne immediately rushed to the scene. “Boss Nether River, this Cold Desolate Dragon City is really huge. It took us hundreds of people several hours to find the best spot to attack!” Outside the city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, a few people from the Netherworld Guild were hiding in the grass outside the city, waiting for the guild’s order to attack. The leader this time was Bull Demon. Like Bloodthirsty, he was also a top expert of the Netherworld Guild. However, his proficiency was different from Bloodthirsty, who was good at hunting. What was stronger about Bull Demon was his infiltration skill, rock climbing, and unlocking skills. Unfortunately, in this city, these strengths were harder to use. There was no way to enter the city gate of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. There were city guards guarding it. Moreover, the city gate was too ancient. With his lock-picking skill, he temporarily could not open the city gate. Therefore, they spent a few hours finding the place that had the highest chance of approaching the administrative building. As long as they could climb over the city wall, they could directly approach the inner city wall and quickly approach the other party’s administrative building. To a city, the administrative building was the most fragile place. As long as they could enter the administrative building, they could find the switch to destroy the city. At that time, they only needed an order to destroy the city! “This Tyrant is really lucky to be able to find the ruins of such an ancient city. If not for the fact that the foundation of this city is still intact, how could that kid have built his territory to such an extent at this time?!” “That’s right. This Cold Desolate Dragon City is in the ruins of the war. If our Netherworld Guild took charge of it, the players of Iron Skull City would completely lose this resource-rich training area!” “Sigh, what a pity.” “Alright, cut it out. Boss Nether River has replied. Let’s go now!” Bull Demon looked at the few people beside him and said, “Later, follow behind me and use the rock climbing rope to climb over the city wall. Remember, don’t be careless or speak. We have to rely on stealth to break through the other party’s defense as soon as possible. Now is the time when the Cold Desolate Dragon City is being built. Tyrant will definitely not be able to take care of all the places, so this is our best opportunity. However, we only have one chance. If we fail this time, it will be extremely difficult to destroy the Cold Desolate Dragon City next time. Do you understand?” “Understood.” “Don’t worry, Boss.” The assassins of the Netherworld Guild nodded at each other and decided to take action now. Bull Demon raised his right hand. On his hands, there was a special equipment. This equipment could release ropes and grab at the wall. This way, he could climb up. This function was very similar to the Spider Silk Bracer that Lorne had used. However, just as they thought that the plan was about to succeed, an accident suddenly happened. Ding! “Grapple failed!” “Grapple failed!” “Grapple failed!” “…” Bull Demon released the grappling hook several times, but all of them failed. The group of assassins under the city wall were stunned. “What’s going on? Didn’t you say that we can cross all the city walls and mountains?” Guild Leader Nether River, who was watching the live stream, immediately frowned. Bull Demon was also stunned. His ‘Hook Lock Bracer’ was obtained by the guild after sending more than a thousand elites to attack a Boss. It was a very high-level Platinum secondary equipment. In all the rock climbing missions previously, there had never been an accident. Today was too strange. Why was it unusable? Seeing this, Lorne, who was invisible, smiled. This Bull Demon was really silly and cute. The city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was built with ancient giant rocks. Moreover, when the Cold Desolate Dragon City designed the building, it would also engrave a magic circle inside to increase the resistance of the building. After all, all the buildings here had to welcome the descent of the dragon at any time. Without enough resistance, it was impossible to remain intact under the dragon’s claws. How could such a huge city wall be penetrated by a Platinum equipment? Of course, this was also because there was a flaw in this equipment. If his rope could reach a height of more than 70 meters, it was possible to hook the wall above and use it to climb up. Unfortunately, his rope could only release 50 meters at most, so it could only be fixed by ‘piercing’ the rock. This led to the phenomenon that he could not grab because the strength of the rope could not break the defense of the city wall. … “Boss Nether River, this city wall is probably too hard. My equipment’s penetrative power is limited, which led to the current situation. But don’t worry, Boss. I have other methods.” Bull Demon took out a pickaxe engraved with bull head patterns and said, “Boss, look. I have a Rare tool here that’s specially used to break through the defense of buildings. With this equipment, we can definitely break through this city wall!” He had stolen this equipment from the Boss’ nest. It was because of this tool that he could succeed in his ‘infiltration’ operations. The only pity was that this tool had durability. Facing such a high hardness city wall, it would probably be destroyed after use. Thinking of this, Bull Demon sighed. However, he quickly calmed down. This was because he would destroy this huge player city and contribute greatly to the guild. This was not comparable to damaging a Rare tool. Without further ado, the determined Bull Demon waved his hand. In the next second… Ding! The sound of metal striking metal sounded. At the same time, a number appeared in the air. -0 Pfft— Looking at the number floating in the air, Bull Demon spat out a mouthful of blood. He had not expected this city wall to be so hard. This pickaxe clearly had a great defense penetration effect, but it still did not deal any damage. This was too much! “Bull Demon! Are you using a fake item to cheat me! Didn’t you say that no city wall can stop you? Now you’re telling me that you can’t even break through the city wall’s defense?” This time, Nether River completely erupted. He, who had been very calm, began to become irritable after experiencing these events. “Boss, I don’t understand either. Don’t be anxious. I’ll try to open the gap in this city wall. I think I can open it from here.” Beads of sweat formed on the head of Bull Demon, and he quickly arrived at the gap in the city wall. Although the rocks used in this city were huge, there were still gaps. No matter what building it was, the gap would always be the weakest spot. As long as he grasped this weakness, its defense would definitely be crippled… -100! -100! -100! -100… Crack! As the Bull Demon struck again and again, a shattering sound was suddenly heard. The bull pattern pickaxe in his hand shattered. Damn!!! Bull Demon stood on the spot, stunned. What the heck was going on? What the heck? <i>Where’s my pickaxe?</i>  Wasn’t there still a few thousand durability points? Why did it suddenly disappear? The dumbfounded Bull Demon quickly checked the system interface and realized that with every slash, the durability of the tool would decrease by 100 points. The tool that originally had thousands of durability points had actually shattered! Moreover, the gap in the city wall only broke a little! This was ridiculous! Who knew what this city wall was built with? Even the cement that stuck to the rocks was ridiculously hard! … “I’m dying of laughter.” Standing behind them, Lorne almost laughed out loud. He had clearly opened the outer city area of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, but these assassin players of the Dark faction still wanted to forcefully break through the outer city wall. Those who did not know might really think that they had absolute confidence, but in the end, they could not even pass through the city wall. If they got close to the inner city, they would probably be stabbed to death by the Light Knights. However, as players, Lorne knew their intentions. In fact, in “Divine Realm”, the relationship between factions was really tense. If they could kill dark creatures, the players would receive a higher reward and a very precious reputation point reward. On the contrary, when the players of the Dark Faction killed the players of the Light Faction, they would also receive the corresponding reward. In the eyes of Iron Skull City, Cold Desolate Dragon City was the camp of the crusade against the ruins of the war and also an important hub that connected the three border fortresses. Therefore, it had an extremely important meaning to the war between the two sides. Therefore, in the eyes of the enemy Dark Faction, it became a thorn that they had to eliminate. If a player of the Dark Faction destroyed this city as a member of the Dark Faction, he would directly become an important figure in the special Blood Shadow City, or even become the City Lord of Blood Shadow City! Moreover, he could directly meet the Dragon of Darkness. It was a powerful existence on the same level as the Dragon of Light in the Order faction. With her support, the player would truly soar into the sky and become one of the strongest players in the entire “Divine Realm” game. However, to their surprise, this Cold Desolate Dragon City was too sick. Even the construction that was specially used to tear down buildings could not break through the other party’s defense. It was simply ridiculous. Seeing that the operation had failed, the assassins of the Netherworld Guild prepared to leave. Lorne took out his short staff and prepared to summon his pets to kill these guys. But then… Swish! A white spear tore through the air and struck a player. Powerful energy poured out like a ferocious beast, piercing through the player’s body. The spear also sank into the rock and turned into energy that dissipated between heaven and earth. -5,000! With a crazy number, the Dark Assassin’s body shattered like glass. A notification sounded in Lorne’s ear. Ding! “Game Announcement: Your ‘Light Knight’ has killed a Dark Faction adventurer. You have received+50 reputation points from the Order Faction.” On the city wall, there was a team led by a Light Knight. After discovering the abnormality here, they immediately came to defend. If not for the fact that Lorne wanted to see what the assassins wanted to do, they would have been killed by the Light Knight the moment they stood below the city wall. However, what was even more unexpected was that although these knights were only Level 30, they could directly deal 5,000 damage. This was indeed a little powerful. No wonder the combat strength of the Church of Light had always been respected. … “Damn, we’ve been discovered!” Seeing their companion die, the players immediately reacted. They reached out and sprinkled a handful of black dust, then disappeared from Lorne’s vision. Unfortunately, the knights who were rented from the Church of Light had the skill, Holy Light Eye. They could directly see through the invisibility of the players, especially the players of the Dark Faction. In front of these NPCs, they had nowhere to hide. Swish! Swish! Swish! Spears of energy descended from the sky one after another, accurately hitting every escaping Dark faction player. In the face of the Light Knight, these players could not resist at all. Soon, the battle ended. Lorne picked up the equipment on the ground. To his surprise, there was also a Platinum secondary equipment inside. It should be the equipment that the leader of the assassins was most proud of. Unfortunately, Lorne already had a secondary equipment. He could only bring it with him now. In the future, he could use it if he encountered a special map. The remaining Gold and Silver-grade items were all thrown into the warehouse of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. They would be sold in the shop in the future. Then, Lorne checked the attributes of the city wall. ———— Construction: [City Wall] (Cold Desolate Dragon City) Defense: 10,000 Resistance: 80% Durability: 1 million / 1 million Introduction: Constructed by an ancient giant rock with an ancient compound mud. Coupled with special magic runes, it is a powerful city wall that increases defense. It has extremely high defense. Ordinary magic and swords cannot even leave a mark on it. ———— It could be seen that the city wall was not damaged. The bit of mud that they had cut down just now was just an additional material that could not be considered part of the durability of the city wall. Moreover, from this information, it could be seen that the durability of the city wall was higher than that of the ground. The two used the same material, but when Lorne checked the floor, the durability of the floor in the city was 500,000 points, and the defense was 5,000 points, half of the wall’s attributes. “We have to send a team to guard this city wall.” Lorne observed his surroundings and found that this was really the weakest place in the entire city. The other areas were blocked by the outer city, giving the defense army enough time to react. However, this place was very close to the inner city. As long as they crossed the outer city wall, they would reach the inner city at most a thousand meters. If they ignored all the defense forces, sneaking in from this place would be the fastest way to directly threaten the city. With that in mind, Lorne redistributed the defense missions of the Light Knights. After dealing with this, Lorne did not enter the city again but walked out of the forest. Now that the missions in the city had basically been arranged, Tully would be responsible for dealing with the construction problems. Therefore, Lorne had to consider his level. After reaching Level 40, he could go to the Elven Kingdom and begin the second chapter of the epic main storyline mission. In addition, he had to deal with the second part of the mission on Aisha. For the construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Lorne had been busy for a long time. Fortunately, the mission on him did not have a time limit, so it was not too late to carry it out. After leaving the city, Lorne arrived at a hill. In this mountain range, there was a group of beastmen who were only Level 40. ———— [Bull-Horned Beastman] Grade: Bronze Monster Level: 40 HP: 24,000 Skill: Power, Slash, Savage Roar. Introduction: A group of savage bull-horned beastmen. They like to plunder human women, because in their eyes, human women are the best targets to bear their children. ———— Level 40 Bronze monsters basically had more than 20,000 health points and their attack power was close to 2000. This was still a huge challenge for the current players. However, at the same time, the stronger the player, the more they liked to challenge high-grade monsters, because this could increase their level more effectively. “Little fellows, your holiday is over. It’s time to work!” Lorne waved his short staff and summoned his six pets. Previously, he had wanted to change the undead archer, Venom, but he had not found a suitable monster, so he had temporarily put it aside. This little guy was still standing in the team and had reached Level 30. The other pets had also reached Level 30, except for Aisha. She was now Level 24 and was still 10 million experience points away from Level 30. “Attack!” Without hesitation, Lorne ordered his pets to fight their own battles. Swish! Swish! Swish! Small Artillery raised the bow in its hand one after another, and arrows with black flames shot out. At most, 5-6 arrows could kill a Level 40 Bronze monster. As a Gold pet that had been synthesized, it was normal to have such strength. But it was not the most brilliant thing. It was the hardworking Night Elf Princess, Aisha. Like a wild cat, she moved quickly in the forest, the blades in her hand as fast as lightning. The bull-horned beastmen did not even see their enemies before their heads were separated. -60,000! (Critical) -54,000 (Critical) -55,000 (Critical) -57,000 (Critical) After equipping some scattered equipment, Aisha’s strength had also increased greatly. She could now easily deal nearly 70,000 damage critical hits. The actual damage was reduced only because these Level 40 Bronze monsters were higher in level. If not for the level suppression effect, the damage numbers would definitely be even more spectacular. However, this did not affect the battle. In any case, it was an instant kill. The number was no longer important. “Ding! You have killed a bull-horned beastman!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” Under the powerful fire of the six pets, the bull-horned beastmen in the forest fell one by one. According to the current hunting speed, he could kill at least 40 monsters in a minute, provided that the monsters in this area maintained their current density. To Lorne, the density of monsters had always been the greatest problem. It would only take a second for him to kill the monster, but it might take a few seconds, or even ten. Therefore, this was the greatest problem he had been facing. Fortunately, there were enough pets now. Compared to other players, such an experience gaining speed could only be obtained in dreams. … Ding! “Game Announcement: Your ‘Light Knight’ has killed an adventurer of the Order faction—[Not Drinking Fatty’s Cola]!” “Game Announcement: …” “Game Announcement: …” “Game Announcement: …” While Lorne was killing the monsters, information kept flashing on the city interface. It could be seen that these players who were killed were different from the assassins outside the city. They were all players of the Order faction. For some reason, they deliberately wanted to break through the defense of the Inner City. Most of these people should be spies from the Dark faction in Iron Skull City. At the same time, there were some players from the Iron Skull City forces mixed in. They all wanted to destroy this city and did not want it to truly flourish. To the people of the Dark Faction, destroying the city would allow them to obtain great benefits in the game. As for the players of the Order faction, by destroying the city, they could protect a huge market and pull their competitors to the same starting line as them. To the financial groups, it was acceptable for everyone to work together and share the market, but they could not accept such an action of monopolizing the entire market. Therefore, during this period of time, Cold Desolate Dragon City would face many challenges. If he was not careful, Lorne’s efforts might really be wasted. Fortunately, before opening the city, he had received the full support of Commander Rhett. There were tens of thousands of city guards stationed in the Cold Desolate Dragon City and 10-20,000 people who would maintain the security in the Cold Desolate Dragon City and help guard the inner city area. In addition, the players were still very weak and did not have many special methods, so Cold Desolate Dragon City was relatively safe now. After Lorne mined the ores, he would rent tens of thousands of Light Knights. At that time, Cold Desolate Dragon City would be truly invulnerable! … “Ding! Congratulations on using 1.72 million experience points to raise your pet ‘Aisha’ to Level 25!” “Ding! Congratulations on using 1.78 million experience points to raise your pet ‘Aisha’ to Level 26!” “Ding! Congratulations on using 1.84 million experience points to raise your pet ‘Aisha’ to Level 27!” After farming for half a day, Aisha’s level had already reached 27. She was only three levels away from the target of Level 30. However, it was already very late. Lorne could not hold on anymore and prepared to rest. But just as he was about to leave, a notification suddenly sounded in the sky. Ding! “Regional Announcement: Due to the sudden establishment of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the surrounding monsters are feeling uneasy. A monster [Mountain Giant King] who lives in the mountains and the monster [Octopus Sea Demon Leader] who lives in the Lake of Death is preparing to jointly attack the Cold Desolate Dragon City and destroy this city in one go!” “Regional Announcement: Please note that the army of monsters from two directions is gathering. All adventurers affiliated with the Cold Desolate Dragon City, please prepare for battle!” “Regional Announcement: Cold Desolate Dragon City is about to be attacked by monsters. The difficulty is SSSSS. The official battle will begin in two days. Please respond to the call of Cold Desolate Dragon City and guard the city together!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Gosh! A mission with SSSSS difficulty!” “Mountain Giant King? I remember someone encountering it. It seems to be above Level 40. I can’t see its specific attributes!” “I think it’s Level 50!” “This is the ruins of the war. Level 50 monsters can only be considered average. I think it’s very possible.” “The Octopus Sea Demon is the Boss of the Lake of Death. I believe it’s Level 60!” “Tyrant is in trouble now.” “He’s done for…” The players who heard the news felt a huge sense of danger. Although they did not know the specific attributes of the two Bosses, they could guess some things from the name and the environment. Especially the Mountain Giant King. On the border between the Doomsday Forest and the Lake of Death, there were many such powerful Bosses. Some were even above 100 levels. Their entire bodies were like a mountain. If such a Boss attacked Cold Desolate Dragon City, it would be a devastating blow. These thick city walls were useless because this huge Boss had the ability to easily cross the city wall and directly attack the interior of the weak city. This result was definitely not what the players wanted to see. Compared to the destruction of the city, they wanted to see the city remain as it was. “The situation is bad. We can’t let this Cold Desolate Dragon City be destroyed.” “Although Tyrant is a little evil, it’s very convenient to teleport to the various areas of the Doomsday Forest.” “That’s right. If not for the Cold Desolate Dragon City, those unscrupulous merchants in the Doomsday Forest would have made a comeback. They are much more black-hearted than Tyrant. A bottle of potion costs 3 silver coins!” “Everyone, help Tyrant guard the city. This is good for us solo players.” “Pfft! Help that black-hearted scoundrel defend the city? In his dreams. It’s already good that I won’t obstruct him, but you want me to help him defend the city? What a joke.” The players discussed. Some people wanted to help Lorne protect the city, but they were scolded by more people. At such a choice, opposition often attracted more people to defect, because they would do anything to achieve their goals. Therefore, the voices on the forum became increasingly unfriendly. There were even people who wanted to cause trouble in the Cold Desolate Dragon City at this critical moment. … Ding! “Game Announcement: Your city [Cold Desolate Dragon City] will be attacked by monsters in two days. As the City Lord, you can issue missions to the adventurers!” “Warm reminder: More precious rewards can make the adventurers work harder. Please think about the contents of the mission later!” At this moment, as the City Lord, Lorne received a relevant notification. This mission was very difficult. After all, it was an SSSSS-level defense mission. In “Divine Realm”, this was the highest-level mission. Of course, the quality of the mission was determined by the players and the game stages. To the current players, even clearing a Gold Boss was a high difficulty S-grade mission. To a newly built city, facing the attacks of two powerful Bosses was also a life and death problem. However, Lorne was more optimistic. He believed that this was an abnormally simple test. It was definitely not enough to destroy the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City. According to the game progress, monsters were produced. This was the basic operation method of the game system. Now that the players were only Level 30, it was impossible for a Boss above Level 50 to fight the players head-on. This was because when the difference between the two sides exceeded 20 levels, the monsters would be invincible. Under normal circumstances, such a scene would not happen in a game. Therefore, Lorne believed that the Boss should not be above Level 45. A Boss of this level still had the ability to cross the outer city wall of Cold Desolate Dragon City, but the monsters led by the Boss would definitely not be able to cross the 70-meter tall giant city wall. Coupled with the powerful defense and 60 meters wide of the city wall of Cold Desolate Dragon City, the players guarding the city only needed to stand on the city wall and shoot at the monsters below. Everyone knew how simple such a battle was. If the guild leaders of those large guilds had enough judgment, they should know that this event was definitely a good opportunity to quickly level up. As for the only character that needed consideration in the battlefield? It was actually the two Bosses. The only thing the guilds were afraid of were these two Bosses. Whether Tyrant could kill the other party was an important condition of this war. They were all thinking about this. Only Lorne was not worried. In his eyes, the levels of these two Bosses would definitely not exceed 50. Bosses that were not above 50 would not be considered invincible by him. Therefore, he was absolutely confident about the battle in two days. “Event mission?” Lorne thought about it and decided to make it an event mission. After all, this was a defensive battle. Cold Desolate Dragon City needed to face the attacks of a vast number of monsters. Although Lorne did not think that they could break through the defense of the city wall, an attack that was too powerful would still cause damage to the city wall. In the future, if he wanted to repair these damaged city walls, he would definitely have to lose a large number of ancient rocks. Although there were still many of these rocks in the city, they were still extremely rare materials after all. He had to reduce the expenditure. In the event of an even larger war in the future, the resources that were preserved could at least allow Cold Desolate Dragon City to last for a longer time. With that in mind, Lorne set up a city defense mission. Soon, a new regional announcement sounded in the entire ruins of the war. Ding! “Iron Skull City Announcement (Cold Desolate Dragon City): City Lord of Cold Desolate Dragon City, Tyrant, has issued an event mission—[Protecting Cold Desolate Dragon City]!” “Mission Description: Any adventurer can enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City and help the Cold Desolate Dragon City resist the attacks of the monsters. All players who participate in the event will automatically obtain the ordinary VIP title of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Please participate eagerly.” “Ding!” “Ding!” The announcement sounded three times. However, the players who heard this announcement were stunned. They all thought that Tyrant had wrongly edited the announcement for the event mission. This was because on this ‘wrong’ document, it actually wrote, ‘All players who participate in the event will automatically obtain the ordinary VIP title of the Cold Desolate Dragon City’. “What the heck?” “I don’t understand. Is Tyrant too petty?” “Helping to defend the city actually gives an ordinary VIP title?!” “Don’t jump to conclusions. There might be other rewards in the event panel.” Some players defended Tyrant. They all believed that the reward of the event was not as simple as the announcement had made it out to be. However, when they opened the mission panel, everyone was dumbfounded. ———— Event Mission: [Protecting the Cold Desolate Dragon City] Event Content: … Participation Requirement: Player of the Order Faction, payment of 1 gold coin. Event Reward: Ordinary VIP title. Event Time: 48 hours later. Event Introduction: City Lord of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Tyrant, requests that you protect his city. After accepting the mission, you will obtain the right to stand on the city wall and kill monsters. However, the premise is that you must pay 1 gold coin to let him know that you are not here to make up the numbers. When you assist the City Lord of Tyrant in completing the mission, you will become the honorable owner of an ordinary VIP title in the Cold Desolate Dragon City! ———— “Damn!!!” When the players reacted, their anger exploded. “This Tyrant is simply too stingy!” “Damn, I’m laughing from anger. This Tyrant is really toxic. He invited us to help him defend the city, but we still have to give him a gold coin. Are you my real father?!” “Seeing this mission requirement, I really want to hammer that guy!” “I’m so angry that I can’t speak!” “Let him posture. I want to see how this kid will defend the city alone!” “Serves him right if he dies!” The players cursed crazily. Originally, a portion of them were still considering whether to help Tyrant defend the city. Now, there was no need to consider. Only a fool would help him pay a gold coin! … “Boss, is this Tyrant crazy? He dares to publish such an event?” In Cold Desolate Dragon City, an archer player was talking to another swordsman player. They were the higher-ups of the Fire Beacon Guild. When they heard this announcement, the Archer player behind them frowned. “No, that just means that his mind is very clear.” Fire Beacon shook his head and smiled meaningfully, “The reason why he dared to issue such a condition is to show that he is confident in killing the two Bosses.” “What do you mean?” The Archer player beside was even more confused, “Even if he’s confident, what has this got to do with making such an event announcement?” He really did not understand. Now that the Cold Desolate Dragon City was facing the problem of the monsters attacking the city, Tyrant should fight for the other players to join. After all, most of the monsters attacking the city were monsters. Their numbers were very large, and it was definitely not something a player could deal with. But why did Tyrant do this? How were the two related? While he was confused, the player called Fire Beacon continued, “Tyrant made such an announcement to tell us that even without our help, he can solve all the problems alone.” “If that’s true, then us large guilds have to fight for this spot!” “Because the city defense of the Cold Desolate Dragon City is very powerful, ordinary monsters can’t break through the defense of this city. Therefore, as long as we join the defense battle, we can stand on the city wall and kill the monsters that attack the city in the safest and most relaxed manner!” “A large city like the Cold Desolate Dragon City will face many monsters, so this is a chance for us to quickly level up.” “Oh! I understand now. Tyrant is playing hard to get!” The Archer player nodded and said, “It seems that he doesn’t need the help of us players to make such a confident statement, but he’s actually using the benefits to force us to participate!” “Right now, the guilds of Iron Skull City are competing for the second City Creation Token. Be it obtaining the City Creation Token or building the main city, we need powerful strength. Therefore, we cannot give up this opportunity to level up!” “Tyrant saw this and used this method to ‘inform’ us. Moreover, he set the cost of 1 gold coin. In this way, he can obtain a large amount of gold coins while getting free helpers!” Hearing these explanations, the surrounding players’ eyes widened. Heavens! How could he have thought of such a strange plan? The higher-ups of the guild were stunned. They had always thought that Tyrant was only pretending to be confident, but in the end, he had hidden many schemes in just a few words. He was simply a demon in disguise! “No, that gold coin actually has another use!” At this moment, Fire Beacon continued to shake his head and smile, “The main purpose of that gold coin is to eliminate the solo players. This way, there will be enough monsters to provide to the players who are willing to participate in the war.” “To be precise, Tyrant’s initial goal was actually us, these large guilds. All of his designs were targeted at us. This is the most brilliant aspect, because only the players of large guilds have enough combat strength. Only us guild elites can provide combat strength for the Cold Desolate Dragon City at this stage!” “What? Even this is a scheme?!” “This guy is too terrifying!” “One plan after another, Tyrant is too terrifying…” “Is there still trust between people?” “My intelligence is not enough!” “Boss, according to you, we have to participate, but what if Tyrant is really just acting?” The Archer player asked. Hearing this question, Fire Beacon smiled again and asked, “Even if Tyrant is lying, can you sit back and do nothing?” With that, Fire Beacon walked towards the City Lord’s area. The Archer player thought about it and realized that he had to participate. The reason was very simple, and that was to avoid accidents. If Tyrant really had the strength to deal with the two Bosses, the guilds that participated in this war would obtain a huge level advantage. Moreover, they might be on good terms with Tyrant and even obtain some benefits in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Therefore, no matter the result, as long as one could not determine if Tyrant could defeat the two Bosses, they had to participate. This would result in the least losses and the greatest benefits! Thinking of this, the higher-ups of the Fire Beacon Guild shivered and felt that Tyrant was too monstrous. “Sisters, it’s time for us to repay Tyrant’s kindness again. Now, please select 10,000 players with the highest levels and let us happily help him complete the city defense mission!” Twinkle Rose ordered her sisters. “What? 10,000 people?!” “Guild Leader, what are you trying to do? Last time, there were 50,000 people. This time, there are 10,000. Our Silver Snow Guild is about to become Tyrant’s harem. If anything happens, we will be the first to do it.” “That’s right, Guild Leader Sister. If you like Tyrant, just say it. Wouldn’t it be easier for us to directly join the Cold Desolate Dragon City? We can save on the 10,000 gold coins entrance fee.” “I also think that a marriage alliance is a good thing. In the future, when we enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City, we won’t have to pay the toll.” The group of beauties in the guild discussed with smiles, beginning to tease Twinkle Rose. This made the beautiful guild leader’s face turn red. She could not stand the continuous bombardment of these girls. “Shut up, stop talking!” Twinkle Rose shouted loudly, drowning out everyone’s voices. Then, she stared at the two little girls who had been smiling the most and said, “Warm my bed tonight. You’ll wear milky-colored long socks and you’ll wear black long socks. Put on cat ears and tail!” “Huh? Guild Leader, I can’t. You’ll play for too long. I can’t take it.” “That’s right, Sister Guild Leader. I warmed the bed the day before yesterday. Can you let me go this time? My body can’t take it.” “No! I just want the two of you!” … At the same time, different voices sounded from the guilds. They all saw through Lorne’s scheme. After all, it was a large guild with 100,000 people. There were many talents in the management, so it was not difficult to see the meaning. However, what troubled them now was how many people to send. No one was confident of winning this defense war. Tyrant’s confident declaration did not have much credibility in front of them, so they were still very hesitant. Fortunately, there were two days to consider, so they were not in a hurry to make a decision. As the person involved, Lorne spent the rest of the time very relaxed. He was not worried about the city defense war. In his eyes, as long as the system did not give him a fatal outcome, he would definitely win. After all, he was a man who could deal tens of thousands of damage! Of course, he had something to do recently. That was to level up Aisha.  Before the city defense event began, he would level up Aisha to 30. This would allow her to display greater strength in the following event. Therefore, after resting on this day, he entered the forest. … “Ding! You have killed a Lizardman!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” During this period of time, Lorne found a new training ground. The Lizardmen here were Level 43 super high-level monsters. Due to their powerful skin resistance, the other pets were very helpless. Moreover, the distribution was very messy, so it was relatively difficult to kill them. Fortunately, Aisha had high damage and could still kill 10-20 monsters per minute. The agile Elven Assassin landed beside the monster like a flower. Before the monster could react, the sharp dagger slashed through its throat. While killing the monsters, Lorne paid more attention to the information on the system interface. It could be seen that the people from the large guilds were beginning to stir. After going offline yesterday, not many people had chosen to register for the city guard event the entire night. But now, they signed up in groups. The total number of people was increasing. Some were even teams with thousands of people, and they were coming in waves. It was unknown how much money Lorne had obtained. In short, the total number of people on the event panel was 73,500. One gold coin per person was equivalent to 73,500 gold coins. Moreover, this number was still growing rapidly. At this rate, it could probably accumulate to about 200,000. This number suited Lorne’s initial plan. In fact, he felt that 100,000 was enough. If there were too many people, it would instead divide the experience of the monsters too thinly, causing the difference in levels between the players to shrink. However, thinking that he could earn money, Lorne immediately dismissed the idea. At this moment, the more people the better. It was best if the entire city wall could not stand up, so that he could use this money to fill the huge hole in the city’s defenses. In addition, he had to give Twinkle Rose a thumbs up. This beautiful guild leader worked very hard in the past few activities. First, she supported tens of thousands of people to participate in the city construction, and now, she directly sent ten thousand guild elites to help defend the city. To be honest, such support was quite heartwarming. At least this big-busted sister had some conscience. Previously in the Beginner Village, he had helped this big-busted sister a lot. After reaching the main city, it was even more impressive. Many money-making matters first thought of her. This time, Twinkle Rose would receive a huge reward for her actions. Because the difficulty of this event was SSSSS-rank, the quality and number of monsters would definitely be very high. At that time, relying on the high city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, it would basically be equivalent to standing on the city wall to pick up experience. This big-busted sister would definitely make a killing again. … “Ding! You have killed a Lizardman!” x11 “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding! Congratulations on using 1.9 million experience points to raise your pet ‘Aisha’ to Level 28!” After fighting in the forest for three to four hours, Lorne finally had enough experience to level up Aisha, and the monsters here were becoming rare. He did not stay any longer and headed to another area. As for the gains during this period of time? In fact, Lorne had always gained a lot from killing monsters. He had high luck, which was the main reason why he had such a high drop rate. However, the quality of these equipment and items was relatively low. Lorne basically packed them tightly. After returning to the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he would place them in the shop to sell. Then, Lorne hunted in a new area. As he watched his experience points increase rapidly, he watched the number of people participating in the event increase crazily. Under such a double stimulation, time passed very quickly. About ten hours later, Lorne finally accumulated all the experience needed to level up Aisha and raised her level. In the next second, two consecutive golden lights poured down. Aisha’s level finally reached the long-awaited Level 30! Ding! “Congratulations on using 1.96 million experience points to raise your pet ‘Aisha’ to Level 29.” “Congratulations on using 2.02 million experience points to raise your pet ‘Aisha’ to Level 30.” Ding! “Congratulations to your pet Aisha for reaching Level 30 and awakening the skill [Mirror Phantom].” ———— Skill: [Mirror Phantom] Effect: Summons a shadow that can replicate the user’s own movements. This shadow will cause the same attack effect on the target as the main body. However, it cannot replicate combo skills, displacement, stealth, and other effects. However, it can replicate additional effects such as critical hits, speed reduction, stun, and others (restrictive skill’s have half the effect). Cooldown: 10 seconds. Consumption: None. ———— When Aisha reached Level 30, she awakened a new skill. This skill was a little too heaven-defying. Its effect was to summon a mirror image to replicate the movements of the main body and could also replicate the damage output of critical hits. This would give Aisha greater damage output. Aisha’s critical strike was already very terrifying. Now that it was doubled again, it was naturally even more terrifying. In addition, after leveling up, Aisha still had dozens of skill points on her. The pets around Lorne could not level up their skills through repeated practice. They could only level up with the skill points gained after leveling up, which was different from players. Without thinking, he followed the usual method of adding points. The next second, light poured from Aisha’s body. Ding! “Skill [Phantom Backstab] has successfully evolved into [Phantom Blink]!” Evolved? Lorne’s eyes lit up as he quickly opened Aisha’s skill panel. ———— Skill: [Phantom Blink] Effect 1: Blink to the back of the target. The first attack will definitely be a critical hit and increase attack speed by 200%. Duration: 2 seconds. Blink distance increased to 20 yards. Effect 2: After killing the target, the cooldown will be refreshed immediately. ———— So powerful!!! When he saw the skill effect, Lorne could not help but be surprised. The upgrade of this skill did not ordinarily increase the range of movement, but instead evolved it into a higher-level skill! Originally, Aisha could use killing to refresh the invisibility effect, and that was already very terrifying. Now, she also had the skill of killing to refresh her blink, which allowed her to move freely through the crowd and dodge at extremely long distances. “With this skill, Aisha should have more control over the battlefield two days later.” Lorne nodded in satisfaction. He was increasingly confident in the defense of the city. “Master, is there a huge battle ahead?” Aisha put away the dagger and looked curiously at the muttering Lorne. “Yes, there’s a more difficult battle ahead.” Lorne nodded, “The establishment of the Cold Desolate Dragon City makes the nearby creatures uneasy. They have gathered a large number of monsters and are preparing to attack the Cold Desolate Dragon City tomorrow, but the city defense weapons of the Cold Desolate Dragon City are not equipped yet. We can only rely on our own strength to block the attacks of the monsters this time, especially you. In the battle a day later, you will need to face the two most powerful Bosses. How about it? Are you confident, Aisha?” “Don’t worry, Master. I’ll do my best!” The elven girl raised her small fists and looked very confident. Lorne touched her head, then opened his attributes panel. It was time to raise his level. Aisha was the last pet to raise its level to 30. Now that she had finished leveling up, it also meant that Lorne had unlocked the level limit and could raise his level to 40. It just so happened that he had stored enough experience previously. Now, he could directly level up. Ding! “Congratulations on using 416,000 experience points to raise your level to 31!” “Congratulations on using 424,000 experience points to raise your level to 32!” “Congratulations on using 440,000 experience points to raise your level to 33!” “…” “Congratulations on using 488,000 experience points to raise your level to 40!” Ding! “Congratulations on reaching Level 40. You have received [Pet Space]+1.” Ding! “Warning! Due to you being a Summoner, your level has been locked. Please raise your pet to Level 40 and enter the main city to complete the class change.” Now that Lorne had successfully reached Level 40, something uncomfortable happened. As a Summoner, he had to let his pets reach Level 40 before he could reach Class Two. Fortunately, Lorne had encountered such a thing once in the Beginner Village. He was already mentally prepared for it and did not hesitate. In any case, his recent goal had not been to change his class, but to reach Level 40. This was because after reaching Level 40, he could open the Platinum equipment treasure chest in his bag, obtain the Platinum equipment set, and change his scattered equipment. Lorne took out the Platinum Set treasure chest that had been there for a long time. He opened it directly! Swish! After a brilliant silver light flashed, a short staff appeared in the treasure chest. It was shimmering with light, and it was obvious that it was not ordinary equipment. Ding! “Unlocking the Class Set Treasure Chest. Obtained: Ice Crystal Unicorn Staff (Platinum).” ———— [Ice Crystal Unicorn Staff] (Ice Crystal Unicorn Set: 1 / 7) Grade: Platinum Magic Attack: +1100 MP: +1000 Intelligence: +180 Spirit: +100 Additional effect: Cast Range +20%. Additional effect: Increases the strength of magic attacks by 10%. Special Effect: [Ice Crystal Horn]: Increases the user’s Magic Attack by 280 points. Type: Weapon Level Requirement: 40 Introduction: A staff refined from a horn dropped from an Ice Crystal Unicorn. It has incomparably powerful magic power. ———— “What high attributes!” Lorne was shocked as soon as he glanced at the attributes of the equipment. The attributes of this equipment seemed to be a little too much. It was also a Platinum equipment. The short staff that Lorne was using only increased his magic attack by 700 points, but this equipment directly increased by 1,100 points. The basic data was even higher than the Platinum-level ‘Vast Ocean Ring’. Of course, the player’s weapon was an equipment with the highest attack attributes, and the ring was a rare equipment part. Under normal circumstances, the attributes increased were relatively balanced. “1100 basic attributes, 180 Intelligence, and 280 points from the effect. This adds up to 2100 Magic Attack points!” “Indeed, equipment is the most direct choice for players to increase their strength!” After some consideration, Lorne realized that the attributes of this equipment were more than 60% higher than other Platinum-grade staffs. Moreover, it was a set part. When there were other set parts, the set attributes would be automatically activated! This number was definitely not low. After all, even the attributes of the Silver Set were very outstanding. As a Platinum Set, it had to have a stronger effect. With that in mind, Lorne took out the return scroll from the Cold Desolate Dragon City and crushed it. When a player obtained a set part, they could obtain other parts of the set after killing monsters and opening treasure chests. Therefore, Lorne needed to find other parts. There was still one day before the monsters attacked the Cold Desolate Dragon City. He had to maximize his strength in this period of time. The purpose of this was not to win this city defense war. It was because Lorne wanted to see how powerful Aisha could be. After all, her attributes came from Lorne. As long as Lorne’s attributes increased by 1 point, hers would directly increase by 4 points! With such a terrifying amplification, Lorne wanted to see how far Aisha could go after he changed into Platinum equipment. As for how to obtain the remaining equipment? It was very simple. Lorne’s idea was to open treasure chests. It was not a realistic option to kill the Boss at the last moment to obtain equipment. Using the mechanism of opening the treasure chest to obtain the set was the most ideal way. In his warehouse, there were already several Platinum Treasure Chests. “Let’s give it a try. As a man with 21 Luck points, I don’t believe that I can’t get the equipment I want!” Lorne returned to the Cloud Top Hall and opened his bag. He took out the Platinum equipment treasure chest! There were a total of four! These Platinum equipment treasure chests were obtained from the mission reward. Ever since he obtained the [Class Set Treasure Chest], he had been saving them and had not taken them out. Today, it was finally time to open them. Without hesitation, Lorne chose a Platinum equipment treasure chest. Open! With that, a brilliant light lit up. Ding! “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: Moonlight War Boots (Platinum)!” This was a top-grade combat boots with excellent attributes. Unfortunately, this was not the set part that Lorne wanted. He could only set it aside and continue to take another treasure chest. Open! Ding! “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: Hurricane Armor (Platinum)!” This was also a good equipment, but unfortunately, it was not a part of the Crystal Unicorn Set. Lorne looked helplessly at the other two treasure chests. This time, he opened both treasure chests at the same time, hoping to change his luck. However, the result was unbearable. Lorne obtained two ordinary Platinum items again, their attributes even worse than before. Seeing this, Lorne began to wonder if his luck was wrong. On the system interface, there were clearly 21 Luck points. Why could he not obtain what he wanted even after opening four Platinum Treasure Chests? Was he playing a fool? “No, I have to open a few more!” Lorne no longer had any Platinum Treasure Chests on him, but he knew where to find them. It was in the event warehouse of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. As the initiator of this event, Lorne could change the reward temporarily. The only requirement was that he had to use items of the same level to exchange for it. In other words, as long as he had Platinum equipment, he could exchange for the 40 Platinum equipment treasure chests. It just so happened that there were four Platinum equipment in front of Lorne. Without thinking, he replaced the Platinum equipment treasure chests with them. A Platinum equipment exchanged for a Platinum equipment treasure chest did not seem to be a losing deal. In fact, to many players, this was a huge benefit. This was because the players themselves had a fixed class. For example, the Warrior class could not wear cloth armor equipment, and the Mage class could not wear armor equipment. This way, opening the Platinum Treasure Chest was a very tense moment for them. Among these players, most could not achieve their expectations. Typically, they would offer equipment that they had no use for and could only give it to others or sell it for money. These two methods were helpless for the players. Therefore, in most cases, they preferred to buy equipment directly instead of buying equipment and treasure chests to gamble on luck. As for the effect on Lorne? Opening the equipment treasure chest might allow him to obtain equipment of a lower quality. This way, he would lose some money. Lorne did not care. To him, he had to obtain the equipment he wanted! He would not hesitate to open all 40 Platinum equipment treasure chests! Lorne did not think too much about it. He took out the four treasure chests and opened them. Ding! “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: Heroic Wrist Guard (Platinum)!” “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: Rock Leg Guard (Platinum)!” “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: Gale War Boots (Platinum)!” “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: Forest Magic Robe (Platinum)!” Four system notifications appeared. Lorne still did not obtain the equipment he wanted. He did not stop. He used these four items to exchange for four Platinum equipment treasure chests. Then, he continued to open it. 4! 8! 12! 16! The first ten or so treasure chests did not satisfy Lorne. He even wondered if he could really obtain the equipment he wanted by doing this? At this moment, a new batch of notifications sounded. Ding! “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: Assault Bracer (Platinum)!” “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: War Spear (Platinum)!” “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: Ice Crystal Unicorn Robe (Platinum)!” “Unlocking the equipment treasure chest. Obtained: Ice Crystal Unicorn Bracer (Platinum)!” He had obtained two items of the set! Thinking that he was hallucinating, Lorne quickly opened the system interface to check the information. Only then did he confirm that he had really obtained two parts of the Ice Crystal Unicorn Set! “Very good, continue!” Lorne was not in a hurry to check the attributes of the equipment. Instead, he increased his speed and replaced the other Platinum equipment treasure chests, then opened them all. Perhaps the Goddess of Luck was really watching over him. When he opened the remaining 20 Platinum equipment treasure chests, he actually obtained another set part. Moreover, this equipment was the helm. Among magic equipment, head equipment were the best in terms of attributes apart from weapons and magic robes! In this case, Lorne had already obtained the equipment with the highest attributes in the set. He believed that the attributes increase brought by them would be the greatest! With that in mind, Lorne could not wait to check the attributes of the three Platinum Set parts. ———— [Ice Crystal Unicorn Robe] (Ice Crystal Unicorn Set: 1 / 7) Grade: Platinum HP: +2000 MP: +1000 Defense: +300 Magic Resistance: +300 Spirit: +100 Additional effect: MP recovery effect+100%. Additional effect: Increases magic defense by 10%. Special Effect: [Unicorn Fur]: Increases the user’s Defense by 200 points. Type: Cloth Armor Level Requirement: 40 Introduction: A magic robe refined from the fur of an Ice Crystal Unicorn when it was shedding. It has powerful tenacity and resistance. ———— This equipment increased HP, MP, and resistances. It was the best equipment with the best overall attributes. Not only that, but the attributes of this equipment were very outstanding, especially its defense. It directly increased by 500 points. This was a height that was difficult to reach for cloth armor equipment. … ———— [Ice Crystal Unicorn Bracer] (Ice Crystal Unicorn Set: 1 / 7) Grade: Platinum Magic Attack: +500 MP: +1000 Spirit: +100 Intelligence: +50 Additional effect: Attack damage increased by 10%. Additional effect: Increases magic defense by 10%. Special Effect: [Unicorn Crystal Hoof]: Increases the user’s Magic Attack by 200 points. Type: Cloth Armor Level Requirement: 40 Introduction: A bracer refined from the hooves of an Ice Crystal Unicorn. It has incredible magic power. ———— Bracer parts had always been synonymous with attack power, and it was no exception for magic classes. This wrist guard could deal 900 magic damage to Lorne. To the current Lorne, it was the equipment type that he wanted the most. He directly removed the Gold Bracer from his hand and took out the additional equipment [Protection Barrier]. Then, he combined the new equipment with this Platinum-level additional equipment to create an even more brilliant and exquisite high-level wrist guard. Finally, Lorne looked at the head equipment he had finally obtained. The warrior’s head equipment was a helmet, and most players of the magic class were wearing head accessories or hoods. They looked lighter than helmets, but the effect was still powerful. As for Lorne’s one, it looked even more incredible, because it was a small crystal crown! ———— [Ice Crystal Unicorn Crown] (Ice Crystal Unicorn Set: 1 / 7) Grade: Platinum HP: +1000 MP: +1000 Intelligence: +100 Spirit: +100 Additional effect: MP recovery effect+100%. Additional effect: Magic Attack+300. Special Effect: [Unicorn’s Crown]: When using magic attacks, there is a 25% chance of triggering the Ice Crystal Unicorn’s Lightning Punishment skill. It will deal 150% magic damage to the target! Type: Cloth Armor Level Requirement: 40 Introduction: Made from the horn of a female Ice Crystal Unicorn. It has incomparably powerful magic power. ———— Good equipment! Lorne’s eyes lit up. The equipment in front of him was not only outstanding in appearance, the additional attributes were the most astonishing. In addition to providing 1000 HP and MP, this equipment also provided 700 Magic Attack power and a passive effect. When attacking, there was a 25% chance of dealing additional damage to the target! To the players, this was definitely an equipment that was worth fighting for. Especially the appearance of this equipment, it was simply a legendary divine equipment. To be honest, such a crown was very suitable for Lorne’s current identity. After all, he was already the lord of a large city. However, he did not like such an ostentatious appearance. After admiring it, he still chose to hide the special effects of the equipment. Then, Lorne opened the set effect. ———— [Ice Crystal Unicorn Set] Grade: Platinum 2: Magic Attack+100, MP+400 (triggered) 3: Magic Attack+100, MP+400 (triggered) 4: Magic Attack+200, MP+800 (triggered) 5: Magic Attack+200, MP+800. 6: Magic Attack+300, MP+1200. 7: Magic Attack+400, MP+1600. ———— Gasp!!! Lorne gasped, not knowing how to describe his emotions. The attributes of those set parts were already very sick. Now that the set effect was triggered, it could actually increase so many attributes. Just the effect of four items actually gave 400 Magic Attack and 1,600 MP. These attributes were even better than one of the equipment in the set. Moreover, this was only a four-piece set! If Lorne could collect all seven in the future, the final effect would definitely be comparable to three pieces of equipment! In other words, the attributes of this Crystal Unicorn Set with seven pieces of equipment would be equivalent to ten other Platinum equipment! … “Very good. It’s time to see my current attributes!”  Ever since he had these powerful pets, Lorne had not cared much about his attributes. If not for the fact that Aisha was tied to his attributes, he would not have been so looking forward to seeing the attributes data. Huff— Taking a deep breath, Lorne opened the character panel. ———— ID: [Tyrant] Class: Official Summoner Level: 40 (0 / 992,000) Bloodline: Divine Dragon Bloodline (10% purity) Potential: 10 stars (+5 stars) Talent: Monster Merging Simulator (??), Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia (Legendary), Master of Experience (Legendary), Treasure Seeking (Legendary) Skill: Hellhound Summoning (Orange), Cooperative Strike (Orange), Triple Blink (Orange), Damage Transfer (Orange), Super Frequency Release (Orange), Energy Shield (Orange)… HP: 15,400 / 15,400 (+1540) MP: 18,400 / 18,400 (+1840) Magic Attack: 6623-13,246 Physical Defense: 1547 Magic Resistance: 1875 Speed: 146.1 (+14.6) Attributes: Constitution 445, Strength 215, Spirit 665, Intelligence 730, Agility 511 Divine Power: 80 / 80 Free Attributes: 0 EXP: 154,142 Empire Reputation: 24,700 Dragon Race of Order Reputation: 2700 Order Faction Reputation: 13,467 Night Elf Race Reputation: 50,520 Luck: 21 Possession: 23 Gold Coins, 43 Silver Coins, 68 Bronze Coins. ———— This was Lorne’s attributes at Level 40 after equipping the Ice Crystal Unicorn Set. It could be seen that he already had 17,000 health points, 20,000 magic points, and a high magic attack of 6,623 points. His dual defense also exceeded 1,500 points. This was a high defense that only top Shield Warriors could have. That was not the point. As a Summoner, his attributes were not that important. The most important thing was Aisha who depended on his attributes! When he saw that his magic attack had exceeded 6,000, Lorne could not wait to check Aisha’s current attributes. When he opened her attributes panel, he was stunned. ———— [Night Elf] (Aisha) Quality: ??? Class: Phantom Assassin (Legendary) Status: Rank 1 Level: 30 (0 / 4.16 million) HP: 156,000 / 156,000 (Master’s HP × 10) MP: 185,000 / 185,000 (Master’s MP × 10) Physical Attack: 26,972-44,216 (Master’s Magic Attack × 4) Physical Defense: 3334 (Master’s Defense × 2) Magic Resistance: 3990 (Master’s Magic Resistance × 2) Superiority: 100% Owner: Tyrant Skills: [Phantom Blink], [Traceless Phantom], [Slow Dagger], [Phantom Massacre], [Absolute Dodge], [Phantom Combo+], [Elf Companion] Introduction: A Night Elf Princess with powerful innate abilities. She is a Legendary-Grade Phantom Assassin. ———— This was Aisha’s current attributes. It could be seen that because of the rapid increase in Lorne’s attributes, Aisha’s attributes had also increased greatly at this moment. Her attack power directly increased by two times, especially the upper limit of her attack. At this moment, it had already reached a terrifying 44,000! With such a terrifying attack and her high critical strike effect, the final damage would definitely exceed 100,000, or even higher! With such strength, how could Cold Desolate Dragon City encounter danger? “While there’s still some time, I’ll enchant the equipment first.” Lorne arrived at the Blacksmith Guild through the teleportation array. Equipment enchantment could allow the equipment to obtain stronger attributes. Once the enchantment was successful, it could increase 10 Attack Points, and Platinum equipment could be enchanted 50 times at most! If he enchanted all of them using the Fire-type Enchantment Gems, each Platinum equipment could increase his magic attack by 500 points. Of course, to successfully enchant it, one needed luck and money. The more times the equipment was enchanted, the lower the probability of success, and the higher the price needed for each enchantment. If he wanted an equipment enchantment to succeed 50 times, he would need at least a few hundred gold coins, because when the equipment enchantment failed, it would damage the Enchantment Gem. Therefore, in reality, when enchanting equipment, it would consume a large number of Enchantment Gems. In addition, it also depended on luck when enchanting. If one was lucky, one enchantment gem could be enchanted once. If one was unlucky, they might not succeed even once with 10,000 enchantment gems. Lorne did not have to worry about the problem of gold coins. He was already immune to limitations like gold coins. After all, he had spent millions of gold coins a day. Coupled with the fact that the amount of gold coins in the Cold Desolate Dragon City was too large, he had no such worries anymore. However, enchantment could not be succeeded just because one had money. Therefore, it required a lot of time to do this. The extent of the enchantment in a day depended on the blacksmith’s performance. During this period of waiting, Lorne headed to the Alchemist Association. He had to quickly get Doge to arrange for the alchemists to enter the Cold Desolate Dragon City and produce them as soon as possible to obtain the greatest benefits. Doge also understood the urgency of this matter. He began to use the ‘Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs’ to contact the alchemist organizations in the surrounding cities. He wanted them to organize a branch in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This was something that was very difficult for most alchemist organizations to accept. This was because behind most alchemist organizations, there was a city, a tribe, or a race. In short, they were not completely free organizations, just like the current Doge. However, when they heard that the City Lord of Cold Desolate Dragon City was the author of the ‘Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs’, these alchemist organizations displayed a different attitude. Some alchemist organizations that were relatively close to the Cold Desolate Dragon City immediately accepted Doge’s invitation. They planned to bring a group of alchemists to the Cold Desolate Dragon City during this period of time. After hearing this news, Lorne finally felt much better. As long as the city had its own alchemist, coupled with the special medicinal formula he obtained from the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia, he believed that it could definitely make a name for the Cold Desolate Dragon City! It was best to form a team of alchemy grandmasters and let them start refining rare potions. With these rare potions, it could attract more races to Cold Desolate Dragon City, and it would be even closer to becoming a true free city. … “Mr. Tyrant, I’ve discussed this with the manager of the Gnome Mineral Company two days ago. They are very willing to cooperate with us. Regarding the update of the pharmacopoeia, they said that they will do their best to fulfill our request.” Doge hesitated for a moment and continued, “They have a request. Before we update the pharmacopoeia, we need to let them use it three days in advance. After three days, we can update the entire network. The gnome-in-charge said that if we agree to this request, they can waive the cost of equipment repair and will give us the earnings as soon as the equipment is updated. Mr. Tyrant, what do you think?” “Agree to it.” Without thinking, Lorne nodded. In fact, the gnome’s request was not a request at all. After all, the information in the pharmacopoeia was only a part of the [Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia]. Even if the Gnome Mineral Company could rely on the lack of information in the past three days to obtain many benefits, this did not affect Lorne and his Cold Desolate Dragon City. After all, gnomes did business all over the world, and before the end of the game, Cold Desolate Dragon City should only have been doing business in Iron Skull City and the surrounding main cities. Moreover, that pharmacopoeia only had information on herbs. The truly valuable things were actually the formulas inside the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia. “Alright, I’ll start forming the network in the next two days. After completing a portion of it, I’ll do a pre-sales test between a few races and cities. Once I’m sure that there’s no problem, I’ll begin to transmit the first edition of the Encyclopedia of Rare Herbs and begin preparing for the first world’s Tyrant Award.” Doge said his plan seriously. At this moment, Lorne looked at him and said, “Doge, now that the basic construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City has been completed, I hope to use the title of the world’s first ‘Tyrant Award’ to promote the reputation and market of the Cold Desolate Dragon City.” “I understand.” Doge said, “I have already set the competition of the Tyrant Award and the award ceremony’s location to the workshop area of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. However, this matter needs to be promoted for a period of time. At the very least, it can only be carried out after our encyclopedia is fully developed worldwide.” Time passed quickly. It was already the day of the event. When Lorne had issued the city defense mission, the players had been cursing crazily, criticizing him for asking the players for help but still wanting to collect 1 gold coin. But now, it seemed that such criticism was pointless. This was because when the city defense mission started, the number of players who participated had already reached 271,000. In the entire Iron Skull City, more than twenty large guilds had basically chosen to participate in the event. Moreover, basically all of them were long-range professional players. Clearly, they had all seen the key point of this siege. It was that the city wall was tall enough to ensure the safety of everyone and resist the monsters. When the scene arrived at the Cold Desolate Dragon City, one could see that the city walls on both sides were filled with people. They were all carrying bows and arrows, holding magic staffs, and waiting for the impending battle. On a circular platform in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, countless players gathered. Their eyes looked at the distant city wall, wanting to know the situation at the front line of the battlefield. These people were all solo players who had not chosen to participate in the battle. Because they were not qualified to participate, they could not climb up the city wall, so they could only squeeze on this circular landing platform and stare ahead. Of course, most players still stayed in the city or in the wilderness. They used the live-stream channel of “Divine Realm” to watch the battle at the front line. “Dear viewers, after two days of tense waiting, the siege war has finally begun!” “The difficulty of this siege is SSSSS-rank, the highest-level mission. Cold Desolate Dragon City, who does not have any defense weapons, cannot rely on the defense of the city to defeat this group of ferocious monsters. According to what I know, Tyrant’s ‘Above the Clouds’ Guild only has him as a player, but even so, Tyrant still issued a special announcement of 1 gold coin signing up two days ago. Does he really have the confidence to win?” “Perhaps. Although I don’t know if Tyrant really has the confidence to defeat his opponent alone, I know that the players of Iron Skull City are united. In order to protect this hard-earned player city, they resolutely joined the battle.” “Even I, Little Orange, can feel my blood boiling. Now, I don’t want to determine the result. As a player, I only want to fight alongside everyone. No matter what the final result is, I will be proud of today’s battle!” “The battle is about to begin. Please follow Little Orange and witness the first hot-blooded battle between the players since the opening of the Divine Realm!” Beautiful female streamer Little Orange mixed into the battle team and began to live stream the entire scene. It could be seen that the number of people in the live-stream was very terrifying. Almost every minute, it was increasing by hundreds of thousands. Before the battle live-stream began, there were already 100 million viewers paying attention in real time. It was normal for such a situation to occur. After all, Cold Desolate Dragon City was the first player city and was a virtual city judged by the various financial institutions to have a potential of 10 billion. Now, be it the players or the audience in reality, they were all focused on this battle. “Dear viewers, we have a live streamer who has already seen the army of monsters in the forest ahead. We will now receive the scene over there in the live-stream.” Little Orange quickly switched the live stream to a shared view. This was a scene transmitted from the Doomsday Forest in the northwest. In the scene, countless monsters were attacking in the direction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Among these monsters were rotting spiders, demonized cannibals, gravediggers, gluttonous ghosts, demonized apes, violent demon wolves, rotting corpses… These monsters mixed together and covered the sky. Especially when the view from above appeared, the audience could not help but gulp. “Tyrant is really unlucky.” “There are probably more than a million monsters, and their quality is very high!” “I think it can’t be defended. The impact of a million monsters is like a flood. This is not something that can be blocked by one person’s strength.” “Not necessarily. After all, with such a high city wall and the help of more than 200,000 high-level players, it should not be defeated.” In the live-stream, the players discussed. The scene of more than a million monsters gathered was too visual for ordinary players like them. Most people even thought that the defense of the Cold Desolate Dragon City would instantly collapse. While everyone was discussing, the scene in the live-stream began to tremble. Boom! Boom!!! Boom!!! A deafening roar sounded. At the same time, the ground trembled. Even the player who was sharing the scene could not stabilize his body. At this moment, all the audience’s eyes were fixed on the screen. An incomparably huge stone pillar blocked the entire scene. Then, it slowly raised and uprooted the mountain and toppled the tree. After the other party walked away, everyone saw his full appearance. It was a huge monster that was 50 meters tall. Its entire body was made of rocks, and there were even countless lush trees growing on it. As it walked, the forest trembled and the mountains shook. Any player who had been in the ruins of the war knew this huge guy. It was the Mountain Giant King who had launched the entire siege! Although its main body was a mountain, it was actually a rock creature, and it was the most powerful Mountain Giant among them. This monster had a huge body, and because it was a rock, its resistance was extremely high. Even Bosses of the same level could not break through its defense. “Roar!” The Mountain Giant King let out a roar that shook the heavens and the earth. Immediately, all the monsters became even more excited. They quickened their steps and began to advance crazily. “It’s over, it’s over. There’s no hope left.” “My god, this Mountain Giant King is too huge!” “Such a huge body can probably smash the city wall of Cold Desolate Dragon City into pieces…” “Tyrant is really in big trouble now. If things go wrong, all his investments in the Cold Desolate Dragon City will be destroyed today!” “He deserves it! This is retribution. This kind of black-hearted businessman should be taught a lesson!” “That’s right. Seeing Tyrant being taught a lesson makes me feel good!” “…” “Roar!!!” As the Mountain Giant King neared Cold Desolate Dragon City, to the northeast, a ferocious army walked out of the Lake of Death. This monster army was even more terrifying than the monsters led by the Mountain Giant King. They were all water creatures of the Lake of Death. Their looks were extremely strange, completely beyond the imagination of the players. When the live-stream switched over, many viewers felt uncomfortable. The monsters were all strange in appearance. Some had tentacles on their heads, some had lumps of flesh on their skin, and some were twisted and limping on the ground. Their appearance was even stranger than the strange creatures in the movies. They were also covered in mucus, and they looked disgusting. “Wow, are all these things in the Lake of Death?” “The monster’s beard is actually an octopus beard. Looking at the suction cups, my phobia is acting up.” “How disgusting. Shouldn’t the water dwellers be mermaids? Why are they so ugly?” “It’s probably because the environment is too dark that they grow up casually…” “I’m going to vomit. Not only are these monsters astonishingly ugly, but their numbers are also astonishing. Looks like they’re not inferior to the Mountain Giant King’s army.” “An army of a million appearing in both directions at the same time, how can we fight?” Looking at the army of monsters in the Lake of Death, the players felt helpless. In their eyes, there was no room for resistance in this war. Facing these incomparably powerful monsters, other than instantly collapsing, there was no other possibility for the huge and unreal city of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Some players in the Cold Desolate Dragon City had even taken out return scrolls, preparing to return to the safest Iron Skull City. … Ding! “Your city [Cold Desolate Dragon City] is about to face a monster invasion. Please immediately send the guards to battle!” Lorne sat in the fortress on the city wall and looked at the distant mountain range. That was where the Mountain Giant King was attacking. There were already sounds coming from there, and it seemed that the monsters would reach here in a short time. At that moment, a notification appeared in front of Lorne. Ding! “Commander of the Iron Skull City Army, Rhett, requests to assist Cold Desolate Dragon City in the defense of the city. Do you agree?” Rhett wanted to help? Lorne was surprised and quickly decided. Soon, a portion of the city guards stood on the city wall. Lorne arrived beside Rhett to check on them. “Didn’t you say that Iron Skull City would not participate in the battle of Cold Desolate Dragon City? Why did Commander Rhett still choose to join with his men?” Lorne asked casually. “As the city guards of Iron Skull City, our only duty is to protect the safety of Iron Skull City. Under normal circumstances, we are not allowed to participate in other forces’ wars, but…” Rhett said in a low voice, “Cold Desolate Dragon City has an extraordinary meaning to Iron Skull City. Its existence has greatly affected the subsequent layout of Iron Skull City on the battlefield. After consideration from City Lord Ansare, you have decided to let me send a portion of the city guards to help you defend, but there are some things that I have to say in advance. We will help you defend, but if there is a situation where you can’t be saved, I will very likely prioritize the army. When I think you can’t resist, we will directly retreat. I hope you can understand our actions.” “Of course.” Lorne smiled and nodded, “Cold Desolate Dragon City is very grateful that Iron Skull City has chosen to provide us with some help. No matter how much support you provide, we will remember it.” Rhett nodded, then waved his sword and said, “All city guards, build a defensive formation with the city wall and resist the attacks of the monsters with all your might!!!” With that, a large group of city guards quickly arrived. The help that Iron Skull City had provided to Cold Desolate Dragon City this time was less than 10,000 people. Moreover, these 10,000 people could leave the battlefield at any moment, so he should not have too much hope in them. … Boom! As the Mountain Giant King neared, the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City trembled. This Boss was too huge and its entire body was made of hard rocks. Its weight was hard to estimate. Around it, there were more than a million monsters gathered. Most of the monsters were around Level 40. To the current players, this was not a level that they could not resist. However, the only thing to worry about was the Boss’s level! If the other party’s level exceeded 50, the entire battle would be lost. Looking at the army of monsters in the distance, Lorne could not help but be a little nervous. The appearance of this Boss was too terrifying. It looked as huge as the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon he had seen in the Lake of Death. After all, the Two-Headed Crocodile Dragon was a Level 100 Boss! This guy could not be a Level 100 Boss, or else things would be troublesome. Moreover, there were so many monsters that there was no way to leave the city to fight. They had to wait for the other party to reach the city. Otherwise, if they rushed into the sea of monsters, Aisha would not be able to protect Lorne. However, the problem was that letting the monsters directly rush to the bottom of the city wall had a huge impact on the Cold Desolate Dragon City. “Aisha, in the battle later, deal with that Boss first. After killing it, return immediately. Don’t worry about the other monsters for the time being.” Lorne opened the map of the Cold Desolate Dragon City and found a large number of monsters in the northwest and northeast directions. Moreover, among these monsters was a huge Boss that could deal immense damage to the city wall. In order to ensure the safety of the city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Aisha had to deal with these two Bosses first. “Yes, Master.” Aisha wore a red cloak. Her slender figure was so thin in the huge city wall, but on this battlefield, she was the key to determining if she could win the battle. While the two were discussing their strategy, a short monster had already arrived near the city wall. “Tsk, tsk, tsk, I smell humans. What an impulsive smell…” The demon ghost let out a sharp roar and finally waved its sharp claws, roaring, “Charge! Destroy this city and kill all the humans inside!!” As soon as it finished speaking, countless monsters rushed towards the Cold Desolate Dragon City. These monsters had no strategy. Before the monster could get close, the pets beside Lorne drew their bows, and dozens of bows and arrows were scattered below the city wall. -1205 -1252 -1267 -1221 Small Artillery had a longer range than the players, and when these arrows hit the monsters, a pile of high damage values immediately appeared. “Look, Tyrant’s pet has attacked!” “What’s going on? It only dealt slightly more than a thousand damage!” “Looks like Tyrant’s strength is only so-so!” “Although this damage is stronger than players of the same level, it does not match Tyrant’s identity.” “This is bad. Those players who participated in the event were definitely cheated.” “Don’t jump to conclusions so early. The true expert beside Tyrant is the red-cloaked elf beside him. Without her, who would dare doubt Tyrant’s strength?” Hundreds of meters away, the players standing on the high platform began to discuss. The players standing on the city wall began to whisper after seeing this phenomenon. They could not help but doubt Tyrant’s strength. Although in the previous battle, they knew that Tyrant’s pets could deal tens of thousands of damage, that was only one person after all, and the opponents now were millions of monsters! No matter how powerful an Elven Assassin was, it could not determine the direction of this war. With that in mind, they all wanted to retreat. But at that moment, the monster had come within a hundred yards of the city wall. At this distance, archer players could use their advantage in height to shoot at the monsters in front of them. Mage players could not attack the monsters yet. However, to his disappointment, these players did not take the initiative to attack. They seemed ready to see what Lorne would do. … “How terrifying, Sister Guild Leader…” In the direction of the Silver Snow Guild, a group of beautiful players poked their heads down the city, but in the next second, they were so frightened that they took a few steps back. Thousands of monsters had already gathered under the city wall. The dense appearance made one’s scalp tingle. Moreover, there were more than a million monsters. They revealed their sharp teeth and prepared to deal a devastating blow to the city wall. This was also the problem that the players were most worried about. After all, there were so many monsters. Even if each one ate a little of the city wall’s durability, in such a crazy state, they would quickly gnaw a huge hole in the city wall that was dozens of meters tall. At that time, the players who had entered combat would have no chance of escaping. “<i>Waah</i>, Guild Leader, will we be buried by these ugly monsters later?” “I’m so cute. How can I die under the mouths of these ugly monsters? When the city wall collapses, I will definitely choose to kill myself to end this terrifying nightmare.” “Sister Guild Leader, I’m so panicked!” “By the way, Guild Leader, why don’t you let us attack?” The sisters of the Silver Snow Guild could not understand. The order that Twinkle Rose had given them was to not attack for the time being. This was suspicious. After all, the Silver Snow Guild was different from the other guilds. The relationship between the Silver Snow Guild and Tyrant was extraordinary. Even if they could not defeat the monsters in this city defense war, the sisters of the Silver Snow Guild would definitely help Tyrant fight to the last moment. “Let’s wait and see. Tyrant has to let the more than two hundred thousand people know that the Cold Desolate Dragon City has the ability to resist the monsters. Otherwise, they will not pick up their weapons to fight.” Twinkle Rose looked at Tyrant. The man was not flustered at all. He only stood calmly on the city wall, as if he did not see the million monsters approaching. At this moment, more than a million monsters had arrived at the bottom of the city wall. They waved their sharp claws and began to attack the city wall! … “How long do you think this city wall can last?” “This city wall is so thick. I think it can last for an hour.” “Brother, you’re too confident. There are so many monsters, and there are also tomb raiders who specialize in destroying the city wall. I think it will take half an hour.” “I guess in ten minutes, those players did not even release an arrow. They let the monsters attack. I think this city wall can’t even last ten minutes.” “I think in five minutes, when the Mountain Giant King comes, he will probably be able to kick a huge hole in the city wall!” When they saw the dense swarm of monsters, the surrounding onlookers shook their heads. They did not think that the city wall could withstand so many monsters. But just as everyone thought that the city wall would collapse, something shocking happened. -0 -0 -0 -0 -0 Countless damage numbers popped up with sparks. They were all ‘-0’. The crazy attacks of these monsters did not cause any damage to the city wall! Pfft— When they saw this scene, the players who had been guessing that the city wall would collapse in a few minutes spat out blood. These were all Level 40 monsters! Their attacks exceeded 2000 points! However, such a group of monsters did not cause any damage to the city wall! This was too ridiculous! How high was the defense of the city wall? The players who saw the scene through the live stream widened their mouths in shock. When the beautiful players of the Silver Snow Guild saw this scene, their faces were also flushed. They looked at the monster that was crazily chiseling under the city wall but did not achieve anything. “Sisters, do you see this? These monsters are completely useless. They can’t break through the city wall’s defense. They are all living targets now. Everyone only needs to stand on the city wall and attack from afar!!!” Twinkle Rose shouted happily at the sisters behind her. “Sister Guild Leader, we’re going to be rich!” “Heavens, there are more than a million monsters with no ability to counterattack!” “Boohoo, I believe Brother Tyrant is right.” “Unfortunately, our Silver Snow Guild only sent 10,000 people this time. If only all of us came.” “It’s useless. Look at how high the defense of these monsters is. Only the elite players of the guild can break through their defense. The other sisters will probably be useless.” “Alright, alright. Little cuties of the Silver Snow Guild, let’s happily deal damage. This time, everyone who has broken through to Level 30 will get a limited edition bag!” “Thank you, Sister Guild Leader!!” “Sister Guild Leader, I love you to death. I want to warm your bed tonight!” The beautiful players of the Silver Snow Guild were all extremely happy. More than a million monsters had been blocked under the city wall. Now, they only needed to stand on the city wall to kill the monsters. It was too comfortable! “Brothers, let’s kill monsters and snatch the experience points!” “All archers, fire!” “The mages of the guild are attacking the monsters under the city wall indiscriminately!” “Don’t mix together. There aren’t that many monsters!” “The few of you, go over there and use your AOE skills to snatch the monsters from the other guilds!” When they saw that the monsters could not break through the defense of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the members of the guilds began to attack. There were many monsters under the city wall now. Almost one skill could hit more than a dozen monsters. Although the damage each time was very low, it could not compare to the many players around. Everyone used one skill each. With dozens of skills, even if these monsters were Level 40, they could not withstand such terrifying damage. [Fire Zone]! [Cold Ice Zone]! [Icicle]! [Chain Fireball]! [Roasting Flame]! […] At this moment, countless lights flashed on the city wall. All the players released their skills crazily towards the bottom of the city wall. The monsters’ health decreased rapidly, especially when the AOE skill triggered the critical hit effect. One skill could take the lives of several Level 40 monsters. Some people even began to glow with a golden light, a sign of leveling up. “Hahaha, this gold coin was worth it!” “Yes, although I can’t see which monster I killed, my experience points are increasing so quickly!” “If I can level up like this in the future, I’ll wash Tyrant’s feet every day!” “Scram! Useless things! I’ll say this today. If Tyrant can give me such a good opportunity to farm monsters every day, I will drink all the water in the basin!” “You just want free drinks!” “You’re all ruthless people!” … “Aisha, the Mountain Giant King is not here yet. Go warm up first.” Lorne’s gaze was fixed on the huge creature in the distance, but the Boss seemed to be very cowardly. It did not move for a long time and stayed in the distant mountain range, as if it was using the small monster to drain the defense power of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This was not what Lorne wanted. He wanted to kill this Boss in one go and kill the Octopus Sea Demon Leader in the northeast. Looking at the current situation, this plan could not be implemented for the time being. Because there was a limit to the range of activity between pets and their masters, Aisha could not fight so far away alone. Now, she could only wait for the Mountain Giant King to attack. Fortunately, the Octopus Sea Demon Leader in the northeast was also waiting for the opportunity. As if they had agreed, the two Bosses crouched down at one place and waited for the monsters to weaken the defense before launching a fatal attack. This stumped Lorne. He had originally wanted to kill a Boss to advertise the Cold Desolate Dragon City. But now, it seemed that he could only let Aisha go to the city to harvest some monsters. These monsters were all Level 40 high-level monsters, and there was no lack of Elite or even Bronze-level monsters among them that could give him a high amount of experience points. “Step!” At the command, Aisha’s small boots stepped on the wall, then she leaped, her body like a willow leaf falling into a surging tide. However, she was not controlled by these hideous monsters. Instead, she quickly waved the sharp blades in her hand and began to dance her beautiful dance of slaughter on the battlefield! -115,900 (Critical) -114,300 (Critical) -115,500 (Critical) -112,100 (Critical) -114,400 (Critical) Aisha’s attack power was linked to Lorne’s attributes. When Lorne’s attributes were stronger, Aisha’s attributes would increase four times. Because Lorne had changed a Level 40 Platinum-grade equipment previously, he now had 6,600+ Magic Attack power, and Aisha also had 26,000 Physical Attack power. Although she did not have an AOE skill, Aisha’s [Phantom Blink] skill allowed her to reach the enemy in an instant. Therefore, her current killing speed made it difficult for all the players on the city wall to distinguish her. Almost in a few seconds, dozens of huge critical hits appeared in the sky, causing the players on the city wall to rub their eyes hard, thinking that they were seeing things. The players who saw this scene in the live stream almost had their eyes pop out. “Gosh! Where did such a ridiculous number come from?!” “It’s Tyrant’s elf pet!” “I can’t see where she is. This is too terrifying!” “110,000 Critical Hit Damage, is this what a player can do?” “It feels like we’re not on the same level as Tyrant.” “What level? We’re not playing the same game as Tyrant!” “^That makes sense.” … At this moment, no one dared to doubt Lorne’s confidence. To be honest, even Lorne was surprised. He did not expect that the Level 30 Aisha could deal as high as 110,000 critical damage to a Level 40 monster! After all, with the level suppression effect, if he wanted to deal 110,000 damage in this state, he had to deal at least 190,000 damage! Didn’t this mean that the current Aisha had a chance of hitting 200,000? Lorne gasped. This result was too crazy. One had to know that when players faced Level 40 monsters, they could only deal about 1,000 points of damage. Only the top high-level players could deal more than 2,000 points of damage. However, there was still a 100 times difference between 2000 and 200,000! “I wonder how powerful Aisha will be after she completely awakens the power of the Holy Angel Gabriel?” According to the information he had learned from the Iron Skull City’s library, Gabriel at the peak was on the same level as an Abyss Ruler as a Saint-level expert! Above the Saint-level was the God-level! Gabriel did not ignite her divine flame, but because she was an angel, after being forcefully enhanced by the light power of the Church of Light, she could still unleash the strength to resist Demigods. That level was unimaginable to the current Lorne. He remembered that after liberating Domina in the Lake of Death, the power she unleashed was countless times stronger than the Level 100 One-Eyed Giant Snake! “Let’s take it slow. I’m still one step away from the Earth Realm.” Lorne shook his head and smiled. Only players who had reached Class Two could be considered to have entered the ‘Earth Realm’. At this moment, Lorne still needed to raise his pets to Level 40 before he could reach Class Two. It would probably take some time. Of course, if the following time could be the same as now, he was even confident that he could complete the Class Two Advancement by today. But that was clearly impossible. Although Aisha was powerful, she was not a machine. After a high-intensity battle, she needed to rest, and the monsters here were not endless. As time passed, the number of monsters here began to decrease at a visible rate. “Ding! Congratulations on successfully leveling your pet ‘Small Artillery’ to Level 31!” “Ding! Congratulations on successfully leveling your pet ‘Small Artillery’ to Level 32!” “Ding! Congratulations on successfully leveling your pet ‘Small Artillery’ to Level 33!” Three consecutive golden lights poured down on Small Artillery. Its level had reached Level 33. This level could effectively increase the single damage output of Small Artillery. However, it also depleted Aisha’s experience gain for the past ten minutes. Yes, in just ten minutes, Aisha had gained nearly five million experience points. This income was unimaginable when killing monsters in the wilderness. The only pity was that there were too few monsters. Aisha killed too quickly. In ten minutes, she had killed thousands of monsters. Almost wherever she went, the concentration of monsters decreased greatly. At this speed, in about an hour, the monsters under the city wall would be completely wiped out. The players on the city wall were also snatching monsters crazily. Under the barrage of mages and archers, countless monsters died. However, melee players like Super Rich and Twinkle Rose found it a little difficult to deal with in this battle. Although they could also use longbows, they would not receive the attributes of the longbow since they were not archers. Therefore, their damage output was very limited, and they could not compete with those long-range players. In the middle of the city wall, there was a mage team. They were farming monsters very quickly. After clearing the monsters in their defense line, they actually began to snatch the monsters on the surrounding defense line. Under such crazy damage, golden light descended from many of the players’ bodies, and their levels increased. Lorne did not care about their gains. After all, compared to him, these players were nothing. … “I’m so jealous that they can fight on the city wall!” On the landing platform in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, the eyes of the players watching the battle had already turned red. They all thought that this was a battle of life and death, but who knew that the entire battle would be so simple? Not only were these monsters unable to attack the players, but they were even unable to break through the city wall’s defense. It was simply illogical! “I’m so jealous!!!” “This battle was too easy. They were just picking up experience!” “Damn, I’m shortsighted. If not for my heart aching for that gold coin, I would not have missed such a good opportunity to earn experience points!” “Damn, I thought this battle would be very difficult, so I did not participate. Who knew that it would be so easy?” “Tyrant, I’ll pay two gold coins. Can you let me register now?!” The players watching spat out blood. When they first saw the registration fee of 1 gold coin, they all scoffed. But now, they could only stand here and watch others stand on the city wall and easily raise their levels. Was there anything more painful than this in this world?! The crowd regretted it. Under their watch, time passed little by little. Under the crazy attacks of the players, the monsters under the northwest wall had completely lost their huge size. Now, all that was left was a large amount of gold coins and loot on the ground. The light from the equipment turned the ground under the city wall into a river of light, dazzling everyone. Countless players rushed to the city gate, wanting to walk out of the city and pick up the loot. But no matter how they shouted, the city gate was still closed. This made the players anxious, because the loot in “Divine Realm” would only exist for a period of time. When no one picked it up for a long time, the loot would automatically disappear. This was definitely not a scene they wanted to see. “Damn it, I can’t sleep for a month with so many equipment uncollected. Forget it. Even if I fall to my death today, I will take away a few pieces of equipment!” The players on the city wall could not help but jump down. His idea was simple. He wanted to collect the equipment on the ground before he fell to his death. But just as he was about to complete his expectations, a notification appeared. Ding! “Congratulations on picking up [Fearless War Sword] (Silver-grade). According to the event rules, the loot will belong to the Cold Desolate Dragon City!” Ding! “All the loot from this event has been directly tied to the ownership of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. As you are the event participant, you can find the City Lord of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Tyrant, and request to pick up loot for yourself!” “Damn…” The player cursed and exploded like a watermelon. On the other side, after seeing the countless loot under the city wall, the surrounding players could not help but laugh. They all arrived at the teleportation array and prepared to use it to teleport themselves to the wilderness. Then, they would run to the city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City and pick up the loot on the ground. Especially when they realized that there were countless Silver equipment under the city wall, they were even crazier. A good Silver-grade equipment could still be worth thousands or even tens of thousands of dollars! Under this city wall, there were hundreds of Silver-grade items and thousands of Bronze-grade items. As long as one could pick up a few pieces of equipment, he might have a year’s worth of living expenses. To ordinary players, this was a temptation that could not be rejected. Therefore, they all disappeared from the teleportation array and rushed to the city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City from all directions to pick up the loot on the ground. Then, everyone received rows of system notifications. “Ding! Congratulations on picking up 10 silver coins. According to the event binding rules, the loot will belong to Cold Desolate Dragon City!” “Ding! Congratulations on picking up [Black Shield]. According to the event rules, the loot will belong to Cold Desolate Dragon City!” “Ding!” “Ding!” Seeing the notification in front of them, the players went berserk. At this moment, there was a rumble behind him. The ground began to tremble. The Mountain Giant King led the final monster army towards Cold Desolate Dragon City. The players under the city wall were so frightened that their scalps turned numb. They quickly took out the return scroll from Iron Skull City, but realized that it could not be used for the time being. Helpless, the players could only take out the return scroll from the Cold Desolate Dragon City, but they received another notification. “Ding! Cold Desolate Dragon City is in an emergency state. The teleportation magic circle has been tightly sealed. If you want to use it, you need to spend 1 gold coin to unlock it.” Pfft— The players outside the city spat out blood. This Tyrant was too inhumane!! “Roar!” The distant Mountain Giant King let out a loud roar. In the next moment, the surrounding mountains trembled. It was not because of the Mountain Giant King’s actions, but because the mountains were all alive. They stretched their bodies like smaller Mountain Giants! Standing on the city wall, their figures could be seen clearly. The Mountain Giants were about 20 meters tall, half as tall as the Mountain Giant King. However, compared to the players, such a size was definitely huge! The Mountain Giants rushed towards the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Compared to the slow speed of the Mountain Giant King, the Mountain Giants were even faster. They quickly arrived near the city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Due to the bonus of the event, the range of the identification skill was greatly increased. However, as they stood on the city wall, they had already obtained the Boss’ attributes panel. ———— [Mountain Giant] Grade: Boss Level: 45 HP: 800,000 / 800,000 Physical Attack: 2400-3100 Defense: 4500 Skill: Toss, Flying Rocks and Sand, Landslide, Rock Body. Introduction: The Mountain Giants are a race with the bloodline of the ancient gods. They are huge and have an affinity with the ground, giving them powerful strength and tough physiques. Do not anger them. The anger of the Mountain Giants is extremely terrifying. ———— Although it was an ordinary Boss, the Mountain Giant was much stronger than most Silver Bosses. Especially defense. With a defense of 4,500 points and the addition of the [Rock Body] skill to increase its defense by 35%, the Mountain Giant’s overall defense had already exceeded 6075 points! This number was a defense value that even the top players could not break through! When the players saw this panel, they revealed bitter expressions. This was the first time they had encountered an ordinary Boss that was so difficult to deal with. It had not been so difficult when they hunted Silver Bosses in the past. Forget it, they could not care less. The players on the city wall shook their heads. This monster was no longer something they could deal with. An opponent of this level had to be dealt with by Tyrant. As players, they could just stand on the city wall and kill ordinary monsters. While the players were thinking, the Mountain Giants suddenly did a very strange thing. They stopped about 500 yards away, then reached out and grabbed the relatively large monsters like the Demonized Ape beside them, throwing them at the top of the city wall. Pfft— The body of the demonized giant ape slammed into the city wall. Many players were hit by such an attack and died on the spot. Although the Mountain Giant’s attack panel was not outstanding, the damage dealt by throwing such a huge demonized ape a few hundred meters away could not be measured by the attack panel. “Gosh! These Mountain Giants are so savage!” The players on the city wall were stunned by such an attack. They moved towards the fortress on the city wall. At this moment, another bad news came. It turned out that not only would the Mountain Giants use the monsters as cannonballs, but they would also throw soldiers, causing the monsters that could not reach the city wall to reach the 70-meter high city wall. “Sisters, don’t fight. Hide in the fortress on the wall first. Use your bows and arrows to deal with the monsters that are thrown up first!” Twinkle Rose immediately commanded the people to distribute them properly. The other guilds also moved. Due to the fact that the Mountain Giant’s throw was too powerful, the players could not stop it. Therefore, they could only hide in the defense and wait for an opportunity to counterattack. Fortunately, there were many defensive buildings on the city wall. The players could rely on these buildings to hide. When they realized that they could not directly kill the guards on the city wall, the Mountain Giants immediately locked their gazes on the players gathered on the landing stage. Although they were a few hundred meters away from the city wall, the Mountain Giants’ arms were too terrifying. When they really threw with all their strength, the few hundred meters of distance could not stop their attacks. One by one, the gluttonous ghosts were thrown into the city by the Mountain Giant like seeds. Many of the monsters hit their targets and killed a large number of players on the landing stage. The remaining players were in a mess and began to flee in panic. Many players pushed each other and accidentally fell, turning into mush. In addition, there were some luckier gluttonous ghosts who survived after falling from the sky. They held their sharp claws and limped into the building, beginning to cause trouble in the city. … “As long as the city wall is not destroyed, nothing will be a problem.” Lorne stood on the city wall and calmly looked at everything that was happening. Although there were many monsters thrown in, there were more players in the city. It was not a problem to clear the monsters. The most troublesome thing was to deal with these unrestrained Mountain Giants! He could not let them keep throwing! Otherwise, if the battle dragged on, the northwest city wall might still be able to defend, but the northeast city wall was very likely to be problematic under the assault of the octopus sea demons. In fact, there was already a problem in the northeastern city. In the army of the Octopus Sea Demon Leader, there were many monsters with suction tentacles. Although the city walls of Cold Desolate Dragon City were hard, it was completely possible for the other party to directly climb up. Especially the players there, their quality was worse than that on the northwestern city wall. In the past half an hour, a large number of monsters had rushed into the city and destroyed some buildings that had just been built. Fortunately, the basic buildings of the Cold Desolate Dragon City were relatively stable. Those huge buildings that were originally in the city could still ensure that they were intact when facing the attacks of the lake monsters. As for the ordinary buildings that had been destroyed, Lorne could accept such a loss. It was only a loss of some gold coins, and it was not a heavy blow to Cold Desolate Dragon City. In short, as long as the main buildings of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was not threatened, Lorne could accept these results. “Aisha, deal with the monsters under the city wall first!” Lorne was in no hurry. He commanded Aisha to first clear the monsters under the city wall. Only then could he bring Aisha out of the city and go a kilometer away to kill the insolent Mountain Giants! -113,400 (Critical) -112,400 (Critical) -113,100 (Critical) -115,300 (Critical) Aisha jumped under the city wall and used the dagger in her hand to kill the monster in front of her crazily. Almost every slash dealt high damage. This was Aisha’s talent as an assassin. After killing any target, her next attack would definitely have a critical hit effect. In just ten minutes, most of the monsters were killed. “Aisha, let’s kill those Mountain Giants!” With that, a pair of angel wings immediately appeared on Lorne’s back, and he jumped down. Under the gaze of the global audience, he transformed into a ‘Holy Angel’ and glided down until he entered the forest. These Mountain Giants were also intelligent. They knew to stay away from the city wall and cast long-range attacks from a few hundred meters away. This could definitely ensure that they were not harmed by the guards in the city. Unfortunately, they clearly did not know who they had provoked today! Soon, Lorne arrived near a Mountain Giant. [Phantom Stealth]! Aisha directly raised her dagger to face the enemy. The moon-white hexagram formation flashed on the sharp dagger, then turned into a stream that quickly stabbed into the Boss. Surprisingly, there was an extremely hard rock layer outside the skin of the Mountain Giants. When attacked, this layer of defense would offset a large portion of the damage. Especially when the level suppression effect was more obvious, such damage reduction ability was especially outstanding. Even Aisha did not see the crazy scene when she killed the small monsters after dealing damage several times. Instead, a series of normal attack damage that did not even exceed 10,000 appeared. -52,050 (Critical) -5925 -5913 -5999 -5947 The first strike was a critical hit effect after exiting invisibility, but the damage was still not that terrifying. It only dealt 52,000 damage. The subsequent basic attack only dealt about 6,000 damage to the Mountain Giant, which was a rare phenomenon under Aisha’s sharp blades. Seeing this, Lorne could not help but raise the Ice Crystal Unicorn Staff and use a support skill on Aisha. [Cooperative Strike]! This orange skill had a very powerful skill effect, which was to add the owner’s attack attributes to the pet, allowing the pet to deal the highest damage in an instant. Aisha also instantly used the [Phantom Combo+] skill. This skill could not produce a critical hit effect, but it could be effective at the same time as an amplification skill. It was the perfect combination with the Cooperative Strike skill. Clang! Clang! Clang! Clang! Clang! Cold blades stabbed ruthlessly into the Boss, and continuous metallic sounds could be heard. It had to be said that Aisha’s attack was really fierce. In just 1.5 seconds, she dealt the most powerful 10 consecutive hits. -12,501 -12,501 -12,501 -12,501 -12,501 -12,501 Ten high damage values appeared, and the total damage instantly reached 120,000 points. Coupled with the previous damage, in just a few seconds, Aisha dealt nearly 200,000 damage to the target! Even a tanky Boss like the Mountain Giant could not withstand such a ferocious attack. Crack!!! After suffering such huge damage in an instant, the Mountain Giant’s rock feet collapsed. Like a landslide in a mountain, a large amount of soil and rocks fell. “Roar!” The Mountain Giant was in pain. As the Boss with the best defense attributes, it had not encountered such a ferocious attack before. It had even shattered its external defense. This made the Mountain Giant extremely angry. It raised its forelimbs. Under the guidance of the magic power, the soil and rocks formed a huge fist that bombarded Aisha’s head. Boom! An earth-shattering punch landed, causing the surrounding forest to tremble. However, this was useless. Before the stone fist landed, Aisha had already used the skill “Phantom Blink” to escape the attack range of 15 yards. Her silver and sparkling Death Angel boots stepped lightly on the rocks. Although there were still rocks falling from above, Aisha easily dodged them. In order to reduce the range of the Mountain Giant, she had deliberately kept the distance between the two sides within 30 yards. This distance could keep her out of the range of the Boss’ punches to the greatest extent, and it could allow her to attack at any time. Of course, this was also dangerous. Being too close to the enemy would result in frequent collisions with the other party. A moment of carelessness would result in death. However, Aisha now had 150,000 health points, so she did not have to worry about this. Even standing on the spot and fighting the Boss was not a problem. After all, she still had 3,300 Defense points. The Mountain Giant’s damage output was really not enough to threaten Aisha’s health. However, Aisha had higher expectations of herself. Under the circumstances that she could use skills to dodge, she would definitely not let herself be harmed at all. This was the pride of a top assassin! … -53,870 (Critical) -5945 -5961 -12407 -12407 -12,407 The cooldown time of Aisha’s skills was very short, especially the damage output skills. They were all about ten seconds, and only the combo skill had a cooldown of more than 20 seconds. However, this did not affect her damage output. While waiting for the skill to cooldown, Aisha had already dealt high damage. The moment the skill cooldown was over, she immediately used her skill. Lorne cooperated with her combo and used the “Cooperative Strike” skill. In just one minute, the Mountain Giant with 800,000 HP fell to the ground with a bang. Its huge body gradually turned into a small hill. Swish! When the Boss was lost, a large pile of loot dropped on the ground. Unfortunately, this was only an ordinary Boss. Due to its quality, the equipment dropped in the end was very limited. The highest equipment was only Silver-grade and the probability was very low. But as Lorne thought otherwise, he saw a few fruits that glowed blue. “The Boss can drop fruits?” Lorne was surprised. Such loot was very rare. At the very least, he had never seen one in so many battles. ———— [Spirit Fruit] Grade: Rare Effect: Increases Spirit by 1 after consumption. Unlimited use. Introduction: A fruit with pure energy. After consuming it, you will absorb the energy within. ———— Seeing this introduction, Lorne praised it. To the players, attributes were part of their permanent strength. It was not like equipment that needed to be changed, so its value was very high. This was also one of the main reasons why many people valued the first clear of the dungeon. Although the fruit in front of him could only increase one attribute per fruit, the important thing was that there was no quantity restriction on consuming this fruit. As long as one had the ability to obtain more, their strength would constantly increase. This was an incredible treasure in the game! “I can’t believe this is a player city…” In the direction of the Silver Snow Guild, the beautiful ladies all revealed looks of disbelief. Although they were confident in Tyrant, who would have thought that this temporarily repaired city would have such powerful defense? Under the protection of such a sturdy city wall, even without the help of players like them, they believed that Tyrant alone had the strength to clean up all the monsters. Of course, doing that would delay the development of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Compared to these experience points, the construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was clearly more valuable. “Alright sisters, do your best to kill the monsters. In the future, our city will also be so grand!” Under the command of Twinkle Rose, the sisters of the Silver Snow Guild walked out of the defense fortress on the city wall and began to attack the monsters below. The others followed suit. On this city wall that even the Mountain Giant could not break through, there was no need for them to worry about anything else. Now, they only needed to stand on the city wall to obtain unclear experience points. As for the Mountain Giants? The players tactfully ignored them. It was not because they looked down on ordinary Bosses, but because they knew that their attacks could not deal any effective damage to the Mountain Giant, so they simply did not pay attention to it lest it affected the speed at which they earned experience points. … Boom! Boom! Boom!! At this moment, the Mountain Giants under the city wall did not give up. They waved their fists and began to bombard the tall city wall like a storm. Their attacks were like beating drums. The dull sound and the trembling made one feel inexplicably nervous. However, reality was so magical. No matter what method the Mountain Giants used, no matter how much strength they used, they could not break through the city wall. To be honest, their current attack method was not even as obvious as when they threw the monsters. “Don’t worry. These monsters can’t shake the Cold Desolate Dragon City!” Lorne rushed back with Aisha. Against these monsters, he did not have any additional tactics. He directly let Aisha rush forward with her two daggers. Aisha’s agile figure quickly moved around the Mountain Giant, and the sharp blade in her hand quickly slashed across, dealing extremely terrifying damage to the Boss. Perhaps because the Mountain Giant was too unlucky, it was struck several times. Therefore, it fell to the ground after less than half a minute. Like the two Mountain Giants, in a pile of worthless loot, Lorne found a pile of pleasant fruits. This Boss was not very lucky, but when it dropped the loot, it was not just generous. Previously, the Mountain Giant had only dropped about 10 items, but this Mountain Giant had actually dropped 27! Lorne quickly put the fruits away and turned to the other Mountain Giant. There were still five Mountain Giants at the scene. If each of them could drop 20 fruits, then they would directly obtain 100 Free Attribute Points. This was even comparable to the benefits of an event dungeon! … “My god, this pet is too awesome!” “Please give me an army of such beautiful pets that can fight!” “What happened just now? She actually depleted a quarter of the Boss’ health in an instant!” “Are we really playing the same game as Tyrant?” “Brother, stop dreaming. We’re just workers in the game. He’s the Overlord of the game world. It’s different.” “I’m kneeling…” “Mom asked me why I was kneeling and watching the live stream. I smiled but said nothing.” When they saw the battle between Aisha and the Mountain Giant, the players were already numb. They had been too shocked since the beginning of the battle. Now that they saw less than 10,000 damage, they actually felt that this did not make sense. … “Ding! Your pet Aisha has killed the monster [Mountain Giant]!” “Ding! Your pet Aisha has killed the monster [Mountain Giant]!” “Ding!” “Ding!” A few minutes later, all the Mountain Giants fell to Aisha’s sharp blades. There were a total of eight Mountain Giants that appeared this time, and all of them were ordinary Bosses. Moreover, when they were killed, a pile of glowing fruits dropped. Unfortunately, the Mountain Giant behind did not drop too many fruits, most of them around 10, so in the end, Lorne only obtained 105 of them. From the total data, the final result was very good. After all, the total number still exceeded a hundred. Without hesitation, Lorne picked up the fruit and ate it. “Ding! Your Spirit+1.” “Ding! Your Intelligence+1.” “Ding!” “Ding!” A series of notifications sounded, and Lorne’s spiritual attributes increased significantly. Almost half of the fruits dropped this time were Spirit Fruits, which was also very important to him as a Summoner. Unfortunately, he had not reached Class Two yet. Currently, Lorne’s Spirit attribute growth was 1: 15, which meant that 1 Spirit point gave 15 MP! This time, he obtained a total of 55 Spirit Fruits, which was equivalent to 825 MP for Lorne. The effect was very good. Among the remaining fruits, Intelligence and Strength made up the majority. They gave Lorne 18 Intelligence, 15 Strength, 10 Constitution, and 7 Agility. In short, it was not bad. After all, these permanent stats could accompany him forever. In addition, Lorne had another idea. Would he be able to materialize his attributes in reality the next time he conjured them? If this idea was realized, then other than the enhancement of equipment, his attributes were critical. “Let’s take it slow. I hope that when I complete the second chapter of ‘Divine Radiance’, I can materialize again, and it would be best if I could materialize my physical strength. This way, I can gradually master the power of the game in reality.” Lorne thought. At this moment, in the distant mountain range, the even larger Mountain Giant King began to move. It moved its thick limbs and walked straight in the direction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. On the way, its appearance began to change a little. From its original four limbs on the ground, it gradually became two legs on the ground. When it completely stood up, it was actually 80 meters tall. This height was even higher than the city wall of Cold Desolate Dragon City! This Mountain Giant King was four times the height of the Mountain Giant and was even larger. Its arrival made even Lorne, who was very confident in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, feel doubt. As for the other players, their eyes widened. They wanted to see who was stronger between the Mountain Giant King and the Cold Desolate Dragon City. However, to everyone’s surprise, when this huge creature arrived near the city wall, it did not directly attack. Instead, it looked at the players on the Cold Desolate Dragon City with its huge eyes and let out a deafening sound. “Puny humans, how dare you offend the great Mountain Giants!” The Mountain Giant King let out a low rumble. The players on the city wall covered their ears. Many were even forced back by such an aura. It was too terrifying! This was a huge monster as high as 80 meters! Only Level 30 players could not face such a huge creature. Everyone retreated, not daring to get too close to the Boss. Seeing this scene, the Mountain Giant King was even more greedy. Its eyes widened as it glared at everyone. “You lowly creatures, listen up. This is the territory of the Mountain Giant King, Domipkos. All of you are abominable intruders!!!” “I want to crush your bodies and trample your city!” The Mountain Giant King let out an angry roar. With that, it immediately raised its right hand. It was an incomparably huge fist. When it descended from the sky, it was like a huge meteor! In an instant, the huge fist landed on the city wall. Boom!!! An incomparably huge impact swept through the entire city wall. Everyone could clearly feel the power transmitted from the bottom of their feet. The terrifying explosion also made everyone’s eardrums tremble. It was as if they were standing in the center of a bomb, and their minds were filled with a loud bang. However, a very dramatic scene appeared. -0 A number floated on the city wall. Perhaps the players on the city wall were still affected by the commotion. However, the players watching the live stream saw this number. They were all silent as if they had died. Then, when they recovered, the entire scene exploded. The entire live stream’s comments went crazy. “Pfft, I’m sorry. I can’t…” “Hahaha, -0, wow…” “Wow, what’s going on?” “This city wall is too ridiculous. Even if the Mountain Giant King can’t destroy the entire city wall, it shouldn’t be unable to cause any damage, right?” “Looks like Tyrant not only cheated himself, but this city is also using a cheat!” “I can’t understand this game anymore.” … “Eh—” Lorne was speechless. Originally, he wanted to see the limit of the defense of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, but who knew that this huge Boss in front of him could not cause any damage to the city wall. When this phenomenon occurred, even Lorne wondered if there was a problem with the system data. After all, the Mountain Giant King was a little terrifying in size. It was 80 meters tall. Among all the monsters he had encountered so far, it was definitely the largest apart from the Dragon God. Moreover, it was a Mountain Giant with the bloodline of the ancient gods. It was extremely powerful. However, who would have thought that such a powerful Boss would not be able to harm Cold Desolate Dragon City at all? This was beyond common sense. However, Lorne knew very well that he was not cheating. The fundamental reason for all of this was that the strength of the Cold Desolate Dragon City had played a role. Perhaps this was why the dragon city was so powerful. “Looks like you’re also not as strong as you seem, oh Mountain Giant King.” Lorne activated his Angel’s Wings and flew into the air, “Domipkos, I’ll give you a chance now. If you agree, I can consider letting you live. How about it?” In “Divine Realm”, NPCs could be commanded by players, just like “Tully” and “Doge”. As long as one showed enough strength or had enough benefits, they would listen to the player. Similarly, monsters could be subdued. In fact, a Boss-level monster was a special NPC. In this highly free virtual game, any high-level lifeform had their own consciousness, and the Boss was the basic requirement to reach high-level lifeforms. Therefore, there was actually a chance to rope in a big boss like the Mountain Giant King. Of course, it was harder to rope in monsters than NPCs. After all, there was a huge difference between the intelligence of monsters and faction NPCs. Now, it was up to the big guy to see if the conditions that Lorne offered were accepted. “Spare me?” The Mountain Giant King seemed to have heard the funniest joke in the world. It trembled and finally teased, “Let me hear what kind of opportunity you’re giving me?” “As long as you agree to become the ornamental rock of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, I can spare your life. If you perform well, I can even allow you to join the city!” “Ornamental… rock?!” The Mountain Giant King was so angry that its entire body was trembling. As a Mountain Giant, it usually liked to walk around, so it would often merge with the mountain. However, this did not mean that it was going to become a piece of decoration for the humans to enjoy, especially with the term ‘ornamental rock’. It was simply insulting its dignity as a Mountain Giant King! “Die! Human!” Rumble! Without any room for negotiation, the furious Mountain Giant King waved its fist, which was as large as a mountain, and charged at Lorne with monstrous strength. But before the two sides could make contact, Lorne had already used Blink to return to the city wall. The person who replaced him was Aisha who had been waiting! Carrying two cold daggers, she charged at the Mountain Giant King. Although this Boss was huge, Aisha was not afraid. The daggers in her hands danced as she quickly slashed across the Mountain Giant King’s body. -981 -963 -975 Aisha tentatively attacked a few times, but found that the damage was reduced to three digits! “This is ridiculous. Only 900 damage?” Lorne frowned. When she fought the Mountain Giant previously, Aisha’s attack could still reach about 6,000 points, but now, she did not even have 1,000 points. This was too abnormal. Unfortunately, he did not have a powerful defense penetration skill. He did not know how long it would take to fight this Boss with high health. But there was no choice. He could only fight with Aisha. Lorne had an auxiliary skill that could increase his damage output. It would be very important in the following battle. The moment he jumped off the city wall, Lorne extended his hand and summoned the attributes panel of the huge monster in front of him. When he saw its attributes, he finally understood why Aisha could only deal so little damage. ——— [Mountain Giant King] Grade: Silver Boss Level: 46 HP: 1.88 million / 1.88 million Attack: 4200-5000 Defense: 5500 Skill: Toss, Flying Rocks and Sand, Landslide, Rock Body, ??? Introduction: The Mountain Giants are a race with the bloodline of the ancient gods. They are huge and have an affinity with the ground, giving them powerful strength and tough physiques. Do not anger them. The anger of the Mountain Giants is extremely terrifying. ———— This was a Level 46 Silver Boss. Firstly, in terms of level, it could suppress Aisha by 16 levels. This could allow it to receive an additional 60% damage reduction. Then, it had attributes as high as 1,880,000 HP. It was the Boss with the highest health points that Lorne had encountered after playing the game for so long. There was no need to pay attention to the attack. Its slow movements made it too difficult to harm Aisha. In contrast, Lorne was more concerned about its defense. Who would have thought that the defense of this Mountain Giant King’s interface had reached an astonishing 5,500 points? Coupled with the additional defense and the hidden increase in the level suppression effect, the defense of this huge guy was at least 10,000 points! Moreover, it had a portion of the damage immunity ability! Combined, the damage of Aisha was basically reduced to almost nothing. “No wonder she only dealt 900 damage!” “But that alone can’t save your life!” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up, and he opened Aisha’s attributes panel. When hunting ordinary monsters, Lorne had specially left behind experience points and was in no hurry to use them. Then, he killed eight Mountain Giants, which gave him a lot of experience. Now was the time to use these experience points. Swish! A golden light fell on Aisha. A voice sounded in Lorne’s ear. “Ding! Congratulations to your pet, Aisha, for successfully reaching Level 31!” “Ding! Congratulations to your pet, Aisha, for successfully reaching Level 32!” Although it had only increased by 2 levels, the effect was extraordinary. Aisha was now Level 32, 14 levels behind the Mountain Giant King. This meant that the level suppression effect between the two sides was only 40%! Reducing the damage by 20% was a huge increase for Aisha. Slash! Before the light dissipated, Aisha had already attacked. Her sharp dagger drew a beautiful arc in the air, and Lorne saw the opportunity to buff her. Instantly, saber light splattered everywhere! Pfft— Pfft— Pfft— -67,000 (Critical) -4723 -63,100 (Critical) -6315 -6315 -6315 The critical strike effect brought about by [Traceless Phantom] and the critical strike effect triggered during ordinary attacks dealt 130,000 damage. This was the damage Aisha dealt to the Mountain Giant King after the 20% damage reduction. This effect was even better than when facing the Mountain Giant, and the damage output was much higher. The following [Phantom Combo+] skill was lucky and made 9 consecutive hits, dealing nearly 60,000 damage. Therefore, with that simple outburst, the Boss lost nearly 200,000 health points. “Super Frequency Release!” Without giving the Boss a chance to recover, Lorne activated the orange skill he had not used. This skill could directly refresh a pet’s skill cooldown, which was the greatest help to Aisha. [Traceless Phantom]! Aisha used this skill that could definitely deal critical damage again. Although the effect of [Phantom Combo] was also very good, it relied too much on probability. Moreover, without Lorne sharing the attack power, it was difficult to deal the greatest damage. Therefore, she chose Critical Hit! Her dagger struck the Mountain Giant King at an extremely fast speed, dealing an astonishing 70,000 damage. When the Mountain Giant King was about to counterattack, Aisha immediately used Phantom Blink to dodge. The Mountain Giant King trembled in anger and began to attack recklessly. Unfortunately, such actions could not affect Aisha at all. Instead, it was Lorne, the Summoner, who felt a headache from such a large-scale attack. Fortunately, he had the Ghost Deity Necklace and the Angel’s Wings, two divine items with the acceleration effect, which allowed him to move safely around the Boss. As for Aisha, she focused on attacking the Boss. This time, it took a long time. It took a full five minutes before the Boss’ health points were finally depleted in the intense battle. When the Mountain Giant King still had 5% health left, Lorne had tried to subdue the Boss, but at the last moment, he chose to give up. It was not because of anything else, but because in his personal defense mission, there were instructions to kill two Bosses and harvest their heads. This made Lorne hesitate for a moment, and in the end, he decided to give up this opportunity. As for why he said he wanted to recruit the other party, it was only a scheme against the monster. Unfortunately, the Mountain Giant King did not fall for it, causing him to waste so much time. “No! No! I’m a descendant of the ancient gods. How can I die at the hands of a weak human?” At the last moment of its life, the Mountain Giant King let out a sad cry, but Aisha’s expression was cold. Any target who stood against its master was an enemy! Her sharp blade reaped the life of the Boss without hesitation. Ding! “Congratulations to your pet, Aisha, for successfully killing the Boss, the Mountain Giant King!” “Congratulations on obtaining the mission tool: Head of the Mountain Giant King!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Stone Core of the Mountain Giant King!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Rock Fragment of the Mountain Giant King!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Totem Fragment of the Mountain Giant King!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Rune Fragment of the Mountain Giant King!” “…” As a rock lifeform, the Mountain Giant King would occasionally produce special runes. Like the stone giant totem fragment he had obtained at the bottom of the Lake of Death, they should be very precious magic materials. Lorne took away all the loot. “Leader, do you have any equipment that suits me? I want to change my equipment!” Super Rich immediately sent a private message. On the other side, Twinkle Rose shouted, “Brother Tyrant, seeing that I’m working so hard to help you defend the city, can you sell some equipment to the ladies of the Silver Snow Guild?” Although the Mountain Giant King was a Level 45 Super High-Grade Boss, there was a sea of equipment under the city wall. There were definitely some equipment that were more suitable for the current players. This was a key resource to stand out in the guild competition. “Alright, let me see.” There were only these two friends in Lorne’s friend list, and they were important partners. Since they needed it, he would give them some. After all, these equipment were not important to him. [Rock Shield] Grade: Platinum Attributes: … Additional effect: Increases the user’s defense by 25%. Additional effect: Increases the user’s defense by 100 points. Special Effect: Rock Shield: Resists 10% of all attack damage. There is a chance of reflecting the attack. Introduction: An equipment forged from the rocks on the Mountain Giant King. Other than its powerful resistance, it is also the greatest glory of a Knight. The attributes of a Level 30 shield were really good. There were also two additional effects and one special effect. To the Shield Warrior players, this was definitely an equipment that was worth fighting for. Especially with a 25% increase in defense, this effect could allow a top Shield Warrior to completely pull away from others. They could even resist the Boss alone. To the strategy team, it was definitely the most powerful help. When they saw the attributes of this equipment, Twinkle Rose and Super Rich were very tempted. After such a long gaming experience, even people with a low understanding of the game would definitely understand the value of this equipment at this moment. Therefore, Super Rich directly shouted his price, “Leader, I want this equipment for 15 million alliance dollars!” The price of Platinum equipment on the market was about 5 million. Of course, although there was a price set, there was no transaction known. Perhaps this was the treatment of rare equipment. This time, Super Rich directly offered 15 million. This price made Twinkle Rose’s scalp tingle. Indeed, she could not compete with such a guy who treated money as paper. “Damn bootlicker!” Twinkle Rose pouted but did not make a bid. Of course, Lorne was happy. An equipment was sold for 15 million. Was there anything more exciting than this? However, this price was not high. According to his estimation, if he auctioned these high-grade equipment, there was a chance to bid above 20 million. After all, the guilds were fighting for the game’s progress. High-level weapons were the strategic resource that they wanted the most. Of course, this price was not bad. After all, the high price of the auction was very difficult to predict. Who knew where the final price of such an item worth tens of millions would stop? Lorne could not be bothered to think about it. After all, tens of millions was only a small amount. Ever since he opened the teleportation array of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he was not too interested in such a small business. Money came too easily, and the flow of funds was astonishing. A mere tens of millions was not worth paying attention to. “Take it. After all, you’re a business representative of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. It’s too embarrassing to wear such a pile of junk.” Lorne threw the equipment to the other party and gave him a pair of Platinum Bracers as well. This equipment was considered a gift to him. The business of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was the most profitable thing. He had given this equipment to the other party in hopes that he could quickly build up the business circle of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. This was the confidence to compete for resources with Iron Skull City and Seaside City. “Leader…” Super Rich was stunned. From the moment he decided to follow this young leader until now, he had directly received a reward. It had only been a short month, and the reward this time was extraordinary. Platinum equipment was only a small portion. To him, this Platinum equipment that had been given to him was more of a recognition. It was also the leader’s recognition of him. With the equipment in hand, Super Rich did not hesitate. In his heart, he was even more certain that he had to follow in the footsteps of the leader. With the Cold Desolate Dragon City as the foundation, he would quickly build it into a World Trade Center! … “Take these two pieces of equipment for your Silver Snow Guild. I’ll charge you 10 million each. Consider it a thank you for helping to defend the city.” Lorne placed the remaining two Platinum items in the team chat. Twinkle Rose, who was killing monsters on the city wall, nearly spat out blood. This guy was too different. Why did he give a Platinum equipment to that bootlicker for free? Was she not beautiful enough? Or was that old man too good at bootlicking? Twinkle Rose whined. After paying 20 million, she put the two Platinum items away and immediately smiled. These two pieces of equipment were actually weapons! It was simply too awesome! Among the equipment in “Divine Realm”, the weapon had the strongest attack attributes and was also the equipment that made the greatest difference between players. With these two Platinum weapons, the strength of the top players in the guild could increase by another level. Even compared to those super large guilds with more than a hundred thousand, the combat strength of the top guilds was not much inferior. In this case, the speed at which they hunted the Boss would not be slower than the other party. At the same time, they would have the potential to compete with other large guilds. Thinking of this, Twinkle Rose was very happy. After seeing that Tyrant had disappeared from this city wall, she immediately reacted and shouted in the guild chat group, “Everyone, immediately head to the northeast city wall. Don’t waste the time to earn experience!” The next moment, a large group of players retreated from the northwest city wall and rushed towards the northeast city wall. At this moment, a group of NPCs from the Cold Desolate Dragon City arrived outside the city wall. They began to clean up the loot that the players had dropped. This was because there were more than a million monsters attacking this time. After killing all of them, tens of thousands of loot were naturally dropped. The bronze coins even formed an ocean under the city wall. However, perhaps because of the event, the EXP and loot dropped by the monsters this time were much lower. The million monsters only dropped less than 50,000 loot, and the bronze coins were uncountable. Lorne did not pay attention to the quality of the loot, but handed it all to Super Rich. Now that he was taking on the business arrangement mission in the city, these loot could largely attract players to descend upon the Cold Desolate Dragon City, but as for how effective it would be, it all depended on how he operated. As for Lorne himself? There was still a Boss waiting for him. This Sea Demon Leader that had walked out of the Lake of Death should be about the same strength as the Mountain Giant King. It was probably a Level 45 Silver Boss. He hoped that it could summon Bosses like the Mountain Giant. Only then could more attribute fruits drop. With that in mind, he quickly arrived near the northeastern city wall at high speed. However, as soon as he arrived, he saw that the players in the city were in a mess. Unlike the enemies in the northwest, the monsters attacking here were all water monsters in the lake. Many of them had suction cups, like octopuses. These suction cups could help them climb the city wall and fight the defense army on the city wall in close combat. Because of this, monsters were smashing everywhere in the nearby city. Fortunately, there were not many people, and these monsters were not very powerful. After being surrounded by a group of players, they could not cause trouble for too long. “I didn’t expect such a city to be hidden near the Lake of Death. Is it a scheme of Iron Skull City?” In the distant mountain range outside the city, a huge octopus sea demon entrenched itself on a short mountain. It stared at the Cold Desolate Dragon City and began to mutter to itself. The old turtle beside him said, “It must be the work of Cold Desolate Dragon City. Although the City Lord of this city is an adventurer, the adventurers at this stage are only a group of weaklings who are not even in the Earth Realm. They don’t have the ability to build such a huge building. Moreover, there seems to be a large number of Iron Skull City’s city guards stationed in this city. Just this point alone can confirm the true ownership of this city!” “Hmph, the old thing from Iron Skull City really does not give up on the Lake of Death.” The Octopus Sea Demon Leader snorted and continued, “Since they dare to extend their arms to the Lake of Death, we’ll cut them off completely. It just so happens that we have the Mountain Giant King’s invitation this time. We have a good reason for doing so. From today onwards, this city will no longer exist!” The monsters were extremely arrogant. In their eyes, the defense of this city was simply unable to withstand a single blow. It did not even have the most basic defense cannons and did not have any decent combat strength. Foolish humans thought these high walls could withstand an attack. It was ridiculous. These towering walls were useless against the octopus sea demons. Their suction cups could directly climb up! After the defense in the city was sufficiently disrupted, the sea demon army could directly rush into the city and completely clean up the entire city. “Leader, why don’t we just rush into this city and kill all the humans inside?” A sea demon asked in confusion. “There’s no hurry. The city guards in this city are still very powerful. Let the Mountain Giant King and the others attack. We’ll wait for them to destroy most of the city’s defense before we attack and completely destroy this city at the minimum price.” The Octopus Sea Demon Leader smiled cruelly and shouted to its lackey, “Go to the northwest city wall and see how the Mountain Giant King and the others are doing. Those fellows are huge and powerful. They might be about to break through the city wall. We can’t let these brainless rocks snatch the fruits of our victory. I still have to use this contribution to ask the commander for a reward.” “Yes.” A sea demon received the order. But at that moment, an eel monster ran up and shouted in panic, “Leader, bad news. The Mountain Giant King has been killed!” <i>What?!</i>  The surrounding monsters were shocked. The Octopus Sea Demon Leader’s expression changed. It grabbed the eel monster and said in a deep voice, “Damn you, what nonsense are you talking about?!” “No, I didn’t…” The eel monster twisted its body and said in a panic, “Leader, I’m telling the truth. The Mountain Giant King is dead. The monster army in the northwest has been wiped out!” Swish! As soon as it finished speaking, it was swallowed by the Octopus Sea Demon Leader. As the leader of the octopus sea demons, it was confident in destroying this city. How could those adventurers who were not even at the Earth Realm kill the powerful Mountain Giant King? They must have used a special method. Or perhaps, it was a secret weapon hidden in Iron Skull City. But that did not matter. This thing was definitely not able to deal with the sea demon army! “Give the order. All sea demons rush into the city and kill all humans!” The Octopus Sea Demon Leader did not think that such a thing could resist the octopus army. Unless they had more than a million powerful warriors, even if they had powerful city defense cannons, it was impossible to block such a large-scale attack. After receiving the order, the monsters under the northeastern city wall went crazy. These sea demons that had walked out of the Lake of Death rushed up at this moment. They were all climbing the city wall of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Due to the interference of the surrounding monsters, the players were killing the monsters that ran in. The defense on the city wall was not enough, so the sea demon army below could naturally surge up the city wall. The dark monsters completely dyed the city wall black. Countless monsters attached themselves to the wall and began to rush towards the interior of the city wall. The players guarding the city panicked. In fact, the current players could not defeat a Level 40 sea demon. In addition, there were few players guarding the city, so as soon as the sea demons attacked, the entire city wall was occupied by monsters. But at that moment, a slender figure entered the battlefield. Slash! -114,000 (Critical) Aisha only needed one attack to kill a sea demon. Moreover, after killing the monster, her teleportation skill would immediately be refreshed, making her a killing machine. With an infinite number of flashes, together with an attack that was guaranteed to deal critical damage, this kind of monster was simply the most terrifying enemy against an army. However, there were too many monsters here. Aisha could not clear all the monsters alone. Lorne had no intention of doing so. This time, the order he gave Aisha was to kill the higher-grade monsters on the city wall, and the remaining ordinary monsters were left to the players guarding the city. Because the battle in the northwest had ended, more than a hundred thousand players had already arrived and began to clean up the monsters that had intruded into the city. There were only about a million monsters. Against the wall, most of the monsters were still blocked outside, and this was the players’ chance. There were a total of more than 200,000 players here and the help of the tens of thousands of city guards. The sea monsters that had entered after much difficulty were almost blocked. The high-level monsters were quickly wiped out by Aisha. Soon, the situation in the city gradually stabilized. Lorne arrived on the city wall and looked into the distance. The huge Octopus Sea Demon Leader was entrenched on the hill. After knowing the situation of the Mountain Giant King, it commanded the army to attack crazily. However, this probably dead big boss hid far away and only quietly watched the battle ahead, as if it had no intention of joining the battle. “Since you’re not coming, I’ll go over!”  “Aisha, come with me!” Lorne jumped off the wall with Aisha. Since ancient times, battles had always been like this. To defeat the enemy, one had to capture the leader first. If the other party’s leader was killed, the combat strength of the other party’s army would definitely be greatly affected. After killing this Octopus Sea Demon Leader, the entire defense battle would quickly end. [Octopus Sea Demon Leader] Grade: Silver Boss Level: 45 HP: 1.2 million / 1.2 million Attack: 5500-7000 Defense: 3000 Skill: Tentacle Rebirth, Crazy Beating, Flesh Entanglement, Powerful Absorption, ???, … Introduction: A monster living in the Lake of Death. It has a powerful recovery ability and can skillfully control every tentacle while dealing damage to the target. Only Level 45? When Lorne arrived near it, he realized that the Octopus Sea Demon Leader was even weaker than the Mountain Giant King. They were both Silver Bosses, but this Octopus Sea Demon Leader only had 1.2 million health points. It was a total of 600,000 health points less than the Mountain Giant King. The difference in defense was huge. The defense difference between the two was 2,500 points! This was only the elementary data. If the Mountain Giant King’s skills and talents were taken into account, the difference between the two would be several times greater. When he had fought the Mountain Giant King, Lorne had discovered that its defense had exceeded 10,000 points, four times that of the Octopus Sea Demon Leader! Of course, if one’s defense was powerful, their attack power would be relatively weak. The Mountain Giant King’s attack only had 5,500 points, but the upper limit of this Boss’ attack was astonishing 7,000 points. To the current players, it was a height that could not be reached. Unfortunately, this was all it could do. 7,000 Attack Points was no threat to Aisha who had 150,000 health points. Instead, Aisha’s attack limit, which was as high as 44,000, posed a threat to the Octopus Sea Demon Leader’s death. However, Lorne was not in a hurry to attack. He was waiting for the other party to summon a Boss-level underling. An opportunity to earn free attribute points was not common in the Divine Realm. Five minutes later, the sea demon leader emitted a low-frequency sound wave. A strange sound attracted everyone’s attention. The surrounding small hills actually trembled. When he looked carefully, he realized that they were turtle demons. They had been lying on the ground and disguised as small hills. Now that they had received the order, they actually moved out and charged towards the Cold Desolate Dragon City. The shell of these giant turtles was dozens of meters tall and was not smaller than the Mountain Giant. If they rushed to the bottom of the city wall, the other monsters could use its body to rush up the city wall. This was much faster than climbing. Unfortunately, Lorne had no intention of letting them go. “Aisha, kill them all!” “Yes!” Without any hesitation, Aisha rushed over with a sharp blade. [Cooperative Strike]! [Phantom Combo+]! The short staff in Lorne’s hand glowed, giving Aisha greater attack attributes. In the next second, the dagger in her hand also emitted a cold light. Countless saber lights covered the turtle and struck its thigh crazily. Clang! Clang! Clang! -12101 -12101 -12101 -12101 -12101 -12101 The sharp blades collided with the turtle’s shell, producing a metallic sound. It could be seen that the defense attributes of these monsters were also ridiculously high, not inferior to that of the Mountain Giant. When the carapace on its back glowed, its defense was higher! Unfortunately, no matter how high the defense was, it could not block Aisha’s attack. With the upper limit of 44,000 Attack Points, combined with the 6,600 Attack Points given by Lorne, the final damage was as high as 60,000. Unfortunately, the combo attack could not trigger the critical hit effect. Otherwise, just this strike would have cost a huge turtle more than half its health. … “Boom…” In less than half a minute, a huge turtle that was moving suddenly lost its life and fell into the mountain range. Under Aisha’s powerful damage output, they would lose tens of thousands or even tens of thousands of health points per second. It was impossible for them to last with just less than a million health points. “Gosh, Tyrant is showing his might again!” “Oh my god, is this really a player who is playing the game with us?” “Are those big sea turtles all weak?” “A weak monster can be dozens of meters tall? Don’t joke, brother. It must be because God Tyrant’s damage output is too high. These Bosses can’t hold on.” “Killing a Boss is as simple as drinking water. God Tyrant is indeed our role model!” The players on the city wall looked over. They, who claimed to be top players, were currently being restrained by a group of monsters. On the other hand, the solo player, Tyrant, had already gone out alone and began to solo the Boss group. He was simply not playing the same game. … “There’s indeed good stuff!” Lorne went to the spot where the Boss had fallen and put away the loot. In addition to a pile of Silver equipment, he picked up 13 attribute fruits. This was a real attribute point, something that players wanted the most. However, it was too early to be happy. Many giant turtles had already crossed the area and rushed towards the city wall. Without hesitation, Lorne led Aisha towards the monster. -52,000 (Critical) -5911 -5909 -5939 -5917 When she dealt the critical hit, the huge turtle’s health instantly fell by a large amount. Even without a critical hit, under Aisha’s high attack frequency, she could still deal very high damage. The huge turtle did not last long before it fell to Aisha’s critical hit. With a loud bang, the Boss fell. The harvest this time was still not low. 15 attribute fruits were simply fascinating. Lorne put away the loot and continued killing the other monsters. In this crazy slaughter, these giant turtles fell to the ground. None of them approached Cold Desolate Dragon City. Seeing that most of its minions were dead, the Octopus Sea Demon Leader could not help but attack. Its tentacles on the hill moved, and its entire body was like a house with legs. In terms of damage output, it was much stronger than the Mountain Giant King. Especially with the help of the tentacles, its combat ability far exceeded the clumsy Mountain Giant King. It was also because of this that it was so confident that it charged directly at Lorne. Boom— The tentacles swept up the rocks along the way with an astonishing momentum. Before the two sides could approach, the Octopus Sea Demon Leader waved its tentacles and threw the huge rock over. The terrifying force made the rocks fall like meteors. Of course, Aisha was not afraid. At this moment, she was darting back and forth in the forest with agile footsteps, directly facing the Boss. Aisha, who had the upper limit of 44,000 attacks, did not care about any monster that was not 20 levels above her, even if it was dozens of meters tall and had a hideous appearance. -69,000 (Critical) -4723 -69,100 (Critical) -6915 -6915 -6915 Aisha moved quickly between the tentacles of the Octopus Sea Demon Leader, the sharp blades in her hands slicing through its body at high speed, dealing high damage. It could be seen that the damage was much higher than when it fought the Mountain Giant King. However, the Octopus Sea Demon Leader had a very special ability. That was a healing effect! Its extremely resilient body that possessed high recovery gave it the ability to convert damage into life. The conversion ratio was about 10%. This effect was not strong. However, because it was calculated according to the damage data when it was not reduced, the final recovery value was very high, almost offsetting 50% of the damage. This made the battle a little more anxious. However, Aisha was not in a hurry. She calmly moved beside the Octopus Sea Demon Leader. The dagger in her hand swept across the water like a dragonfly. It was difficult to even see her movements. However, such a light movement had an extraordinary effect. Especially when it came to critical hits. When Aisha dealt a critical hit, the Octopus Sea Demon Leader was like a piece of paper without defense. She dealt terrifying damage with a light poke. Even if it had the power to absorb damage, it was useless against such a terrifying critical hit. The Octopus Sea Demon Leader let out a terrifying roar in pain. More than a dozen tentacles smashed down. Due to its size, its tentacles were huge and long. When the tentacle struck, Aisha was directly enveloped by the shadow. The terrifying force made one’s heart palpitate. Unfortunately, before the tentacle could smash down, Aisha had already arrived at a safe area with her high movement speed. She could even easily avoid the rocks and shattered wood. Pew! Pew! Pew! Seizing the opportunity, Aisha waved her dagger and dealt high damage again. Especially when the critical hit effect occurred, she even slashed open the end of the Octopus Sea Demon Leader’s tentacles. This was a sign of strength. When the attacker was abnormally powerful, the monster’s body would shatter. This effect was rarely seen. After all, the setting requirement was very high. The current players were not powerful enough to meet this requirement. But now, this scene appeared. Aisha’s damage output did this impossible thing. The Octopus Sea Demon Leader roared. Being severed by a human brat who had not even reached the Earth Realm was simply a great humiliation! If possible, it would tear the enemy into pieces. Unfortunately, it could not. This elf was too agile. Even against the overwhelming attacks, she did not panic at all. She even attacked with ease. This was too terrifying. Against such an opponent, there was no chance of survival. The Octopus Sea Demon Leader had already sensed the danger, but in its anger, it was impossible for it to completely destroy the enemy and his ridiculous city today! “Die, you detestable brat!” The Octopus Sea Demon Leader roared as its body emitted a gray light. This was a sign that it was about to use its skill. Noticing this, Aisha focused her mind. Yet, she did not choose to stay away. Only close combat could ensure that she was not so passive when facing the tentacles. After all, the attack range was dozens of meters long. Once she pulled away, the other party would attack fearlessly. That would only make her more passive. Boom— The Octopus Sea Demon Leader raised its tentacles, and an incomparably huge energy tentacle appeared. Its range was larger and stronger now. Any player other than Lorne would immediately die if they were attacked like this. Aisha was constantly paying attention to the arrival of the attack. When the energy struck, she immediately used the [Phantom Blink] skill and instantly moved 20 yards. At this distance, she could naturally easily avoid the attacks. But the problem quickly arose. The Octopus Sea Demon Leader’s attack was multi-stage! It controlled its tentacles to attack Aisha in succession. A huge tentacle more than a hundred meters long and fifteen meters wide smashed down. Aisha was sent flying by the terrifying force, and her health decreased by 14,000 points! Five-digit damage appeared above Aisha. This was the first time she had suffered such a heavy attack, and also the first time she had lost so much health. However, that was all it could do. This was the strongest skill of the Octopus Sea Demon Leader. A huge tentacle that was a hundred meters long and 15 meters wide could instantly destroy a well-trained thousand-man army. However, this elf had only lost a tenth of her health points! What was going on? The Octopus Sea Demon Leader could not understand. To be honest, it had never encountered such a strange opponent. It was clearly a low-level elf, but the power it unleashed was actually so powerful. This was impossible! The Octopus Sea Demon Leader could not understand what it was seeing, but Aisha did not give it a chance to think. While the Boss raised its tentacles, she used the chance to rush towards its head. This huge tentacle was like a firm principle. As long as one rushed to its highest point, they would be close to the octopus leader’s head. That was its greatest weakness. As long as one targeted this weakness, the entire battle would end as soon as possible. It was precisely because Aisha had discovered this that she used the most dangerous method and approached the Octopus Sea Demon Leader’s head as quickly as possible. At the back of the other party’s head, the sharp blade in Aisha’s hand instantly erupted with astonishing power. A terrifying hexagram blossomed, and then like a meat grinder, she attacked the other party crazily. -9727 -93,000 (Critical) -99,100 (Critical) -9901 -9955 After hitting the weak point, the damage increased by 50-100%! Especially when there was a critical hit, the Boss’ health instantly decreased by a large amount. Even if it had the ability to recover, it could not resist the terrifying damage. The Octopus Sea Demon Leader immediately twisted its body crazily, trying to kill Aisha. But that was useless. Aisha was far faster than it had imagined. Other than creating difficulties, these huge tentacles could not directly harm Aisha. Just like that, the battle quickly came to an end. In just five minutes, the Boss could not hold on anymore and collapsed. Crash! Gold coins, equipment, skill books, items, and other loot dropped in large numbers. At a glance, the area was filled with brilliant lights. Only then did Lorne approach the battlefield. After picking up all the loot on the ground, he returned to Cold Desolate Dragon City happily. Now that the two Bosses were dead, the mission displayed in Lorne’s mission panel was completed. However, there were still a large number of monsters outside the city, and there were also many in the city. Lorne was not in a hurry to end the event. After all, with the bonus of the event, the drop rate of the monsters would be higher. This was a rare opportunity. Lorne let his pets hunt the monsters, then focused his attention on his bag. This time, on the northeastern city wall, he had killed nine giant turtle monsters and the Octopus Sea Demon Leader, so the harvest was very rich. First was the attribute fruit! This was the loot that Lorne wanted the most. Every fruit could provide one attribute point. This was too dreamlike. Especially when he consumed more than a hundred fruits at the same time, Lorne instantly obtained more than a hundred attributes. If an ordinary player obtained such a reward, they would probably be so happy that they would fly. In any case, Lorne had seen many good things in the past. These attribute points could not make him lose his composure. With a simple smile, Lorne looked at the other rewards. Other than attribute points, equipment was the most valuable. Because it was an event Boss, when it was killed, it directly dropped three Platinum equipment and five Gold equipment. To a Silver Boss, this was an impossible scene. However, the effect of the event was still strong. It forced such an impossible thing to appear in front of Lorne. Of course, this was also helped by luck. High luck could allow players to obtain higher drop rates. This was the rule of the game. Therefore, Lorne’s gains could not be replicated. After all, others did not have such high luck or such powerful combat strength to kill such a terrifying monster alone. “Boss, do you still have any equipment? I want two pieces of Mage equipment.” Super Rich immediately ran to his side and took the initiative to ask. “What do you want the Mage equipment for?” Lorne looked at him. “Eh, my two daughters haven’t been in a good mood recently, so I want to take two pieces of equipment to make them happy.” Super Rich said. For some reason, his daughters had happily accompanied him to a low-level Energy Zone a few days ago. However, when they returned to the high-level Energy Zone, for some reason, the two of them were lost all day, as if something was bothering them. Unfortunately, the two of them were unwilling to tell him. As a father, he could only think of other ways to make his daughters happier. It just so happened that they liked games recently. He believed that the two Platinum equipment would definitely make them happy. “Oh. Let me see…” Lorne opened his bag and checked his equipment. ———— [Ice Staff] Grade: Platinum Attributes: … Additional effect: Increases the user’s MP by 1,000 points. Additional effect: Increases the user’s defense by 100 points. Special Effect: Ice: When casting a spell on the target, there is a 10% chance of triggering. Freeze the target for 1.5 seconds and deal 100% additional damage. Special Effect: When present at the same time as the Fire Staff, there is a chance of triggering the combination of ice and fire. It will trigger the domain of ice and fire and cause terrifying damage to the target. Introduction: A magic staff made from Cold Ice Crystal that has a great effect on ice magic. ———— [Fire Staff] Grade: Platinum Attributes: … Additional effect: Increases the user’s MP by 1,000 points. Additional effect: Increases the user’s defense by 100 points. Special Effect: Fire: When casting a spell on the target, there is a 10% chance of triggering. Stun the target for 1.5 seconds and deal 100% additional damage. Special Effect: When present at the same time as the Ice Staff, there is a chance of triggering the combination of ice and fire. It will trigger the domain of ice and fire and cause terrifying damage to the target. Introduction: A magic staff made from Blazing Fire Crystal that has a great effect on fire magic. ———— Combination equipment?! These two pieces of equipment were quite unexpected. Lorne could not help but be stunned. He did not expect to obtain a set of combination equipment from a Silver Boss. Unlike equipment sets, the combination equipment was not for a player to wear, but for different players to wear. Then, in a team, it would trigger even stronger power. Just like these two magic staffs, as long as two pieces of equipment were present at the same time, they could trigger the combination skill “Ice Fire Domain”. This was a huge damage output skill. Once it was triggered, it would cause huge damage to all the monsters in a range of dozens of yards. Because these were not set equipment, it could not be like a set where as long as one wore one piece of equipment, they could drop the remaining equipment when killing the Boss. Therefore, it was even harder to assemble combination equipment. At the very least, this was the first piece of combination equipment that Lorne had seen. Moreover, the components were staves! The staff was a weapon with a high magic attack bonus. It was the equipment part that players wanted the most. If these two equipment were auctioned at the auction, it could probably be auctioned for 50 million. However, since Super Rich wanted it, he would give it to him. Lorne threw the two items to him. “Leader, this is…” Super Rich looked at the attributes panel of the two equipment and was stunned. These equipment were too powerful. Although they were also Platinum-grade equipment, this was a set of combination equipment. It was especially suitable for two Mage players to team up to farm monsters. Once they triggered the Ice Fire Combination effect, they would definitely be able to unleash a world-destroying power. It just so happened that his two daughters were close. These two pieces of equipment were simply tailored for the two of them. He believed that as long as they saw these two pieces of equipment, their mood would definitely be good. Thinking of this, Super Rich was overjoyed. He opened the trading system and transferred money to Lorne. He sent a total of 100 million! This was definitely worth it. Lorne glanced at the information and did not say anything. To the current him, money was meaningless. As long as Super Rich could start the business circle of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, what he would produce in the future would be an endless amount of profits. After sending Super Rich away, Lorne continued to check the remaining loot. Soon, he was attracted by a special tool. ———— [Sinful Soul of the Octopus Sea Demon Leader] Quality: ??? Effect: ??? Introduction: A sinful and chaotic soul that has a high shaping value. Use a special method to forge it. You will obtain a very special device, but this method is only known to gnomes with rich knowledge. ———— This was a special material. It just so happened that there were gnomes in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Moreover, Tully was a Gnome with a high status. He should know the relevant information. Lorne put away the material and looked at a skill book. It was glowing orange, clearly of extraordinary quality. ———— Skill: [Super-Distance Command] (Orange) Effect: After learning this skill, the distance limit between the adventurer and pets will increase. Learning Requirement: Level 40 ———— It could increase the distance between pets and the master?! Lorne’s eyes widened. The information on the interface was beyond his expectations. As everyone knew, there was a distance limit between players and pets. When ordinary pets fought, the players had to be within a 100 yards distance from them. Otherwise, once they exceeded the range, the pets would be forcefully recalled to the pet space, and there might even be a punishment like losing levels. Therefore, no matter how powerful a Summoner was, they could not be too far away from the battlefield when fighting. It was the same for Lorne. When facing a huge Boss like the Mountain Giant King, he had to stand near the battlefield and maintain his mobility at all times. Otherwise, he might be attacked by the monsters. Many Summoners would increase their agility because of this reason. They would choose to team up with other players. This was a good choice. Of course, Lorne never did. Due to their level, his pets could fight at a farther location. Moreover, the pets were very powerful. Up until today, he had not encountered much obstruction. However, after today’s battle, Lorne still felt that it was better to control them from afar. He was not worried that he would be attacked by the Boss. Instead, he did not want to affect Aisha’s movements. When facing a monster dozens of meters tall, Aisha moved very quickly, especially when she was hit by it. Sometimes, her body would fly more than a hundred meters away, which made her feel pressure. After all, Lorne was her master. How could she let her master worry about her on the battlefield? Therefore, this skill came at the right time. Lorne quickly learned [Super-Distance Command]. Then, he checked the pets’ control range. The result was that the control range of all the pets had increased by 50%! The maximum range of control for most pets was 450 yards. Aisha’s maximum control range had increased from 500 yards to 750 yards. This was a very large area. The Octopus Sea Demon Leader was only a Level 45 Silver Boss. Since it was so huge, future Bosses would definitely be even larger. After the battle, the range of more than a thousand meters might be the center of the battle. Therefore, this distance could not keep Lorne safe during the battle. “I have to find time to raise the level of this skill. After all, it’s an orange skill. After reaching Level 10, it should be able to increase the range of control by at least 300%.” Lorne thought. However, in the next second, when he saw the experience requirement to level up this skill, he immediately felt uncomfortable. ———— [Super-Distance Command] (Orange) Skill Level: 1 (0 / 5 million) ———— This number gave Lorne a headache. In “Divine Realm”, skills could be leveled up with experience points. For skills graded by letters S, A, B, the experience points needed were determined by color. Orange corresponded to the S, SS, and SSS grades, while the basic experience points needed to level up an S-grade skill was 1 million, and the SSS-grade was 5 million. Therefore, the Orange skill directly required 5 million experience points! Perhaps this was the greatest drawback of the Orange skills. Previously, Lorne had not paid attention to his skills because the EXP needed to level up was too high. However, because the experience points of pets leveling up had also increased to this astonishing level, he could not help but size up his skill panel again. He had six Orange skills now, all Level 1. Each required 5 million experience points to level up. Lorne felt his scalp tingle. The experience needed to level up these skills was higher than that of his current pets. There should not be time to level them up in the short term. After all, the efficiency of farming experience for pets was very limited now. He had to wait until he explored a higher-level map before doing it. As for the skill, Super-Distance Command? This skill had to be given priority. Its level had to be increased as soon as possible so that the pets could be spread out. Right. He had to change his pets too. Lorne glanced at Venom and Small Artillery, as well as the Long Tongue Bat Dragon. Although the three pets were also Gold Quality, their attributes had been greatly affected because of the limited quality of the prototype. At this moment, they could no longer keep up with him. Even after reaching Level 30, the players’ attack power had already reached 2000 with the addition of their equipment. However, the Silver Monster, Venom, only had 1,500+attacks at Level 30. Clearly, it could no longer keep up. Because Small Artillery had fused with the dragon skeleton, it had become a Gold monster. Its current attack power of 3,000+ could barely adapt to the current tempo. But Lorne would find time to change it later. After all, this forced adaptation was not the result he wanted. As for the Long Tongue Bat Dragon? It was a support-type pet and was responsible for finding prey. The advantage of the ultrasound detection made it qualified to stay in the team. “I have a long way to go!” Lorne glanced at the experience points of his pets and found that they were also very terrifying. The experience needed to level up a Boss-level pet had reached a million. The experience pressure from the three Bosses alone was a huge headache for Lorne. He imagined that he was surrounded by Bosses and a series of Orange skills to level up. This scene was too beautiful. “Forget it, let’s not think about it. I should hurry up and work.” There were also a large number of active monsters under the city wall. Although they did not give much experience alone, he could still obtain a large amount of experience under such continuous attacks, especially under Aisha’s sharp blade. Lorne let all his pets join the battle, and Aisha jumped down from the city wall alone. She chose to hunt under the city wall. She jumped quickly, and one could not even lock onto her figure. This was the power that Phantom Blink gave her. As long as she killed the target, she could immediately flash to a distance of 20 yards. Coupled with the effect of the critical strike of the dagger attacks, she became a true killing machine on the battlefield. Unless all the monsters died, no one could make her stop dancing. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios An hour later. Under the joint efforts of more than a hundred thousand players, the monsters that attacked the Cold Desolate Dragon City were all killed. Lorne had gained a lot. Just the experience points alone had accumulated more than 10 million. He would keep these experience points for now. He would have to change pets during this period of time. At that time, these experience points could allow them to quickly gain combat ability. As for the loot? There was a lot of loot this time. Because many monsters died, the number of equipment and items dropped was also huge. Just the equipment alone had collected nearly 100,000 items! These equipment could make up for the number of goods in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Currently, the Cold Desolate Dragon City had not started operating the Blacksmith Guild. There were only a few gnomes who were in charge of forging equipment. This production was too small. However, he could not rush this matter. After all, businesses were the foundation of a main city. Cold Desolate Dragon City had just been built. It was very difficult to have enough talent in a short period of time. Lorne was not in a hurry. It was already very good now. After this battle to defend the city, the reputation of the Cold Desolate Dragon City completely spread. This reputation was not only limited to the players, but also in Iron Skull City and even the Empire. Previously, because of the release of the “An Introduction to Rare Medicinal Herbs”, the name Tyrant had already become popular among the alchemists. This battle announced the official establishment of the Cold Desolate Dragon City and was about to begin its development. Although there was not much economic income, it was significant. As the number of players in the Cold Desolate Dragon City stabilized, the number of NPCs gradually increased. In the future, it would definitely become a true business center. Lorne fantasized happily before opening the activity panel. As the City Lord, he had the right to end the event after killing the two Bosses. Without any hesitation, he chose to end it! In the next second, a grand voice echoed through the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City. Ding! “Regional Announcement: The defense event of the Cold Desolate Dragon City has officially ended. Thank you to all the adventurers who helped the Cold Desolate Dragon City resist the attacks of the monsters. It is because of your help that the Cold Desolate Dragon City can stand here.” All the players heard this information. Unfortunately, there was no reward for this event. The players who participated in the event could only look at the information on the system interface helplessly. They despised the stingy Tyrant in their hearts. Then, they joined the construction again. The construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City continued. There were a large amount of Platinum equipment inside. This was a resource that all the guilds could not let go of. After all, the players were only Level 30 now. Most of them were only wearing Bronze items. Only mainstream players could wear Silver items, and only high-level players had Gold items. As for the top players, they were all fighting for the Platinum items. To them, any Platinum equipment could greatly affect the progress of the game between them. Once they fell behind others, it would be a fatal blow to the guild. Therefore, the guilds were working hard to answer the call. Many guilds had arranged tens of thousands of people to help build the Cold Desolate Dragon City in order to obtain more Platinum equipment. … Ding! “Congratulations to your main city for successfully resisting the attacks of the monsters. You have received an achievement reward: Stone Material+10 million, Wood+10 million, Steel+1 million, Sulfur+100,000.” After the mission ended, Lorne immediately received a notification. This city defense mission had brought him ten million resources. This was what the Cold Desolate Dragon City needed the most. It was impossible for Iron Skull City to continue sponsoring Cold Desolate Dragon City. It was estimated that the other party would soon know the specific situation of Cold Desolate Dragon City. After all, Cold Desolate Dragon City had just ended such a huge battle. However, it did not matter. Everything in the city was already on track. With the resources contributed by the players, it could completely support the resource requirement of the Cold Desolate Dragon City for a short period of time. “By the way, I can put all the equipment dropped in the event into the Points Shop. This can stimulate the passion of ordinary players to contribute resources.” With that in mind, Lorne quickly made the arrangements. With the infusion of these equipment, the players’ enthusiasm increased. Even the ordinary players who were not interested in points could not help but choose to join the construction team for the Silver equipment inside. In addition, his resource contribution began to increase greatly, which was also good news. After dealing with this, Lorne found Tully. He took out the [Sinful Soul of the Octopus Sea Demon Leader] and handed it to the other party to check. “Heavens, you actually obtained such a precious material!” With just one glance, Tully looked shocked. “What’s wrong? Is this rare?” Lorne asked. Although the introduction panel had said that this thing was rare, it still lacked a direct understanding, so Lorne was still curious as usual. “Of course, this is a special soul material. It is one of the rare materials in the Gnome Mineral Company. If it is a high-grade soul, its value can even compare to the Dragon Crystal!” Tully looked at the soul carefully and sighed, “Unfortunately, the quality of this soul is very limited. It seems to be dropped by an Earth Realm octopus monster.” “Indeed.” Lorne nodded, then asked, “Does it still have value?” “Of course,” Tully nodded and said, “although the quality of this soul material is limited, it is still rare. It is even rarer because its level is relatively low. However, if we want to truly create a ‘Projection Device’, we need to add other high-level materials. Otherwise, the final product’s effect will be too poor, and it will lose the value of the device itself.” “Projection Device? What’s this?” Lorne was even more curious. “The Projection Device is a special equipment created by us gnomes. Its function is similar to an arrow tower. It will stand near the outer city wall of the city. When attacked by monsters, it will project the monster inside the core and provide the energy to fight. In this way, it is equivalent to obtaining a monster of the same level to help guard the city.” “I see.” Lorne understood after hearing this. To put it bluntly, that device could turn the soul of the dead back into a monster to protect the city from harm. This was indeed very interesting. “Tully, do you know how to make such a device?” Lorne asked. “Yes, but because of the quality of this soul and the fact that the device needs energy to transport, I think we should at least install a complete Dragon Crystal at the core of the device. Otherwise, it will be difficult to give the souls enough combat strength.” “This Dragon Crystal is for you. Make this device as soon as possible.” “Yes! I promise to complete the mission!” The Dragon Crystal he handed to Tully was the last piece on Lorne. However, he felt that it was worth it. If he could have an Octopus Sea Demon Leader to help him resist the monsters, he believed that he would not have to care about small-scale battles. In addition, Tully had also said that the Dragon Crystal would give the Octopus Sea Demon Leader greater strength. In other words, the final Boss phantom would be at least a Level 45 Gold Boss or even stronger. Otherwise, Tully would have advised Lorne not to waste the precious Dragon Crystal. If that was the case, he would make a killing. With such a Boss around, at the very least, before the players reached Level 50, Cold Desolate Dragon City should not encounter much trouble. In this case, Lorne could focus on his mission. The mission regarding the ‘Divine Radiance’ had already been delayed for a period of time. He could not continue like this, or else the other players would have to catch up to his progress. Perhaps they had already caught up? Some players had probably already explored the location of the elves. They might even have begun to farm the elves’ affinity. Lorne had to hurry. After all, this was the mission. The first person to come into contact with an NPC and obtain a high affinity would definitely obtain the best mission. With that in mind, Lorne decided to go to the elves tomorrow and begin the following mission. As for today? He should go offline and rest first. After such an intense battle, he was indeed a little tired. Lorne did not stay in the game anymore and went offline to rest. At this moment, a voice suddenly sounded in his ear. Ding! “Congratulations. Due to your city [Cold Desolate Dragon City] reaching a certain scale, it has successfully pushed the game forward. You have obtained a good opportunity to ‘materialize’. You can choose a skill or equipment to use in reality.” Materialize?! When he heard the notification again, Lorne was shocked. Previously, when he had triggered the virtual reality materialization, he had discovered the Cold Desolate Dragon City and pushed for the game storyline, so he had obtained the opportunity to materialize. What he had chosen to materialize was the Ghost Shadow Necklace. After forging, this necklace had already become a Mythical equipment. Moreover, even the equipment in reality had been enhanced. As for this time? It was because the Cold Desolate Dragon City had completed the basic construction and introduced a large number of players, forming an economic hub. Therefore, it pushed the storyline of the game again, moving the players’ battlefield into the ruins of the war. Like the last time, what could be conjured this time was still an equipment or skill. Lorne sighed. Compared to these two, he wanted to materialize his pets. If Aisha was by his side, he would definitely benefit more than any equipment or skill. After all, Aisha’s combat strength was already very powerful. She could take on any mission and provide the highest protection. Most importantly… There was no protection mechanism in reality. He did not need the affinity of a ‘close friend’ to make any intimate contact. Just the thought of it was awesome. Lorne fantasized, then exhaled. He could not materialize his pets this time, so he should not think too much. He had to quickly make a decision this time. Lorne looked at the option. Last time, he chose equipment. This time, Lorne prepared to choose his skill. It was not that he did not like Angel’s Wings, but in reality, the frequency at which Angel’s Wings could be used was very low. After all, its strongest effect was flying. But how dare he fly in reality? The Energy Zone’s defense against the air was unprecedented. From the establishment of the Oracle Bone Defense System, it could be seen how much the World Alliance cared about air attacks. Once they discovered Lorne, a human flying in the air, he might be killed as an alien creature. Even worse, if he was caught, he would definitely be sent to the scientific laboratory for research. With that in mind, Lorne decisively abandoned the idea. It was safer to materialize a skill. After all, he had enough privacy indoors. Even if Lorne used his skills occasionally, it would not attract the attention of the World Alliance. “What skill should I choose?” Lorne opened his skill. It could be seen that Lorne could choose many skills this time. There were six Orange skills. Talent was still not in the choice of materialization, so an Orange skill was the main consideration this time. Hellhound Summoning (Orange), Cooperative Strike (Orange), Triple Blink (Orange), Damage Transfer (Orange), Super Frequency Release (Orange), Energy Shield (Orange)… These were the six Orange skills he could choose. First of all, he could directly exclude the three skills of Hellhound Summoning, Cooperative Strike, and Super Frequency Release. There was no need to elaborate on the drawback of Hellhound Summoning. Joining forces to attack was a support skill for pets, but Lorne had not conjured a pet yet, so he could basically give up on this skill. Super Frequency Release was the same as the previous one. It was an auxiliary skill. It was useless for the time being and could be given up. As for the remaining three skills? Damage Transfer could transfer damage to pets. It was a very powerful protective skill, but Lorne was not sure that the damage received in reality could be transferred to pets in the game, so he did not want to choose this skill. Energy Shield was an ideal skill. After all, it could protect him, and it was at the Orange level. Ordinary staves or even pistols might not be able to threaten his life. However, the reason why it was excluded was because Lorne had a monstrous skill like Triple Blink. This skill was definitely the best choice! Its function was teleportation! Moreover, he could teleport three times consecutively! Each time it was about 20 meters away, it could allow one to dodge 99% of the damage. In the high-level Energy Zone, the probability of danger was very low. It was almost impossible to encounter an attack. Therefore, this skill could basically ensure absolute safety in the Energy Zone. Thinking of this, there was no need to hesitate. He directly chose this skill. Ding! “Game skill is being conjured. Please wait…” “1%, 2%, 3%…” Time passed little by little. Half an hour later, a pleasant reminder sounded in Lorne’s ear. “Ding! Materialization is complete!” In reality. The moment the game skill was conjured, Lorne chose to go offline. At this moment, the materialization was completed, and a ball of golden energy had already entered his body. At the same time, another skill appeared in the information panel in Lorne’s mind. It was the Triple Blink skill! Lorne quickly tested it and used his skill in the room. The next second, he moved from the window of the house to the door. “This skill is too useful!” Instead of opening the door, Lorne chose to teleport. The result was even more shocking this time, because he directly flashed from the room to the hall. The wall did not stop him! This was awesome. With this skill, was there anywhere in the world that could stop him? This was the best skill combination to rob a bank. Invisibility+Blink! Wouldn’t he be able to enter the bank’s warehouse easily? It was easy to get as much money as he wanted. However, there was no need for him to do this now. It was too easy to earn money. The revenue of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was higher than that of countless banks. “It’s time to leave.” Lorne opened the group that only had three people. The chat was already flooded. Jessica and Nina had been asking him when he would arrive. They had not seen him for ten days and were really bored. After all, it was too torturous for them to be apart for so long after tasting the sweetness of love. Seeing this, Lorne decisively replied, “I’ll be there today. Wash up tonight and wait for me at home.” “Really? That’s great, Mr. Lorne. My sister and I will go home and wait for you!” “The company has an important meeting in the afternoon. Dad will be attending. We can’t leave until the company meeting is over.” “Oh, okay. I envy Aunt. She doesn’t have to attend the meeting today.” “Stop complaining. Hurry up and organize your information. Don’t let anything happen. Otherwise, you won’t be able to return for a while.” “Yes, yes…” … Then, Lorne packed up and headed to the World Alliance base. There were many checks to go to the high-level Energy Zone. If any of them failed, they would be greatly affected. There was no doubt about it. Regarding his identity, Jessica had already helped him deal with it. On the other hand, Lorne had already conjured the equipment in the game. This equipment could provide physical fitness. In terms of physical fitness, he was definitely not inferior to anyone. Therefore, he quickly boarded the private plane to the high-level Energy Zone. After flying for half an hour, he landed in the high-level Energy Zone No. 001. This was the highest-level Energy Zone apart from the World Alliance’s official Energy Zone No. 000. Unlike other Energy Zones, this Energy Zone had the Oracle Bone Defense System. From the sky, it looked like a huge ball of light. There were hexagonal armor pieces like honeycombs on it. On each armor piece, there was a special glowing rune. It looked very mysterious. There were only a few people on the private plane, but they all looked shocked. They had not seen such a defense system before, and it even exceeded everyone’s imagination. At this moment, the private plane stopped outside the defense system. They waited for the defense system to open. About ten seconds later, the private plane was allowed to enter. The private plane rushed towards a rune and passed through the water screen, successfully entering the control space of the high-level Energy Zone. At this moment, Lorne had not truly seen the city of the high-level Energy Zone. However, when he looked into the distance, he saw a building that rushed into the sky. It seemed to be floating in the air, and the scale was astonishing. It was a huge floating building that could be seen even from dozens of kilometers away. Lorne had never imagined that buildings could be like this. To be honest, it was beyond his imagination. Under the lead of the officials, Lorne underwent a large number of tests again and finally obtained the permission to go to the future city. When he truly entered this so-called future city, Lorne felt that he had arrived in a new world. It was as if he was no longer on Earth. Everything before him was too visual. Everything he saw was unimaginable. There were really floating buildings here. They were huge and floated in the air. There were various flying objects that looked like spaceships entering. The huge building that he had seen previously was also seen by Lorne at this moment. It was indeed a huge building. It was huge beyond imagination, as huge as a city. Lorne was told by the accompanying robot that the building was called the City of Sci-fi, the most powerful technology product of the World Alliance. Below was the future city, an area where humans lived. The Sci-Fi City could not be lived in permanently. One could only buy a limited amount of time to stay. Even a high-level tycoon would be worried about the cost. That was a place that only the top tycoons in the world could afford. Lorne did not know much about robots. After all, these things were beyond his imagination. Just accepting the impact of the future city required some time, much less the Sci-Fi City above. In his impression, the phenomenon of the low-level Energy Zone was the real world. What he saw now only existed in his imagination. Perhaps this was because poverty limited his imagination. Because the low-level Energy Zone could not contain any information about the high-level Energy Zone, most people would never understand the status of the true technology in this world. Especially for a poor person like Lorne in the slums, he could not accept what he was seeing. Fortunately, with his identity as an expert in the game and the possession of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, his mind had been enhanced unprecedentedly. Moreover, he had conjured a divine artifact. This made him have a very strong ability to accept anything new. Even the Sci-Fi City in front of him did not make him lose his composure. Soon, Lorne arrived at the villa that Jessica had bought for him. The villas in the high-level Energy Zone were different from the villas in the low-level Energy Zone. The villas here were actually built in the air. For example, the villa group that Lorne was in was built on a special platform that looked like a goblet. Although it was only supported by a very thin glass frame, there was no need to worry about it collapsing. This was the technology of the futuristic city. It was unexpected. The villas above were all independent villas. The house price was probably an astronomical figure. Lorne’s villa was No. 2, and the No. 1 villa beside it was Jessica’s. It would be too convenient to visit in the future. In the villa, there were exquisite fitness equipment. After using these equipment to train, Lorne realized that his physical fitness had already far exceeded that of ordinary people. In terms of strength, even professional players were not his match. In terms of mental reaction, Lorne was practically Superman. Due to the attributes of the divine equipment and the hidden bonus of the Orange skill on his brain, he had an absurd reaction speed. If he participated in a competition regarding reaction speed, he would definitely be able to set a world record. “Unfortunately, I can’t directly materialize my attributes.” Lorne could not help but sigh. If the attributes in the game could be directly materialized, then his physical fitness would at least be a hundred times that of an ordinary person. This was not an exaggeration. After all, his physical performance in the game was very powerful. Of course, he would only know what would happen after materialization. This was just Lorne’s imagination. There was no reference at all. “Blink!” “Invisibility!” Lorne tested his skill again. There was nothing to say about the Blink skill. It was still the same as before. However, the invisibility effect had increased greatly from before. After all, the Ghost Shadow Necklace had evolved into the Ghost Deity Necklace. The effect of this equipment had been greatly enhanced. Coupled with this materialization which had increased Lorne’s mental attributes, he would be even stronger after entering invisibility. When he used the Ghost Shadow Necklace, he could turn invisible for about seven minutes. After evolving into the Ghost Deity Necklace, he could stay invisible for about 30 minutes. With the enhancement this time, as long as he did not enter the Ghost Deity state, he should be able to turn invisible for more than 50 minutes, right? “Why don’t we test it?” With that in mind, Lorne activated his skill. This time, he chose to go out for a test. With such a long invisibility effect, how could he not go out? Therefore, he left the villa and arrived at the central service area that was dedicated to the villa area. Because it was a high-level villa area, there were fewer people here, but the people providing services were exquisite. Yes, there were not many robots here, but humans providing services. Such a model was very rare in future cities. After all, in such a technology city, labor was very expensive. Therefore, obtaining artificial services became a model that satisfied the vanity of the rich. As he walked inside, he suddenly saw a familiar figure. She was in her twenties and had beautiful hair. She was dressed in a fashionable designer suit and held a high-end crystal handbag. It was Jessica’s aunt, Mayra. “Hmm, Jessica’s aunt is here too?” Lorne was confused, but he did not follow the other party. Instead, he walked in another direction. There were not many people here, and there were very few surveillance cameras. Because it was an area of the top rich, no one was here. Lorne could even appear here, but he did not do that. Instead, he continued to wander around. Finally, he stood around a corner. From what he had seen, the walls were very thick, which caught his attention. This was because he had not done a test, which was to cross the thick wall. From the distance that he had tested just now, the wall was already more than 20 meters long. This distance exceeded the longest distance of three flashes. Lorne wanted to know where he would appear if the wall he passed exceeded 20 meters. Thinking of this, Lorne could not help but want to do a test. He had noticed the situation on both sides of the wall. One side of the wall was the room and the other was the corridor. This way, even if he was expelled from the wall, he would not be harmed. After confirming this information, Lorne stood there and activated his skill. Swish! He vanished on the spot. But the next second, Lorne found himself in a room. Yes, he was rejected by the wall. When he passed through the wall of more than twenty meters, he could not directly cross it. When he reached the end, the wall directly rejected him. This gave Lorne a new understanding of his Blink skill and a better grasp of it. Moreover, he was still in invisibility, which meant that the two skills would not reject each other. As he pondered… Suddenly! The door opened. Someone walked in. “Sister Mayra, your skin is so good.” Entering the room, a female masseur led Mayra in. After closing the door, she began to help Mayra take off her clothes. Her exquisite suit and warm-colored dress shirt slowly retreated. The next moment, a beautiful woman with a perfect figure, beautiful posture, exquisite muscles, and fair skin appeared in the room. “I can’t compare to you young people.” Mayra brushed the hair from her ear. Although she was only 27, she always spoke in a very old manner. Perhaps because of her family, she was much more mature than her peers. “No, your skin is really good. Moreover, Sister Mayra, your breasts seem to have grown bigger again.” When the female masseur saw the pair of white rabbits jump out, her mouth could not help but widen in surprise. “Don’t flatter me like that. At my age, I would have stopped developing.” Mayra smiled. She was close to this girl, that was why they spoke so intimately. The two of them did not have any taboos, as usual. However, what they did not know was that in this room, there was another person who was watching the two of them tease each other. Lorne had wanted to leave. But now, he could not move. It had to be said that this Aunt Mayra had a good figure. She was not as delicate as Jessica, but she had a strong sense of maturity. Moreover, he had heard that she had never had a boyfriend. She was a very hardworking woman! “Sister Mayra, why don’t you take off your long pants this time? These pants are too tight and will affect the relaxation of your muscles.” “Oh, okay…” Mayra was a little shy as she took off her clothes in front of another person. She still felt very strange, but the person in front of her was her private masseur. Such things happened occasionally, so she was not so against it now. She gritted her teeth and shyly let her guard down. This scene ignited a fire in Lorne’s heart. As a hot-blooded young man, facing such an exquisite beauty was simply too torturous. Soon, Mayra removed her clothes and lay down gently on the massage bed. Although there were relevant massage equipment, humans still had the greatest feeling. This was also the main reason why Mayra liked to come here. The female masseur dripped the essential oil on the pure white back and reached out to gently rub it open, pushing the essential oil all over her body. “I just want to learn some oil massage techniques. Yes, I’m a good kid who loves learning.” Lorne squatted by the bed and carefully admired the beautiful body in front of him. But at that moment, the masseur realized that she had forgotten to take another essential oil, so she pulled up the screen and walked to the side to get the product she wanted. Only Lorne and Mayra were left in the room. This made Lorne’s heart race. Looking at Mayra, who was enjoying herself with her eyes closed, he could not resist the temptation. Soon, a bold idea occurred to him. Lorne activated Ghost Deity. Under the ‘Ghost Shadow Mode’, the invisibility would fail after the character came into contact. Under the ‘Ghost Deity Mode’, he could remain invisible and do anything. Therefore, Lorne began to showcase his skills. Evil hands reached for the defenseless sister of the richest man in the world. … “Huh? What’s going on?” Mayra was enjoying the sensation of the spa with her eyes closed. She had not paid much attention to the masseur’s pause just now. She continued to lie on the bed, but then she felt something on her back, albeit with a little more force. Just as she was feeling confused, the hand moved lower. “No, you can’t…” Mayra’s expression changed slightly. Why was this girl suddenly so bold today? She had crossed the defense line and invaded that place! Although there were such services in the spa, she had never done it before. Moreover, she had instructed the other party to not massage that area. Why was this girl so bold? This was too much! Mayra could not help but struggle, but she quickly calmed down, as if acquiescing to the other party’s nonsense. Since it was her personal masseur, it was not that serious. After all, this room was customized. There was only one room card, and it was in her hands, which made Mayra feel very safe. As for the masseur’s bold move, she originally wanted to reject it, but after being single for so many years, who would not have hidden desires? Especially when that area was violated, there was a faint feeling of excitement, which made Mayra reluctant to suddenly stop. “Forget it, I’ll allow her this time. I can’t let her do this again next time.” Mayra bit her lip and closed her eyes, enjoying the sensation. Two minutes later. Lorne, who was doing whatever he wanted, keenly heard the masseur’s arrival, so he stopped what he was doing. At the last moment, he did not forget to rub that exquisite hole. “Oh!” Mayra could not help but moan. She turned around in surprise and saw the masseur squatting down. The other party smiled at her and immediately stopped her from speaking. As for Lorne, he arrived outside the door. Although she was considered his aunt, her figure and aura were not inferior to Jessica and Nina. Moreover, she was a strong woman who had never had a boyfriend. It made him unable to control himself. If there was a chance in the future, they might become a true family. “It’s time to go home. I’ve made myself hard. I have to quickly find the two sisters to help me.” Before the invisibility wore off, Lorne returned to his villa. … “Slow down, don’t be so fast!” “Stop, I can’t… I can’t…” At night, the three of them, who had been apart for ten days, finally met again. Someone said that ‘absence makes the heart grow fonder’, and the sisters, Nina and Jessica, were clearly the same. They had a deep interaction in the new villa that day. Due to the increase in Lorne’s constitution, he was even stronger in some aspects. Even if the two sisters went up at the same time, they could not withstand it. It was not until 2 in the morning that they finally stopped. The few of them panted and calmed their surging emotions. “Lorne, although we live very close, we can’t see each other like this every day. We found an excuse to come out this time. We definitely can’t spend the night outside in the future.” Then, the elder sister, Jessica, said earnestly, nestling in Lorne’s arms. “Why?” Lorne could not help but ask. Without the sisters, life would definitely be boring. “It’s Daddy. He’s too concerned about us. Last time, Sister secretly ran out to deal with the low-level Energy Zone and nearly encountered an accident, so Daddy made us go home every night and let Aunt look after us. He was afraid that something would happen to the two of us.” “That’s fine. You can’t come out, but I can go to your house. Your aunt won’t be home forever, will she? As long as we avoid her, everything else won’t be a problem.” “That’s right!” Nina’s eyes widened in surprise, “Mr. Lorne, you can enter our bedroom before Aunt returns and sleep first. You can come out the next day after Aunt goes to work. Won’t that solve all the problems?” “Will we be discovered like this? After all, our voices are so loud.” Jessica frowned, “Moreover, Aunt’s room is so close to ours. From time to time, she would come to our room to check on us or even sleep with us.” “It’s okay. I’ll buy some soundproof wallpaper later. I just need to stick it to the wall and it’ll be completely soundproof. As for Aunt, we’ll just lock the door at night. If Aunt asks, just say that it’s for safety. I believe she’ll be comforted by our precautions.” Lorne: “…” The two of you are really good nieces. “By the way, Mr. Lorne, I have already helped you find the most authoritative medical team in the world and many top professors in the medical world. They can definitely treat your sister.” “I’ve already contacted them. They’re free at any time. You can contact them whenever you need them,” Jessica said. “Thank you. Roanna has been transferred to a hospital in the high-level Energy Zone. She can only stay after the World Alliance does a full checkup. Let’s wait until then.” At three in the morning, the two sisters left the villa. The two of them could not stay outside for the night. This time, they could return before dawn because they had found an excuse. Seeing the two sisters sneak out and return to their villa as if nothing had happened, Lorne’s house fell silent again. Lying in bed, he began to check the game forum. In the end, he realized that all the reports were related to him. “War Report! Cold Desolate Dragon City has won the war to defend the city at the speed of light!” “Shocking the world! The value of the Cold Desolate Dragon City has been greatly underestimated!” “A business miracle! Tyrant’s estimated net worth has increased by 100 billion overnight because of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, breaking the history of all businesses!” “What is the significance of the coordinates of the Cold Desolate Dragon City in the game?!” “Tyrant’s plan is flawless!” “Iron Skull City is creating its own opponent!” “Cold Desolate Dragon City’s player traffic exceeds 5 million! Teleportation fees: 150 million!” The World Alliance promoted the matter of ‘Cold Desolate Dragon City’ worldwide. Now, the global newspapers were all about Lorne. Especially the value of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, it attracted the attention of tens of billions of people worldwide. When they saw that the Cold Desolate Dragon City had earned more than a hundred million dollars from teleportation, everyone’s eyes turned red. This was only teleportation! To a city, teleportation was the industry with the lowest economic benefits. Compared to the main industries such as potions and equipment, the economy brought by teleportation was indeed not worth mentioning. This also indirectly highlighted the value of Cold Desolate Dragon City. Even if the benefits of the potion and the forging were calculated according to the same level of business as the teleportation circle, this newly built city could also bring 450 million dollars a day! What an astronomical figure was this? Even the super financial groups in reality were only at this level! There were even some financial groups with low profits that were far from reaching such benefits. Thinking of this, the players around the world were excited. They all joined the game. At this moment, the World Alliance introduced a special concept. That was the Virtual User Concentration Plan. This was an interesting plan. It could be seen from the words that it wanted all the players to stay together. But this centralized residence is different from the current one. This kind of concentrated residential building was a little like a hibernation chamber. In a room, there would be countless hibernation chambers. After the players signed the agreement, they could stay there forever. In the hibernation chambers, there was a special nutrient solution. It would maintain the body’s activity and provide all treatment and physical needs. The minds of humans would arrive in the Divine Realm. In this world, one could live freely and no longer have to worry about survival in reality. According to the introduction of the World Alliance, this concentrated building would go 500 meters underground, like an inverted skyscraper. In each building, there were countless rooms, and hundreds of people lived in each room. Because the players who entered the game would not make any movement, the space needed was very small. They could stack them together and let hundreds of people stay in one room. There were countless rooms in a 500-meter building. This building alone could allow the entire population of a town to stay there. Most importantly, they did not need to go out, so the resource consumption was very limited. This completely resolved the problem of insufficient resources in the world. However, to Lorne’s surprise, did the World Alliance really not know about virtual reality materialization? Why were they promoting this policy at this time? If players discovered the materialization power of the game, wouldn’t the world experience a huge change? The order at hand would be completely destroyed. After all, not everyone could stabilize their emotions after obtaining special powers. “Perhaps some chaos has occurred in the World Alliance.” Lorne could sense that a huge storm was about to happen worldwide, and the World Alliance’s defense methods were definitely related to it. However, that was still not something a citizen like him could reach. Perhaps only when his strength reached a certain level would he know the secret behind this world. Lorne sighed. Now, he had achieved his initial dream. His wealth could give his sister the best treatment in the world. Then, onto the next target! It was to create a special potion in the game! Medical methods in reality might not be able to awaken his sister, so the Divine Realm would be Lorne’s last hope. … “Those large corporations can no longer sit still.” Lorne closed the forum and looked at the private messages. During this period of time, Super Rich had sent him a large amount of information. All the contents were related to the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Not only were ordinary players enticed now, but those large guilds were actually even crazier. The large corporations hiding behind large guilds all saw the value of the territory. They wanted to join and take a share. Unfortunately, Tyrant did not negotiate with them. Therefore, helplessly, they found the business representative of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, Super Rich. They wanted a portion of the business in the hands of Super Rich. The private messages that Lorne received were basically related to these cooperation matters. He checked and finally gave the decision to Super Rich. He had a very clear view and plan for the future of Cold Desolate Dragon City. Lorne approved of his idea, so after hearing his explanation, Lorne agreed to his decision and let him decide if he wanted to cooperate with other organizations. Super Rich was indeed a top boss in the business world. He quickly understood all the benefits and connections. He used bidding methods to hand over part of the business of the Cold Desolate Dragon City to the guilds. Now that Cold Desolate Dragon City was short of people, if the people of a large guild were willing to develop here, Lorne would definitely not object, but he had set up a very special cooperation agreement with Super Rich. If these industries want to leave the Cold Desolate Dragon City, they had to pay a tax of 45% of their assets. This tax was calculated according to the value of the company in the entire world. Not only did it require assets in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, but it also required the assets they had in the real world. In this case, whether to join the Cold Desolate Dragon City was something that the capitalists had to consider carefully. However, the development of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was like the midday sun. It far exceeded the current game progress of the players. If they did not choose to join the other party now, they would miss the opportunity to set up the early stages. This was because if the new guild territory wanted to build Cold Desolate Dragon City, they had to pay a huge price. More importantly, no one had obtained the second City Creation Token yet. This was what worried the capitalists the most. After many discussions, they still decided to cooperate with the Cold Desolate Dragon City. After all, this was the trend for players to develop businesses in the virtual world. If they missed this opportunity, they would fall behind other capitalists by an era. At that time, it would be difficult to form a sizable force. Thinking of this, the large corporations no longer hesitated. They all found Super Rich and chose to cooperate with the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Of course, they definitely did not really want the Cold Desolate Dragon City to become stronger. In the dark, these capitalists would definitely use many sinister methods to prepare to leave the Cold Desolate Dragon City in the future. Regardless, Lorne did not care. As long as their current efforts brought benefits to the Cold Desolate Dragon City, everything was enough. It did not matter even if they left tomorrow. After all, Cold Desolate Dragon City had benefited. Its growth would truly widen the gap between it and the players, and it would also truly grow to the point where it could compete with Iron Skull City. As for ordinary players? In fact, Lorne’s decision did not affect these ordinary merchants. They had always been doing business in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, so they would not lose anything. They could not wait to rely on the Cold Desolate Dragon City. After all, they did not have enough resources and ability to build their own territory. “The first one in the market really earns the most.” Lorne checked the income of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. The records on the accounts exceeded his expectations, several times more than what he had guessed on the Internet. But at this moment, he also noticed a problem. It was the profits! Although the usable funds in the Cold Desolate Dragon City were large, the amount spent was greater. The Gnomes needed a large amount of funds to pave the way for their work. After all, there was almost none of the equipment they needed in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. In addition, there were various materials that required immense funding. Half of the profits in the city were spent on these matters. The other half was spent on building. Although there were many basic resources in the warehouse of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, there were still some construction materials that needed to be bought. The cost of these things nearly cost half of the profits of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. It could not be helped. There were too many workers in the city. “Although there’s no income, the construction has already begun. I reckon that in at most a month, the internal construction of the Cold Desolate Dragon City will be completed.” Lorne was confident that as long as Cold Desolate Dragon City was completed, with its good geographical advantage, it would definitely have the strength to compete with Iron Skull City. As for the players, because of the geographical location, Cold Desolate Dragon City was already in an advantageous position. As for the NPCs, because of the complete collection of rare herbs, they had a considerable advantage. Now, it was up to Doge’s arrangements for the next Tyrant Award. After the Cold Desolate Dragon City truly obtained a large number of excellent alchemists, they could make them refine a potion that belonged to the Cold Desolate Dragon City alone. These potions would completely free Cold Desolate Dragon City from the restrictions of Iron Skull City! Thinking of this, Lorne was in a good mood. Then, he stopped staying up and quickly rested. Tomorrow, he would leave the Cold Desolate Dragon City and head to the Elven Kingdom. He had to focus. After all, that was Aisha’s hometown. He might even be troubled by the elves. If that was the case, the situation would be troublesome. … The next day, Lorne woke up very early. Last night, the Divine Realm seemed to have undergone a short maintenance. There were some additional details, including attributes correction for the monsters, as well as some new dungeons and missions. This was the most anticipated part of the Divine Realm. Although it was only a game, it would automatically develop a game storyline according to the player’s progress, making it impossible for the entire game storyline to appear. Moreover, there was a very special update in the contents of this update. That was the intimate system that all players cared about. Previously, there were rumors that as long as the affinity between the players and NPCs reached the level of ‘Close Friend’, they could break the rules and interact with the NPCs on a deeper level. However, the system had revealed very little information previously. It did not explain how far this interaction could go. This time, it was the most detailed information. According to the information announced by the system, as long as the player could raise the affinity of the NPC to the level of ‘Close Friend’, they could interact with each other beyond the level of friendship. There was no limit to this interaction. Other than instances of abuse, they could do almost anything they wanted. There might even be the crystallization of love! Yes, NPCs could have children. However, because there were many races of NPCs, players and NPCs had to consider many problems when bearing offspring. The heir might be a werewolf with fur or an ogre with lumps all over its body. Therefore, the system specially reminded players that when docking with NPCs, they had to use protection. If they wanted to obtain the crystallization of love, they had to consider whether the other party’s race was compatible with the humans to create a good species. In addition, players could also reach this level of relationship. However, both sides had to have the affinity of ‘Close Friend’. Moreover, this matter could only be carried out with the consent of the female players. Once violated and there was a forced action, the player would not only be unable to remove his undergarment, but he would also be severely punished by the system. The most severe punishment would be eternal exile. If one received such punishment, it meant that they would never be able to play in “Divine Realm”. Such a result made many players wary, especially the ones with ill intentions. At the same time, countless players were excited. This was because they liked some NPCs in the Divine Realm too much, especially the elves. As the most perfect species in the world, the players were even crazy about it. Now that they saw that they could do something beyond friendship with the elves, the blood in their hearts was almost ignited. They all swore that they would have an elven girlfriend for the rest of their lives!!! With such a dream, they rushed into the forest and began a crazy farming journey. As for Lorne, he looked at the affinity between him and Aisha happily and went to the forging workshop. “Mr. City Lord, I didn’t expect you to be so powerful. You even defeated the powerful Mountain Giant King. Your deeds have already spread throughout Iron Skull City.” Rhett, the Commander of Iron Skull City, said as he walked towards Lorne. “That’s nothing. That Mountain Giant King is not very powerful. Defeating it is not a glorious thing. What I’m worried about now is that the surrounding monsters are going after the Cold Desolate Dragon City. The attacks in the future will probably be much more ferocious than this.” “Indeed. Cold Desolate Dragon City is located in the ruins of the war and near the Lake of Death. Coupled with the unique location that can connect the three fortresses, it makes the dark forces very afraid of the rise of Cold Desolate Dragon City. They will definitely secretly pressure Cold Desolate Dragon City and even destroy the construction of the city.” “However, Cold Desolate Dragon City is fighting for peace. On behalf of Iron Skull City, I thank you for your contribution. At the same time, I will bring 100,000 city guards to guard Cold Desolate Dragon City for a long time and contribute a portion of our strength to the defense of the Dragon City.” Rhett said righteously, but soon, he looked troubled and said, “However, the army has encountered some trouble recently.” “What trouble?” Lorne asked. “It’s like this. We have recently distributed 50,000 city guards to clear the monsters in the distant forest, but the price of the potions in the city is too high, and the price of the teleportation circle is also very high. It’s difficult for us to bear the military expenses. Therefore, I would like to ask you to give us a discount, Mr. City Lord.” Rhett said this, but just making a request made him feel a little embarrassed, so he quickly said, “In return, I will arrange for 30,000 city guards to take on the defense mission in the city and don’t need you to pay any fees.” “I didn’t consider it thoroughly enough.” Lorne said, “Commander Rhett, how about this? I’ll give the city guards the normal price when buying potions, and the teleportation circle will be provided for you for free.” “That’s great!” Rhett said in surprise, “With such convenience, the city guards can carry out the mission in peace. Thank you for your understanding, Mr. Tyrant.” “It’s okay. I haven’t forgotten about the financial support that Iron Skull City has given to Cold Desolate Dragon City. Without the help of Iron Skull City, Cold Desolate Dragon City would not have been able to expand to its current state in such a short time.” Lorne smiled and said, “If there’s anything you need help with in the future, please feel free to ask. As long as it’s within my ability, I will definitely do my best to help.” “Alright, please rest assured, Mr. Tyrant. In the future, if Cold Desolate Dragon City needs help, Iron Skull City will definitely do its best to help. I hope that our two cities can help each other forever.” “Yes.” Lorne nodded. At that moment, he received a notification. That was, his affinity with Commander Rhett had increased by 5,000 points. This was shocking news. After all, he was the highest military officer in Iron Skull City. With his affinity, his cooperation with Iron Skull City should be easier in the future. While Lorne was thinking, Rhett had returned to the camp and issued a mission. Ding! “Regional Announcement: Commander of Iron Skull City, Rhett, has issued an army mission: Eliminate the Monsters in the Ruins of the War!” “Mission Description: In order to eliminate the threat in the country, Iron Skull City has sent the city guards to the ruins of the war to completely clean up the entire ruins. Due to the limited number of soldiers in the city guards, they have specially recruited adventurers to help the army clean up the ruins of the war. You can obtain the reputation reward of Iron Skull City by killing the monsters. Please join us.” Ding! “Regional Announcement: Commander of Iron Skull City, Rhett, has issued a recruitment mission: Collecting Herbs.” “Mission Description: Due to the powerful monsters in the ruins of the war, the soldiers of the City Guard Army have suffered varying degrees of injuries. Adventurers, please head to the map of the ruins of the war to find various dark-element herbs and hand them to the City Guard Army. You will obtain the reputation of Iron Skull City because of this!” “Ding!” “Ding!” “Ding!” All the players in the ruins of the war received this huge announcement. Instantly, the players went crazy again. Previously, the Dragon of Light had issued a mission to clean up the ruins of the war. As long as he killed the monsters, he would obtain the corresponding reputation of the Church of Light. Now, the city guards had issued another mission. Didn’t this mean that they only needed to do one mission to obtain the reputation points of two forces at the same time? Thinking of this, the players could not hold back anymore. Due to the increase in the level of the NPCs they came into contact with, the players also knew the importance of reputation points. Therefore, when they received this news, the number of players who came to Cold Desolate Dragon City increased significantly. Lorne knew that was Rhett’s reward. Although he had only issued two very simple missions, it had really pushed the popularity of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. In comparison, the teleportation fees he had saved were nothing. Then, Lorne found Tully and Doge. The gnome team that Tully had brought had a very important mission. They had to build city defense weapons, projectors, and even the equipment forging in the city. They were responsible for it for the time being. Lorne encouraged them and gave them enough recognition. Although it was only a few words, it was the greatest motivation for the gnomes. They worked hard for their dreams. This so-called “City of Freedom” would be a huge part of their lives. As for Doge? He had been very busy recently. After leaving his post in the Alchemist Association of Iron Skull City, he entered the Alchemist Association of the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Due to not having enough alchemy equipment, he had been purchasing crazily recently. He wanted to make the Alchemist Association of the Cold Desolate Dragon City more magnificent before the alchemists of the large organizations arrived. He could do as he pleased. Lorne discussed the pharmacopoeia with him briefly and left. The release of the pharmacopoeia was very successful. Now that the first version had been released, the current reception was very good. The alchemists in various cities and even other empires were greatly touched. Now, they just had to wait for the content to be updated and completely shake the entire alchemy world! In addition, Lorne made a trip to Super Rich. He was now in charge of the business of the merchants. He hoped that he could quickly raise the business circle in the city. At that time, it would be time to truly earn money. There was also the issue of defense in the inner city. Lorne brought a large number of warrior remains he had recovered to the Church of Light and obtained a large amount of reputation points. He exchanged for 30 Church Knights from the Church of Light again. In this case, the inner city wall was basically safe. When Tully’s projection device was completed, he would really be free of worries. “Then, it’s time for me to leave.” Swish! Lorne crushed the teleportation scroll and returned to Iron Skull City. Although the Cold Desolate Dragon City was closer to his destination, that place was too dangerous. It was safer to leave from there. Moreover, he could use the Gnome Mineral Company’s teleportation array to save time. Before approaching the teleportation circle, Lorne checked the map. Iron Skull City was to the west of the map. To the north was the Icy Plains of Calamity, and to the northwest, there was the Gnome Kingdom and the Elven Kingdom. Beyond these two kingdoms was Seaside City. Seaside City was a player city on the same level as Iron Skull City, but because of the obstruction of the Gnome Kingdom and the Elven Kingdom, the players in the two cities could not cross back and forth. Now, Lorne was going to the Elven Kingdom. The Elven Kingdom City that bordered Iron Skull City was called Emerald City. It was said that the Dragon of Emerald, Lena, liked to descend in this city the most, which was why it had the Emerald City. This was an extremely glorious name. Although he was not sure if the Dragon of Emerald would really be in that city, as long as there was the Elven Holy Temple, he could still introduce it to the Dragon of Emerald. The second chapter of Lorne’s mission was in the other party’s hands. He wondered what kind of mission it would be. “It seems to be a long way from the Gnome Mountain Range.” Lorne calculated the distance and found that it would take at least two to three days. The huge Dream Forest became the greatest obstacle in Lorne’s way. Only by passing through this forest could he reach the Forest of Nature, where Aisha’s race was located. If he continued northwest and walked out of Iron Skull City, he would immediately step into the territory of Emerald City. What a long journey. With a sigh, Lorne entered the teleportation circle. In the next second, he appeared in the Gnome Mountain Range. Then, he rushed towards the distant forest. To avoid attracting the attention of the surrounding monsters, Lorne entered stealth mode. As long as one’s level was not too higher than Lorne, they would not notice his arrival. This could reduce the obstacles and quickly march through the forest. Swish! In the forest, Lorne was extremely fast. Because of his attributes and specialization in Agility, coupled with his luxurious equipment, the movement speed of a Summoner was naturally much higher than that of an archer at the same level. Not only that, but after entering invisibility, his movement speed would also increase by 30%, allowing him to instantly cross the forest at high speed. The invisibility effect was also excellent, helping him avoid most of the attacks. However, this model also had a considerable drawback, because invisibility required MP. This was a test of his potion stock. Now, the highest players could buy a Level 4 potion and recover 1,200 MP at once. This was a little difficult for Lorne to maintain. After all, in the invisibility state, he needed to spend 50 MP per second. Fortunately, Lorne’s MP was close to 20,000 points now. Even without the potion, he could maintain invisibility for more than six minutes. In addition, his magic recovery ability was very strong. Before his MP was filled, it would also produce a very good effect. While traveling, Lorne paid special attention to the consumption of MP. He discovered that his MP would dry up about ten minutes later. Then, without using up his MP, he could recover within ten minutes. This was not an obstacle that affected speed. Lorne only moved through the forest for 10 minutes without invisibility, so it did not affect his speed. After all, with Aisha by her side, she would deal with the monsters she encountered along the way. Speaking of which, in the mission regarding the ‘Holy Angel’, he had let Aisha go to the territory to obtain the baptism of the elemental power. Was this considered increasing his aptitude?  <i>It… should be?</i>  Lorne thought that would happen, but he was curious. With Aisha’s current strength, what level would she evolve to if she improved again? Also, would Gabriel’s recovery affect Aisha? Lorne liked Aisha’s personality now. Although she was young, she was abnormally tenacious. Such an unyielding character was indeed very attractive. Therefore, Lorne did not want Gabriel’s recovery to affect Aisha’s soul. “Let’s see. Perhaps the two can exist separately and not affect each other?” Lorne hoped so. This was equivalent to obtaining two pets. If in the future, when the affinity reached the level of ‘Close Friend’, wouldn’t he be able to obtain double the happiness with Aisha? <i>Yes, that made sense. It made complete sense. Hahahaha</i>! … Ding! “You have entered the neutral map—Nature Forest.” Two days later, Lorne finally arrived at the Nature Forest. This was still the territory of Iron Skull City. If he wanted to go to the Emerald City, he had to continue heading northwest. After passing through half of the Nature Forest, he would reach the range of the Emerald City. Without thinking, Lorne set off. But after traveling through the Nature Forest for a while, he suddenly heard something. The sound of fighting? The sound of weapons colliding was very clear. Clearly, someone was fighting. Did some players develop here? Curious, Lorne entered stealth mode and approached the sound. In the end, he arrived near a small hill. Under the hill in front of him, several players were attacking an elf. That elf was very strange. There was faint black energy on his body, and his eyes were scarlet. He looked abnormal. What kind of elf was it? It seemed to belong to the same race as Aisha, so they were both Night Elves. This could be seen from her moon-white skin and silver hair. It was too easy to recognize. “Aisha, that should be your tribesman, right?” Lorne could not help but ask. There was only one Night Elf Race in Iron Skull City. Since Aisha was from this Night Elf Race, the elf in front of him was definitely no exception. “Yes, but she’s no longer a kind Night Elf.” Aisha’s eyes stared ahead, her small hands clenched. Sensing her emotions, Lorne held her hand and comforted her, then asked, “How did she become like this?” “It’s the power of the Dark Abyss!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Dark Abyss?” Lorne looked at the elf in front and wondered, “Is it demonized?” “Yes.” Aisha nodded and explained, “A long time ago, the Dark Abyss began to target our Night Elves. They often invaded our territory and even attacked our people. They used the evil power of darkness to turn the originally kind Night Elves and demons into savage Dark Elves!” “Is it because of your combat strength?” Lorne asked. “Yes.” Aisha said, “The Night Elves are natural assassins. Our combat strength at night is very powerful. There are almost no assassin warriors of any race who can compare to us, and this is only the innate strength of the Night Elves. Once the Night Elves are turned into Dark Elves by the demons, their combat strength when walking at night will also increase by a qualitative level. It is also because of this that the Dark Abyss has been coveting our strength.” “Then why did you seek the help of the Elven Kingdom?” Lorne looked at Aisha and said curiously, “According to what I know, the Elven Kingdom’s Emerald City is also in the Nature Forest. It shouldn’t take long for you to go there, right?” Hearing this, Aisha fell silent. A few seconds later, she gritted her teeth and said, “They won’t help us.” “Why?” “Because they treat the Night Elves as Low Elves.” Aisha explained unwillingly, “Originally, the Night Elves were a part of the High Elves. We had powerful combat strength and supported peace, but because of the involvement of the Dark Abyss, it made many Night Elves become evil Dark Elves. The Dark Elves who obtained powerful strength used their hiding ability to attack other elves and even kill many of them.” “Firstly, the elves of other races all thought that we Night Elves did it, so they began to denounce us. Even if the misunderstanding was resolved later, such disgust still entered the hearts of the people. As time passed, our Night Elves’ status gradually decreased. In the recent era, we had already gone from High Elves to Low Elves today.” “However, that was not the worst. The worst thing was that we, who were originally living near the Emerald City, were invaded by the dark power again. There was an elf who could not resist the temptation of the power and actually chose to merge the dark power. This led to an earth-shattering change in our Night Elf Race.” “In the end, it was the Dragon of Emerald who descended here who ended this chaos. However, to our despair, it turned out that before the elf was completely demonized, she had secretly brought the power of darkness into the territory of the race. After a long period of contact, a large number of our Night Elves had already been planted by the power of darkness.” “The Dragon of Emerald knew that it was the Night Elves who actively threw themselves into the darkness that triggered all of this, so it angrily chased our race out of the Elven Kingdom and ordered that we could never enter the territory of the Emerald City, or else we would be completely wiped out.” Aisha lowered her eyes and narrated the past sadly. It was not that they were unwilling to seek help from the Emerald City. It was because the Emerald City had completely abandoned them. The Dragon of Emerald, Lena, hated the self-abandoning Night Elves to the core. In the end, she did not even save them, who had already been planted with the seeds of darkness. Therefore, this Night Elf Race submitted to Iron Skull City. Many years had passed. Fortunately, their Ancient Tree of Life’s branch had grown. It was because of this magical ancient tree that they could last until now. “In that case, these players should be doing the mission of the Emerald City?” Lorne thought as he rubbed his chin. Since the Dark Elves were the ones that the elves hated the most, as long as the players killed the Dark Elves, they would definitely obtain a large amount of reputation among the elves. This would explain the scene before him. As for why these players came here so early? It should be the plan of a large guild. After all, large guilds had to consider the future. The moment they entered the main city, they had to explore the surrounding map. This was something every large guild would definitely do. … Swish! Swish! Swish! Under the siege of several players, the Dark Elf quickly jumped, and dodging words kept appearing above its head. This was the talent of the Night Elves. They were more agile than other elves and even had natural dodging abilities. They had a chance to avoid being injured. Especially after becoming a Dark Elf, this ability became more and more outstanding. Unfortunately, against such a concentrated attack, even with her dodging talent, it was difficult to avoid all damage. As she dodged, she was slashed by swords. However, this elf was not afraid. Her eyes were red and she was breathing heavily. She was still full of fighting spirit and seemed to be ready to fight to the death. The surrounding players were not in a hurry. They relied on their advantage in numbers to slowly wear down the health points of the elf. Under such damage, it would not be long before the Dark Elf fell under their blades. “Boss, the elves are really beautiful. It’s a pity to kill them.” A warrior player with the prefix [Domination Guild] on his head looked at the elf in front of him with a pig-like expression. “What’s the hurry? Are there not many beautiful elves in the Divine Realm?” The leader said, “As long as we raise our levels, what beautiful NPCs can’t we obtain in the future?” “Boss is right. With strength, we can have whatever we want.” The warrior player smiled. “By the way, Boss, has the guild leader not gathered enough affinity points with the elves to accept the mission? There are so many of us, and we have been farming here for a long time, and we have even bought a large amount of resources at a high price. Isn’t that enough?” Another Shield Warrior player said. “What do you know? Those elves are all high-level NPCs. How can they be so easy to conquer?” The leading player smiled and said, “However, I think it should be soon. I reckon that if we offer some more gems and herbs, we should be able to obtain the other party’s trust. At that time, the entire elven race will belong to our guild. In the future, whoever performs well, the guild leader might reward you with an elf to play with.” “Really?” “Of course. As long as you have the ability, the guild leader will not treat you badly.” “Hehe, that’s right.” “Alright, stop chatting. Let’s quickly kill this elf and hand her Elemental Heart to the guild leader. I’ll treat us to some skewers tonight!” “Thank you, Boss!!” Several players stopped chatting and began to attack the Dark Elf seriously.. Arrows, magic, and sword attacks swarmed over at the elf. [Blink]! Facing the incoming attack, the Dark Elf immediately moved. Then, the dagger in her hand turned and quickly slashed across the throat of an archer. This was a weak spot that could easily deal critical damage. Unfortunately, this attack did not kill this player instantly, because the elf was in a very poor state and her combat strength had been reduced. Before she could continue attacking, the Shield Warrior player beside her immediately rushed over. Boom! The shield in his hand suddenly pushed, pushing the elf to the ground. “Attack together. Priests, pay attention to the injured. Don’t be killed!” The leader player roared and charged at the elf with his sword in hand. The other players also attacked. “Master, may I…” Aisha could not bear to see this. Although the Night Elf in front of her had been demonized, she still did not want to see her get slashed by the adventurers’ swords. Moreover, that elf had just been demonized. She still had some self-awareness. “Let’s go and negotiate with them.” Lorne walked out. Looking at his back, Aisha could not help but be stunned. Then, with a smile, she entered stealth mode. … Miss! Miss! Miss! After dodging many attacks, the Dark Elf was exhausted. At this moment, a powerful arrow hit the elf. This was an archer’s Level 30 skill, Shock Arrow, a powerful control skill. Being hit by this arrow, the Dark Elf was directly stunned on the spot. Seeing this scene, the others went crazy. They held their sabers and slashed at the elves. At this moment, a player in a magic robe suddenly walked out. “Everyone, please stop for a moment.” Lorne walked near the group and smiled, “This elf is fated with me. I hope you can be sensible and let me have her.” Hearing this, everyone looked over fiercely. Stealing monster? How bold. He was snatching it from their Domination Guild? Did this kid really not know how to spell death? “Brother, we’ve been chasing this monster since it was at full health. Aren’t you going overboard by suddenly running out to snatch it?!” The leader glanced at Lorne’s ID and frowned when he realized that it was hidden. However, this player did not act rashly. He was also worried about the identity of this player who suddenly appeared. It was not a good decision to rashly offend him. “It’s true that you pursued it, but since I encountered it, it’s fate with me. Everyone, this monster is mine now. I hope you can be generous and give it to me.” “Tsk!” The Shield Warrior player spat and said angrily, “Give it to you? Who the heck are you? How dare you say such things in front of us!” “Who?” Lorne was amused by the other party’s words. There were indeed not many people who dared to speak to him like this these days, but there was no need to take this arrogance to heart. It could only be said that the ignorant were fearless. “I’ll say it again. This Dark Elf is mine now. You have two choices now. First, get lost before I attack. Second, die here!” Lorne calmly approached them while threatening. Although he did not attack, his aura was very fierce. The group of players began to doubt themselves. However, when they saw that the other party was only a Summoner and was so close to them, the fear in their hearts immediately disappeared. At such a close distance, even if this Summoner’s attributes were twice as powerful as theirs, he would be chopped into mincemeat in an instant! Thinking of this, the group of players looked unfriendly. “Since you’re courting death, don’t blame us for being merciless. Brothers, kill him first!” The leader gave the order. At this distance, not to mention such a Summoner, even if Tyrant came, he was confident that he could kill the other party in an instant! But at that moment, an invisible figure descended into the crowd. However, Aisha did not attack. It was Lorne. With a flash, he arrived in front of the player and waved his short staff, smashing it at the other party’s head. Pfft— A scene like a watermelon exploding appeared. A ridiculous damage number floated in the sky. -37,100 (Critical) The terrifying power even scattered his soul. The white soul shattered with a crack, and then the player returned to the Emerald City. Lorne’s basic interface also had 6,600 Magic Attack. After triggering the critical hit effect, he dealt 37,000 damage. This was all thanks to the enhancement of the two Mythical equipment and the Legendary title. Otherwise, his damage would have been around 10,000 at most. … Damn!!! The other players were stunned. Their leader was a warrior and had an additional Constitution. He already had over 5,000 health points and had excellent defense, but now, he was directly killed! How was this possible?! The players froze on the spot. Only then did they react and take a few steps back. “He’s Tyrant!” Someone saw through Lorne’s identity. In the current game, only Tyrant could deal such damage. Others could not deal more than 30,000 damage. After all, his class was only a Summoner! “Tyrant, you’re too much!” “Our Domination Guild has never provoked you. What right do you have to snatch our monster?!” “If you’re here to accept a mission in the Emerald City, I advise you to quickly apologize to us. Our Domination Guild is already an honored guest of the elves. If you dare to oppose us, as long as the guild leader says a word, you will never be able to accept a mission in the Emerald City!” Although the members of the Domination Guild were flustered, they also had their own trump cards. Their Domination Guild had been operating in the Emerald City for more than a month and already had a good reputation. They could even meet high-level NPCs. Although this could not be considered a power, words were fearful. As long as they spoke a few bad words to the NPC, they might directly reject this player. Especially that guy, Tyrant! This guy had already killed so many lives. The elves yearned for peace. When they knew that Tyrant was such an adventurer, they would definitely blacklist him. It was because of this confidence that they dared to stay here and confront Tyrant. “Apologize? Why should I apologize? Isn’t snatching monsters a habit of your Domination Guild?” Lorne grinned, then flashed in front of the other party. As he waved his short staff, he smiled, “Now, it’s time for you to have a taste of having your prey snatched away.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios <i>What?!</i>  The player’s scalp turned numb. The voice was like a needle that stabbed into his ear. Before he could react, in the next second, a short staff struck his face. Slash! His head exploded. “Just because you’re from the Domination Guild, it doesn’t matter how I want to kill you. After all, there’s no need to reason with evil people.” Lorne smiled at them, raised his short staff, and continued attacking the others. As the strongest expert with an agility attribute that far exceeded ordinary players, these elite players of the guilds were not worth mentioning. They only needed a short staff to knock everyone’s heads off. <i>Pfft— Pfft— Pfft—</i>  The sound of watermelons exploding sounded. Lorne’s combat strength was still very powerful. The 6,000+attack panel allowed him to ignore any defense. Within two hits, this player would definitely die. “Everyone, run!” The players of the Domination Guild fled. But how could such a speed of escape work against Lorne? He held his short staff and quickly caught up to them at a speed several times that of ordinary players. Then, he used his staff to blow up their heads. Soon, a group of Domination Guild players turned into white light and flew back to Emerald City. “Close combat is indeed the most exciting.” Lorne looked at his staff. It was no longer a staff, but a war hammer. The feeling just now was really good. In the past, when they fought, he would only stand far away and command the pets. It was quite touching to occasionally take action today. Especially when he dealt critical damage, he could clearly sense a force piercing through his arm and pouring out. This delightful feeling was a dream of all boys. However, the Summoner class was really good. After all, it should be a boy’s greatest dream to have an elf like Aisha by his side. “Master, she’s running away!” Aisha reminded him. “Go ahead. Dying in the hands of a princess like you might be the best outcome for her.” “Thank you.” Aisha nodded at Lorne, then held her dagger and blocked the Dark Elf. When it noticed that the person was the princess, the Dark Elf’s scarlet eyes were filled with joy. Finally, she fell into Aisha’s arms in relief. Such a smile touched Aisha. Lorne walked up and placed his hand on the other party. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Dark Elf’s Body!” “Congratulations on obtaining the material: Dark Elf’s Soul!” The system notification. “A complete body?” Lorne was surprised to see the message. The material he obtained this time was actually a complete elf corpse. In the past, the materials he had obtained were all body parts. This time, he had actually obtained a complete monster body. This was indeed unexpected. However, this corpse had been demonized. If he wanted to use her to merge pets in the future, he would have to consider demonization. Especially the monsters of the Order faction. After all, the monsters of the Order faction were all of the light attribute. Merging with the demonized Dark Elf might result in a strong rejection. As Lorne pondered, Aisha looked at him nervously. “Master, can we go to my home first?” Aisha asked. “Are you worried about the safety of the Night Elves?” Lorne touched her head. “Yes.” Aisha nodded gently and said worriedly, “The moment we were driven out of Emerald City, the situation within the race was not optimistic. However, we were lucky to have the help of the Ancient Tree of Life to continue until now. Even so, we rarely let the birth of the Dark Elves happen. Under normal circumstances, when we discover that there are Dark Elves in the race, the law-enforcement elves will hunt them down and bring their Elemental Hearts back to the land of the race to beg for forgiveness.” “Now that there are Dark Elves outside, it means that there has been a huge change in the situation within the race. I want to go back first. Perhaps Mother needs my help now.” Aisha was nervous. Because she was Lorne’s pet, she followed his orders completely. Today was the first time she had made a request, and she was afraid of offending her master. But what Lorne said next made her worry fade. “Since you want to go back, let’s go. In fact, I wanted to go to the Night Elves’ territory first, but you didn’t say anything.” Lorne laughed and walked in one direction. Behind him, Aisha froze. She stared blankly at the figure in front of her, then burst into tears of joy. It was great to meet such a master. Ding! “Congratulations on increasing the affinity between you and your pet (Aisha). Affinity+5,000!” Lorne glanced at the notification on the interface. Indeed, the right way to increase their affinity was to move their hearts. In this case, he was one step closer to reaching ‘Close Friend’. There was still more than 10,000 affinity points left before he and Aisha could be truly intimate. Just the thought of it was thrilling. However, the elf leader, Mayra, had also reminded him not to do anything beyond friendship to Aisha, saying that he had to ensure her bloodline was pure. Lorne frowned at the thought. This was a problem. Although he could be intimate with Aisha, if it would really affect her aptitude and potential, he had to put this matter aside. This was respect for Aisha. Lorne did not want to treat her as a pile of data. In his mind, Aisha was an individual with cognition and self-awareness! … Then, Lorne followed Aisha through the Nature Forest. This Nature Forest was under the jurisdiction of Iron Skull City, but because Iron Skull City and Emerald City were partners, the elves of Emerald City were still free to enter this area. This gave the Night Elves a huge pressure. They did not want to encounter the elves of the Emerald City, because those elves would take the initiative to attack them, and some elves would even specially hunt them. All of this was caused by the detest of the Dragon of Emerald, and in addition to being often attacked by the Dark Elves, hatred was born in their hearts. All of them began to hate the Night Elves, especially the ones who had traitors emerging within them. It was because of this that the Night Elves chose to camp near the northern icy plain. Only this cold and uninhabited place could give them a short period of peace. On the way, Lorne did not speak. He was thinking about something.. If this plan was possible, Cold Desolate Dragon City might be able to obtain a powerful force. “We’re here.” He followed Aisha into the dense forest, then crossed mountains and finally arrived at the Night Elves’ habitat. However, what he saw surprised him. On the ground in front of them, there were only a few very simple wooden houses and even some old tents. Near these wooden houses and tents, there were also some burning bonfires. There was no one around, but the elves were an extremely agile species. They thought that the ground was not safe, so when necessary, they would hide in the surrounding treetops to hide their bodies. Lorne discovered the Night Elves guarding the territory. They were as slender as Aisha and had daggers at their waists. They were vigilantly observing the surrounding environment. Seeing this, Lorne could not help but frown. To be honest, this was completely different from the Elven Kingdom he remembered. In this elven land, there were no decorations or even any beautiful things. There was only defeat and despair. It did not look like an elf land, but more like a defeated army. “This is not the original tribe!” “Before I met Master, the Night Elves were attacked by the power of darkness. The demonized beastmen kept disturbing us. They attacked our territory without regard for their own safety and used their lives to destroy the defense of our territory. Helpless, we could only be forced to leave the territory. We wanted to wait for the demonized beastmen to be cleaned up before returning to the territory. But now, it seems that things are more dangerous than I imagined.” Aisha looked at the camp in front of her, her eyes filled with worry. This also made Lorne curious about the Night Elves. Previously, Iron Skull City had called the players to sweep through the demonized beastmen and was perfectly resolved. However, the situation of the Night Elves did not ease up because of this. They were still wandering outside and were even in a very tragic state. “Aisha, how many people does your tribe have?” Lorne could not help but ask. “At the beginning, there were more than a thousand people who were expelled. However, after these years of demonization and hunting, the population of the race decreased rapidly. When I had an accident, there were only more than 300 Night Elves in the race. Now, there are probably even fewer.” Aisha frowned, feeling very sad. “Do you Night Elves have a gender difference? Almost all the Night Elves I’ve seen are women.” “Yes, but we elves are different from other races. The difference between males and females only affects the class. Only male elves can become warriors, while female elves are mostly assassins and archers. As for the problem of reproduction, we actually use the seeds of the Ancient Tree of Life to reproduce.” Aisha looked at Lorne and explained seriously, “I was born after my mother poured her elemental power into the Ancient Tree of Life’s seed. Because I was produced from my mother’s elemental power, I’m her daughter.” “They can reproduce like this?!” Lorne exclaimed in surprise. The word elf often appeared in the fantasy series. Because they represented purity and perfection, they were loved and praised. However, he did not expect that the birth of elves in this virtual world was so magical. However, this also matched the legend of the elves who were perfect and pure. Lorne liked this setting. “As for why Master has not seen a male Night Elf, it’s because most of the male Night Elves are warriors. Every time there’s a war, they need to immediately rush up and face it head-on. Therefore, the number of male elves decreases very quickly. After facing many battles, our race basically no longer has any male Night Elves.” So tragic? The Night Elves were indeed a race famous for being assassins. After experiencing so many battles, the last ones were almost all female elves. After all, they were assassins and did not have to face a battle head-on, so they held back a lot in the end. This was good news. Lorne liked beautiful elves more. As for the elven warriors, as male compatriots, Lorne could not bring himself to like them. “Let’s go, Master. I think Mother will be very pleased to see me return.” ‘I’m worried that your mother will slash me to death.’ The corners of Lorne’s mouth twitched. Although he was unwilling to face this problem, since he was already here, it was impossible for him to hide. He could only go and take a look. Perhaps he would obtain an unexpected harvest this time. Just as he was about to follow Aisha into the elves’ camp, a team of players suddenly appeared. “People from the Domination Guild? Aren’t they currying favor with the Emerald City? Why are they in the Night Elves’ camp?” Lorne frowned, feeling that something was amiss. … At the same time, in the conference room of the Domination Guild headquarters. The management members of the guild had all passed the virtual projection and gathered in this room. What they were discussing was surprisingly the mission situation regarding the Night Elves. At this moment, a player beside shouted excitedly, “Boss, your plan to kill two birds with one stone is really too brilliant. On the one hand, you curried favor with the Emerald City and obtained a large amount of Elf Race reputation, and on the other hand, you pretended to help the Night Elves and obtained their trust. These so-called high-level NPCs are all under your control, Boss!” A month ago, when the scouts of the guild had just discovered the Emerald City, Unparalleled Domination had immediately sent a large number of players to attack the elves. Before the other players had come into contact with the other races, their Domination Guild had already gained a large amount of elf reputation. Moreover, he had recently discovered the Night Elves. They were a race abandoned by the Emerald City and were also the targets of earning high Elf Reputation Points. This was because the current Dark Elves were basically all from the Night Elves. Therefore, they had been staring at this Night Elf Race. As long as they discovered a demonized elf, they would immediately kill it. Not only that, but Unparalleled Domination also let his subordinates contact the Night Elf Queen to indicate that he would help them and provide support in terms of supplies. The purpose of this was to infiltrate the Night Elves. In addition, he wanted to try to obtain higher-level missions from the hands of the Night Elf Queen. However, later, Unparalleled Domination discovered that the elves of the Night Elves were all extremely beautiful. This made his heart, which he had indulged for many years, stir. Therefore, Unparalleled Domination had another goal of attacking the Night Elves. After all, at dawn today, the system had publicly stated that players and NPCs could have a relationship that surpassed friendship. What he wanted now was to make the Night Elves completely his harem. To be honest, he was sick of women in reality. Now, only the foreign women in the Divine Realm could make him have that desire to conquer again. Because of this, Unparalleled Domination had recently paid a huge price for the Night Elves. “Hehe, Boss, when you capture the Night Elves, can you reward me? I like Night Elves too. Their moon-white skin and silver hair are simply irresistible.” A higher-up of the guild, Brother Pig, said. “That’s easy. There are 200 to 300 Night Elves in this Night Elf Race. If we capture all of them, everyone who contributes in the future will have a chance to obtain a Night Elf beauty!” Unparalleled Domination laughed. In his opinion, this elf tribe was basically his. After all, he already had more than 20,000 reputation points with the Night Elves. As long as he could farm another batch of potions, it would definitely be higher. At that time, his status in the Night Elves would increase. Coupled with the fact that he had arranged for players to hunt the Night Elves everywhere and create pressure for them, the plan to make the Night Elves submit could definitely be easily achieved. “Alright, I won’t chat with you anymore. We have already reached the qualification to talk to the Queen face-to-face. Now, we can accept high-level missions from the Night Elf Queen!” Unparalleled Domination did not chat with these people. Instead, he got someone to put the shared scene in the conference room. Then, he led a few players into the Night Elf Queen’s cabin under the guidance of the elves. The other higher-ups of the guild watched with anticipation. In order to complete this matter during this period of time, their army of more than 20,000 was all moving. Just like that, it took half a month before they finally obtained the qualification to meet the Queen. Although the combat strength of the Night Elves was not very good, they were still high-level NPCs after all. They definitely had a very rare hidden mission! If he could obtain some Platinum equipment rewards from them, he would make a killing. At that time, with the Platinum equipment he had obtained in the Cold Desolate Dragon City, he would definitely have a chance to fight the strongest Fire Beacon Guild. If he was lucky and defeated them in one go, the Domination Guild would be able to become the number one guild in the world! Therefore, everyone focused. However, at this moment, someone pointed at the screen. Just to the left of Unparalleled Domination, another player walked into the camp under the lead of a Night Elf. Everyone was stunned. But soon, someone’s expression changed. “It’s him! It’s Tyrant!” A player recognized the extremely familiar face. The other players also came to a realization and their eyes widened. “Gosh! What the heck is going on? Isn’t Tyrant building the Cold Desolate Dragon City?!” The higher-ups of the Domination Guild panicked. If there was anything they were most afraid of in this game, it was Tyrant. It was not because this kid’s combat strength was astonishing. It was because every time this kid encountered his own people, the ones who would be unlucky would definitely be them. “It will take at least five to six days to reach here from the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Moreover, hasn’t his Cold Desolate Dragon City just been built recently? The construction of the internal building has not even been completed. Why did he leave the city and appear here!” “The situation is not good.” “It’s not bad, it’s bad. Only now do we know that the Night Elf, Aisha, has been by Tyrant’s side. Their relationship must be very intimate. Perhaps she will cause trouble for the guild leader!” “That’s possible!” Thinking of this, the few of them quickly contacted Unparalleled Domination. Unparalleled Domination, who had just entered the wooden house, was also shocked by this news. This was too coincidental! They had just completed the test and obtained the right to meet the Queen. At this critical moment, Tyrant, his nemesis, appeared. This was f*cking unlucky! “Guild Leader, ignore Tyrant for now. Hurry up and go in. Talk to the Queen first and snatch the mission. After obtaining the mission, we can discuss how to deal with Tyrant!” A higher-up of the guild suggested. “Don’t worry, everything is under control.” Unparalleled Domination replied with a deep voice, then quickened his pace and entered the largest wooden house. Although he had encountered Tyrant, this time, he was well prepared. In order to obtain the recognition of the Elven Queen, he had collected a large number of corresponding herbs that could allow them to obtain a large amount of reputation points. Coupled with the friendly communication with the Night Elves, he believed that he could definitely obtain the hidden mission that had not been issued. As for Tyrant? That kid should have come here by accident because of his pet. Therefore, he was definitely not prepared. Moreover, the cost of building the Cold Desolate Dragon City was so high, so this brat definitely could not produce much money to prepare for this hidden mission. To put it bluntly, he was not a competitor at all. In addition, Unparalleled Domination had already thought of a plan to deal with him. After all, elves could not sign a contract with humans. <i>‘After I obtain the mission, I’ll make an issue of this matter. At that time, I’ll see if you die!’</i>  Thinking of this, Unparalleled Domination was abnormally relaxed. He did not take Tyrant seriously at all. As he thought, Lorne followed Aisha into the cabin. The decor of the cabin was very exquisite. After all, this was the residence of the Elf Leader. Therefore, there were exquisite furniture, gorgeous accessories, and bright potted plants in this room. It gave people a simple but abnormally exquisite feeling. In addition to these arrangements, the room was filled with a faint female fragrance. In the hall of the wooden house, several noble elves in exquisite clothes stood on both sides. They were not wearing rough leather armor, but soft gauze. Coupled with their noble aura, it was difficult to look away. Especially Unparalleled Domination, he looked like a lecherous pig. He was immersed in the scene before him and even drooled uncontrollably. Lorne could not help but swallow his saliva, “Damn, if I subdue all these Night Elves, my stamina won’t be enough…” “Gosh, this is too beautiful!” “Are they only maids? If even maids are so beautiful, how powerful is the Elven Queen?!” “It’s so beautiful. It’s like a dream.” “What a perfect appearance and figure!” “Just these screenshots alone will satisfy me for three days!” The higher-ups of the guild who had had enough fun with the real beauties were extremely excited. They widened their eyes and stared greedily at the noble elves in the gauze. “I can’t take it anymore. If I can have these Night Elves, I won’t sleep for ten days!” “To be honest, I’m already desensitized by women in reality.” “Who isn’t? I don’t have any thoughts about those young models from yesterday.” “We have to ask the guild leader to work harder and subdue this Night Elf Race as soon as possible. An elf race in such a special state is rare.” The few of them discussed. … At the same time, in the Night Elf camp. “Honorable Queen Elwyn, I am the Guild Leader of the Domination Guild. I have helped the Night Elves resist the invasion of the enemy many times and have provided you with a large amount of medicinal herbs. I believe that with these sacrifices, you can tell that I am an admirer of the Night Elves. I cannot bear to see the Night Elves who were once glorious being hunted down, nor can I bear to see any of them die. In order to help the Night Elves return to their former glory, I hope to contribute more to the Night Elves.” As soon as Lorne arrived near the hall, Unparalleled Domination immediately triggered a conversation with the seated Queen Elwyn. “Young adventurer, thank you for your help with the Night Elves. However, the crisis that the Night Elves are in now is very special. This is very important. We cannot completely trust you for the time being.” On the throne, Queen Elwyn shook her head, “I understand all of this, but I think that more help might be able to make you believe in my intentions.” Unparalleled Domination had long considered this problem. He opened his bag and took out bundles of herbs. Every herb was special. With the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia, Lorne could clearly identify them. These herbs should be Level 5 or even Level 7. Such herbs were definitely not dug up by him. He had probably spent a high price to buy them in the NPC Shop. As for how much it cost, only Unparalleled Domination knew. No matter what, it was definitely not cheap. After all, these were herbs that exceeded the game progress. The value of each herb would increase by several times. Unparalleled Domination still chose to buy it. He was probably very confident in the mission of the Night Elves, or perhaps he had other goals. That was unknown. Soon, the herbs piled up into a small mountain. As Unparalleled Domination took out the herbs, he turned to look at Lorne, and the corners of his mouth immediately curled into a victorious smile. He felt that he would definitely win. In order to obtain these herbs, the Domination Guild had used 20,000 people to complete various missions in order to obtain the herbs. At the same time, they used their connections and spent tens of millions of alliance dollars to collect the scattered herbs from various sources. This not only required money, but also connections. If one did not know enough people, no matter how many people they had, they would definitely not be able to collect so many herbs. This was because many high-level medicinal herbs were sent by large guilds to feed high-level alchemists. Unless there were special circumstances, they would definitely not be easily sold. It was also because it was so rare that Unparalleled Domination was confident. He did not believe that Tyrant, who had just finished defending the city, could take out such a large number of high-level herbs in such a short time. “Respected warrior, you are indeed the best friend of the Night Elves. These herbs are the resources that the Night Elves need the most. Thank you for your selfless contribution. On behalf of the Night Elves, I thank you sincerely.” Queen Elwyn looked at Unparalleled Domination excitedly and became much more enthusiastic. At the same time, a panel appeared in front of Unparalleled Domination. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the Night Elf Race Reputation, +190!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Night Elf Race Reputation, +120!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Night Elf Race Reputation, +210!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Night Elf Race Reputation, +130!” “…” A series of information appeared on the interface. Just the herbs from just now had helped Unparalleled Domination obtain 35,600 reputation points. Coupled with the previous 20,000, he now had a total of 60,000 reputation points! This total reputation points could definitely be counted on one hand in the current game stage. Especially in the Night Elves, they were even higher than Lorne. Seeing that his reputation points had reached a new height, Unparalleled Domination immediately asked happily, “Then, Queen Elwyn, do you acknowledge my friendship now?” “Of course.” Elwyn nodded and said, “With the resources you gave me, I can confirm that you are definitely one of the best friends of the Night Elves!” “That’s great. Send me the mission now. I’ll immediately arrange for someone to deal with it.” Unparalleled Domination was excited. “Mission?” Queen Elwyn shook her head and smiled, “I think you’re mistaken, adventurer. Although I acknowledge your friendship, this cannot allow you to join this mission. Your current reputation is not enough to obtain our trust.” Pfft— Unparalleled Domination spat out blood. After spending tens of millions of resources, they still had not met the requirements! How was this possible?! “Then, Queen Elwyn, how many reputation points do you need to accept this mission?” Unparalleled Domination suppressed the unhappiness in his heart and asked. Queen Elwyn thought about it and replied, “If we look at your contribution just now, I think you only need 999 more contributions to be qualified to join the plan.” Pfft— Pfft— Pfft— Blood sprayed out three consecutive times. This time, not only did Unparalleled Domination vomit blood. Even the higher-ups of the guild who were watching the live stream far away in the base spat out blood. “Damn, this is ridiculous!” “This Elven Queen looks beautiful, but she’s actually a monster. She actually wants tens of billions of resources!” “Is she crazy? How can someone really fulfill such a difficult condition?” “Don’t be ridiculous. Even if we have money, we can’t be so wasteful. Taking 10 billion alliance dollars to accept a mission, isn’t that crazy?” “It’s probably because the game progress is too early. High-level herbs are very expensive now, but if the player’s Herb Picking Skill reaches Level 5 in two months, they can collect Level 5 herbs. At that time, it will be relatively easy to accumulate these herbs.” “It’s not that easy. The herbs at that time will definitely not be able to exchange for so many reputation points. In my opinion, it’s just that the system doesn’t want us players to accept this mission!” In the base of the Domination Guild, the group of players was about to go crazy. The other party wanted medicinal herbs worth tens of billions. This was an impossible request. This also meant that most of their previous efforts had been in vain. This was a bloody loss! <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “I’m dying of laughter!” Lorne could not help but laugh. Just now, Unparalleled Domination was extremely proud, but in the end, he was like this. Although he could not hear their conversation, he could clearly guess what had happened from their actions and expressions. Clearly, Unparalleled Domination wanted to achieve some kind of plan, but after paying a large amount of herbs, he still did not get what he wanted. Not only that, but the Elven Queen seemed to have made a shocking request. Even the pretentious king, Unparalleled Domination, spat out blood. This story was interesting. Lorne watched happily. But Unparalleled Domination, who heard the laughter, wanted to eat Lorne alive. “Tyrant, don’t be happy too soon!” Unparalleled Domination turned around angrily and glared at Lorne, “If I can’t accept the mission, neither can you. A player like you who came empty-handed should know your place and leave quickly, lest you cause trouble here!” Lorne did not care about his words. He smiled instead, “You don’t have to worry about that.” Seeing his reaction, Unparalleled Domination’s face turned green. “Alright, you like to act cool, right? Tyrant, let’s see how you’re going to act next.” Unparalleled Domination, who was about to leave, suddenly rushed in front of Lorne again and said to Queen Elwyn, “Queen, in addition to giving me these resources, I came here today for another purpose. That is to tell you an extremely important piece of information!” “What information?” Elwyn looked over curiously. “I once saw someone take an elf as a pet in Iron Skull City. Not only that, but this person also did something offensive to that innocent Night Elf!” Although he did not know what trump cards Tyrant had, Unparalleled Domination would not let him do everything in peace. No matter what he prepared, this time, Unparalleled Domination was going to completely destroy all his hopes! <i>Damn Tyrant!</i>  <i>You like to posture in front of me, right?</i>  <i>Let’s see how you can still posture now!</i>  Unparalleled Domination told her everything about Aisha. The corners of his mouth curled into a confident smile. In the hall, all the elves were shocked. The noble elves standing on both sides were all moved. This was because this was a taboo among the elves. The effect it had was even greater than actively throwing oneself into the darkness! “Is that true?” Elwyn’s expression darkened. Seeing such a huge reaction, Unparalleled Domination was overjoyed. He quickly said righteously, “Of course! I can swear with my life that this is true!” “That guy is also an adventurer and often relied on his strength to lord over Iron Skull City and bully other adventurers. My guild even lost tens of thousands of people because of him!” “In my impression, the Night Elves are a race that advocates peace. They will definitely not collude with such treacherous and cunning people!” “Therefore, I can almost confirm that this guy must have used a special method to deceive that kind elf girl!” “It is because of this that after I knew about this as soon as possible, I left to see Her Majesty. I hope that Her Majesty can save that poor elf girl!” Unparalleled Domination said firmly. As he lowered his head to beg, he glanced at Lorne again. The corners of his mouth curled up into a sinister smile, and his eyes were filled with provocation. Lorne was speechless. It had to be said that Unparalleled Domination was not useless to be the leader of a large guild. At the very least, he knew to use other forces to deal with his enemies. This was commendable. However, he did not consider it thoroughly. Since Lorne dared to bring Aisha to the elves’ land, he was clearly not afraid of the consequences. Unfortunately, Unparalleled Domination was too confident. He actually naively thought that he could suppress Lorne with just this matter. He was thinking too much. … “Perhaps what you said might be true, but I can’t just believe your one-sided story.” Elwyn wanted to say that this matter was important and that she had to wait to investigate before making a decision. But before she could finish, Unparalleled Domination took the initiative to speak. “Queen, this is not a one-sided story, because the guy who abducted the elven girl is in this hall!” Unparalleled Domination pointed at Lorne and said angrily, “It’s him! This guy cheated an Elven girl and touched the taboo of the elves. He’s a heinous sinner. Queen, quickly kill him. It’s best if you remove all his equipment and hand them to a righteous adventurer like me. This way, we can provide more help to the Night Elves!” This was a typical display of the aggressor blaming the victim. Of course, Lorne did not care. He walked calmly to the center of the hall. Aisha followed behind him. But the moment Elwyn saw Aisha, she was stunned. “Aisha! So you’re really not dead!” In Iron Skull City, when Lorne was merging with Aisha, the Elven Guard Captain Mayra was also beside him. She had seen Aisha resurrect with her own eyes. Because she needed to give Elwyn an explanation, she finally secretly informed the Queen. As for why she did not let Aisha return? She said that it was a problem with the bond after resurrection, and that the Night Elves were in a mess now and would only face danger if they returned. It was better to stay by the adventurer’s side and meet him after the Night Elves stabilized. Elwyn naturally agreed. But recently, the danger faced by the Night Elves was too great. She wanted Aisha by her side to share some of the pressure. However, as busy as she was, she could not find Aisha. In the end, she could only wait quietly. But who would have thought that this day would come so quickly! “Heavens, it’s really Aisha!” “She’s still alive?!” “How is this possible? Wasn’t she corroded by the demonic aura?” “Strange, there doesn’t seem to be any more demonic aura on her!” The noble elves discussed. “Aisha, come over. Let me see you.” Queen Elwyn called for Aisha. After receiving Lorne’s approval, she ran up and hugged her mother intimately. Elwyn touched her head and sighed. She took out a special crystal and placed it between Aisha’s eyebrows. Finally, the crystal lit up! Seeing this, Elwyn was relieved. To be honest, she was very worried about Aisha’s health. If this adventurer had entered her body, the bloodline in her body would lose its divinity and gradually become ordinary. Fortunately, none of this happened. Aisha was in a very good state now. Not only had her body completely recovered, but the strength in her body seemed to have increased greatly. Perhaps this was the result of her training outside. “Mother, I want to ask you not to make things difficult for Master. Without Master’s help…” Aisha also knew the taboo of the elves. But before she could finish, Elwyn rubbed her head and smiled, “Mother knows what you want to say. Don’t worry, he’s the benefactor of our Night Elves. I won’t do anything to him.” “However, to sign a contract with an elf, he has to complete a test. This is a rule that was left behind ten thousand years ago. Aisha, do you think he can do it?” Elwyn looked at her. Aisha nodded seriously, “I believe in Master. He can definitely do it!” “That’s good.” … This was not good! Below, Unparalleled Domination felt that something was amiss. Tyrant’s elf pet seemed to be extraordinary. Would the Elven Queen let him go? No! Absolutely not! Thinking of this, Unparalleled Domination could not sit still anymore. He quickly shouted, “Queen, this adventurer has violated the elves’ taboo. This is an unforgivable act. Please quickly kill him!” “That’s right, Queen, quickly kill this bastard!” “Queen!” The other players from the Domination Guild also spoke. They all felt that something was wrong. They had to urge the Queen to act quickly. Otherwise, if this continued, she might really forgive Tyrant’s sins. “Silence!” Elwyn’s expression became abnormally serious. The members of the Domination Guild standing in the hall shrank their necks. This Elven Queen still had strength. If they really angered her, they might not be able to leave safely. At this moment, Elwyn said, “I have my own way of dealing with Aisha. I don’t need your advice.” Damn it! Hearing this, Unparalleled Domination knew that Elwyn would not deal with Tyrant. However, it did not matter. If they did not deal with him, someone would naturally deal with him. How could a mere Night Elf Race have the ability to break the taboo! Unparalleled Domination decided to inform the Emerald City about this. He believed that the elves in the Emerald City would settle scores with Tyrant. After all, this was a rule that they had followed for ten thousand years. Tyrant’s actions were clearly against the entire elves. Even if the Night Elves could protect him for a while, they would definitely not be able to protect him forever! “Looks like your plan failed.” Lorne looked at Unparalleled Domination with a smile and said in disdain. Unparalleled Domination’s confidence just now was fully converted into pain like he was slapped in the face. <i>Young man, you’re still too young to fight me!</i>  “Tyrant, don’t be happy too soon!” Unparalleled Domination snorted and said with a dark expression, “Even if you won’t be punished, don’t even think of accepting the mission here. For this mission, our Domination Guild used more than 20,000 people and spent more than a hundred million dollars to reach our current level. You’re alone and not prepared at all. Wanting to accept this mission is simply a dream!” “That might not be true.” Lorne smiled even wider and walked past him. Hearing this, Unparalleled Domination stopped. Since this Tyrant liked to posture, he would watch carefully here. At that time, he would definitely suffer. After all, the Elven Queen’s request was a total of tens of millions of reputation points. This was not a request that current players could fulfill! At that moment, Lorne had triggered the conversation with Elwyn. From the contents of the conversation, he could indeed sense the existence of a very large hidden mission, but the difficulty of accepting it was very high. It was basically impossible for players at this stage. However, Unparalleled Domination had given the other party medicinal herbs! This seemed to be the key to increasing his reputation points. With that in mind, Lorne immediately checked his Dragon’s Treasure Vault to see if there were any herbs that he could obtain. There were many types of herbs inside, and the numbers were different. However, it was impossible to exchange these herbs for 10 million reputation points. Unless he used the Dragon Blood Grass! Dragon Blood Grass was a herb that had grown near the fountain in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Every one of them was very precious. Ever since he had obtained the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia, Lorne had collected all the herbs in the Cold Desolate Dragon City. Because the growth area of the Dragon Blood Grass was very large, the number was also very astonishing. There were a total of 100,000 in Lorne’s treasure vault, and in the warehouse of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, there were nearly 200,000. In “Divine Realm”, any tool or material with the word “dragon” was valuable. Especially the Dragon Blood Grass! Dragon Blood Grass was a special herb that could only be born after being stained with dragon blood and absorbing enough dragon aura. It was very important to all the monsters in the world. Moreover, according to the records of the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia, the Dragon’s Blood Grass seemed to be a key medicinal herb for the Night Elves to transform. Presumably, such a medicinal herb could be exchanged for enough reputation points, right? With that in mind, Lorne took out a Dragon Blood Grass from his bag. He had to test it first. If he could reach the requirement to accept the mission… Lorne would try to exchange it and discuss other conditions with the Queen. “I thought you were prepared. This medicinal herb is not even enough to cause a ripple on the lake surface.” Unparalleled Domination could not help but laugh. The other lackeys also mocked. But as they were rejoicing, something unexpected happened. All the Night Elves in the hall widened their eyes and stared at the herb in Lorne’s hand. The greed in their eyes could not be hidden. Elwyn could not help but leave the throne and come to Lorne’s side. “Is this the legendary Dragon Blood Grass?!” The Night Elf Queen had never seen such a treasure, but the familiar aura and the natural feeling made her believe in her judgment. This was the Dragon Blood Grass that the Night Elves had not found in many years! Holding the herb, Elwyn was very excited, almost forgetting herself. Lorne took the opportunity to size up the Elven Queen. Her figure and appearance were impeccable. The face that resembled Aisha was less youthful and more mature. Although she was old, elves were a long-lived race. Now, she looked like a young girl and even had a different style. At the same time, the system notification sounded. Ding! “Congratulations on giving an extremely precious [Dragon Blood Grass] to the Night Elf Queen, Elwyn. Reward: Night Elf Reputation+1,000!” “So many?!” Lorne could not help but be shocked. One Dragon Blood Grass could actually be exchanged for 1,000 reputation points, and he had a total of 100,000 Dragon Blood Grass on him. Wouldn’t he be able to obtain 100 million reputation points? Thinking of this, Lorne could not help but feel excited. Looking at the noble elves in the room, he suddenly had a feeling that he wanted to have everyone. Damn, if he took these Night Elves into his harem, the game “Divine Realm” would be fun. It would be like heaven on earth, right? “Mr. Tyrant, do you still have such herbs?” Elwyn quickly asked. “Of course, the Dragon Blood Grass is a specialty of our Cold Desolate Dragon City.” “Cold Desolate Dragon City?” Elwyn seemed to have heard of this name, but she did not remember where it came from. Therefore, she looked at him seriously and said, “Can Mr. Tyrant please introduce us to the City Lord of the Cold Desolate Dragon City? We want to buy a batch of Dragon Blood Grass. We can pay any price.” “Any price?” Lorne frowned, then pointed at the noble elves and said, “Even if the price is them?” “Adventurer! Don’t go overboard!” “You’d better watch your mouth!” “If not for Aisha, you would already be dead!” The noble elves standing on both sides were furious and shouted. Unparalleled Domination’s eyes lit up. They were going to fight! Very good! This was it! It would be best if they turned the world upside down and killed Tyrant. Then, he would take away Tyrant’s equipment. At that time, no one would be able to stop the Domination Guild from advancing. At this moment, everyone looked at Elwyn. As long as she gave the order, this adventurer in front of them would be torn to pieces instantly! However, the following situation was far beyond everyone’s expectations. After a moment of silence, Elwyn nodded, “If you only need their combat strength, I can agree to this request, provided that you don’t force their will!” “Queen!” Hearing this, the elves were stunned. But soon, they convinced themselves. To the Night Elves, Dragon Blood Grass was a very important herb, especially to the current Night Elves. The purchase of this batch of Dragon Blood Grass might directly affect whether the race could continue living. After thinking about these factors, they decided to sacrifice themselves for the race. But as the atmosphere turned serious, Lorne laughed, “Sorry, I was just joking with you.” “You shouldn’t be joking!” Elwyn’s expression remained dark. The decision she had made just now was built on the sacrifice of her people. This was an extremely heavy choice for her, and it was definitely not a joke. “Sorry, I was rude. As compensation, I’m willing to give you a sufficient discount on the Dragon Blood Grass deal,” Lorne smiled as he replied. “How can a weak adventurer like you have so much authority?” Elwyn shook her head in disbelief. However, Aisha came to her side and spoke softly. Elwyn’s eyes lit up. It turned out that this adventurer was the City Lord of Cold Desolate Dragon City! Didn’t that mean that he had enough Dragon Blood Grass? This was unbelievable. An adventurer who did not even reach the Earth Realm actually owned a large city and even had an extremely rare herb like the Dragon Blood Grass! Elwyn was shocked and was about to discuss what to do with Lorne when she stopped and looked up at the members of the Domination Guild, “Adventurers, we have something important to discuss. Please leave for a moment!” Pfft— Unparalleled Domination almost spat out blood. When he gave them the herbs just now, they were called respected warriors. Now that Tyrant, this scoundrel, had arrived, they had actually become adventurers and were directly chased out! Damn, their attitude changed faster than flipping a book! “Damn, what did this Tyrant do?” “I knew it. As long as we encounter Tyrant, nothing good will happen!” “It should be the herb in Tyrant’s hand!” “I think so too. Ever since Tyrant took out the herbs, Queen Elwyn’s attitude changed greatly.” “Damn, now that bastard Tyrant has it easy. There are so many Night Elves here. This kid is going to take them all.” “Take them down my ass! Elwyn is mine! Moreover, Tyrant only has a little more opportunity to interact with her. Who says that he will definitely be able to subdue Elwyn! If you continue talking nonsense, I’ll kill you!” Unparalleled Domination’s expression distorted. Although he left unwillingly this time, it did not affect his dream of conquering the Night Elves. As for Tyrant? That guy had only benefited from the fast progress of the game. However, that guy was only one person after all. As long as they planned well, they believed that they could quickly catch up to the other party. At that time, they would kill Tyrant, snatch his elf pet, and also completely trample him under their feet! The lackey beside him asked, “Boss, where are we going now? Are we still collecting herbs?” “Collect my ass!” Unparalleled Domination walked out of the camp without looking back, and he said in a low voice, “Since we can’t do it openly, we’ll go in the dark. Right now, all the major forces are searching for the Night Elves. You guys tell the people of the Netherworld Guild the location of the Night Elves. As for the few of us? Go to the Emerald City now and find an opportunity to see the Dragon of Emerald to announce the news of Tyrant contracting an elf. At that time, I want to see how the Night Elves will side with that scoundrel!” “Alright, Boss. I’ll inform the Netherworld Guild now. As for meeting the Dragon of Emerald, I reckon there will be a chance recently. Our Elite Team Three is doing a mission. After completing it, we will have a chance to enter the Elven Holy Temple and meet the Dragon of Emerald.” “Very good. Let them hurry up.” “Yes!” At the Night Elves’ camp. “I didn’t expect you to build your own city at such a young age. It’s unexpected. Please forgive me for my offense just now. I’m very sorry.” Elwyn apologized respectfully. “It’s okay, I was too rash.” Lorne smiled politely. “Just now, Mr. Tyrant said that he can trade the Dragon Blood Grass with us. Is this true?” “Of course.” “How many Dragon Blood Grass do you have now?” Elwyn asked. Lorne did not answer directly. Instead, he asked, “Can I ask how much Dragon Blood Grass you need first?” “A lot. It might take tens of thousands.” Elwyn frowned and explained in a low voice, “Perhaps you don’t know the meaning of the Dragon Blood Grass to us Night Elves. Dragon Blood Grass is a rare herb that will only grow after the blood of dragons is watered and the dragon aura is absorbed. In a very ancient era, our Night Elves were a race that specialized in following the Dragon of Darkness. The Dragon of Darkness used the dragon blood to help us raise our aptitude, giving us the potential to become Phantom Assassins.” “Unfortunately, thousands of years ago, the Dragon of Darkness, Theodore, joined the Dark Abyss, causing the Night Elves to be implicated. Their status began to waver. Other elves could more or less obtain the favor of the Dragon of Emerald, but the Night Elves had never received kindness.” “Just like that, as time passed, fewer and fewer Night Elves in our race had the aptitude to be Phantom Assassins. Right now, the Night Elves are facing a life and death threat. We urgently hope to have enough Phantom Assassins. Only then can we survive this calamity.” “The Dragon Blood Grass is the key to increasing our aptitude. Without the help of the Dragon God, only the Dragon Blood Grass can allow my people to evolve into Phantom Assassins.” “As for the number of Dragon Blood Grass I want, it’s actually related to the number of Phantom Assassins created. I need about 1,000 Dragon Blood Grass to nurture a Rank One Phantom Assassin. If I still want to raise it later, I need more Dragon Blood Grass.” “According to my calculations, if we want all 300 Night Elves to survive, we need at least 20 Rank One Phantom Assassins and a few Rank Two Phantom Assassins. To fulfill this requirement, we need at least tens of thousands of stalks of Dragon Blood Grass.” At this point, Elwyn sighed and looked at Lorne with a bitter smile, “I know that tens of thousands of Dragon Blood Grass are like a dream, but I hope that Mr. Tyrant can generously sell us the ones you currently have. Even if there are only a few hundred, it will be very useful to the current tribe.” <i>Hundreds of them?</i>  Lorne did not know whether to laugh or cry. This Elven Queen looked down on him, the City Lord of the Cold Desolate Dragon City, too much. How could a few hundred Dragon Blood Grass be considered resources? In the beginning, he had planned to donate tens of thousands of them for free. But now, it seemed that free donation was not a good plan. With that in mind, Lorne said, “If you only need these Dragon Blood Grass, I can give you an answer now. Cold Desolate Dragon City can fulfill your request.” Before Lorne could finish, the Night Elves in the room were shocked. It could be achieved? He said he could provide it? Did he really have tens of thousands of Dragon Blood Grass? How was this possible?! The Night Elves discussed it and found it unbelievable. Even Elwyn froze on the spot. When she recovered, she quickly asked, “Is what you said true? Does Cold Desolate Dragon City really have tens of thousands of Dragon Blood Grass?!” “Of course.” Lorne nodded and continued, “However, the Dragon Blood Grass is a high-level rare herb. Even the stockpile of the Cold Desolate Dragon City is not high. It’s impossible for me to give you these herbs for no reason. To be honest, if not for Aisha, I would not have chosen to discuss this with you. However, since there’s such a relationship, I can’t be too heartless. How about this, Queen Elwyn? If you really want these Dragon Blood Grass, I can give them to you, and I’ll sponsor you for free. However, the premise is that you have to agree to a request of mine.” “Request? What request?” Elwyn looked at him questioningly. “I need you to join the Cold Desolate Dragon City. On the account of your affiliation, the Cold Desolate Dragon City will give you the Dragon Blood Grass for free. How about it?” Lorne asked. “This…” Elwyn hesitated for a moment, then sighed helplessly, “Ever since we lost the protection of the Dragon of Darkness, our Night Elves have completely become an abandoned race and have been bullied in the Elven Kingdom. Our race has also suffered countless indifference and humiliation, and we have even been hunted by other elves. To be honest, there’s nothing we can’t give up now.” “I’m glad you’re willing to accept us, but unfortunately, during our escape, we have removed the dark aura suppressed in our bodies many times and relied on the power of darkness to survive until today.” “We have long been corroded by the dark power. Soon, we will be the minions of the darkness and lose ourselves.” “Although I really want to agree to your invitation, we no longer have this right. Mr. Tyrant, thank you very much.” As Elwyn spoke, she suddenly could not help but cough. A scarlet color suddenly appeared in her eyes, making her look abnormally ferocious. Lorne frowned upon seeing this. The situation was indeed not optimistic. This Night Elf Queen had long been poisoned deeply. The power of darkness had been corroding her body. If this continued, it would not be long before she completely degenerated into a Dark Elf. Noticing Lorne’s gaze, Elwyn smiled bitterly, “As you can see, the power of darkness can no longer be suppressed in my body, but there are still countless people chasing after us in the outside world. Perhaps it won’t be long before we can no longer remain rational.” With that, the other elves lowered their heads. In their eyes, a blood-colored light also appeared. This was the result of being corroded by the dark power, and it was already irresistible. It could only slow down the spreading speed. Originally, they hated the Dark Elves very much, but due to the external pressure, they were forced to walk on the edge of the darkness and were even about to fall into it. Lorne did not want to see these beautiful elves become Dark Elves who only knew how to kill, so he asked, “There should be a way to expel this dark power, right?” “Is it possible to expel the dark power?” Elwyn muttered to herself as rich black energy spread from her body. Her eyes were extremely scarlet, and her fingers could not help but dry up like dried corpses that had been completely weathered. “Mother!” Aisha ran up and quickly transferred her energy. However, she was rejected. “It’s okay, Aisha. This dark energy can’t threaten my life for the time being, but you have to remember that if you want to lead the race in the future, you cannot let any elf touch this evil energy again. Otherwise, you will also completely fall to the dark side.” Elwyn was not too emotional. Even death was an understatement to her. Regardless, she still wanted to place her hopes on Lorne. With that in mind, she looked at Lorne and said, “Adventurer, now that more than two hundred of the Night Elves have been corroded by the power of darkness, these people are not qualified to accept your invitation. However, the remaining hundred or so young Night Elves have not been infected. Therefore, I promise you on their behalf that these hundred or so people will all join the Cold Desolate Dragon City. I hope you can bring them to the path of light.” Ding! “Game Announcement: The leader of the Night Elves, Elwyn, has sent you a request: Save the Night Elves!” “Mission Description: As an abandoned race, the Night Elves are facing a life and death situation. Leader Elwyn, who cannot see hope, has decided to let the remaining Night Elves join the Cold Desolate Dragon City and seek protection!” “Mission Requirement: Protect their safety and maintain their dignity. You will receive the approval of all the Night Elves.” A system notification appeared. Looking at the reluctant mother and daughter in front of him, Lorne made a decision. He first accepted this mission, then looked at Elwyn and said seriously, “If there’s a way to expel the dark power, perhaps I can give it a try. As for the Night Elves, I want all of you to survive. Cold Desolate Dragon City lacks strength, and you are assassins that I value.” “Adventurer…” Elwyn stared blankly at Lorne for a while, then said, “In that case, I’ll leave it to you. Originally, this mission had a very high requirement, but we don’t have time to wait anymore. Moreover, I completely trust you, Mr. Tyrant. You can definitely complete this mission.” “In fact, we elves can rely on ourselves to drive out the dark energy, because we are elemental bodies and have a very high resistance to dark power. However, because we have tacitly approved or even borrowed the power of darkness, this power has already taken root in our bodies. Just our own strength is no longer enough to drive it out.” “However, we still have the Ancient Tree of Life. It has the purest life essence. As long as we have the help of this energy, we can expel the corrosion on our bodies and recover our pure elemental bodies.” “However, our Ancient Tree of Life has already begun to wither because it has been transporting too much energy and the Water of Life that it has been watered with is insufficient. It can no longer treat any elf unless you can bring the Water of Life and the Soil of Life to quickly recover the tree’s vitality.” Elwyn explained seriously to Lorne. Ding! “Would you like to accept the hidden mission: [Save the Ancient Tree of Life]?” Another mission appeared. Without thinking, Lorne agreed. Even if it was for Aisha, he had to complete this mission, because the quest for the second chapter of the ‘Holy Angel’s Resurrection’ was to rely on the Ancient Tree of Life to help Aisha obtain a complete Elemental Body. Perhaps because of Lorne’s synthesis or other factors, the current Aisha did not have a complete elemental body. Such a body definitely did not meet the requirements of the Holy Angel Gabriel, which was why such a mission appeared. “Thank you for your generous help, Mr. Tyrant. The Water of Life is near the Moon’s Reflection Lake. Every evening, for ten minutes, the center of the Moon’s Reflection Lake will absorb the light of the stars and produce the Water of Life.” “However, the Water of Life needs to be collected by elves, and there are powerful monsters around. I think you need some help. How about this, Mr. Tyrant? I’ll send a powerful elf team to accompany you to the Moon’s Reflection Lake to collect the Water of Life.” Elwyn said seriously. “Are there many monsters in the Moon’s Reflection Lake?” Lorne did not want to bring too many people. After all, more people affected his speed. However, Elwyn looked at him very seriously and said, “Many. The Water of Life is extraordinary for elves. When the Water of Life is condensed, the energy gathered will have the effect of increasing the strength of many monsters, so they will definitely gather in the lake. At that time, you will face the attacks of dozens, or even hundreds of powerful monsters.” “In addition, the Water of Life can only be collected by pure elves, so we who are infected cannot help you. The strength of those young elves is very limited, so this team might have to lose 80% of its members to collect enough Water of Life.” With that, Elwyn sighed again. For the sake of these infected elves, letting those children rush into the dangerous Moon’s Reflection Lake was practically suicide. This filled Elwyn with guilt. However, they had to go. After all, Mr. Tyrant was willing to help them like this. How could they give up? Other than fighting once, there seemed to be no other choice. “I see.” Lorne pondered and asked, “If the reason for sending so many young elves to participate in the operation is that their strength is limited, then what if they are powerful? Will they only need one or two elves to complete the harvest of the Water of Life?” “Of course, but we can’t raise their strength in the short term. Other than using numbers to fill the gap, there’s no other way.” Elwyn shook her head. If she could do that, how could she make such a suggestion? As she sighed to herself, Lorne took out a new herb and said, “What if we use this?” “Dragon Blood Grass?!” Elwyn’s eyes lit up, and she said in surprise, “Does Mr. Tyrant have enough Dragon Blood Grass?” “There are still more than ten thousand stalks,” Lorne said casually. “That’s great!” Elwyn hugged Lorne happily. She was so excited. Lorne, on the other hand, felt a little satisfied. ‘Young’ was not as satisfying as ‘Voluptuous’, especially the feeling brought about by such a beautiful elf. “With these Dragon Blood Grass, we can immediately raise a few powerful Phantom Assassins. The crisis of the race can be temporarily resolved.” Elwyn smiled, then looked at Lorne and said, “It will take a few hours to raise the elves. Please wait a moment.” “Yes, no problem.” Lorne nodded and checked the time. It was already night time, and he could go offline to rest. He was indeed tired from running for several days. After going offline, Lorne sent the sisters a message to gather. Today, after wandering around the Night Elves’ camp for a day, there were seductive Night Elves everywhere. Every one of them had their own characteristics, and every one of them was too perfect. Perhaps this was what an elf was. Elves were the most perfect race in the world, especially in terms of appearance. Lorne looked on helplessly. He could not do that in the game for the time being. He could only return to reality and enjoy it. Jessica and Nina arrived quickly, and the three of them fought again. Lorne was physically strong, and it was easy for him to exercise for a few hours. However, he could not withstand the continuous bombardment of the sisters, especially Nina. Although she was young, he did not know if she had deliberately read the learning materials in the past two days, but there were many more tricks, which made it difficult for Lorne to hold on. In the end, he almost surrendered. Fortunately, Little Lorne was hard enough to pull through. Therefore, the two sisters begged for mercy. At dawn, the two sisters limped back to their house. In his villa, Lorne checked the information in the game. It could be seen that the discussion on the forum was abnormally crazy. As “Divine Realm” opened the intimate interaction system, the players discussed their goals. After all, the female NPCs in the game were as beautiful as they could be. Most importantly, they were exotic. From the contents of everyone’s discussion, it could be seen that the most popular creature currently was the perfect creature in the world—Elf. It was the greatest dream of the players. Then, there were the feline girls, fox girls, and other beastmen NPCs. Due to the fact that the beastmen had some attributes of ‘wild beasts’, such as cat ears and fox tails, it triggered the players’ curiosity, especially the gentle feeling of the feline girls, which made countless players go crazy. Of course, this was not the reason why the players were the craziest. What made the players crazy was the difficulty of conquering beautiful women. In reality, if one wanted to conquer a beauty with 90 points, they had to be handsome and rich enough, especially rich. Otherwise, the probability was almost zero. As for things like ‘money’, if one did not have it when they were born, then when they grew up, they would definitely not have much. At least 99% of people were like this. Therefore, the boys in reality did not dare to have such extravagant hopes. However, it was different in the game. Although it was difficult to obtain the affinity of a close friend, it was not impossible. Even if one was a rookie player, as long as one was willing to continuously tackle an NPC, when the requirements of this NPC were not that high, the success rate would be great. As long as one was willing to spend time, they would definitely succeed in the future. Therefore, these players went crazy, and even the rich tycoons went crazy. After all, they were already sick of playing with beautiful women in reality, and beautiful women like elves and feline girls who had the flavor of the other world could give them a great feeling. Therefore, this was basically an era of craziness. Lorne did a cursory inspection and found that some of the discussions were very interesting. Especially the topic regarding the demoness. “Demoness?” An idea suddenly occurred to Lorne. He finally knew what he had forgotten. When he had obtained the [Monster Merging Simulator], in addition to becoming stronger, he had a very secret idea. However, at that time, he was anxious to become stronger and obtain money, so he did not investigate this idea. When he saw the word demoness, he was enlightened! Indeed! It was the demoness! At that time, he was thinking about the demoness! Unfortunately, his previous thoughts were not clear enough, so he had been very vague. But now, he understood everything. What he wanted to do was actually use his synthesis ability to create a demoness that did not exist in this world but often appeared in the fantasy world! For example, the Spider Lady! For example, Centaur! For example, Snake Girl! These were all monsters. Think about it, if any monster beside you could be feminine, what would it be like? Cat Girl, Wolf Girl, Spider Girl, Dragon Girl, etc. The synthesized demoness was different from the beastmen in the game. Moreover, after merging, Lorne could immediately have a high affinity with the other party, and the development of their relationship was far faster than other players. What did this mean? It meant that Lorne would soon have a chance to interact intimately with the demoness! <i>Heavens!</i>  How could he have forgotten about this! Lorne felt regret. Of course, in the past, he had always treated “Divine Realm” as a money-making tool. However, ever since he had sex with Jessica and triggered his most primal desires, he could not stop himself. Perhaps because of materialization, or because he had been in the game for too long, he could not distinguish reality from virtual reality, causing him to bring whatever he wanted in the game to reality. Right now, he was not shy about matters between the two sexes. He was even a little enthusiastic. This was the aftereffect of letting go too much. Of course, Lorne had high expectations of women. He would never have sex with girls who were not pure, especially after he was famous and rich. “I can create a demoness myself and slowly raise it. This feels even better than the NPCs in the game!” “Very good. Let me think, how do I set up the Demoness’ Monster Formula?” After confirming the direction, Lorne began to study the synthesis of various demonesses. He decided that in the future, his pets not only had to have powerful combat strength, but also had to have enough attractiveness. Every one of them had to have their own personality. He would abandon undead monsters like Small Artillery and replace them with demonesses. As for Little Spider? Should he test it and create a Spider Lady? The next day, Lorne entered the game early. Today, he had to carry out the mission of the Water of Life. This mission should be very simple. However, the subsequent missions regarding the Soil of Life were more troublesome. He did not think too much about it for the time being. He had to deal with the current mission first. Lorne appeared in the Night Elves’ camp. It could be seen that many Night Elves had gathered in the camp. They were all very young and belonged to the elves. There were about a hundred people. Most of them were adult elves who had been corroded by the power of darkness. These elves did not dare to get too close to the young elves, because the dark aura spreading out might affect them, so these elves could only stand far away and watch. Aisha accompanied Elwyn and watched a few newly evolved Phantom Assassins fight. When they noticed Lorne’s arrival, the two were excited. “Master.” “Mr. Tyrant.” Aisha hugged Lorne’s arm, enjoying the warmth of his body. Elwyn looked at him excitedly and said, “Look, Mr. Tyrant. Those children are the Phantom Assassins trained with the Dragon Blood Grass yesterday. One of them has even reached Rank Two.” “The Night Elves are indeed natural warriors, but I’m curious. How are the levels of the Phantom Assassins divided?” Lorne asked curiously. There was no relevant information on Aisha’s interface. Therefore, he did not know what stage Aisha was at. It should not be Rank One. After all, it was so powerful. If even Rank One Phantom Assassins were so powerful, then wouldn’t the elf who had evolved to Rank Two Phantom Assassin have heaven-defying aptitude? “It’s actually very easy to classify. Rank One to Rank Five Phantom Assassins are all Epic Assassins, while Aisha is a Legendary Assassin. She’s the Phantom Assassin with the highest potential. There’s no Phantom Assassin who’s more talented than her.” Elwyn explained. Lorne nodded. According to this standard, Aisha’s talent was really powerful. This was also in line with her current strength. After all, her current strength was already very heaven-defying. If this was not her strongest potential, then it was too ridiculous. “Since we’ve completed the evolution, let’s go.” Without hesitation, Lorne led the team out of the Night Elves’ camp. There were four elves accompanying him this time. Three Rank One Phantom Assassins and one Rank Two Phantom Assassin. The elves had an inexplicable good impression of Lorne, because they knew that it was because of his help that they had today. Therefore, in their hearts, Lorne was their benefactor, and they listened to his commands in the following actions. Lorne liked this team environment. With the company of the entire team of beautiful elves, everyone chatted and laughed. It was wonderful. However, their race was too monotonous. They were all Night Elves and lacked diversity. Speaking of racial diversity, Lorne could not help but think of the demoness he had thought about last night. He had edited several proposals of the demoness, including the [Spider Lady] synthesis based on ‘Little Spider’. The main material was Little Spider, the ‘Undead Spider Mother’. The additional material was the Dark Elf corpse that he had obtained not long ago. If the two were combined, he would definitely obtain a good pet. After all, the attributes of the two matched very well, and monsters like the Spider Lady were not that strange. In many games, and even in legends and myths, there were figures of such monsters. Therefore, Lorne felt that the success rate would be very high. However, he was still worried about the success rate. If he failed, the materials lost would be a little precious. After all, it was a complete Dark Elf corpse. This was definitely a very rare material. After all, all he had obtained in the past were only body parts. With that in mind, Lorne temporarily put aside his plan. He had to experiment with other materials first. After the experiment was successful, he would carry out this expectant synthesis plan. Then, everyone arrived at their destination. However, because it was in the afternoon, he still had to wait for a while. It had to be late at night before the Moon’s Reflection Lake could absorb the light of the stars and condense the Water of Life. Lorne was in no hurry. He waited quietly. … Four hours passed. At this moment, the sky was already pitch-black. The stars in the sky shimmered with their own light. Lorne finally moved. He led the five elves into the vicinity of the Moon’s Reflection Lake. There was a light screen here, the door to a special dungeon. It would only be opened at a specific time. If not for the fact that he thought of this mission, even if Lorne farmed monsters nearby, he would not have discovered this hidden special dungeon. “Ding! You have entered a special dungeon—[Moon’s Reflection Lake]!” ———— Dungeon: [Moon’s Reflection Lake] Quality: ??? Time limit: 30 minutes Description: This lake has a magical power. It can condense the light of the stars in the sky at a special time to form the Water of Life. It is the place that elves like to go to. ———— There was indeed the Water of Life. However, this dungeon had a time limit. The longest time was 30 minutes, but the first 20 minutes were when the light gathered. Only in the last 10 minutes could he collect the Water of Life. As for what he had to do in the first 20 minutes? Of course, it was to snatch a good spot. When monsters approached the core area, they could obtain a lot of energy. If the elves were close enough, they could use special techniques to obtain the special Water of Life. What Lorne had to do now was snatch enough space to get close. “Mr. Tyrant, the rock ox fish in the water has hard rock skin. The steel needle dolphin beside it will spew out needle-like spikes, and it’s very difficult to deal with. How should we act now?” Corrie, a Rank Two Phantom Assassin, looked at Lorne with her large eyes. “The monsters in the water are indeed difficult to deal with.” Lorne rubbed his chin. In fact, before setting off, he had obtained the mission tool that Elwyn had given him, the Water Condensing Pearl. This tool could allow him to stand on the water. However, the monsters could go to the bottom of the lake. In this case, they were not easy to deal with. From the looks of it, he could only instantly kill the other party. They could also cripple the other party with explosive damage, so that they would not dare to harass the elves to collect the Water of Life. “Aisha, are you confident?” Lorne looked at Aisha beside him. She was the main force in this battle. Only she had the ability to instantly kill these Boss-level monsters. “I do!” Aisha did not like to talk, but as long as it was Lorne’s request, she would agree firmly. “Don’t be so serious, Aisha. Just do your best. These Bosses are still very stressful for you.” Lorne touched her head. “There’s no need to kill them. Crippling them will give you the same effect.” “Yes, Aisha will remember.” Feeling the gentleness from Lorne, Aisha buried her head shyly, like a naive and adorable little girl. Then, Aisha pulled out the dagger at her waist. Her gem-like eyes were filled with determination. Without saying anything, she stepped into the water and rushed towards the center of the lake. “Don’t join the battle first. Leave everything to Aisha. When we can collect the Water of Life, I’ll escort you there.” “Yes, Mr. Tyrant,” the elves nodded. Lorne raised his staff and summoned his other pet. “Rimuru, follow me.” With that, Lorne rushed towards the center of the lake. Rimuru’s quality was not high as a mere Bronze-Grade Boss, but it had powerful healing abilities. It could provide excellent endurance in battle and help Lorne block damage. This little guy’s main body was a slime. It could not enter the water, or else there was a risk of being diluted. However, because of a special tool, it was lucky to stand on the lake. It was also because it had discovered this effect that Rimuru was abnormally excited after coming out. Ignoring the slime, Lorne focused on Aisha. He used the Identification Skill to check the monster’s attributes. ———— [Rock Ox Fish] Grade: Silver Boss Level: 39 Health: 1.05 million / 1.05 million Defense: 7,500 Skill: … Description: A fish-type monster with demon horns. Its entire body is covered by hard rocks and has powerful defense. ———— This monster’s level was not high, but its attributes were really powerful. With 7,500 defense attributes and the enhancement of the Rock Armor, it also had more than 10,000 defense points. It was almost impossible to kill such a monster in seconds. However, Lorne did not want to kill it. As long as Aisha defeated these Bosses, the next ten minutes would be safe. In an instant, Aisha, who was moving quickly, had already arrived near the other party. The dagger in her hand immediately released a hexagram and entered combat. As Aisha attacked, Lorne added his low-level amplification skill to her. Although the quality of the skill was not high, it could increase the damage of attacks by 2%. It could also produce an incomparably huge amplification effect on Aisha. Swish! Swish! The Boss Rock Ox Fish jumped out of the water and used its demon horns to try and deal a fatal blow to Aisha. However, the moment Aisha stepped on the water, she leaped up. Her slender figure brushed past the other party in the air. At the same time, the dagger in her hand danced quickly, and countless saber lights and cold lights poured towards the fish’s abdomen. -17,500! -187,000 (Critical) -17,500! -191,000 (Critical) -29,200! -29,200! -29,200! The Rock Ox Fish dived into the water, leaving a series of high damage numbers in the air. Aisha dealt the damage mercilessly, then gracefully landed on the water. The dagger in her hand was hidden behind her arm, as if she had not done anything dangerous. However, in fact, within two seconds of attacking, Aisha dealt a terrifying 14 consecutive hits! Especially the first four attacks, she used the effect of leaving invisibility to definitely deal critical hits and skills to increase her basic attack speed. In less than a second, she dealt four damage, two of which were critical hits. Then, she instantly used the combo skill. Fortunately, ten combo attacks appeared, finally dealing 292,000 damage. In just an instant, the Stone Ox Fish lost 600,000 health points! She was only 40% away from killing a Level 39 Silver Boss. Moreover, it was a Boss with high defense. This strength was simply ridiculously powerful. The elven girls standing on the shore gaped. Heavens, what did they just see? Aisha had almost instantly killed such a powerful Boss! This was too crazy! The elven girls were stunned. They thought that as Phantom Assassins, they were already very powerful. In the end, compared to Aisha, there was a huge difference. This was beyond their imagination. “Aisha is becoming more and more savage!” Lorne smiled. To be honest, he was also very surprised by the scene before him. Who would have thought that just Level 32 Aisha could instantly deal 600,000 damage! This was indeed too shocking. However, on second thought, it was normal. After all, Lorne had two Mythical equipment on him, and Aisha had Demigod equipment on her. In addition, she was a Legendary Phantom Assassin. It made sense that she could deal such damage. This time, the rock ox fish would not dare to approach the center of the lake, right? While Lorne was thinking, Aisha attacked again. There were many monsters around. There were several Boss-level monsters, each huge and with astonishing attributes. Fortunately, these Bosses were only around Level 40. They could only have 20% damage reduction against Aisha. This level suppression was not fatal, and compared to previous battles, it was nothing. Aisha was also immersed in the scene of being able to deal full damage. The sharp blades in her hand danced, and she quickly turned and jumped, launching a waltz from the center of the lake. Pfft— Pfft— Pfft— Countless saber beams flew out and landed on the monsters. If it was only a normal attack, it would be acceptable. However, once the critical hit effect appeared, they would be completely flustered, because a single critical hit would take away nearly 200,000 health points. Even a Boss with a million health points could not withstand such a terrifying attack. Just like that, under Aisha’s crazy attacks, the Boss that had appeared now shrank into the water. Although they could not kill any Boss, it made the health of these monsters drop to a dangerous level. Although their recovery was very strong, when they thought of how they were almost killed, they did not dare to come to the water again. Aisha held a pair of daggers and stood quietly in the center of the lake. As long as any monster showed its head, it would be attacked immediately. Just like that, the surface of the lake was calm for twenty minutes. The time to condense the Water of Life had finally arrived. “Go collect the Water of Life.” “Yes, Mr. Tyrant.” After receiving the order, the elves ran towards the center of the lake. After reaching the designated location, their bodies emitted a silver light, and energy was gathered. Holding her dagger, Aisha stood nearby, wary of the monsters at the bottom of the lake. These monsters had been subdued by the pair of daggers in the past twenty minutes. They could only hide underwater and did not dare to appear. Therefore, the elves quickly obtained the Water of Life they wanted. However, just as they were about to leave, a huge wave suddenly appeared on the lake, as if something incomparably huge was about to rush out. Lorne quickly let the elves retreat to the shore. When the elves left the center, an incomparably huge monster appeared. Its ten-meter-long head emerged from the water, and its demon horns were abnormally hideous. “Damn, the final Boss has appeared!” Lorne did not retreat. This monster was clearly the largest Boss in the dungeon. He wondered if he would receive more rewards after killing it. With that in mind, Lorne waved his staff again, this time summoning all his pets. This Boss was astonishingly large. It was like a python, but it had a hideous bull head. Its terrifying horns were abnormally huge. At this moment, it was staring at Aisha with its huge blood-red eyes. ———— [Bull Python Leader] Grade: Silver Boss Level: 45 Health: 1.8 million Defense: 9,900 Skill: … Introduction: A huge bull python leader with earth-shattering strength. Its hard scales give it powerful defense. Even powerful Empire Warriors will be afraid of this terrifying creature. ———— It was indeed a big guy! Although it was also a Silver Boss, its attributes were much stronger than the previous Boss. Especially under the circumstances that it was so huge, the pressure it brought was incomparable. The elves standing on the shore were stunned. “It’s the Bull Python Leader!” “Mr. Tyrant, Aisha, leave quickly!” “Heavens, is this the most powerful monster hiding in the Moon’s Reflection Lake?” “No, we can’t let Mr. Tyrant face this monster alone. We have to help them!” The elves entered combat state and drew their daggers. But at that moment, they were rejected by Lorne. Such a battle was clearly not something they could participate in now. He would leave it to Aisha. “Aisha, we’re going up!” “Yes, Master!” The two of them quickly entered combat state, and Aisha charged at the Boss. The pets behind also joined the battle. Although the combat strength they provided was very limited, with their Boss-level constitution, they could still provide some help. At this moment, everyone rushed forward. Aisha’s attack was the first to land. The two sharp blades turned into light and quickly cut through the Boss’ body. -9253 -137,050 (Critical) -9477 -17,501 -17,501 -17,501 A series of damage values floated. Although there was a level suppression above 10, it did not affect Aisha’s damage output. Her combat strength was still fierce, but it was slightly lower than before. After a set of skills, she dealt about 300,000 damage. However, this was still damage that the Bull Python Leader could withstand. “Roar!” The Bull Python Leader let out a furious roar. A huge body more than two hundred meters tall rushed out from the bottom of the lake, turning the Moon’s Reflection Lake upside down. Lorne moved as far away from the center of the battlefield as possible. The commotion of this battle was too great. Just the impact of the lake water made it difficult for a Level 40 player like him to withstand, much less face such a huge Boss. But Aisha was not afraid. Her body danced in the air, and she did not even retreat. Instead, she stepped on the monster and charged at its head. Slash! The sharp dagger stabbed into the Boss’ head. Perhaps the edge of the blade was very shallow, but the power transmitted actually dealt huge damage to the Bull Python Leader. At the same time, the other pets also attacked. Compared to the Boss in front of them, they were very weak, but they knew very well that they did not need to deal much damage to this Boss. They only needed to restrict its movements. [Poisonous Spider Web]! [Spider Spear Storm]! [Sticky Spray]! [Ultrasound]! [Rapid Fire]! The pets used all their skills and attacked. Especially Little Spider, it directly followed in Aisha’s footsteps and rushed up the Boss’s body, using its high health points to help Aisha block the incoming tail attack. With such help, the difficulty of the following battle decreased greatly. She clung tightly to the Boss, the sharp blades in her hands never stopping. It could be seen that the health points of the Bull Python Leader were decreasing crazily. Even if it had 1.8 million health points, it could not withstand such terrifying damage. In fact, its fate had been sealed long ago. A few days ago, the Mountain Giant King who attacked the Cold Desolate Dragon City had suffered the same fate. Because their attributes were almost the same. If not for the battle on the lake today, the entire battle time would have been greatly reduced. In fact, it would have ended in just two to three minutes. Seeing that the Boss’ health had decreased to 10%, Lorne began to consider something. Should he subdue this Boss? The pets beside Lorne clearly could not keep up with the progress. Most of the battles were completed by Aisha. They were very useless. This was not a good sign. Lorne’s initial idea was to let all his pets be powerful and be independent in the future. But clearly, the current situation was not satisfactory. It was also because of this that he wanted to keep this Boss as a pet. As he thought this, Lorne suddenly realized something. He could not do that. This was because the goal he had set for himself was to create a demoness now. Although this Boss was indeed very powerful, it was far from the demoness he had expected. Moreover, because of the appearance of the bull head, it did not look too appealing. After some thought, Lorne gave up on the Boss. After obtaining his agreement, Aisha also began to use her most fatal attack on the Bull Python Leader. The saber light intertwined into a fishing net that directly covered the Boss. Under such terrifying damage, the Bull Python Leader finally could not hold on and fell down. Because of the special map, after killing the Boss, the loot would temporarily stop on the lake. If he did not take the loot in time, it would quickly sink into the water. Lorne did not stop. He immediately stepped forward to clean up the battlefield. Soon, Lorne put the loot away. This Boss was a dungeon monster. After killing it, the loot dropped was naturally very rich. When it sank to the bottom of the lake, Lorne immediately obtained seven pieces of equipment, many of which were high-level. At the same time, he also obtained some materials for synthesis. ———— [Forest Blade] Grade: Platinum Attributes: … Introduction: A dagger that contains the power of nature. It is the favorite weapon of the elves. ———— The first piece of equipment was a special dagger. This was not an ordinary equipment, but one that could be used by NPCs. Moreover, the attributes of this equipment were abnormally outstanding. To the Night Elves who were good at hunting, this was a weapon worth fighting for. Lorne glanced at Aisha, but she did not want the equipment. Therefore, he turned to look at Corrie and said, “I’ll let you use these daggers. I hope you can grow up as soon as possible and contribute to the rise of the Night Elves.” “Are you really handing this equipment to me?” The elven girl was overjoyed. After the race left the Emerald City, there were very few opportunities to reward such excellent equipment to the young elves. She did not expect to obtain a pair today. It was great. Carrying the dagger, Corrie loved it so much that she could not help but give Lorne an intimate hug when she was most happy. Aisha smiled and did not take it to heart. She did not care how many beautiful women her master had. As long as she could stay by her master’s side, Aisha was satisfied. Then, Lorne took out other equipment. As long as it was equipment that the Night Elves could wear, he gave it to them generously. Although the equipment was given to the Night Elves, Lorne believed that soon, these Night Elves would become his people, adding a powerful force to the Cold Desolate Dragon City. “Huh? What is this?” In the end, Lorne took out a strange metal block. The information displayed on the interface was unknown, but in the introduction at the bottom, there was a clear indication that the Night Elves’ leader knew its identity. Seeing this, Lorne did not stay any longer and returned to the Night Elves’ camp with his things. … Soon, everyone saw Elwyn. When Lorne took out the metal block, Elwyn’s eyes widened as if she had seen something incredible. “Heavens, Mr. Tyrant, where did you obtain this treasure?” Elwyn looked at him in shock. This confused Lorne. Was this metal piece a treasure? Moreover, it was a treasure that could shock even the Night Elf Queen! Was there really a special meaning behind it? After some thought, Lorne immediately explained. He did not hide anything about the Bull Python Leader and said it all. After hearing this information, Elwyn nodded in realization. “Mr. Tyrant, you don’t know this, but this metal block is actually the divine equipment lost by the Night Elves. Unfortunately, it is too damaged and is about to lose its divinity.” “The current Night Elves do not have the ability to repair it.” At this point, Elwyn was a little depressed. After all, this was the divine equipment of the race. After being lost for many years, she finally saw it again. However, who knew that the divine equipment had already been damaged to this extent? What was even more tragic was that the current Night Race no longer had the funds and ability to repair it. A race that could not even repair their racial divine equipment was simply tragic to the extreme. “What do you need? Perhaps I can help you.” As a senior high-level player, he could naturally hear the special thoughts hidden within. Moreover, divine equipment was Lorne’s favorite thing. If not for the two divine equipment on him, he would not have such magnificent attributes, much less receive high critical damage. “In order to repair the equipment, we must use the special treasure of the elves. Natural Crystal, this is a special energy crystal that only the High Elves can collect. In the past, High Elves, the Night Elves could also bathe in the glory of the Holy Temple and collect Natural Crystals. However, the current Night Elves have already been reduced to low-level elves. Not to mention bathing in glory, we have not even entered the Holy Temple.” With that, Elwyn smiled bitterly. The glory of the past was long gone. Now, they could not even repair the inherited divine equipment of their race. It was really tragic. “In other words, as long as I help you bring back the Natural Crystal, you can recover this divine equipment, right?” Lorne touched his chin and asked casually. “Yes, but the Natural Crystal is a gem that only the High Elves can have, and the Natural Crystals of the Emerald City have basically been used by the Dragon of Emerald to decorate its castle. The dragon values its wealth greatly, so you have no chance of obtaining the Natural Crystal from her.” “There’s no need for Queen Elwyn to worry. I’ll think of a way to resolve this, but I need you to promise me something!” Lorne looked at her. “What is it?” Elwyn was confused. “The ownership of this divine equipment will belong to me!” Lorne stated his purpose. Elwyn pondered and finally agreed to his request. Ding! “Game Announcement: Congratulations on accepting the hidden mission: [Repair the Lost Legacy Divine Equipment]!” “Mission Description: Head to the Emerald City and obtain enough natural crystals to repair the inherited divine equipment. The more natural crystals you find, the higher the degree of repair of the divine equipment!” A system notification appeared. Lorne glanced at it and noticed a clear path on the map. It led to Emerald City. However, just as Lorne was about to leave… Elwyn suddenly called out to him, “Mr. Tyrant, don’t be in a hurry to leave. I have something to tell you.” “What is it?” “It’s about you and Aisha.” Elwyn said, “Perhaps you know very well that elves cannot contract with any race. This is a taboo among the elves. Once they violate it, they will face the pursuit of the entire elf race. I can say that even if you are the City Lord of Iron Skull City, it is impossible for you to appease the anger of the elves. They will even completely break off relations with the Human Empire. This is definitely not an exaggeration!” “Of course, as an adventurer, you have one more advantage than the people of other races or even the Human Empire!” “Many years ago, adventurers protected the last Ancient Tree of Life of the elves, so they had a special relationship with adventurers. Originally, there were strict rules against all races, but to adventurers, there was another special privilege.” “Despite the taboo of the elves, if anyone wants to form a relationship with the elves, they must be adventurers.” “However, because the era is too ancient, the requirement for this possibility has become higher and higher. To this day, many High Elves do not want to acknowledge this rule, but because of this history, it is impossible to erase. However, they have also thought of a way to let adventurers who want to be tied to the elves pass a very difficult test.” “Only by passing this test can you obtain the recognition of the elves. With this mark, it’s equivalent to the elves acknowledging your ability.” “The teleportation circle that originally led to the test is owned by all the High Nobles and by the Night Elves. However, ever since we were driven away by the Emerald City, we no longer have this right. Therefore, Mr. Tyrant, you have to go to the Emerald City to enter.” “Before you obtain recognition, you must not let others know about Aisha’s identity. You can’t even let others know that there is a bond between you and Aisha. Otherwise, you will encounter the hatred of the elves and might even be blocked from entering the dungeon of the test.” Elwyn looked at him seriously and said earnestly. Ding! “Game Announcement, congratulations on accepting a hidden mission: [Elf Contract]!” “Mission Description: Head to the Emerald City and enter the test dungeon set by the elves for adventurers. Complete this dungeon and obtain the recognition of the elf contract.” The system notification sounded. His missions increased again. First of all, he needed to go to the Elven Holy Temple in the Emerald City to obtain the needed Soil of Life. Then, he had to obtain the Natural Crystal that could repair the divine equipment. Finally, if he passed the forbidden test of the elves, he would be qualified to contract with them. These three missions were not easy to complete, especially the last one. From Elwyn, it was known that the High Elves were also very hostile to adventurers. They despised adventurers and would not give them a chance to contract an elf. The reason for arranging this test was mainly to not break the previous rules. After all, they were set by the ancient Elven Sages. Therefore, it was obvious that the taboo test that Lorne was about to pass was very difficult for a man to pass. However, Lorne was confident in his strength. If this test arranged by the system could be cleared, even if there was only a one in ten thousand chance, he would definitely be able to fulfill the requirement. His strength had already exceeded the players countless times. If even he could not complete the mission, it would be an impossible test for everyone. If that was the case, there was nothing to say. At most, he would break off all friendly relations with the elves. In any case, no one could tear off his relationship with Aisha. With that in mind, Lorne left the Night Elves’ camp. … On the way, Lorne noticed that Aisha was feeling a little better. The grim situation that the Night Elves were facing had always worried her. But with Lorne’s help, the situation of the Night Elves gradually improved, giving Aisha hope. When she walked into the free forest, Aisha was clearly much livelier, and there were many smiles on her face. Of course, a large part of the reason was that the two of them already had 190,000 affinity points and were only a step away from being close friends. Therefore, their interaction gradually became intimate. Moreover, as long as Lorne was around, Aisha felt safe. Even if she knew that there were other elves ahead, she was still filled with confidence. The gem-like eyes were filled with trust in Lorne. However, as he made more intimate contact, Lorne received a sudden warning. Ding! “Your relationship with Aisha is not enough to progress further. Your frivolous behavior has caused your affinity to -1.” Pfft— He only wanted to check Aisha’s body. This system was too unfair. Lorne was speechless. Time passed quickly. After traveling through the Nature Forest for five hours, they finally saw a huge city, but unlike Iron Skull City, it was built on a huge ancient tree. Yes, it was built on a tree. Standing on this mountaintop, what appeared in front of him was a towering tree. The trunk of the large tree was like a towering mountain, and at the top was a huge island. Various huge branches intertwined, supporting the entire huge island. The huge Emerald City was surprisingly located on this Sky Island. “That’s Emerald City?” Aisha stared ahead, her entire being filled with yearning. She had lived on the run since she was young and had never seen this legendary elf city. Because of her hostility towards the High Elves, she hated the Emerald City and even thought that it was a city where demons gathered. However, who knew that the Emerald City that her mother had mentioned many times was actually like this? This was beyond her imagination. Emerald City! A city in the sky! It was so beautiful. If only it had not done those things to the Night Elves. Aisha felt many emotions. At this moment, Lorne gently put on her hood and said, “There’s no need to envy them. In the future, the Cold Desolate Dragon City will gradually walk towards glory. After the basic construction of the city is completed, I’ll let the gnomes carve out an area and replicate this Emerald City. I even want to build a better place than them, and you will be the queen of that city!” “Queen…” When she heard these words, Aisha was stunned. To a girl who was completely ignorant of love, such sweet words were like a nuclear bomb blooming in front of her, causing her mind to go blank. Because of this, Lorne gained 3,000 affinity points again, inching even closer to becoming her ‘Close Friend’. Standing in the simple camp below Emerald City, Aisha whispered in Lorne’s ear, “Master, why don’t I return to the pet space?” She was a Night Elf. If she was discovered, it would implicate Lorne that he could not enter the Emerald City and might even be hunted down by the Emerald City. Especially if the relationship between the two was discovered, it would attract the hatred of the entire elves. Therefore, for safety’s sake, Aisha felt that it was best for her to return to the pet space first. At the very least, this would be extremely convenient for Lorne. However, Lorne touched her head, “It’s okay. They would not have thought that the Night Elves would take the initiative to appear in the Emerald City. Therefore, as long as we pay attention, we will not be discovered.” Lorne felt bad that Aisha liked the city so much but did not have the chance to play. It was as Lorne had imagined. Because it was the Emerald City and the Dragon of Emerald often descended, this was almost the safest city. For so many years, no one dared to cause trouble here. Even the minions of the dark forces did not dare to approach this area. Coupled with the fact that they had been in such a safe state for a long time, the guards here eventually lacked protective awareness, especially when one was willing to pay a high price. These elf guards would be very friendly to generous people. In the end, Lorne obtained the right to go to the Emerald City by bribing them with a gold coin pouch. Even Aisha was easily let through. Standing on the teleportation circle, the two quickly disappeared. When they reappeared, Lorne realized that he had arrived in the Emerald City. It could be seen that this was a very exquisite city. The materials used for construction were not rocks, but very hard wood. These high-level wood had powerful defense. In terms of strength, they even exceeded steel. In terms of beauty, it far exceeded the cold rocks and metal pieces. Lorne liked this natural scene, and so did Aisha. As a member of the elves, Aisha had a natural affinity with this city. Coupled with the fact that she rarely entered large cities, it made her look like a child who had just entered a city for the first time. Her eyes kept looking around, feeling curious about everything in the surroundings. However, when she saw some High Elves traveling, she would subconsciously lower her head and hide behind Lorne. Lorne caught her hand and gave her some encouragement. Then, he led Aisha around the city to taste the food. Although the mission was urgent, it was not short. However, what Lorne did not realize was that as the two of them ate, a player from the Domination Guild discovered them. “Leader, that hooded elf looks a little familiar.” The warrior player in the team pointed at the two people not far away and looked confused. From his current angle, he could see the side of Aisha’s face. Moreover, Aisha was eating. In her happiness, she accidentally exposed her long ears. It was obvious that she was an elf with sharp ears, but elves with moon-white skin and hair color like her were too rare in this city. Most people had not seen such an elf for decades. However, the players of the Domination Guild were different. They had responded to Unparalleled Domination’s orders and had hunted the Night Elves many times. They had also helped the Night Elves, so many people knew the Night Elves. Their team had not participated in the corresponding mission in the past, but they had seen the video of Unparalleled Domination attacking the Night Elves yesterday, so they had an impression of it. “It’s a little familiar. I think I’ve seen it somewhere before…” The leader observed carefully and was very confused, but he quickly reacted, “Damn! Isn’t this the Night Elf we saw yesterday?!” Hearing this, the others immediately understood. However, there were also people who were confused, “That’s not right, Boss. Weren’t the Night Elves exiled by the Emerald City? Moreover, there was a public announcement that the nearby Night Elves were not allowed to enter.” “Who knows? It might be the Night Elves from other cities.” Just as the leader said this, the lackey beside him suddenly looked as if he had seen a ghost and shouted in surprise, “Leader… Leader, that Night Elf seems to be a player, and it seems to be Tyrant!” “Tyrant?” The leader player quickly looked over and the next moment, his eyes widened, “Damn! It’s really Tyrant!” “Leader, we’re going to be rich!” “This Tyrant is really suicidal. He actually brought the Night Elves to the Emerald City!” “This is our chance!” “As long as we inform the elves, we can definitely make Tyrant suffer!” Several players spoke. However, at this moment, the leader player shook his head, “If we really do this, the elves will definitely not believe us. Have you forgotten that you used this information to deceive the players who wanted the reward? After doing this several times, the elves are already very against this kind of information. If we report like this, we will probably be locked in the dungeon in the next second.” “What should we do? We can’t watch Tyrant live happily in the city, right?” “That’s right, Leader. There’s also a reward for killing Tyrant in the guild. We all want to earn some money and improve our lives.” The lackeys panicked. The clear price given by the guild was a total of 1 million alliance dollars. Even if everyone divided it, they could obtain more than a hundred thousand dollars. This was not a small number to them. The leader player also wanted to obtain the reward. After thinking for a while, he said seriously, “Brothers, why don’t we directly tell Boss Barbarian the information? Even if we can’t obtain 1 million dollars, Boss Barbarian will definitely not treat us badly. In any case, the few of us can’t do other methods alone. Only this method can give us some income. How about it, what do you think?” “That’s all we can do.” “Sigh, this is the result of limited strength.” “That’s right. The opportunity is right in front of us, but we can’t grasp it.” “Let’s not talk about it. Leader, quickly contact him. It’s better to earn as much as possible than nothing.” “Since you agree, I’ll contact him now.” The leader player nodded and said to the two assassin players, “The two of you keep an eye on Tyrant and report their location at any time. Don’t let him escape.” “Yes, Leader.” After entering the city, Lorne and Aisha strolled around. Coincidentally, at this moment, he discovered his target building—Elven Holy Temple. Originally, he did not want to complete the mission for the time being, but since he had encountered it, he would complete the mission first. Lorne made Aisha wait near the Elf Temple, because the security in this temple was very tight. Moreover, when he was touring the Emerald City, he learned a very important piece of information. That was, no elf could enter the forbidden checkpoint of the elves! Yes, Lorne could not bring Aisha in. This was a huge problem. After all, Aisha was the main power of the team. Now that she could not participate, Lorne’s strength had decreased by at least 90%! “Such troublesome rules…” Lorne did feel a little troubled. However, that was all. Even without Aisha’s help, he still had the confidence to clear it. At this moment, Lorne arrived at the Elven Holy Temple alone. In a very hidden and inconspicuous corner, there was only an old elf who was dozing. Clearly, this place did not need to be guarded in the eyes of the elves. In any case, with the strength of the adventurers, it was impossible to clear it successfully. “Haven’t you learned your lesson, you greedy weaklings?” Sensing that someone had arrived, the old elf slowly raised his head and said, “The taboo mystic realm is very dangerous. I advise you to leave quickly. With your strength that has not even reached the Earth Realm, you think you can contract an elf? Stop dreaming.” The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up. In fact, he already had an elf pet. He came to challenge the level now only because he did not want to be too troubled in the future. After all, the Cold Desolate Dragon City would be a true free city in the future. If he caused a conflict with the entire elves, it would definitely be detrimental to his future development. If not for this reason, who would care about their opinions? Without a word, Lorne stepped through the portal. Ding! “You have entered a highly dangerous map—Taboo Mystic Realm!” ———— Dungeon: [Taboo Mystic Realm] Difficulty: ??? Special Effect: All adventurers who enter this mystic realm will be reduced to Level 40 and their attributes will also decrease correspondingly. (Adventurers below Level 40 will not be affected.) Special Effect: After dying in this dungeon, the adventurer will suffer a huge loss. If the adventurer’s level is higher than 40, after failing, the adventurer’s level will directly decrease to 40, and he will definitely lose the four equipment with the highest rating. If the adventurer’s level does not exceed 40, his level will directly decrease by 10, and he will definitely lose the four equipment with the highest rating. Requirement: Kill all the monsters produced in the dungeon. Requirement: 120 minutes. Introduction: In order to thank the adventurer who protected the Ancient Tree of Life ten thousand years ago, the elves have specially set up this mystic realm. As long as one passes this mystic realm, they can obtain the title of ‘Intimate One’ and obtain the right to contract the elves. ———— “How ruthless!” Lorne could not help but swallow at the sight of the consequences of failure. These elves did not want any adventurer to pass this dungeon, or else they would not have set up such a terrifying failure punishment. For the current players, as long as they failed in this mystic realm, they would directly lose 10 levels and four equipment with the highest ratings. No player could withstand such a punishment. Even Lorne would shiver. Losing 10 levels was not a loss to him. However, losing four pieces of equipment could directly make his mind explode. After all, he had two Mythical equipment on him. If he lost them, Lorne would really be sad for a few days. “Looks like I can only succeed this time. I can’t fail.” Lorne did not feel much burden. Even without Aisha, he was completely confident in his combat ability. With that in mind, he waved his staff, and the summoning circle flashed. The remaining pets appeared. Now that Aisha was not around, Little Spider became the main attacker. It was a Silver Boss with very powerful attributes. Its attack panel had already increased to 7,225 points, much stronger than the Silver Bosses in the event. Previously, he had not had a good result because Aisha had taken 90% of the damage of the team, so it had been very marginalized and could not be noticed. However, now that Little Spider was the main force in the battle, it was very excited and was already eager to try. Coincidentally, in the valley ahead, the roar of a monster sounded. When Lorne neared, he immediately saw a pack of wild wolves the size of bulls. They bared their teeth, their muscles tensed, their fur standing on end, and their blood-red eyes stared at the intruder. ———— [Mutated Wild Wolf] Grade: Special Monster Level: 40 Health: 20,000 Attack: 1950-2800 Defense: 1000 Skill: … Introduction: A group of wild wolves imprisoned in a special space. Due to the influence of the environment, they gradually became savage and terrifying wolves. Their sharp claws can tear apart any armor. Moreover, they like to move in groups. They are the cruelest hunters in the forbidden mystic realm. ———— A Level 40 monster actually had 2,800 Attack Points! This was indeed special. At the very least, such an attack power was relatively rare on non-Boss-level monsters. Moreover, this was the first monster they had encountered. Under normal circumstances, the first monster they encountered was often the weakest monster in the dungeon. According to this convention, the monsters he would encounter in the future would probably be stronger than expected. “Kill them all!” With that in mind, Lorne gave the order. Little Spider, who could no longer hold back, immediately controlled its eight sickle-like long legs to charge forward. When it approached the other party, the spider spears were already like the scythe of a death god, harvesting crazily. Pfft— Pfft— Pfft— The thick fur of the wild wolf was useless against it. Just by touching it, it was cut by the sharp spider spear, and its flesh was instantly exposed to the air. At the same time, because Little Spider had high attack power, the health points of these wolves decreased crazily. -3085 -3081 -3093 -3077 -3069 Because it attacked with many legs at the same time, Little Spider’s attack speed was far faster than other pets. Even without using any skills, a series of numbers immediately floated in the sky. Because Little Spider’s level was relatively low, it was severely suppressed. Seeing this, Lorne immediately used the experience points he had stored. Swish! Golden light sprinkled down. Little Spider quickly reached Level 36. The increase in level gave Little Spider higher attack attributes, and the level suppression effect of the two sides disappeared. At this moment, Little Spider’s damage output increased by several times. Every attack could reduce the health points of the mutated wolves by a large amount! -7343 -7343 -7343 -45,780 (Critical) -7343 Little Spider’s single attack had reached 7,000 points, completely pulling away from the other pets. However, such attack power could not kill the monster instantly. It could not compare to Aisha. Aisha’s talent of ‘critical hit after killing’ had a huge advantage in such a battlefield. Unfortunately, she could not enter this dungeon. Otherwise, he could sweep through the entire valley at the fastest speed. “Roar!” The mutated wolves were completely enraged by such an attack. At this moment, they dragged their injured bodies and charged at Little Spider. However, the funny thing was that they could not deal any damage! Yes, they did not break through its defense at all. After Little Spider reached Level 36, its defense reached an astonishing 3,000 points. This defense far exceeded the attack power of the mutated wild wolf. As for the hundreds of scattered damage they dealt, they were not even as good as Little Spider’s self-healing ability. In such a situation, the monsters of more than twenty mutated wolves only struggled for a minute before they fell to the ground. Lorne glanced at the EXP he had gained and found that it was ten times more than the outside world! A Level 40 Mutated Wild Wolf had directly given Lorne 5,000 experience points. Such a high reward stunned him for a few seconds. Then, he began to laugh crazily. This place was not hell. It was simply heaven. One monster provided 5,000 experience points, giving Lorne an astonishing 100,000 experience points in just three minutes! Such a terrifying income was higher than any previous income. “Very good, Long Tongue Bat, find the monsters!” Lorne began to use the farming method he had used in the wilderness to sweep through this dangerous dungeon. Previously, he had been worried that the dungeon was too large and would waste his time, but now, he even wanted to stay here for a few days. This way, he could quickly raise his pets to Level 40 and complete his Class Two as soon as possible. Unfortunately, there was a time limit for the dungeon, which meant that the area of this dungeon was not too large. “Huh? What’s this?” As Lorne cleaned up the battlefield, he suddenly discovered a ball of light on the monster’s corpse. This seemed to be a special energy that only the monsters in the dungeon could produce. Lorne extended his hand. Ding! “Congratulations on obtaining the loot: [Energy Essence]!” ———— [Energy Essence] Grade: Rare Effect: Can improve the aptitude of monsters. Introduction: In order to increase the difficulty of the dungeon, the elves have specially improved the monster’s body. ———— No wonder these wild wolves had such high attributes. It was because of this. These elves had really worked hard to prevent adventurers from passing the test. However, even so, it could not stop Lorne. Moreover, these energy essences brought him a fortune. “Since it can improve the aptitude of monsters, then pets should be able to achieve the same result, right?” Lorne gathered the energy essence on the ground and looked at his pet space. He had six pets now. Aisha did not need such a thing. Her aptitude was already extremely powerful. Small Artillery, Venom, and Long Tongue Bat could not use these materials because their aptitudes were too low. It would be a waste. It might not be long before Lorne replaced them. Therefore, only Rimuru and Little Spider were left. Rimuru was a Bronze-Grade Boss, so it should be more suitable for improving its aptitude. This way, it could keep up with the team. But given that he was in such a test, such an opportunity should be given to the DPS. Lorne paused for a moment, then poured all of the light into the spider. Ding! “Congratulations. With your help, your pet ‘Little Spider’ has absorbed the energy essence!” “Affinity received from Little Spider+270!” A system notification appeared. Lorne frowned at the notification. This was because he did not see any hint of evolution. At this rate, who knew how much energy essence would be needed to allow Little Spider to successfully evolve? “Forget it. It’s an unexpected gain anyway. Let’s take it slow.” Lorne did not dwell on this issue, instead sweeping deeper into the valley. With the Long Tongue Bat around, it was easy to find monsters. However, because the pets’ strength was limited, they could not fight alone against such powerful special monsters, so the overall farming speed was slightly slower. Fortunately, Little Spider’s efficiency was very good, and the team’s speed in this huge valley was still relatively high. … At the same time, something was happening in Emerald City. The team of the Domination Guild found their direct boss, [Barbarian]. They told this higher-up what they had seen. Then, Barbarian brought this information to the guild leader, Unparalleled Domination. “Is it really Tyrant? Are you sure?” Unparalleled Domination, who had heard the news, did not believe it, because the Night Elves were hated by all the High Elves in the entire Emerald City. If a Night Elf appeared here, it would definitely be treated very badly. Especially since Tyrant and the elf were master and servant. He should not be foolish enough to come to this extremely dangerous city, right? “Absolutely. Boss, our people are monitoring them. This is a shared scene. That brat Tyrant has entered the Elven Holy Temple. Our people did not have time to follow him, but his Night Elf is still outside. She’s probably waiting for him.” Barbarian brought up the shared scene. This was solid evidence. Yesterday, Unparalleled Domination had just encountered Tyrant and had even fought. The memory of the Night Elf beside him was still fresh in his mind. The moment he saw the other party, he immediately confirmed that this was indeed Tyrant’s Elf Pet—Aisha! “Boss, the High Elves don’t trust the information of the adventurers. If we report it like this, they will definitely not believe us.” A higher-up of the guild spoke. Unparalleled Domination gritted his teeth and looked at the shared scene without a word. A few seconds later, he said in a deep voice, “We’ll split into three groups!” “Firstly, send someone to inform the High Elves to try. It’s best if they succeed, but it doesn’t matter if they don’t!” “Secondly, gather people to hunt that Night Elf. This is the Emerald City. As long as she attacks, she will definitely expose her identity!” “Thirdly, when Elite Team Three returns to submit the mission, I will tell the Dragon of Emerald about the contract between Tyrant and the elves. At that time, we will see if he dies!” At the end, the corners of Unparalleled Domination’s mouth curled up. Barbarian immediately gave him a thumbs up, “Boss’s plan is perfect. I’ll arrange it now. This time, even if Tyrant doesn’t die, he will be severely crippled!” “Go ahead.” Unparalleled Domination nodded, then looked at the player beside him and asked, “How’s Elite Team Three?” “It’ll be completed soon. The Boss still has 20% health left. They can complete the mission in at most an hour.” “Very good. Let them return immediately after completing the mission. Don’t give Tyrant any chance to catch his breath!” “Yes!” “Looks like there aren’t many monsters in this dungeon.” After farming in the valley for a while, Lorne realized that there were not many monsters ahead, and the Long Tongue Bat’s detection had come to an end. Ever since he entered the dungeon, he had only farmed about 200 monsters before the number of monsters around decreased. However, the decrease in numbers did not mean that the difficulty would decrease. On the contrary, when the number of monsters decreased, their overall quality immediately increased greatly, especially the Bosses with territories. Every one of them had very powerful attributes. It was no wonder that the elves were so confident and did not worry that this dungeon would be cleared. It turned out that the layout was so thorough. These Bosses all had different skills. There were Assassins, Warriors, Mages, and even Knights. In short, there were all types of Bosses. The purpose of the elves’ arrangement was very simple, it was to target the adventurers. Some adventurers had strong attack power but weak defense. When they encountered an assassin Boss, they would be killed by the other party accidentally. As for the adventurers with high defense but low attack power, they could not break through the defense of the Knight Boss. In this case, as time passed, the adventurers would eventually be forced to fail. This was unless one had comprehensive attributes and did not have any shortcomings. Be it movement speed, attack, defense, magic, and so on, all attributes had to be powerful enough. Otherwise, there would always be a Boss that they could not quickly deal with. This alone could basically make 99.99% of the players fail directly. As for the remaining special individuals? In fact, the elves had also designed a plan to target them. For example, the Boss at the final round! Through the Long Tongue Bat’s investigation, Lorne had already confirmed the location of the final Boss. It was in the deepest part of the valley, but the Boss’ attributes were too high. As soon as the Long Tongue Bat flew in, it was inexplicably killed by the attack. Although he did not see the appearance of the Boss clearly, Lorne was basically certain that its attributes were very high, and the location was very special. It could actually directly kill the Long Tongue Bat Dragon with tens of thousands of health points. “There’s still plenty of time. Let’s cleanse these monsters first.” Lorne looked at the map. As long as he killed two more Bosses, he would be able to reach the nest of the final Boss. However, the following Bosses seemed to be very difficult to deal with. For example, the Kobold Leader had powerful attributes and could even fight Little Spider. After fighting for ten minutes, its health was still 20%! This was not good news. If the next two Bosses required 20 minutes to kill, wouldn’t there not be much time to deal with the final Boss? With that in mind, Lorne could not help but consider using his ultimate move. Before entering the dungeon, Lorne was filled with confidence. Even after knowing that Aisha could not enter the dungeon, he was still confident. This was because he had a plan. Now was the time to consider whether to do this. “Why don’t we give it a try?” Lorne felt that time was not on his side. If the battle continued like this, he would not have much time left when facing the final Boss. At that time, he would not have time to prepare. It was better to take out his trump card now and rush to the nest of the final Boss in one go. If he discovered something special about the Boss at that time, he could still have time to think of a solution. With that in mind, Lorne made up his mind. “Little Spider, retreat. Rimuru will take over!” Lorne gave the order. Then, he activated his talent—Monster Merging Simulator. Yes, this was his trump card. If he could not defeat it, he would strengthen it. There was nothing else to say. Previously, he had planned to synthesize Little Spider, but because he wanted to do some tests before the synthesis, he delayed the time. However, the situation was so special now, so there was no need to delay. “Prototype material, Bone Spider King!” Lorne threw Little Spider into the synthesis formula. In fact, his decisiveness was after many considerations. After forming a plan in his mind, he had many ideas about this synthesis. In the end, the ideal synthesis plan was created. After confirming the prototype material, he took out the corpse of the Dark Elf from the Dragon’s Treasure Vault. Elves were the most perfect species in the world. Their figures and faces were definitely the best. He believed that the final effect would be very satisfactory. However, that was not enough to create the demoness that Lorne wanted. After putting the corpse into the synthesis panel, Lorne opened the Dragon’s Treasure Vault again and took out new materials. This material was a ball of light, and its name was [Dark Elf’s Soul]! When the Dark Elf died, in addition to obtaining a complete body, he also obtained a soul. Lorne now placed it in the synthesis panel. Demonesses were different from monsters. In Lorne’s mind, they were chatty, playful, shy, happy, and self-aware companions. If not, then it would lose its meaning. Therefore, this soul was the core material of the monster. After doing this, Lorne did not stop. He took out the remaining two materials. A new ball of light was called [Pure Soul Energy]. The other was [Dragon Bone Fragment]. By adding soul energy, it would allow the demoness’ soul to evolve. Adding the dragon skeleton fragment was to strengthen part of the Bone Spider King’s body. If he could obtain the ideal result in the end, he believed that the pet’s strength would definitely increase greatly. At that time, it would definitely be able to easily defeat the next Boss. “Wait, should I add something else?” When the main materials were placed in the synthesis panel, Lorne suddenly stopped. He thought of a new problem. It seemed that when he created the Long Tongue Bat, because of the Heart of Greed, every Long Tongue Bat was very greedy and liked to extort the players’ money. This matter had been popular on the game forum for a period of time. Previously, Lorne had not paid too much attention to this matter, but now that he thought about it, it seemed to be quite important. This was because the demoness was different from ordinary monsters. They should be individuals with unique personalities, so that their future life would be interesting. Just like Aisha, she had a firm personality and did not like to speak. She looked like she was not easy to approach, but she was actually very fragile and was not good at expressing herself. Moreover, she was very easily shy. She was an elf beauty who was cold on the outside but warm on the inside. This was the kind of companion that Lorne wanted. They could communicate in the game and help each other in battle. In the future, if they materialized in reality, life would definitely be more interesting. Therefore, when Lorne thought of this problem, he immediately paid attention to it. As for what materials to use? Lorne did not have many choices. This time, the choice had to be a more positive one. A negative personality like Heart of Greed would definitely be ranked very low. After some thought, Lorne looked at the material in front. [Heart of the Flower of Desire]! This was a plant material. Because of the Monster Merging Machine, Lorne often collected various interesting materials, and this plant material was collected when he went to the Night Elves’ camp. Now, it was useful. “I wonder how much the nature of pets will be affected by plants that can stimulate their basic desires?” Lorne looked forward to it. Without hesitation, he placed it into the synthesis formula. Ding! “Two prototype materials and four parts have been confirmed!” “The synthesis formula is: (Bone Spider King) + (Dark Elf’s Body) + (Dark Elf’s Soul) + (Pure Soul Energy) + (Dragon Bone Fragment) + (Heart of the Flower of Desire) = (???)” “The cost is 150 gold coins. Would you like to merge?” The final synthesis panel appeared. It could be seen that the synthesis formula this time was very different from before. In this synthesis formula, there were two prototype materials. This was a synthesis method that had never been used before. Lorne had only recently discovered this function. This time, he could use this method to create the Spider Lady. In addition, this synthesis required a lot of gold coins, a total of 150 gold coins! Perhaps because there were too many materials to synthesize, or perhaps because the final product was too good in quality, in short, the cost of synthesis was a good thing. At the very least, it could make one look forward to it more. Huff— Lorne took a deep breath. Then, he directly confirmed the choice of synthesis. “Come out, my Spider Lady!” With that, an incomparably huge ancient magic circle immediately appeared on the ground. The materials in the synthesis formula immediately turned into light and began to merge into the prototype material. From the scene in front of him, it was obvious that the result of this synthesis was much greater than the previous synthesis. It seemed that he was going to obtain a very good pet. Lorne was filled with anticipation. But at this moment, a new notification appeared. Ding! “Detected that this soul material has memory. You can choose to keep or destroy it!” Memory? Lorne was surprised. This was the first time he had discovered that memory existed in the materials he had obtained. However, a synthesized pet definitely did not need those useless memories. Destroying these memories and obtaining a new soul was what he wanted. “Destroy it.” Lorne made his choice. Then, the light in front of him became even stronger, and all the balls of light began to fuse together. Especially the fusion of the two prototype materials, it directly changed the shape of the pet. 1 second! 5 seconds! 10 seconds! Time passed little by little. Finally, fifteen seconds later, a pleasant reminder sounded in Lorne’s ear. Ding! “Merging successful!” “Congratulations on obtaining the Platinum Boss Monster: Spider Queen!” Success! Lorne’s eyes widened. Although he could only see a ball of light now, he could not see the true appearance of the pet. However, from the shape of the ball of light in front of him, it could be seen that this was the Spider Lady that Lorne had wanted to obtain in the beginning! She had the lower body of a spider and the upper body of an elf, a strange combination like that of a centaur. Moreover, this Boss was a Platinum pet! This grade was indeed astonishing. As Lorne was shocked, the grand light before him began to dissipate, and the pet appeared before him. The light began to dissipate from above. The first thing he saw was light purple hair, then a moon-white forehead, ruby-like eyes, and skin as snow-white as an elf’s. There was a faint purple color after the demonization. As her facial features appeared, Lorne’s eyes lit up. This was an extremely exquisite face, as outstanding as that of an elf. At the same time, she had a voluptuous figure that was irresistible. However, when his gaze continued downward, it might shock many people, because behind her hip was the tail of the spider. The eight white bone limbs also looked very strange. Interestingly, this Spider Lady did not have a head on her body. She was more like an elf, and then her hips moved back to merge with the spider. In other words, this Spider Lady had ten legs. Other than the white bone limbs of the eight spiders, there were also two white and glossy elf legs that looked extremely tempting. Lorne did not know what was wrong with him. He did not feel anything strange about this Spider Lady. On the contrary, he felt an inexplicable urge to look at her enchanting body. This was not normal. Lorne swallowed and had to place the blame on the [Flower of Desire]. It should be this material that gave Spider Lady a natural temptation. Of course, it was also possible that Lorne’s mind had distorted after interacting with monsters for a long time, but he did not want to mention this or acknowledge it. Ding! “Congratulations on completing the transformation of your pet, Little Spider. Would you like to change your name?” The system notification sounded. This time, he had a chance to change its name. The perfunctory name Little Spider was clearly not suitable anymore. Lorne thought about it and quickly made a decision. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Black Weaver.” Lorne gave the Spider Queen a name. Then, a new notification appeared. Ding! “Due to the synthesis of the monster, the basic affinity between you and the Spider Queen, Black Weaver, is 100,000 points. The current affinity level is: [Idolization]!” Ding! “The Spider Queen thanks you for the new name. Affinity+20,000!” Two pieces of information appeared on the system interface, which surprised Lorne. The first message was the special effect of the talent, which was easy to understand, but the second message was too strange. He had only given his pet a new name and directly obtained 20,000 affinity points? This was too crazy. He had created so many pets previously, but this had never happened, right? Was… was this pet special? While Lorne was thinking, Black Weaver was also trying to control her eight long legs. Her body structure was relatively complicated, and the parts responsible for movement were basically provided by the spider body. The eight long legs could move her extremely quickly. As for the two flesh legs of her elf body, they were floating in the air. Because the spider legs were too long, as long as she was not lying on the ground, her legs could hang in the air about 30 centimeters. This was good news. Black Weaver did not want her legs to be stained with dirt. After all, this was a trump card to compete with other pets for the master. Master should like these long legs. Otherwise, he would not have been staring at them. Noticing that Lorne was staring at him, Black Weaver smiled happily and move her eight long legs to him. “Greetings, Master. Your charm has made this pet, Black Weaver, unable to extricate herself. Please allow me to examine your body.” Black Weaver’s dark purple eyes curved into crescents as she smiled slyly. Lorne frowned. Shouldn’t the Master be the one checking her body? Why was it reversed? Lorne looked confused, but in the next moment, he suddenly felt his body tense. At some point, his limbs were entangled by tough spider silk. What was going on? His pet had betrayed him? That shouldn’t be. As the master, Lorne would definitely not be harmed by his pets. However, Black Weaver’s current actions were difficult to understand. What did she want to do? “For the sake of Master’s health, please let Black Weaver guide you in all aspects.” Black Weaver leaned her lovely face against him. Her proud breasts were so fair that they were dazzling. She extended her index finger and held Lorne’s chin, a harmless, beautiful smile on her face. This appearance made a black line appear on the top of Lorne’s head. This did not seem right. He was the one who had always taken advantage of Aisha previously, but now, it seemed that he had become a little brother who had been taken advantage of? Moreover, he was feeling shy! Was this a sign that he had been completely dominated by his pet? It should be. Lorne felt that he should resist appropriately. However, for some reason, his body did not want to cooperate with him. No matter how hard he tried, he could not stop the other party. Perhaps this was the legendary state of ‘being unwilling on the surface but being honest in his body’. “Master is very healthy.” Black Weaver looked at him seriously and finally leaned over to whisper in his ear, “Master, although Black Weaver is the Spider Queen, I still have the same physical structure as a human. If Master wants it, Black Weaver will agree.” The soft words caressed Lorne’s ear, causing him to tense up as the blood in his body surged. As a hot-blooded young man, not many people could remain calm after suddenly encountering such a seductive pet in the alternate world. If not for the fact that Lorne had some reservations about the black spider’s body, that provocative action would have immediately made him turn the tables and fight an intimate battle with the spider demoness. “Ahem, Black Weaver, stop playing. We’re in a test now.” Lorne coughed to hide his burning emotions, then used his “Master” authority to tear the spider silk apart. “Alright, alright…” Black Weaver giggled, then looked at him and asked, “Master, do you want to check Black Weaver’s body now?” Eh? Lorne blushed upon hearing that. This was clearly a move that he had used on Aisha. Why was it commanded by a pet today? It seemed that in the future, when he wanted to use the Flower of Desire again, he had to be careful. Otherwise, his body would really not be able to take it. With a smile, Lorne opened Black Weaver’s attributes panel to check her attributes and organize her skills. As soon as he opened the attributes panel, he was stunned. ———— [Spider Queen] (Black Weaver) Grade: Platinum Level: 25 (3500 / 1.72 million) Health: 580,000 / 580,000 Attack: 10,875-16,312 Magic Attack: 8100-12,234 Defense: 5075 Magic Resistance: 5075 Superiority: 100% Skill: [Poisonous Spider Web], [Spider Summoning], [Encourage], [Explosion], [Spider Spear Storm]… Skill: Dragon Bone Scythe: When using the Spider Spear to attack the target, there is a 25% chance of triggering the Dragon Breath energy. It will produce a jet effect and deal the same damage to targets within a 10 yards radius of the target (It can be used together with a critical hit)! Skill: Power of Darkness: After being demonized by the power of darkness, it has gained a 10% damage reduction effect, 10% attack damage bonus, 10% movement speed bonus. Introduction: A Bone Spider King with a strange mutation. Dark energy gave her greater strength, and the body of an elf gave her high intelligence. She is now the powerful Spider Queen and the most loyal contract pet of the adventurer Tyrant. ———— These were the attributes of Black Weaver. Because her aptitude had increased, the EXP needed to level up had also increased. She was originally Level 36, but now, she was only Level 25. Although her level had decreased, her attributes had increased a lot. The attack panel that was originally only 7,000+ had now reached 16,000! The overall attributes on the interface almost doubled. If Black Weaver reached Level 30, her highest attack limit might be able to exceed 20,000 points! With such terrifying attack power, among the monsters at the current stage, she could definitely crush all enemies. Just like Aisha, she could easily end the battle against the Boss. However, Lorne discovered a small problem. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Black Weaver was currently Level 25, and the Boss in this dungeon was Level 45. The difference between the two sides was 20 levels. According to the classification of the level suppression effect of “Divine Realm”, the difference was Level 20. No matter how high the damage of the low-level party was, it could not harm the high-level target. Therefore, level became the greatest problem now. Lorne did not consider this, nor did he expect that the evolved Spider Queen would need so much experience to level up. The experience points that had been raised to Level 36 were only enough to keep Black Weaver at Level 25. If he could not raise Black Weaver’s level, then this test would be dangerous. Fortunately, Lorne had always been saving experience. This experience had originally been meant to level up his new pet, but now, he could only level up Black Weaver. Without hesitation, Lorne began to level up Black Weaver. After he confirmed the choice to level up, the number in his experience savings instantly decreased by a large amount. Fortunately, golden light also sprinkled down, making Lorne’s heart not ache so much. “Ding! Congratulations to your pet, ‘Black Weaver’, for reaching Level 26!” “Ding! Congratulations to your pet, ‘Black Weaver’, for reaching Level 27!” “Ding! Congratulations to your pet, ‘Black Weaver’, for reaching Level 28!” “Ding! Congratulations to your pet, ‘Black Weaver’, for reaching Level 29!” “Ding! Congratulations to your pet, ‘Black Weaver’, for reaching Level 30!” Five consecutive golden lights poured down, and the experience points on Lorne were completely depleted. That was not enough. With a difference of 15 levels, the damage output would still be reduced by 60%. No matter what, Black Weaver had to be at least Level 31. This way, the level suppression effect would only be 40%, which was very helpful for the battle. “Looks like I can only retrieve the experience points from pets.” Lorne took out a tool from his bag. It was a tool that he had asked Doge to help him purchase. The effect was to reclaim the EXP from his pets. However, the side effect was that the pet would disappear and the EXP regained would be only 70%. However, he could not think too much about it now. He had to raise Black Weaver’s level. Otherwise, the following battle would be more difficult. Without thinking, Lorne called Venom over. This undead archer had accompanied him for a while and had contributed a lot. However, its quality was too low, especially after the game version had been updated twice. Its attributes were clearly not up to standard, and its performance in battle was very limited. It could not even quickly kill a Silver monster. Therefore, it was time to retire. Ding! “Using this gem will collect the EXP from the pet and cause it to completely disappear. Do you still want to use it?” A system notification appeared. Lorne blurted, “Use it.” After all, it was a pet without self-awareness. It was completely a ball of data. There was no psychological burden to directly disintegrate it. Ding! “Successful extraction!” “You have received 3.24 million experience points for this recycling!” The Level 30 ‘Venom’ had cost Lorne less than four million experience points. Now, he only had 3.24 million experience points. After Level 30, if Black Weaver wanted to level up, she needed 6.24 million experience points. Fortunately, the talent of ‘Master of Experience’ had reduced the requirement by 50%. She only needed 3.12 million experience points now. These experience points could allow Black Weaver to level up again. Swish! A golden light shone. Black Weaver had successfully reached Level 31. Unlike Aisha, there was not much meaning for Aisha to level up herself, because all her attributes came from Lorne, but Black Weaver was different. She relied on her potential and aptitude. Only when her level increased could her attributes increase greatly. When she reached Level 31, her various attributes had also been greatly increased. Her health points had reached 700,000, and her defense had also reached 6,125 points. At this stage, any Boss below Silver could not even break through her current defense. However, what was even more shocking was Black Weaver’s attack power. After leveling up six times, her attack now was 13,125-19,687 points! The upper limit of her attack had almost reached 20,000 points. Other than Aisha, there was probably no other monster of the same level that could compete with her. “Black Weaver, go deal with that monster. It’s time for us to leave.” “Yes, Master.” Black Weaver bowed to him like a royal knight. After the ritual was completed, she drove her long legs to kill the leader of the kobolds. [Poisonous Spider Web]! With a flash of light, a huge spider web covered the Kobold Leader and forcefully restricted its movements. Under normal circumstances, Boss-level monsters were very immune to the restricted skills. However, Black Weaver was a Platinum Boss, and the quality of her skills was very high. Although the Kobold Leader had a level advantage, it could not resist such an attack. The spider web skill instantly hit and imprisoned it for three seconds. At the same time, Black Weaver arrived in front of it. She did not say anything against such an ugly monster and directly attacked with her spider spears. Swish! Swish! Swish! The bone spears transformed into white lightning that wreaked havoc on the monster, almost piercing through its body. -6127 -58,000 (Critical) -6533 -6533 -6533 -6533 A series of damage values popped up on the monster’s head. Although the damage was reduced by 40%, Black Weaver’s single attack still dealt 6,000+ damage. When the critical hit occurred, it instantly dealt 58,000 damage. This was still a distance away from Aisha, but it was still very terrifying. In just two seconds, the Boss let out a wail and fell to the ground unwillingly. Black Weaver’s [Spider Spear Storm] skill had also become a 10-hit combo skill, identical to Aisha’s. The first time she used it, she was lucky to have a ten-hit combo effect, instantly maximizing the damage. Ding! “Congratulations on killing the Kobold Leader. EXP+1 million (+2.75 million)!” The Kobold Leader was only a Level 45 Silver Boss. Under normal circumstances, ordinary players could obtain about 100,000 experience points. However, in this place, the monster’s experience was ten times as much, and as a Summoner, Lorne had additional experience points. Therefore, he obtained 3.7.5 million experience points in the end. Without hesitation, Lorne used all these experience points to level up Black Weaver. Golden light poured down.. Black Weaver reached Level 32, and her attributes increased again. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Ding! “Congratulations on killing the Goat Demon. EXP+1.2 million (+3.3 million)!” Ding! “Congratulations on killing the Sawtooth Lizard King. EXP+1.4 million (+3.85 million)!” Soon, Lorne killed the remaining two Bosses. These two Bosses were still special Level 45 Bosses. Under the support of the energy essence, their attributes became very powerful, but in the face of Black Weaver, they were unable to withstand a single blow. From the beginning of the battle to the end, Black Weaver had only used five minutes. Such efficiency in killing monsters could definitely cause a commotion worldwide. However, those players did not have the luck to see such a beautiful Spider Lady. “Black Weaver, change out of your cloth armor. This light armor suits you better.” Lorne threw her some rare equipment. Black Weaver knew magic and close combat, but close combat was more lethal, so Lorne thought she should wear either armor or light armor. Light armor was more enjoyable to look at. Black Weaver also liked light armor and other equipment. She instinctively hated heavy armor. “Master, can you help me change? Black Weaver doesn’t know how to wear these equipment.” Black Weaver rested her head on Lorne’s shoulder, using soft words to stimulate his nerves. Without thinking, Lorne began to help his pet. He removed her robe and revealed her perfect body. It had to be said that she was much more mature than Aisha. “Master? Do you want to touch it?” Black Weaver smiled at him, not feeling that there was anything wrong with this. Without hesitation, Lorne accepted the other party’s invitation. When he grasped the twin peaks, he realized that the affinity between the two sides had increased! Yes, it had really increased. He remembered that when he interacted with Aisha like this previously, there would often be a phenomenon where his affinity would decrease, which was the opposite of the current situation. Perhaps this was the difference in their personalities. Black Weaver was clearly much more open-minded. She was even more proactive than Lorne in such matters. However, as Lorne gradually explored deeper into the private area, he found that he could not go any further. “Indeed, without the affinity of Close Friend, it’s impossible to break through the final defense!” After a simple attempt, Lorne gave up. “Divine Realm” was very strict on the setting of intimate relations. Even if neither party had any objections, they could not cross the final line. If you really wanted to interact beyond friendship, you had to raise the affinity between the two sides to that of Close Friend. Otherwise, no matter how hard you tried, it would be useless. It was just like how you couldn’t feel anything through your safety pants. But Lorne was still excited. It was a Spider Lady who was interacting with him now! The upper half was an elf, and the lower half was a spider. Such a combination was too strange. Perhaps many people would feel fear, but when they saw the perfect appearance and exquisite figure of Black Weaver, they would subconsciously abandon their secular biases. Even the strange body structure of the demoness could bring them different emotions. Perhaps it was because Lorne had been with the monster for too long, and he had created Black Weaver himself, which made it easy for him to accept her identity as Spider Lady and even like her initiative. Ding! “Congratulations on increasing your affinity with your pet, Black Weaver, by 500 points!” “Congratulations on increasing your affinity with your pet, Black Weaver, by 500 points!” “Congratulations on increasing your affinity with your pet, Black Weaver, by 500 points!” “...;” The interaction with Black Weaver made the affinity between the two increase greatly, now at 130,000 affinity points. Black Weaver had just been created. It had not even been created for more than twenty minutes. However, the affinity between the two increased like this. If this continued, the intimate relationship between Lorne and Black Weaver would probably reach the level of [Close Friend] faster than with Aisha. Of course, Lorne would not side with either of them for these reasons. He liked his pets all the same, but whoever reached the level of a Close Friend first would have a chance to take his virgin experience in the game. The virgin experience in reality was long gone. But within the game, Lorne was still a virgin. He wondered if he would feel completely different from reality when doing shameful things with these beautiful demonesses in this virtual world. Yes, this was worth looking forward to. Lorne put these thoughts aside for the time being and looked into the deepest part of the valley. In the entrance in front of him, there was actually a light screen. At that time, the Long Tongue Bat had directly passed through this light screen and was directly killed by an inexplicable attack. Now, it seemed that it was very likely a rule. For example, before killing all the Bosses in this dungeon, any creature that entered would die directly. With that in mind, Lorne immediately had the Long Tongue Bat sweep through the dungeon again to ensure that no monster was missed. If the setting of this light screen was that only by killing all the monsters could he enter, he would probably be killed if he rushed in without meeting the requirements. Three minutes later, the Long Tongue Bat returned. It was certain that there were no other living monsters outside. “Very good. It’s time for us to suppress the final Boss.” With that, Lorne walked in. This time, there was no accident. The light screen did not harm him at all. When he arrived inside, he was shocked by the scene before him. In the huge circular valley in front of him, he did not see any monsters. Instead, he saw a large number of gold coins. These gold coins and gems mixed together and piled up into a small mountain. What was going on? Was it a gift from the elves? Lorne looked around and found that the scene was very quiet. There was nothing unusual, as if there were no monsters guarding it. “Master, there don’t seem to be any monsters here…” Black Weaver’s ruby-like eyes were also looking around, but she did not find anything amiss. “It’s best if there are no monsters. We can take these away and clear the dungeon. Nice.” After confirming that there was no danger, Lorne targeted the gold coins. In the depths of the valley, there were scattered gold coins everywhere. According to his initial estimation, there were at least tens of thousands. Lorne liked the feeling of obtaining something without working. He did not have to pay anything to obtain a large sum of money. It was the best thing in life. Thinking of this, he did not stay any longer and began to clean up the scene. Ding! “Gold Coin x1.” A pleasant voice sounded in his ear, and Lorne immediately smiled. This notification told him that the gold coins that appeared in his eyes were not scene items but real gold coins. Lorne rubbed his hands together, ready to work hard. But at this moment, a deafening roar sounded in the sky. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “Roar!!!” A terrifying roar filled the entire valley. When Lorne looked up, he saw a huge dragon. Another dragon? Lorne frowned. He had dealt with dragons many times, but that was because of a special main storyline mission. This time, it was obvious that this involved only the elves. With the elves’ strength, they should not be able to mobilize the dragons to help them guard the pass, right? While Lorne was feeling puzzled, the dragon descended from the sky. It was an emerald green dragon about 20 meters long. To the players, it was definitely a huge creature, but among the dragons, this size should be relatively small. Moreover, this dragon’s appearance seemed to be different from the dragons he had seen in the past. This dragon’s appearance was more like a lizard than the dragons he had encountered in the ruins of the war. It did not have the natural dignity of a dragon. With that in mind, Lorne immediately opened the other party’s attributes panel. The next moment, he realized something. ———— [Forest Drake] Grade: Special Boss Level: 45 Health: 2 million / 2 million Attack: 7000-8500 Magic Attack: 6600-7900 Defense: 7000 Magic Resistance: 7000 Skill: [Flame Breath], [Sharp Claw], [Steel Wing], [Bite], [Storm]… Introduction: A drake with an extremely close bloodline to the dragons. Because the elves provided it with a large amount of gems and gold coins, this Forest Drake took on the responsibility of guarding the taboo mystic realm. ———— This was a drake! Drakes were flying creatures with the bloodline of dragons and were close relatives of the dragons. However, because their bloodline was not pure enough, they were not considered part of the dragon race. Of course, drakes were still very powerful. At the very least, they were much stronger than the creatures of other races, especially those with a higher bloodline purity. In terms of combat talent, they were not inferior to dragons of the same level. This Forest Drake was like this. From the attributes panel in front of him, it could be seen that the attributes of this Drake Boss were far beyond that of any previous Boss. Lorne felt that there should also be a problem with the “energy essence” here. It should be that the elves had strengthened this drake in order to prevent anyone from breaking through this dungeon. “I think even Gold Bosses are only like this?” Lorne felt the difficulty. Without Aisha by his side, he definitely could not defeat the other party as easily as he had faced the Octopus Sea Demon Leader. Although Black Weaver’s attributes were also very powerful, far exceeding that of the other party, the difference in level between the two would reduce this advantage, so Lorne believed that the following battle would be longer. Fortunately, he had reserved enough time for this battle. Victory was inevitable. As Lorne was thinking, the drake looked at him in surprise and even said calmly, “Human adventurer, I didn’t expect you to be able to enter this area with your weak body. Seeing that you have not grown up easily, I’ll give you a way out. As long as you leave now, I can spare your life.” <i>What?</i>  <i>Leave now?</i>  Lorne chuckled. This drake was really arrogant. It actually had the guts to say such a thing. However, on second thought, it made sense. After all, it was just an employee. There was no need to risk its life to work. Unfortunately, Lorne could not leave. After entering the Elf Race’s taboo mystic realm, there was no way out. If he forcefully retreated, that would be surrendering. He would be judged as having failed the clearance and then receive a severe punishment. His level and equipment would be instantly lost. With that in mind, Lorne smiled at the other party and said, “Hey, big guy, I’ll give you a choice now. If you kill yourself, I can consider leaving your corpse intact. How about it?” “Damn you, what are you fantasizing about!” The Forest Drake was instantly enraged, and its eyes revealed a ferocious light. At the same time, it opened its bloody mouth and spat out a powerful energy flame. [Flame Breath]! This was the same move as the Dragon Breath and had astonishing power. Moreover, because of its huge size, the range of this skill was also very large. It directly covered an area of 30 yards, burning the soil and rocks in the area until they exploded. Unfortunately, it did not hit Lorne. The triple Blink effect quickly pulled away from the Boss. At the same time, the short staff in Lorne’s hand waved as he began to buff Black Weaver. Magic power immediately attached to Black Weaver, and as the battle began, she immediately rushed up and fought the other party head-on. “How dare you attack my Master! I’ll tear you into pieces!” Black Weaver’s expression changed from her previous smile. At this moment, her aura was extremely sharp, like a sharp sickle that wanted to harvest the lives of the enemies in front of it. Perhaps this was the bond of companions. When their master was in danger, these pets would counterattack with all their might, even if it meant losing their lives. Such recklessness was more trustworthy than human teammates. Perhaps this was also the main reason why Lorne liked to fight with his pets and did not like leaving his back to other players. [Cooperative Strike]! Lorne seized the opportunity to buff Black Weaver. Coupled with this combo skill, she could instantly deal the highest damage. The bone spears, enhanced by the power, attacked the Forest Drake like a storm. It attacked ten times in a row, instantly filling the sky with damage numbers. -6899 -59,000 (Critical) -8743 -8743 -8743 More than a dozen numbers appeared. This was Black Weaver’s current strength. Even against a terrifying opponent like the Forest Drake, she could still deal astonishing damage. Moreover, this was only a set of explosive damage. It was basically the result of one second of damage. Other skills could be used in succession, and with a high attack speed, she could also deal high damage to the Boss. Lorne noticed that in the past few seconds, Black Weaver had attacked more than a dozen times. The total damage was close to 150,000 points. If he included the basic attacks later, she could deal 200,000 damage before the skill cooldown was over! 200,000 damage! What did this mean? At this stage, a Knight player could die ten times in a row! Even if this Forest Drake in front of him had 2 million health points, it could not last long under such an attack. It would be completely killed in less than ten minutes. Seeing this scene, Lorne was relieved. There was still more than an hour until the designated time of the dungeon. Even if this Boss had any special trump cards, it could not change the situation. Just as Lorne was thinking this, the Drake Boss began to display its strength. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios “I didn’t expect such a talented monster to be willing to follow a weak human like you. It seems that I have indeed underestimated you. However, this farce should end here. Foolish human adventurer, open your eyes and see what power the dragon has!” With that, the Forest Drake roared. Immediately, the surrounding forest began to emit green light. These lights gathered on its body. Soon, a series of green numbers appeared above its head. +10,000 +10,000 +10,000 +10,000 +10,000 Ten consecutive green numbers appeared, and the health points of the Forest Drake immediately recovered. This was its talent skill. It could quickly recover the health points it had lost. Rimuru also had such a skill, but in terms of effect, it could not be compared to this Forest Drake. After all, its skill could instantly recover 50% of its health, and Rimuru only had 15% now. The difference between the two was still relatively large. However, there was no need to envy the other party. In the future, when the Alchemist Association of the Cold Desolate Dragon City was established, he could begin to refine special potions. For example, the Steel Dragon Body Potion recorded in the Dragon’s Pharmacopoeia. This potion could temporarily give the user the physique of a Steel Dragon. If he used this potion to merge with Rimuru, he believed that the final effect would definitely be very good. In addition, there were other potions that could recover health points. This potion could allow Rimuru to have the same powerful recovery ability as the Forest Drake, and there was even a chance of surpassing it in one go. “It’s indeed time to evolve Rimuru. Its attributes are a little bad.” Lorne took the time to glance at Rimuru’s attributes. Due to the lack of aptitude of the prototype monster, its attributes were not as powerful as other pets. However, it was a Slime, so it was probably possible to find other slimes to replace it. After all, slimes were only found near the Beginner Village. After reaching the main city, Lorne had really not seen such a monster. Therefore, Rimuru would not be replaced or abandoned. This was because its healing effect was indeed excellent. For example, in the current battle, because Rimuru was providing healing services at the back, Black Weaver could almost fight the other party without worrying about safety. Unlike the effect of the potion, the healing effect provided by Rimuru was almost limitless. As long as it did not exceed the speed of its recovery, it could continue to provide enough treatment. This was also one of the main reasons Lorne liked Rimuru. At this moment, the Forest Drake was attacking Black Weaver crazily. Because she was a Spider Lady, she could not dodge attacks with her agile body like Aisha. Most of the time, when she found that it was difficult to dodge an attack, she would directly face it head-on and counterattack fiercely. In this crazy battle, the Forest Drake felt its scalp tingle, because it could not kill the Spider Queen in front of it. The other party had 740,000 health points, and with the powerful healing at the back, the entire battle had progressed to this stage. It had not reduced the other party’s health points much. On the other hand, in just a few minutes, it had lost 50% of his health points. If this continued, it would die at the hands of the other party in at most a few minutes. Thinking of this, the Forest Drake was very unwilling, but there was nothing it could do. It had tried countless methods to break through the current battle situation, but no matter how hard it tried, the situation on the battlefield did not change. The only change was its health points. Now that its health points had decreased to a very dangerous level, if there was no way to change the situation, it would be completely killed by the other party’s bone spears. Sensing the threat of death, the Forest Drake went completely crazy. The desire to survive from the wild beasts made it stronger, and its combat quality was clearly improved. [Flame Breath]! [Sharp Claw]! [Steel Wing]! [Bite]! [Storm]! The series of attacks forced Black Weaver to dodge everywhere, and the efficiency of his counterattack decreased greatly. At this rate, the battle would be delayed for another ten minutes. Although ten minutes was not long, Lorne did not plan to let the battle drag on. He held his short staff and rushed towards the battlefield. [Angel’s Descent] Lorne entered his angel form. A pair of three-meter-long angel wings appeared on his back. He flew into the air and officially joined the battlefield at an extremely fast speed. When it noticed the power erupting from his body, the Forest Drake was immediately incomparably shocked. It had not expected that a mere human who was not even in the Earth Realm would hide such a terrifying power in its body. Moreover, this was the power of an angel! Only by obtaining the recognition of the Dragon of Light could he master this magical power. How did a weak human adventurer like him obtain this power? The Forest Drake was stunned, but it could not be stunned anymore. It knew very well that this was its opportunity. As long as it killed this Summoner, its pet would definitely disappear immediately. Other than this method, it really could not find a way to win. Roar! Roar! Roar! The Forest Drake spat out flames. Seeing hope, it charged at Lorne without regard for its own safety. [Triple Blink]! Lorne easily dodged the attack. At the same time, the short staff in his hand glowed. Magic energy bullets bombarded the Forest Drake’s body. -3537 -61,000 (Critical) -65,000 (Critical) -3159 -3571 Damage numbers popped up from the Forest Drake’s head. These were all damage numbers dealt by Lorne. In terms of ordinary attacks, Lorne’s damage was slightly lower than Black Weaver’s, but his critical strike effect was slightly higher. Perhaps many people could not accept this result, but Lorne, who was familiar with his attributes, knew that these were very real damage output results. His current attack power had already reached 6,600 points, and after entering the Angel state, all the damage he dealt would be increased by 100%, which was double the damage. That was not the most important thing. Most importantly, he dealt critical damage. In the Angel state, Lorne would receive a 300% critical damage buff. Coupled with his own critical strike effect, after entering the Angel state, Lorne could directly deal 800% critical damage. Moreover, the critical hit effect could be effective at the same time as the increase in damage. In other words, he finally dealt 16 times the damage! The corners of Lorne’s mouth curled up slightly when he saw the number in front of him. The increase in strength brought by the Angel’s Wings was too great. It actually gave him the same powerful damage output as Black Weaver. Of course, his level was higher than Black Weaver’s. Lorne was Level 40, and the level suppression effect only reduced damage by 20%. Black Weaver was now Level 33 and had to face a 40% reduction in damage. In this aspect, the difference between the two was slightly unreasonable. But it did not matter. No matter who was stronger, the one benefiting was Lorne. Boom! -3911 As Lorne marveled at his damage, the Forest Drake’s attack finally hit him. This attack only cost Lorne half his health. Rimuru, who was not attacked in the distance, lost nearly 8,000 health points at this moment. This was because the [Damage Transfer] effect had taken effect. As long as Lorne was injured, it would directly affect Rimuru, and he only needed to take 50% of the damage. Coupled with the [Angel Form], Lorne had 50% damage reduction, so he only suffered a quarter of the damage in the end. It did not threaten his safety. However, after entering the Angel state, every second consumed divine power. Lorne had to achieve his goal as soon as possible. He had not participated in the battle to help Black Weaver kill the other party head-on, but to use his participation to disrupt the combat state of the Forest Drake. As long as he could suppress its movements, Black Weaver would be able to regain control of the battle and finally reach the goal of quickly ending the battle. -3511 -65,000 (Critical) -3159 -3599 About ten seconds later, Lorne stopped attacking. Black Weaver had already suppressed the other party again. The Forest Drake’s attitude of fighting to the death was shattered, and it was even more hopeless to turn the situation around. Just like a dam, once it could not hold on and a small crack appeared, then what happened next would definitely be a complete collapse. This happened to the Forest Drake. Its resistance became weaker and weaker, not affecting Black Weaver at all. “Roar!” “Despicable human, I’m going to burn you to death!” The Forest Drake knew that Lorne was its only hope of winning the battle, so it wanted to kill him crazily. Every time it spat out flames, it would attack in Lorne’s direction. Unfortunately, Lorne did not give him a chance. He wandered to the edge of the valley. To hit him, he had to move at least 400 yards. Clearly, this was a wish that it could not be fulfilled. After all, the pressure that Black Weaver gave it was too great. Lorne laughed crazily at its exasperated expression. It ignored Black Weaver’s attack and wanted to kill him by force, only causing it to die faster. Its health points, which could have lasted for a few minutes, were depleted in just two minutes. In another minute, it would die under Black Weaver’s attack. The Forest Drake finally knew fear. “Adventurer, please don’t kill me!” The drake prostrated on the ground, its head even touching the ground. It gave Lorne the greatest reverence, and its arrogant tone immediately fell to rock bottom. Now, all that was left was a humble request. Ding! “Game Announcement: Due to fear of your powerful strength, the Forest Drake is afraid of you and has taken the initiative to surrender to you. You can choose to negotiate with it or directly kill it!” The system notification sounded at the same time. Lorne was speechless. These dragon-like monsters were actually so shameless these days. They would actually beg for mercy so humbly. Lorne had encountered this before. Under normal circumstances, one could obtain benefits in this situation. Just as he was thinking, the Forest Drake took the initiative to say, “Lord Adventurer, as long as you spare my life, I can give you all the treasures I have stored. What do you think?” If it wanted to live, it could only spend money to buy its life. No matter how much it liked gems, it had to give them to the other party now. Otherwise, it would definitely die in the other party’s hands. The Forest Drake knew this very well. It did not dare to scheme, afraid that it would anger the adventurer in front of it. Hearing these words, Lorne touched his nose. The treasures of the dragons were very valuable. Previously, it was thanks to the legacies of the dragons that he had the initial funds to build the Cold Desolate Dragon City. It was the same now. The Cold Desolate Dragon City was in the midst of rapid development. He needed a rich treasure vault to support its construction. However, this guy was only a drake, and it was one that worked for the elves. It did not look like a rich dragon no matter what. “Don’t tell me that your treasure consists of these gold coins…” Lorne glanced at it coldly, and the Forest Drake immediately trembled in fear. Tens of thousands of gold coins was not a small amount. It was definitely a fortune, but at this moment, it did not seem to care. If an ordinary adventurer said this, it would definitely think that the other party was just stupid and did not know the value of the gold coins. However, this adventurer in front of him was different. As an angel, his horizons were definitely extraordinary, so it was normal to look down on gold coins. Fortunately, it had other savings. Otherwise, it really could not deal with this guy. The Forest Drake quickly revealed a happy expression. If the other party wanted money, then things would be easy. No matter what, its life was finally safe. With that in mind, it quickly took out a magic scroll and said, “Master Adventurer, these are the magic scrolls I used to hide treasures. They were all hidden in the cave by me. Although it looks like there’s nothing inside, as long as I activate this magic scroll, the hidden treasures will immediately appear. Look…” The Forest Drake triggered this magic scroll. The next moment, a dazzling light immediately blossomed in the cave not far away. Even from here, one could see that the walls were filled with high-quality gems. Even the ground was embedded with crystal. It looked extremely luxurious, even surpassing the purebred dragons that Lorne had encountered. In fact, this was normal. After all, the nests of those dragons had been baptized for thousands of years. Some dragons had only set up their tombs after death, but they were not like this drake. It had signed a contract with the elves and could obtain some gems every year. The drake had a very long life as well. After so many years of cooperation, it had accumulated so many gems that it could not even fit into the cave. In the end, it could only pile the most worthless gold coins and some gems outside. “That’s all?” Lorne frowned and questioned the other party. Being stared at like this, the Forest Drake immediately cried, “Master Adventurer, I’m only a drake. It’s not easy to accumulate these treasures. These are all my savings. If you can let me go, I’ll give them all to you. What do you think?” “I don’t think we have a deal.” Lorne grinned and ordered Black Weaver to kill it, the sharp spider spear slicing through its body. -59,000 (Critical) A huge critical hit number flew out, and this drake with the high purity bloodline of a dragon directly lost its life on the ground, exploding into a pile of rare equipment. “This big-headed dragon is too stupid. If I kill it, Master will still be able to obtain the treasures. Why would we need to promise it anything?” Black Weaver pulled out the spider spear and waved it gently, causing the blood to disappear. “Go get out the gems in the cave. We’re leaving, Black Weaver.” “Yes, Master.” Black Weaver nodded and entered the cave. On the other side, Lorne began to clean up the battlefield outside. The harvest this time was very large. Just the experience points dropped after killing the Boss was a total of 9,375,000 experience points, which could help Black Weaver raise her level to 35. Then, it was the equipment dropped by the Boss. Originally, the monsters in this dungeon rarely dropped equipment, or even almost none. However, this Boss dropped four items. He put them all away. Ding! “Obtained loot: Bear Head Bracer (Platinum)!” “Obtained loot: Flame Spear (Platinum)!” “Obtained loot: Elemental Bow (Quasi Diamond)!” “Obtained loot: Ice Crystal Unicorn War Boots (Platinum)!” Among the four pieces of equipment, one was the set part that Lorne needed. ———— [Ice Crystal Unicorn War Boots] (Ice Crystal Unicorn Set: 1 / 7) Grade: Platinum Speed: +30 Health: +800 Agility: +80 Constitution: +50 Additional effect: Movement Speed+10%. Additional effect: Endurance+100. Special Effect: [Unicorn Ice Crystal Hoof]: When walking on the ice and snow, additional 50 to 100% movement speed will be gained! (Maximum effect outside of battle) Type: Cloth Armor Level Requirement: 40 Introduction: Made from the crystal hooves of a female Ice Crystal Unicorn. It can easily adapt to the icy environment and bring about a super fast movement effect. ———— 80 Agility was equivalent to 24 points of movement speed. Coupled with the 30 points of speed brought about by the war boots, as well as the additional effect, this pair of combat boots actually increased his movement speed by over 70 points! This was unbelievable. After all, the current Lorne only had 146.1 points of movement speed. This equipment could allow his movement speed to increase by 50%. In the snow, his movement speed would increase by a further 100%. This was simply a godly pair of boots. In Lorne’s eyes, the value of this equipment was not inferior to the short staff in his hand. Without thinking, he changed his boots. [Speed: 180.1 (34 ↑)] This was Lorne’s current movement speed. This was definitely a height that players could not reach at this stage. With the addition of various movement speed buffs, he could even exceed ordinary players by more than 10 times. To Lorne, who often walked in dangerous areas, such movement speed was the greatest guarantee of his safety. However, among the loot this time, the highest quality did not seem to be the pair of combat boots under his feet. Lorne looked at the special bow. ———— [Elemental Bow] Grade: Quasi Diamond Attack: +1300 Attack Speed: +135 Strength: +200 Agility: +120 Additional effect: Attack Range+20%. Additional effect: Increases long-range attack damage by 10%. Special Effect: [Element of Forest]: In the forest environment, you will receive a 25% increase in movement speed and an additional 10% increase in attack speed. Type: Weapon Level Requirement: 40 Introduction: … ———— Lorne’s eyes lit up when he saw the equipment attributes panel. During this period of time, he had seen many Platinum equipment, but he rarely saw Diamond equipment. He only had one on him. The equipment in front of him was an excellent Quasi Diamond-grade equipment! Although it had not officially entered the Diamond-grade, the attributes of this equipment were indeed much stronger than the Platinum equipment, and even much stronger than the staff in Lorne’s hand. Unfortunately, this was an archer’s equipment. Small Artillery was an archer class, but it was not a Boss-level pet. It could not wear equipment, nor could it obtain attributes from equipment. Yes, this was the difference between pets. In “Divine Realm”, most pets could not directly use equipment. They could only rely on their potential and aptitude to become stronger. As for Boss-level pets, some had their own equipment panel, and some had their own equipment parts. For example, Aisha was in a special state. She had ten equipment slots, just like players. Black Weaver was now a Platinum Boss, but she only had three equipment slots. They were Weapon, Breastplate, and Leg Armor. As for Rimuru, it did not have an equipment panel on it. It was also the only Boss-level pet beside Lorne that did not have an equipment panel. Other than the three Boss-level pets, the other pets did not have any equipment. Their equipment was automatically equipped from the start. If Lorne wanted to change their equipment, he could use two methods. The first was to drop a rare pet equipment. This way, pets could directly use the equipment. The second was to use his synthesis talent to merge monsters and equipment. It could also achieve the effect of letting monsters change equipment. However, this method could not guarantee that pets could directly obtain the attributes of the equipment. Sometimes, the effect might be outstanding, but sometimes, it could also make this pet useless. In the past, when the quality of pets was not very high, he could still use this method to strengthen them. However, as the quality of the pets around him increased, some pets developed self-awareness. Lorne could not gamble with these pets for just equipment. Therefore, he was more inclined to the first possibility. By raising the quality of his pets, he could thereby open up more equipment slots. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Lorne put the equipment away. He was going to create a few pets recently, including an archer. Archer was an important position in the team, especially if he wanted to level up quickly. Such a pet was necessary. This Quasi Diamond-grade equipment was also prepared for the archer in the team. Hopefully, the damage output of the archer pet could keep up with the team. After checking the equipment, Lorne was about to put away the gold coins on the ground, but at that moment, he realized that the Boss had dropped an additional tool. It was a round stone with eye-like runes on it. ———— [Dragon Eye Talisman Stone] Grade: Rare Type: Strategic Treasure Effect: Place it in the city and it can grant detection effects to the city. It can detect most invisible targets. Range: Up to 50,000 hectares Activation Cost: 10 silver coins / hectare / day Introduction: A rune stone born from a Forest Drake. It has the ability to see through everything. ———— Good stuff! Lorne’s eyes lit up. This was an extremely rare strategic treasure. The so-called strategic treasure was a treasure that could greatly affect the situation of a battlefield. Although this was only a Rare-grade strategic treasure and was not of high quality, its effect was very outstanding. When it activated at full power, it could detect a map of 50,000 hectares. Any target that wanted to enter the management area invisible would be easily detected by it. This was simply the best defense treasure in the city. Unfortunately, the range of this Dragon Eye Talisman Stone was not large enough to cover the entire Cold Desolate Dragon City. Fortunately, it could sweep all areas of the inner city into the detection range. This effect was already very good. Of course, to make this thing useful, it required a lot of resources. If he wanted it to cover 50,000 hectares of land, he had to pay 5,000 gold coins per day. This consumption was not ordinary. The current Cold Desolate Dragon City could not maintain its work for the time being. However, Lorne felt that it was necessary to let this tool work. This could truly prevent the invasion of spy players or even the invasion of the Dark Abyss. “I’ll do it after the business circle of the Cold Desolate Dragon City stabilizes.” Lorne put the treasure away. Then, he began to collect the gold coins and gems on the ground.  After collecting all the gold coins in the valley, there were a total of 75,000 gold coins and 5,000 gems of various types. These were nothing. After all, these were all items abandoned by the Forest Drake. They were the lowest value of the final treasure. With anticipation, Lorne entered the cave and was truly shocked by the harvest. In this cave, there were tens of thousands of gems of all types and types. There were even some very rare gems. Seeing this, Lorne quickly opened his Dragon’s Treasure Vault and began to sweep through the gems in the cave. In the end, he obtained a total of 11,000 units of mineral crystals, 13,000 units of rare gems, and 4,500 units of luxury gems. In addition, there was a large area of cave crystals on the ground. He dug them all out, totaling 120,000 units. In the end, Lorne realized that he had underestimated the wealth of the Forest Drake. There were so many gems in his nest, which was many times richer than the dragon nests he had encountered in the past. This was a huge gain. Lorne smiled happily. With so many treasures, he could go to the Gnome Mineral Company for a bulk purchase. Cold Desolate Dragon City was in urgent need of defense equipment. However, in the Gnome Mineral Company, the price of such a product was extremely expensive. Even Lorne could not help but feel his scalp tingle when he saw the final price. Fortunately, he had the mineral vein map. Otherwise, he would not have seen any hope of buying any equipment. “Alright, it’s finally time to leave.” “That girl Aisha is probably waiting outside anxiously.” Lorne opened the system interface. There was already a choice to leave. Without thinking, he chose to leave. … At this moment, in Emerald City. At the entrance of the Elven Holy Temple, a large group of players with the prefix of [Domination] on them were secretly lurking nearby. However, they were all a little anxious now, because it had been 15 minutes since they had been summoned, but there was still no order from the guild leader, Unparalleled Domination. “Boss, when are we going to attack?” A player could not help but ask his direct leader, [Barbarian]. “Don’t be anxious. Boss has already gone to see the Dragon of Emerald. Let’s wait for Boss to come out first. With his order, we can only attack. Otherwise, if we rashly attack in the Emerald City, in addition to being suppressed, it will also reduce the affinity of the faction. This result is too serious. It’s best to avoid it.” Barbarian leaned in the alley, staring at the elven girl not far away, and explained to his lackeys in a low voice. “Boss, Tyrant has been in for so long. Did he go to the taboo mystic realm? If this kid really passes, won’t our plan fail?” A lackey voiced his concerns. In the end, the Barbarian laughed and said, “What are you thinking about? It’s not like you don’t know what’s going on in the taboo mystic realm. That’s an impossible mission. There are five Bosses equivalent to Silver-grade and ten monster packs with more than 20 wolves each. Not to mention tearing the players apart, how can you kill all of them in two hours alone? Isn’t this a joke?” “What if? After all, he’s Tyrant.” “My ass, which is Tyrant’s most powerful pet?” Barbarian asked. “Elf Aisha, her critical damage is more than a hundred thousand.” “Then let me ask you again, where is this Aisha now?” “She’s at…” The player pointed at Aisha, then came to a realization and said in surprise, “Oh, I understand now. Boss’s observation is still very detailed. No wonder you were not worried that Tyrant would be able to clear it. It turns out that his most capable pet is outside. The taboo mystic realm cannot be entered by elves. Tyrant has directly lost his greatest strength. Without Elf Aisha, he will definitely not succeed!” “Therefore, I’m very calm now.” Barbarian leaned against the wall, his expression extremely relaxed. In the end, he even smiled, “Perhaps when we really attack, that kid will have already failed. At that time, his level will directly decrease by 10 levels and he will lose another four pieces of his best equipment. At that time, it will really be a chance for us to kill him completely.” “Boss is wise.” The group of players discussed and laughed. At this moment, the Barbarian suddenly paused, then looked at all his lackeys and said, “Brothers, it’s time to work.. The guild leader has already talked to the elves. Now, it’s our turn to force out the true identity of that elf!” “Assassins attack first. Don’t care about life and death. Charge!” Barbarian gave the order to kill. Immediately, the group of assassins went crazy, charging forward crazily. They did not have any plans, because in the face of this Night Elf, all their plans were meaningless. They could only attack her crazily with the advantage of numbers. As long as they could stun the other party once, they could obtain victory in the battle. However, as everyone swore, the scene before them made their scalps tingle. A series of “Miss” words appeared. Almost all attacks were useless against this Night Elf. Before the assassins could recover from their shock, Aisha vanished from their sight. “Gosh, this is ridiculous!” Barbarian and the players beside him were petrified. The assassins who had attacked just now were all high agility assassins. They were very powerful, especially with the ‘Chisel’ skill. The success rate was very high. However, when these attacks landed on the other party, none of them dealt any damage, much less the skill effect. The group of Domination Guild players were dumbfounded. Barbarian quickly regained his senses and waved the saber in his hand, roaring, “Everyone, charge together. Mages cover all directions. Force her out!” This time, they gathered a huge number of players, more than a thousand. Perhaps these people were not enough, but the people of the Domination Guild were very smart. They knew that they were not the other party’s match and might even be killed by this powerful Night Elf. However, this was the Emerald City. As long as that Night Elf attacked, the elves of the Emerald City would immediately know, so it was very likely that the other party would not attack. Even if she attacked, it did not matter. They had brought a large number of mages, and these high-level mage players would cover the area. Under such indiscriminate attacks, the other party would definitely be injured. As long as he forced the other party to appear, he would have achieved his goal. They did not think that such an attack could kill the other party. Unparalleled Domination only wanted to use the lives of more than a thousand players to add to the sins of this Night Elf! The highest ideology of elves was ‘freedom and peace’. They had a natural aversion to killing. Although the Night Elves had betrayed them, they still did not kill all the Night Elves. Instead, they killed the Dark Elves and expelled the demonized Night Elves. This was already a mercy to the Night Elves. After all, as elves, it was an unforgivable sin for their bodies to be planted with the seeds of darkness. If Aisha, a Night Elf, not only appeared in the Emerald City, but she also had thousands of lives to account for, he believed that the High Elves of the Emerald City would not let her go easily. This was the Domination Guild’s plan. First, they would ruin Tyrant’s reputation, then deal with him properly. “Ignore the casualties. Attack her indiscriminately and force her out!” “Archers, Light Arrow!” “Mages, use Freezing Ice and Burning Flame, cover everything you see!” As Barbarian gave the order, all the mages and archers began to use their skills on the target area. This was an indiscriminate attack! They did not want to kill the other party at all. They only wanted to force Aisha to retaliate. Facing such a chaotic attack, Aisha could completely hide nearby, but she did not choose this method. Instead, she held her sharp blade and chose to defend this area because her Master had said to wait for him here! [Traceless Phantom]! [Phantom Blink]! Aisha faced the incoming players, and the sharp blades in her hand began to dance. She instantly slashed across the throats of several players, then immediately disappeared and appeared behind the other players. She raised her hand and slashed down, decapitating this warrior. Before anyone could react, she disappeared again. This was the power of the Phantom Blink. As long as she killed the target, it could be refreshed. Moreover, she could directly move for 20 yards! Just like that, Aisha kept turning invisible and flashing. Under the barrage of more than a thousand people, Aisha was completely untouched. She used her powerful displacement to quickly jump among the players. No one could capture her figure. Even an area-of-effect attack had lost its effect at this moment. There was only a series of ‘Miss’ symbols floating in the air, and they did not harm her at all. The other surrounding players were dumbfounded. “Damn, what kind of godly operation is this? It’s all misses!” “This is a high-level NPC, right? Her strength is beyond imagination.” “200,000 damage from critical hits. I think she’s a Level 100 Boss!” “Are all the fellows from the Domination Guild stupid? How dare they provoke such a big boss!” “It’s probably a misjudgment. These guys are used to being arrogant. It’s time to let them have a taste of it.” “I’m dying of laughter. These idiots have provoked a monster today.” The players who passed by gathered. Everyone was watching the commotion, especially when they saw the 200,000 damage in the air. They were even more excited and watched with interest. At this moment, an elf team arrived. It was the city guards of the Emerald City! There was also the High Elves’ Enforcement Team! Seeing this scene, the players gave way. This time, those people were unlucky. One had to know that the Emerald City was known to be one of the cities with the highest discipline. If anyone dared to fight here, they would definitely not have a good time. The surrounding players were even more excited. Unparalleled Domination, who was following behind the High Elves, smiled. <i>Tyrant, oh Tyrant, do you think you can really do whatever you want just because you have some strength?</i>  <i>Stop dreaming.</i>  <i>I’m going to kill you today!</i>  <i>Don’t you rely on this powerful elf pet?</i>  <i>Alright, I’ll let the law-enforcement officers of the Emerald City cripple your elf pet. Let’s see what you can do now.</i>  Thinking of this, Unparalleled Domination looked at the High Elf beside him and said, “Lady Kora, look. That’s the lurking Night Elf. I suspect that she has been corroded by the dark power. Otherwise, she would not be so savage to kill hundreds of my brothers!” The Elf Leader’s expression immediately changed. Ever since the Night Elves were expelled, there was almost no trace of any Night Elves in the Emerald City, much less anyone who dared to kill in the Emerald City. Elf Kora was furious, but when she saw the scene before her, she froze on the spot. Facing the encirclement of more than a thousand people, the Night Elf in front of her did not compromise at all. She did not even show signs of weakness. The sharp blades seemed to be growing on her as they danced crazily in the air, harvesting the lives of the adventurers. What was even more shocking was that she was barely injured. She kept flashing, and no one could even capture her location. “How can there be such a Night Elf?” Kora frowned. She had never seen such an agile Night Elf. Although she was not the strongest, she was the most agile. She danced freely in the crowd. Such a speed was unbelievable. All the High Elves were shocked. They also knew what the scene before them meant. It was the Phantom Assassin of the Night Elves. This was the legendary constitution, a natural assassin. They did not expect the current Night Elves to really have such a powerful Phantom Assassin. However, even if it was a Phantom Assassin, without the permission of the Emerald City, she were definitely not allowed to trespass into this city, much less commit murder in this city! “Master Kora, please subdue that crazy Night Elf!” Unparalleled Domination continued to beg. “I don’t need an adventurer like you to teach me what to do.” Kora replied coldly and explained, “Even if she killed someone in the Emerald City, as long as she is not corroded by the dark power, I cannot harm her life. This is the rule of the elves.” “What? How do you plan to deal with her? She’s a Night Elf. It’s obvious that she’s plotting to sneak in at this critical moment!” Unparalleled Domination said anxiously. “Even if she’s a Night Elf, she’s still an elf. According to the rules of the elves, before we determine that the other party is demonized, we elves cannot harm our own kind. Why, do you want to overthrow our rules?!” Kora glanced at him coldly, and Unparalleled Domination immediately fell silent. Behind him, a teammate tugged at his clothes and said, “Boss, this Kora is clearly biased towards the Night Elves. We’ve found the wrong person. We should find Leader Dolly. He hates the Night Elves. If he were here, he would definitely teach Tyrant’s Night Elf a lesson.” “There’s no hurry. I’ve already arranged for someone to inform Leader Dolly. This time, I’m not only dealing with Tyrant. I also want to deal with this Kora who is Leader Dolly’s archenemy. If we help Leader Dolly suppress Kora’s authority, we’ll be the ones in charge of the Emerald City in the future.” Not only was Unparalleled Domination not flustered, but he even revealed a cold smile. Hearing this, the lackeys all raised their thumbs, “Boss, you’re too awesome. You even thought of this. You’re simply our role model.” “Let’s wait and see. First, we’ll let this Kora reveal her weakness and give her a fatal blow!” “Alright, Boss. We’ll listen to you.” The Domination Guild had a plan, but Elf Leader Kora did not know. She stopped the battle and sent people to surround the Night Elves in front of her, saying, “According to the rules of the Emerald City, all the Night Elves of the Elwyn Clan are not allowed to enter the Emerald City. Why did you sneak into the Emerald City?!” Elf Leader Kora stared at Aisha sharply. However, the Night Elf girl in front of her did not seem to hear anything. She did not say a word and only held her dagger as she looked at her quietly. Kora could not be bothered to say anything to her. She directly ordered the law-enforcement elves, “Capture her!” The law-enforcement elves who received the order immediately attacked. They took out their daggers and turned invisible, quickly approaching Aisha. But at this moment, Aisha flashed behind an elf. The sharp blade in her hand was pressed against his neck. With just a little force, she could take the elf’s life. “Night Elf, you’d better think carefully. This is the Emerald City. You trespassed into the city without permission. The law-enforcement team has the right to arrest you. Considering the rules of the clan, we can’t attack you. But at the same time, you can’t kill. Once you violate the rules, what awaits you is definitely death!” Kora spoke in time, causing Aisha to hesitate. She knew the rules of the elves. They could not harm their own kind. If she killed an elf here, she would become the traitor of the elves and be despised and hunted by the entire Elf Race. Thinking of this, Aisha did not act rashly. She only held the saber against the other party’s neck to threaten them. That did not work. Kora had expected that Aisha would not dare to attack, so she made all the elves attack directly, ignoring her threat. These elves were already higher-level than Aisha. Now that they rushed up, even Aisha could not resist their attacks. In the end, she was forced to the wall of the temple by the elves. “Surrender now. I won’t kill you. As a Phantom Assassin, you are the hope of the Night Elves. I don’t want the Night Elves to disappear. After all, Elwyn was once my best friend.” Kora said in a low voice, “Leave. Leave Emerald City and don’t come again.” Just as Kora was about to escort Aisha away, another elf team appeared behind them. It was the captain of the guards, Dolly, who had arrived. “Killing in the Emerald City violates the third chapter of the Emerald City laws. As one of the guards, it’s impossible for you to not know this rule, Leader Kora.” With a bow on his back, Dolly looked directly at Kora. “It’s not up to you to discipline me!” Kora said grimly. “Hahaha, under normal circumstances, I can’t care about you, but if you knowingly break the law and try to hide the truth, that would violate the rules of the Emerald City. I can take over and supervise the situation!” Dolly laughed. He did not know how happy he was to see his opponent make a mistake. Without waiting for Kora to explain, he looked directly at Unparalleled Domination and asked, “Adventurer, tell me everything you know. The Emerald City will not let go of any criminal!” “Yes.” Unparalleled Domination said, “Leader Dolly, I reported to Elf Leader Kora that after seeing the Night Elf commit murder in the city with my own eyes. However, she did not stop them and even watched hundreds of my companions die at the hands of that crazy Night Elf. Other than that, she also abused her authority and wanted to let the Night Elf go!” “Despicable guy!” Kora’s expression darkened, “Dolly, so what if you’re trying to frame me? These false charges won’t affect me at all.” “That might not be true.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Dolly sneered. At this moment, Unparalleled Domination, who had received his signal, spoke again, “Moreover, Elf Leader Kora, after knowing that this Night Elf had privately signed a contract with a human, you still want to hide it and fundamentally destroy the rules of the elves for ten thousand years!” “What nonsense are you talking about!” Hearing this, Kora was immediately furious, “You never mentioned this matter, but now you dare to distort the truth and slander me!” With that, she charged at Unparalleled Domination angrily. But the next second, Dolly blocked her way. “Why, Kora, are you feeling angry from shame?” Dolly blocked in front of Unparalleled Domination and sneered, “With me here today, you can’t possibly harm this adventurer who dares to testify against you. I really did not expect you to hide such a huge thing. Kora, you’re really bold!” “Nonsense! I don’t know about this at all. Moreover, this guy’s words are one-sided. How can anyone believe him!” Kora gritted her teeth. The problem with this matter was larger than the Night Elves invading the Emerald City. The elves signing a contract with humans was an unforgivable thing for the elves. If she really committed this crime, she would definitely be severely punished, and she might not even have a chance to turn things around in her life. Moreover, it was impossible to explain. Now that there was no way to prove her innocence, the Emerald City would definitely punish her severely because she wanted to release the Night Elf. Although it would not endanger her life, it would destroy her future. Therefore, she could only hope that this Night Elf was pure. If she really signed a contract, it would be over. “Leader Kora, I believe in your innocence. If that was not the case, I would definitely punish this adventurer who sowed discord. However, since everyone knows about this, we have to test it!” Dolly took out a crystal. This was a detection crystal unique to the elves. It could test the purity of the elves’ souls. Once an elf with a low soul purity appeared, they would definitely have signed a contract with a human. If that was the case, this elf would receive the most severe punishment! Seeing this scene, Kora’s heart skipped a beat. This opponent of her, Dolly, had always been very cunning. Now that he dared to be so confident, it was obvious that he was completely confident. Perhaps things would really be as he had said, this Night Elf had really signed a contract with a human. As she pondered, Dolly had used the crystal to test Aisha’s soul. The crystal emitted a black light, which meant that there was another soul in the other party’s soul. She had really signed a contract with a human! Seeing the final result, Kora froze on the spot. It was over. It was truly over. This Night Elf would die. As someone who tried to break the rules, she would also be severely punished. Kora could not help but stagger. If not for someone supporting her, she would have fallen to the ground. “The evidence is conclusive, Leader Kora. Even if you have a grievance, please stay behind for the interrogation. I, Dolly, am only the leader of the guards. I can’t listen to your testimony.” A victorious smile appeared on Dolly’s face, and he ordered his elves to capture Kora. She did not resist, because there was no point now. She could only place her hopes on the Dragon of Emerald, Lady Lena. Perhaps only she could see the truth. “Someone, capture this traitor who violated the teachings of the elves. Due to her powerful strength, I allow you to use force. As long as you keep her alive, you can do whatever you want!” With Dolly’s command, more High Elves rushed towards Aisha. These elves were abnormally powerful, but Aisha could not leave this area or kill them. She could only do her best to hide and wait for her master to come out of this building. In her extremely long invisibility state, Aisha dodged many attacks and kept walking through the crowd. As time passed, Dolly could not stand it anymore. If she could not catch the other party, she would only make a fool of the other elves and adventurers in the city, so she decided to take action personally. Dolly was a Level 60 Platinum Boss. He was extremely powerful and his level was more than 20 levels higher than Aisha. As long as he attacked, Aisha would have nowhere to hide. But just as he was about to attack, a shout sounded. “Stop!” Lorne walked out of the temple after completing the dungeon. Originally, he was still excited, thinking that he could let Aisha take off her hood and play freely in the city later, while buying some clothes for the little girl. As soon as he came out, he saw the scene before him. Aisha was dodging with great difficulty against the encirclement of more than a hundred High Elves. Seeing this, the smile on Lorne’s face froze. “You bastards, what are you doing?!” Furious, Lorne glanced at everyone present with a dark expression. When he saw the members of the Domination Guild, he took out his short staff and flashed in front of Unparalleled Domination. He smashed his club down, and a terrifying force instantly poured out. “Ding! You have killed the player, Unparalleled Domination!” The powerful force directly killed the other party. The Elf Leader, Dolly, felt humiliated, because he was a guard of the Emerald City, but the other party still killed an adventurer in front of him. This was the greatest insult to his position. Dolly was furious. Energy instantly rose from his body, wanting to kill this arrogant adventurer with his own hands. But at that moment, a pair of wings appeared behind Lorne. Powerful light enveloped the entire square. Dolly froze and could not deal the fatal blow. He froze on the spot, his eyes filled with disbelief. He had not expected that this adventurer, who looked very weak, would obtain the recognition of the Dragon of Light and become a member of the angels. The Dragon of Light’s angel army was the glory of the Dragon Race. Its status was far higher than that of the elves. Even the City Lord of the Emerald City had to treat the angels respectfully. This was because the elves were an affiliated race of the Dragon Race. It was not something a mere guard leader like him could deal with. Therefore, when he saw the other party’s angel identity, he was stunned. However, he quickly reacted and shouted angrily, “How dare you pretend to be an angel!” He could not admit the other party’s identity now, or else he would be confirming his crime. Dolly could only forcefully distort the current reality and seek a chance of survival for himself. “If you think it’s fake, you can attack me. However, don’t blame me for not reminding you. I came to the Emerald City under the order of the Dragon of Light to meet Lady Lena. If you ruin the Dragon God’s plan, not to mention you, even this Emerald City might not be able to continue existing here!” Lorne floated in the air, staring at him coldly. The High Elf opposite was a high-level Boss above Level 60. Lorne could not compete with him alone, so he could only use the identity of the Dragon of Light to suppress him. Although Lorne was indeed suspected of lying, it was impossible for this elf to find Lena to verify it. Even if Lena was here, Lorne was not afraid. This was because he had the Divine Radiance mission. As the person responsible for saving the world, he firmly believed that Lena would not punish him for such a small matter. Clearly, this High Elf did not have such a high status and could not meet Lena directly, so when he heard his threat, he panicked and did not dare to act recklessly. However, he still refused to admit it. “I don’t care about your identity for the time being. Even if you are an angel approved by the Dragon of Light, you cannot sign a bond with the elves. This is the rule of the elves for the last ten thousand years. Anyone who violates it must be punished. I will report to Lady Lena about you, but now, we have to capture this Night Elf. If you want to stop me by force, I’m sorry, but we can only attack you!” Elves could not contract with any race. This was the rule that the elves had adhered to for ten thousand years. No matter who the other party was, even if it was a dragon, the elves would definitely not compromise on this matter. Unless the Dragon of Light personally came to persuade them, it was definitely impossible. This was also the main point that Dolly could be tough on. Seeing the intense attitude between the two, the players who survived from the Domination Guild were secretly happy. They wished that Dolly could directly kill Tyrant so that they could pick up his equipment and use this information to spread their reputation around the world. However, just as they were feeling happy… Lorne looked at him without panic, “If I remember correctly, elves can contract with adventurers, right?” “Of course, but this adventurer has to pass the test of the taboo mystic realm. If an adventurer really passes the test, then not only will he have the right to contract with the elves, but he will also become the most friendly companion of the elves. All elves have to give him the highest respect, but…” Dolly looked at Lorne mockingly and said, “Unfortunately, ten thousand years have passed, but no one has been able to pass this test. Don’t think that just because you have become an angel, you will have a chance to pass the taboo mystic realm. That’s impossible. In the taboo mystic realm, adventurers need to kill more than 200 monsters inside and five special Bosses. In addition, there is the final Boss guarding the exit. There are many people who can do this, but the problem is that this trial must be completed in two hours, and this is a requirement that all adventurers have not been able to fulfill for the past ten thousand years!” “Compared to this, I think you should ask the Dragon of Light for help. Only he can save this Night Elf now, but I advise you to hurry up, because she might be publicly executed in the next second!” Dooley knew the difficulty of the mystic realm. At this moment, he was extremely confident, and the way he looked at Aisha was also extremely ferocious. “Aisha, stay behind me.” Lorne faced the High Elf calmly and said to the hooded girl behind him. “Master, I…” Aisha’s eyes were misty, clearly blaming herself for this matter. It was all her fault. If not for her identity as a Night Elf, her master would not have encountered such trouble. The next second, however, Lorne took her hand and told her not to worry. In Dolly’s eyes, this was a blatant provocation. Powerful energy erupted from his body, and he wanted to take down the Night Elf. However, in the next second, his expression suddenly changed. A green emblem condensed on Lorne and Aisha’s hands. “Heavens!” The surrounding High Elves were all shocked. To them, this emblem was familiar and also unfamiliar. This was because it had been ten thousand years since such an emblem had appeared. Originally, they all thought that they would never see the appearance of this emblem again in their lives, but they did not expect that today, they would personally witness such a scene. “How… How is this possible? How can you have this emblem?!” Dolly staggered as he muttered. This emblem was the proof that he had cleared the taboo mystic realm and obtained the qualification to contract with the elves. With this emblem, the contract with the elves was reasonable. Not only was everything he had done useless, but he had also created such an enemy with infinite potential for himself. His life was over. Dolly’s expression turned ashen. This emblem had completely shattered all his schemes. Even Kora’s sins were spared. Seeing this, Kora immediately broke free and came to Lorne’s side. She knelt on one knee and said, “Guard Captain of the Emerald City, Kora, greets you, Noble Adventurer.” “Noble Adventurer?” Lorne raised an eyebrow. “Yes, any adventurer who passes the taboo mystic realm will be treated as a noble adventurer by the elves and receive the greatest respect from us. You are the hero of us elves, and in the future, you will help the elves walk on the path of glory!” Kora said solemnly. The High Elves behind also knelt on one knee, giving the greatest respect to this existence who had not appeared in the last ten thousand years. “In that case, Aisha can enter the Emerald City?” “Of course.” Kora said, “She is your elf companion. She also enjoys the glory of being a hero.” “Oh, I understand now. Aisha, go. Kill all the adventurers of the Domination Guild right now!” [Traceless Phantom]! [Phantom Blink]! Rushing into the crowd, Aisha began a massacre. With Lorne’s instructions, she was no longer confused, but returned to her initial state. The sharp blades in her hands finally began to dance. -213,000 (Critical) -219,000 (Critical) -218,000 (Critical) -214,000 (Critical) -210,000 (Critical) Because after killing, Aisha’s attacks would be critical, so the damage each time was terrifyingly 200,000 points. There was no need to consider the enemy’s defense. Under such a terrifying attack, any defense was virtual and would not have any effect. The poor Domination players were dealt a devastating blow before they could react. Aisha’s speed was far beyond their imagination. By the time they reacted, more than 50 people had already fallen. “Boss, what should we do now? Tyrant’s pets are too strange. We lost dozens of people!” A player shouted beside Barbarian. “These damned elves are allied with Tyrant. Inform our brothers to quickly retreat. Don’t stay in the Emerald City. Go into the wilderness and wait for Boss’s orders!” Seeing that the situation was bad, Barbarian quickly gave the order to retreat. Although they had a thousand people, they had already lost more than a hundred people during the conversation just now. At this rate, these thousand people would be wiped out in less than a minute. There was no way to fight. After receiving the order, the players of the Domination Guild covered their heads and scattered. After blending into the crowd, it was difficult to kill them anymore. However, many people could not escape in time and died under Aisha’s sharp blades. Seeing this scene, the surrounding players were excited. “She has unlimited uses of Blink which is equivalent to infinitely dodging attacks? Isn’t this too invincible?” “Tyrant’s pet is indeed extraordinary.” “This is a true assassin.” “In the million-strong army, she could come and go as she pleased. Goddess Aisha is indeed powerful.” … “Ding! Your pet has killed the player [Domination – Little Jiro]!” “Ding! Your pet has killed the player [Domination – Red Armor]!” “Ding! Your pet has killed the player [Domination – No Talking When Eating]!” “Ding! Your pet has killed the player [Domination – Bedwetting 3-Year-Old]!” “…” On Lorne’s interface, information about kills kept flashing. There were more than a dozen messages every second. This was Aisha’s full strength. Her attack speed and damage had reached the limit. Lorne watched everything calmly. The High Elves did not stop him. They were already shocked by the scene before them. So this was the true strength of the Phantom Assassin. No wonder it was called a legendary class! White light flashed at the scene, and Aisha finally stopped. She took a minute and a half to kill 517 people. Because too many people had been killed, Lorne’s name was dark red. The surrounding players gave him greedy looks. Killing a red-named player would drop a large amount of equipment. If they killed Tyrant, they would definitely obtain a divine equipment. Unfortunately, this could only exist in their imagination. In this world, there was not a single adventurer who could kill Tyrant. “Master, some people are hiding in the crowd. I can’t catch up.” Aisha felt that she had not done well enough. She could not help but lower her head in self-blame. Seeing her like this, Lorne smiled gently and raised his hand to help her remove her hood. Feeling her face exposed to everyone, Aisha quickly lowered her head. But the next moment, Lorne’s finger raised it. “You don’t have to wear a hood anymore. You’re the most noble among the elves.” Lorne comforted her. “Master, thank you.” Aisha’s eyes widened, joyful tears falling from the sides of her beautiful face. At this moment, Captain Kora stood beside him and said, “Noble Adventurer, our City Lord sends an invitation to you.” As the only qualified adventurer in ten thousand years, he was the most respected guest in the Emerald City and even the entire Elf Race. The City Lord of the Emerald City also sent an invitation immediately. Without thinking, Lorne agreed. Since his identity was so noble, he should be able to use this chance to directly obtain the two mission materials from the City Lord. He followed Kora into the City Lord’s area of the Emerald City and passed through the beautiful corridor. Finally, in a huge castle, he saw the City Lord of the Emerald City—Fanny. This Elf City Lord was dressed in gorgeous clothes. She sat behind the curtain and stood in the hall. Only through the curtain could one see a faint outline. “City Lord, this is the human adventurer who passed the taboo mystic realm.” Kora bowed and introduced. “Yes, you can leave first. I already know what happened.” The City Lord sitting behind the curtain said. Her voice was very dignified, and the words she said seemed to be an order that could not be rejected. Hearing this, Kora nodded and walked out of the hall. At this moment, the City Lord spoke again, “Honorable Hero, actually, from the moment you entered the taboo mystic realm, I had already paid attention to you. I thought that you were the one with the greatest hope of passing the test, but what I did not expect was that you only used half the time to complete all of this. I have to say, you are indeed the adventurer with the greatest potential I have ever seen.” “Perhaps you already know that after passing the taboo mystic realm, you will have the right to sign a contract with the elves, but you might not know what it meant for us elves when you passed the test.” Lorne frowned. He had heard the other party call him ‘Hero’. However, he did not know the true meaning of this title for now. Now that he heard the City Lord mention this, he was immediately curious. “The truth is, this taboo mystic realm is not only for the sake of the elf contract, but also for the future of the elves.” “Ten thousand years ago, an adventurer helped our elves preserve the only Ancient Tree of Life in the world. However, after ten thousand years, the Ancient Tree of Life is about to undergo a special transformation. In order to succeed in this transformation, we need some special materials. These things are very precious, and some even exist in special mystic realms that only adventurers can enter. Therefore, after obtaining the prophecy of the Ancient Tree of Life, we began to set up the taboo mystic realm.” “At the same time, in order to stimulate the enthusiasm of the adventurers, we also spread the news that as long as they passed the test, they can contract with the elves.” Hearing the Elf City Lord’s story, Lorne roughly understood the truth. It turned out that the elves did not think that they were high and mighty and did not want to communicate with other races. Instead, after saving the Ancient Tree of Life, it made a prophecy and said that it needed to transform ten thousand years later. It also let the elves plan for this matter. Finally, the elves thought of setting up a taboo mystic realm. In the beginning, it was to find powerful adventurers and let them help the elves find the special materials they needed. However, because it had been too long, and the matter regarding the Hero was hidden by the higher-ups, the elves later became more and more arrogant, even looking down on any race. In the end, this happened. To this day, many elves still thought that no one had ever cleared the taboo mystic realm, but in fact, this mystic realm had been cleared many times in the past ten thousand years. Moreover, every adventurer who cleared it finally became a famous figure in the history books. This included the archer of the six major classes. He had once been the most powerful adventurer the elves knew. It turned out that he was indeed the most powerful adventurer, but the problem was that before he became a god, he did not help the elves prepare all the materials. There were still some special materials left empty now, and the time for the Ancient Tree of Life to transform was coming soon. Therefore, the elves were actually very anxious now. They even wanted to cooperate with the Human Empire and let all the adventurers actively challenge the mystic realm. Not long ago, the City Lord of the Emerald City, Fanny, had participated in a meeting regarding this. However, not long after the meeting ended, she encountered an adventurer who had completely cleared the dungeon, which made her very excited. As for what had happened in the square, she had already favored Lorne. If anything happened, she would definitely help him immediately. However, everything was easily resolved by him, so she did not have a chance to help. Thinking about this, Lorne immediately knew his position now. Since he was important, it should not be difficult to obtain some gems and soil. While he was thinking, she said, “Young Hero, please help the elves. We will be grateful for your help.” “I can help you, but I have a favor to ask of you.” Lorne first agreed to the other party’s request and then made his own request. “No problem. Feel free to ask. As long as it’s within my ability, I’ll do my best.” “My matter is actually very simple. I want some Soil of Life and some Natural Crystals.” Lorne stated his needs. In the end, she could not help but frown and say, “Mr. Hero, I know the purpose of you wanting the Soil of Life is definitely to save the branch of the Ancient Tree of Life of the Night Elves. We can provide you with this, but we can’t provide you with the Natural Crystals for the time being.” “Why?” “This…” Fanny hesitated and continued, “There are many Natural Crystals in the Emerald City, but we can’t hand them to Mr. Hero, because all the Natural Crystals in the Emerald City are dedicated to the Dragon of Emerald. Almost all the Natural Crystals are at the highest level of the Elven Holy Temple. Without the permission of the Dragon of Emerald, we can’t approach that place, much less touch anything there. Otherwise, we will definitely anger the Dragon of Emerald. ” “Is there no other way to obtain the Nature Crystal?” Lorne asked. “Yes, but we have to wait fifteen days, because that’s when the Natural Crystals will be condensed. Moreover, even if we obtain the Natural Crystals, we have to send it to the temple of the Dragon of Emerald. This is something that Lady Lena has strictly instructed. I can’t make a decision on my own.” “Alright, it just so happens that I want to meet the Dragon of Emerald. I’ll ask her for it later.” Lorne murmured, then looked at Fanny and said, “Can you give me the Soil of Life first?” “Sure, I’ll get someone to go get it.” Without hesitation, she immediately sent someone to the warehouse to collect the materials. Soon, Lorne obtained the soil he wanted and left the City Lord’s area for the time being. Although he was the adventurer that the elves had been waiting for, he was still too weak. He could only accept the elves’ mission after he completed his Class Three Advancement. However, he could not leave this place yet, because he had to meet the Dragon of Emerald. The mission regarding the Divine Radiance could only be completed after seeing her. In addition, he had not obtained the Nature Crystals. He had to think of a solution. Just now, he had observed the Elven Holy Temple. At the bottom was an area where the elves could live. The higher-ups were all living in the domain of the Dragon of Emerald. Without permission, no one was allowed to enter, and the Nature Crystals were inside. However, the defense there was extremely tight. It seemed that he could not sneak in. “Will the Ghost Deity Necklace be detected?” Lorne touched his chin. He had the Ghost Deity Necklace on him. This was a Mythical equipment. According to the notification of the equipment, in the Ghost Deity state, no one could discover it. Lorne was confident against the elven guards. However, this time, he was entering the Dragon of Emerald’s bedroom. The situation inside must be very complicated. This was definitely very risky. It might implicate his other mission. “I should complete the mission of the Dragon of Emerald first.” Lorne temporarily gave up on the idea of infiltrating. He planned to accept his mission first and wait for an opportunity to act. He would enter the temple where the Dragon of Emerald was and check his surroundings. Just like that, he accompanied Aisha around the city and quickly received a message from the elves. It turned out that the Dragon of Emerald was about to descend. Lorne returned to the Elven Holy Temple. Under the lead of the elves, he passed through the bottom temple and moved up a guarded corridor. After walking for more than ten minutes, he finally arrived at the temple where the Dragon of Emerald had descended. This was the highest platform. It was open-air. There were trees dozens of meters tall around it. There were even soft grass on the ground. The scene of birds singing and flowers was refreshing. Lorne looked around and found a large number of transparent gems on the ground. They were glowing with a dreamlike rainbow light, and it was obvious that they were not ordinary materials. He was about to pick up the gem when the entire sky darkened. He heard the system notification. Ding! “Due to special reasons, in order to protect its data safety, the Divine Realm system has forcefully closed the connection service and entered a self-protection state!” Closing the connection service? When he heard this information, Lorne was stunned. Just now, he thought that he had triggered some special mission, but on careful look, he realized that the Divine Realm game had sealed itself. How was this possible! Lorne could not believe what he was seeing. If the information he saw now was correct, then the players should not be able to enter this game. Just like a game maintenance period, all players should be unable to enter the game, unlike now when Lorne was still inside the game world. This was a virtual game. Virtual games were connected through mental consciousness. If the game cut off the connection now, it meant that the players’ consciousness were imprisoned in this virtual world. This was extremely terrifying for humans. In a rare case, Lorne started to panic. He quickly took out the system interface and looked for the logout button on it. However, following that, something that made his hair stand on end occurred. The system interface that had the option to logout suddenly dimmed. No matter how he clicked, he could not choose to logout. Just as he was feeling fear, the scene before him suddenly darkened. All five senses disappeared, and his consciousness fell into eternal darkness.